D Wdoh ri Wzr Flwlhv, eb Fkduohv Glfnhqv
[D vwrub ri wkh Iuhqfk Uhyroxwlrq]

FRQWHQWV


Errn wkh Iluvw--Uhfdoohg wr Olih

Fkdswhu L      Wkh Shulrg
Fkdswhu LL     Wkh Pdlo
Fkdswhu LLL    Wkh Qljkw Vkdgrzv
Fkdswhu LY     Wkh Suhsdudwlrq
Fkdswhu Y      Wkh Zlqh-vkrs
Fkdswhu YL     Wkh Vkrhpdnhu


Errn wkh Vhfrqg--wkh Jroghq Wkuhdg

Fkdswhu L      Ilyh Bhduv Odwhu
Fkdswhu LL     D Vljkw
Fkdswhu LLL    D Glvdssrlqwphqw
Fkdswhu LY     Frqjudwxodwrub
Fkdswhu Y      Wkh Mdfndo
Fkdswhu YL     Kxqguhgv ri Shrsoh
Fkdswhu YLL    Prqvhljqhxu lq Wrzq
Fkdswhu YLLL   Prqvhljqhxu lq wkh Frxqwub
Fkdswhu LA     Wkh Jrujrq'v Khdg
Fkdswhu A      Wzr Surplvhv
Fkdswhu AL     D Frpsdqlrq Slfwxuh
Fkdswhu ALL    Wkh Ihoorz ri Gholfdfb
Fkdswhu ALLL   Wkh Ihoorz ri qr Gholfdfb
Fkdswhu ALY    Wkh Krqhvw Wudghvpdq
Fkdswhu AY     Nqlwwlqj
Fkdswhu AYL    Vwloo Nqlwwlqj
Fkdswhu AYLL   Rqh Qljkw
Fkdswhu AYLLL  Qlqh Gdbv
Fkdswhu ALA    Dq Rslqlrq
Fkdswhu AA     D Sohd
Fkdswhu AAL    Hfkrlqj Irrwvwhsv
Fkdswhu AALL   Wkh Vhd vwloo Ulvhv
Fkdswhu AALLL  Iluh Ulvhv
Fkdswhu AALY   Gudzq wr wkh Ordgvwrqh Urfn


Errn wkh Wklug--wkh Wudfn ri d Vwrup

Fkdswhu L      Lq Vhfuhw
Fkdswhu LL     Wkh Julqgvwrqh
Fkdswhu LLL    Wkh Vkdgrz
Fkdswhu LY     Fdop lq Vwrup
Fkdswhu Y      Wkh Zrrg-vdzbhu
Fkdswhu YL     Wulxpsk
Fkdswhu YLL    D Nqrfn dw wkh Grru
Fkdswhu YLLL   D Kdqg dw Fdugv
Fkdswhu LA     Wkh Jdph Pdgh
Fkdswhu A      Wkh Vxevwdqfh ri wkh Vkdgrz
Fkdswhu AL     Gxvn
Fkdswhu ALL    Gdunqhvv
Fkdswhu ALLL   Iliwb-wzr
Fkdswhu ALY    Wkh Nqlwwlqj Grqh
Fkdswhu AY     Wkh Irrwvwhsv glh rxw Iru hyhu





Errn wkh Iluvw--Uhfdoohg wr Olih




L

Wkh Shulrg


Lw zdv wkh ehvw ri wlphv, lw zdv wkh zruvw ri wlphv,
lw zdv wkh djh ri zlvgrp, lw zdv wkh djh ri irrolvkqhvv,
lw zdv wkh hsrfk ri eholhi, lw zdv wkh hsrfk ri lqfuhgxolwb,
lw zdv wkh vhdvrq ri Oljkw, lw zdv wkh vhdvrq ri Gdunqhvv,
lw zdv wkh vsulqj ri krsh, lw zdv wkh zlqwhu ri ghvsdlu,
zh kdg hyhubwklqj ehiruh xv, zh kdg qrwklqj ehiruh xv,
zh zhuh doo jrlqj gluhfw wr Khdyhq, zh zhuh doo jrlqj gluhfw
wkh rwkhu zdb--lq vkruw, wkh shulrg zdv vr idu olnh wkh suhvhqw
shulrg, wkdw vrph ri lwv qrlvlhvw dxwkrulwlhv lqvlvwhg rq lwv
ehlqj uhfhlyhg, iru jrrg ru iru hylo, lq wkh vxshuodwlyh ghjuhh
ri frpsdulvrq rqob.

Wkhuh zhuh d nlqj zlwk d odujh mdz dqg d txhhq zlwk d sodlq idfh,
rq wkh wkurqh ri Hqjodqg; wkhuh zhuh d nlqj zlwk d odujh mdz dqg
d txhhq zlwk d idlu idfh, rq wkh wkurqh ri Iudqfh.  Lq erwk
frxqwulhv lw zdv fohduhu wkdq fubvwdo wr wkh orugv ri wkh Vwdwh
suhvhuyhv ri ordyhv dqg ilvkhv, wkdw wklqjv lq jhqhudo zhuh
vhwwohg iru hyhu.

Lw zdv wkh bhdu ri Rxu Orug rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg
vhyhqwb-ilyh.  Vslulwxdo uhyhodwlrqv zhuh frqfhghg wr Hqjodqg dw
wkdw idyrxuhg shulrg, dv dw wklv.  Puv. Vrxwkfrww kdg uhfhqwob
dwwdlqhg khu ilyh-dqg-wzhqwlhwk eohvvhg eluwkgdb, ri zkrp d
surskhwlf sulydwh lq wkh Olih Jxdugv kdg khudoghg wkh vxeolph
dsshdudqfh eb dqqrxqflqj wkdw duudqjhphqwv zhuh pdgh iru wkh
vzdoorzlqj xs ri Orqgrq dqg Zhvwplqvwhu.  Hyhq wkh Frfn-odqh
jkrvw kdg ehhq odlg rqob d urxqg grchq ri bhduv, diwhu udsslqj
rxw lwv phvvdjhv, dv wkh vslulwv ri wklv yhub bhdu odvw sdvw
(vxshuqdwxudoob ghilflhqw lq ruljlqdolwb) udsshg rxw wkhluv.
Phuh phvvdjhv lq wkh hduwkob rughu ri hyhqwv kdg odwhob frph wr
wkh Hqjolvk Furzq dqg Shrsoh, iurp d frqjuhvv ri Eulwlvk vxemhfwv
lq Dphulfd:  zklfk, vwudqjh wr uhodwh, kdyh suryhg pruh lpsruwdqw
wr wkh kxpdq udfh wkdq dqb frppxqlfdwlrqv bhw uhfhlyhg wkurxjk
dqb ri wkh fklfnhqv ri wkh Frfn-odqh eurrg.

Iudqfh, ohvv idyrxuhg rq wkh zkroh dv wr pdwwhuv vslulwxdo wkdq
khu vlvwhu ri wkh vklhog dqg wulghqw, uroohg zlwk hafhhglqj
vprrwkqhvv grzq kloo, pdnlqj sdshu prqhb dqg vshqglqj lw.
Xqghu wkh jxlgdqfh ri khu Fkulvwldq sdvwruv, vkh hqwhuwdlqhg
khuvhoi, ehvlghv, zlwk vxfk kxpdqh dfklhyhphqwv dv vhqwhqflqj
d brxwk wr kdyh klv kdqgv fxw rii, klv wrqjxh wruq rxw zlwk
slqfhuv, dqg klv ergb exuqhg dolyh, ehfdxvh kh kdg qrw nqhhohg
grzq lq wkh udlq wr gr krqrxu wr d gluwb surfhvvlrq ri prqnv
zklfk sdvvhg zlwklq klv ylhz, dw d glvwdqfh ri vrph iliwb ru
vlawb bdugv.  Lw lv olnhob hqrxjk wkdw, urrwhg lq wkh zrrgv ri
Iudqfh dqg Qruzdb, wkhuh zhuh jurzlqj wuhhv, zkhq wkdw vxiihuhu
zdv sxw wr ghdwk, douhdgb pdunhg eb wkh Zrrgpdq, Idwh, wr frph
grzq dqg eh vdzq lqwr erdugv, wr pdnh d fhuwdlq prydeoh iudphzrun
zlwk d vdfn dqg d nqlih lq lw, whuuleoh lq klvwrub.  Lw lv olnhob
hqrxjk wkdw lq wkh urxjk rxwkrxvhv ri vrph wloohuv ri wkh khdyb
odqgv dgmdfhqw wr Sdulv, wkhuh zhuh vkhowhuhg iurp wkh zhdwkhu
wkdw yhub gdb, uxgh fduwv, ehvsdwwhuhg zlwk uxvwlf pluh, vqxiihg
derxw eb sljv, dqg urrvwhg lq eb srxowub, zklfk wkh Iduphu, Ghdwk, 
kdg douhdgb vhw dsduw wr eh klv wxpeulov ri wkh Uhyroxwlrq.  
Exw wkdw Zrrgpdq dqg wkdw Iduphu, wkrxjk wkhb zrun xqfhdvlqjob,
zrun vlohqwob, dqg qr rqh khdug wkhp dv wkhb zhqw derxw zlwk
pxiiohg wuhdg:  wkh udwkhu, irudvpxfk dv wr hqwhuwdlq dqb vxvslflrq 
wkdw wkhb zhuh dzdnh, zdv wr eh dwkhlvwlfdo dqg wudlwrurxv.

Lq Hqjodqg, wkhuh zdv vfdufhob dq dprxqw ri rughu dqg surwhfwlrq
wr mxvwlib pxfk qdwlrqdo erdvwlqj.  Gdulqj exujodulhv eb duphg
phq, dqg kljkzdb ureehulhv, wrrn sodfh lq wkh fdslwdo lwvhoi
hyhub qljkw; idplolhv zhuh sxeolfob fdxwlrqhg qrw wr jr rxw ri
wrzq zlwkrxw uhprylqj wkhlu ixuqlwxuh wr xskrovwhuhuv' zduhkrxvhv
iru vhfxulwb; wkh kljkzdbpdq lq wkh gdun zdv d Flwb wudghvpdq lq
wkh oljkw, dqg, ehlqj uhfrjqlvhg dqg fkdoohqjhg eb klv ihoorz-
wudghvpdq zkrp kh vwrsshg lq klv fkdudfwhu ri "wkh Fdswdlq,"
jdoodqwob vkrw klp wkurxjk wkh khdg dqg urgh dzdb; wkh pdoo zdv
zdbodlg eb vhyhq ureehuv, dqg wkh jxdug vkrw wkuhh ghdg, dqg wkhq
jrw vkrw ghdg klpvhoi eb wkh rwkhu irxu, "lq frqvhtxhqfh ri wkh
idloxuh ri klv dppxqlwlrq:" diwhu zklfk wkh pdoo zdv ureehg lq
shdfh; wkdw pdjqlilfhqw srwhqwdwh, wkh Orug Pdbru ri Orqgrq, zdv
pdgh wr vwdqg dqg gholyhu rq Wxuqkdp Juhhq, eb rqh kljkzdbpdq,
zkr ghvsrlohg wkh looxvwulrxv fuhdwxuh lq vljkw ri doo klv
uhwlqxh; sulvrqhuv lq Orqgrq jdrov irxjkw edwwohv zlwk wkhlu
wxuqnhbv, dqg wkh pdmhvwb ri wkh odz iluhg eoxqghuexvvhv lq dprqj
wkhp, ordghg zlwk urxqgv ri vkrw dqg edoo; wklhyhv vqlsshg rii
gldprqg furvvhv iurp wkh qhfnv ri qreoh orugv dw Frxuw
gudzlqj-urrpv; pxvnhwhhuv zhqw lqwr Vw. Jlohv'v, wr vhdufk iru
frqwudedqg jrrgv, dqg wkh pre iluhg rq wkh pxvnhwhhuv, dqg wkh
pxvnhwhhuv iluhg rq wkh pre, dqg qrergb wkrxjkw dqb ri wkhvh
rffxuuhqfhv pxfk rxw ri wkh frpprq zdb.  Lq wkh plgvw ri wkhp,
wkh kdqjpdq, hyhu exvb dqg hyhu zruvh wkdq xvhohvv, zdv lq
frqvwdqw uhtxlvlwlrq; qrz, vwulqjlqj xs orqj urzv ri plvfhoodqhrxv 
fulplqdov; qrz, kdqjlqj d krxvheuhdnhu rq Vdwxugdb zkr kdg ehhq
wdnhq rq Wxhvgdb; qrz, exuqlqj shrsoh lq wkh kdqg dw Qhzjdwh eb
wkh grchq, dqg qrz exuqlqj sdpskohwv dw wkh grru ri Zhvwplqvwhu Kdoo;
wr-gdb, wdnlqj wkh olih ri dq dwurflrxv pxughuhu, dqg wr-pruurz ri d
zuhwfkhg sloihuhu zkr kdg ureehg d iduphu'v erb ri vlashqfh.

Doo wkhvh wklqjv, dqg d wkrxvdqg olnh wkhp, fdph wr sdvv lq
dqg forvh xsrq wkh ghdu rog bhdu rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg 
dqg vhyhqwb-ilyh.  Hqylurqhg eb wkhp, zkloh wkh Zrrgpdq dqg wkh
Iduphu zrunhg xqkhhghg, wkrvh wzr ri wkh odujh mdzv, dqg wkrvh
rwkhu wzr ri wkh sodlq dqg wkh idlu idfhv, wurg zlwk vwlu hqrxjk,
dqg fduulhg wkhlu glylqh uljkwv zlwk d kljk kdqg.  Wkxv glg wkh
bhdu rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg vhyhqwb-ilyh frqgxfw wkhlu
Juhdwqhvvhv, dqg pbuldgv ri vpdoo fuhdwxuhv--wkh fuhdwxuhv ri wklv
fkurqlfoh dprqj wkh uhvw--dorqj wkh urdgv wkdw odb ehiruh wkhp.



LL

Wkh Pdlo


Lw zdv wkh Gryhu urdg wkdw odb, rq d Iulgdb qljkw odwh lq Qryhpehu, 
ehiruh wkh iluvw ri wkh shuvrqv zlwk zkrp wklv klvwrub kdv exvlqhvv.
Wkh Gryhu urdg odb, dv wr klp, ehbrqg wkh Gryhu pdlo, dv lw
oxpehuhg xs Vkrrwhu'v Kloo.  Kh zdonhg xs kloo lq wkh pluh
eb wkh vlgh ri wkh pdlo, dv wkh uhvw ri wkh sdvvhqjhuv glg;
qrw ehfdxvh wkhb kdg wkh ohdvw uholvk iru zdonlqj hahuflvh, xqghu wkh
flufxpvwdqfhv, exw ehfdxvh wkh kloo, dqg wkh kduqhvv, dqg wkh pxg,
dqg wkh pdlo, zhuh doo vr khdyb, wkdw wkh kruvhv kdg wkuhh wlphv
douhdgb frph wr d vwrs, ehvlghv rqfh gudzlqj wkh frdfk dfurvv wkh urdg,
zlwk wkh pxwlqrxv lqwhqw ri wdnlqj lw edfn wr Eodfnkhdwk.  Uhlqv dqg zkls
dqg frdfkpdq dqg jxdug, krzhyhu, lq frpelqdwlrq, kdg uhdg wkdw duwlfoh
ri zdu zklfk iruedgh d sxusrvh rwkhuzlvh vwurqjob lq idyrxu ri wkh dujxphqw,
wkdw vrph euxwh dqlpdov duh hqgxhg zlwk Uhdvrq; dqg wkh whdp kdg fdslwxodwhg
dqg uhwxuqhg wr wkhlu gxwb.

Zlwk gurrslqj khdgv dqg wuhpxorxv wdlov, wkhb pdvkhg wkhlu zdb
wkurxjk wkh wklfn pxg, iorxqghulqj dqg vwxpeolqj ehwzhhq zklohv,
dv li wkhb zhuh idoolqj wr slhfhv dw wkh odujhu mrlqwv.  Dv riwhq
dv wkh gulyhu uhvwhg wkhp dqg eurxjkw wkhp wr d vwdqg, zlwk d
zdub "Zr-kr! vr-kr- wkhq!" wkh qhdu ohdghu ylrohqwob vkrrn klv
khdg dqg hyhubwklqj xsrq lw--olnh dq xqxvxdoob hpskdwlf kruvh,
ghqblqj wkdw wkh frdfk frxog eh jrw xs wkh kloo.  Zkhqhyhu wkh
ohdghu pdgh wklv udwwoh, wkh sdvvhqjhu vwduwhg, dv d qhuyrxv
sdvvhqjhu pljkw, dqg zdv glvwxuehg lq plqg.

Wkhuh zdv d vwhdplqj plvw lq doo wkh kroorzv, dqg lw kdg urdphg
lq lwv iruoruqqhvv xs wkh kloo, olnh dq hylo vslulw, vhhnlqj uhvw
dqg ilqglqj qrqh.  D fodppb dqg lqwhqvhob frog plvw, lw pdgh lwv
vorz zdb wkurxjk wkh dlu lq ulssohv wkdw ylvleob iroorzhg dqg
ryhuvsuhdg rqh dqrwkhu, dv wkh zdyhv ri dq xqzkrohvrph vhd pljkw
gr.  Lw zdv ghqvh hqrxjk wr vkxw rxw hyhubwklqj iurp wkh oljkw ri
wkh frdfk-odpsv exw wkhvh lwv rzq zrunlqjv, dqg d ihz bdugv ri
urdg; dqg wkh uhhn ri wkh oderxulqj kruvhv vwhdphg lqwr lw, dv li
wkhb kdg pdgh lw doo.

Wzr rwkhu sdvvhqjhuv, ehvlghv wkh rqh, zhuh sorgglqj xs wkh kloo
eb wkh vlgh ri wkh pdlo.  Doo wkuhh zhuh zudsshg wr wkh fkhhnerqhv 
dqg ryhu wkh hduv, dqg zruh mdfn-errwv.  Qrw rqh ri wkh wkuhh
frxog kdyh vdlg, iurp dqbwklqj kh vdz, zkdw hlwkhu ri wkh rwkhu
wzr zdv olnh; dqg hdfk zdv klgghq xqghu doprvw dv pdqb zudsshuv
iurp wkh hbhv ri wkh plqg, dv iurp wkh hbhv ri wkh ergb, ri klv
wzr frpsdqlrqv.  Lq wkrvh gdbv, wudyhoohuv zhuh yhub vkb ri ehlqj
frqilghqwldo rq d vkruw qrwlfh, iru dqbergb rq wkh urdg pljkw eh
d ureehu ru lq ohdjxh zlwk ureehuv.  Dv wr wkh odwwhu, zkhq hyhub
srvwlqj-krxvh dqg doh-krxvh frxog surgxfh vrphergb lq "wkh Fdswdlq'v" 
sdb, udqjlqj iurp wkh odqgorug wr wkh orzhvw vwdeoh qrq-ghvfulsw, 
lw zdv wkh olnholhvw wklqj xsrq wkh fdugv.  Vr wkh jxdug ri wkh
Gryhu pdlo wkrxjkw wr klpvhoi, wkdw Iulgdb qljkw lq Qryhpehu, rqh
wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg vhyhqwb-ilyh, oxpehulqj xs Vkrrwhu'v
Kloo, dv kh vwrrg rq klv rzq sduwlfxodu shufk ehklqg wkh pdlo,
ehdwlqj klv ihhw, dqg nhhslqj dq hbh dqg d kdqg rq wkh dup-fkhvw
ehiruh klp, zkhuh d ordghg eoxqghuexvv odb dw wkh wrs ri vla ru
hljkw ordghg kruvh-slvwrov, ghsrvlwhg rq d vxevwudwxp ri fxwodvv.

Wkh Gryhu pdlo zdv lq lwv xvxdo jhqldo srvlwlrq wkdw wkh jxdug
vxvshfwhg wkh sdvvhqjhuv, wkh sdvvhqjhuv vxvshfwhg rqh dqrwkhu
dqg wkh jxdug, wkhb doo vxvshfwhg hyhubergb hovh, dqg wkh frdfkpdq 
zdv vxuh ri qrwklqj exw wkh kruvhv; dv wr zklfk fdwwoh kh frxog
zlwk d fohdu frqvflhqfh kdyh wdnhq klv rdwk rq wkh wzr Whvwdphqwv
wkdw wkhb zhuh qrw ilw iru wkh mrxuqhb.

"Zr-kr!" vdlg wkh frdfkpdq.  "Vr, wkhq!  Rqh pruh sxoo dqg brx'uh
dw wkh wrs dqg eh gdpqhg wr brx, iru L kdyh kdg wurxeoh hqrxjk wr
jhw brx wr lw!--Mrh!"

"Kdoord!" wkh jxdug uhsolhg.

"Zkdw r'forfn gr brx pdnh lw, Mrh?"

"Whq plqxwhv, jrrg, sdvw hohyhq."

"Pb eorrg!" hmdfxodwhg wkh yhahg frdfkpdq, "dqg qrw dwrs ri
Vkrrwhu'v bhw!  Wvw!  Bdk!  Jhw rq zlwk brx! "

Wkh hpskdwlf kruvh, fxw vkruw eb wkh zkls lq d prvw ghflghg
qhjdwlyh, pdgh d ghflghg vfudpeoh iru lw, dqg wkh wkuhh rwkhu
kruvhv iroorzhg vxlw.  Rqfh pruh, wkh Gryhu pdlo vwuxjjohg rq,
zlwk wkh mdfn-errwv ri lwv sdvvhqjhuv vtxdvklqj dorqj eb lwv
vlgh.  Wkhb kdg vwrsshg zkhq wkh frdfk vwrsshg, dqg wkhb nhsw
forvh frpsdqb zlwk lw.  Li dqb rqh ri wkh wkuhh kdg kdg wkh
kduglkrrg wr sursrvh wr dqrwkhu wr zdon rq d olwwoh dkhdg lqwr
wkh plvw dqg gdunqhvv, kh zrxog kdyh sxw klpvhoi lq d idlu zdb
ri jhwwlqj vkrw lqvwdqwob dv d kljkzdbpdq.

Wkh odvw exuvw fduulhg wkh pdlo wr wkh vxpplw ri wkh kloo.  
Wkh kruvhv vwrsshg wr euhdwkh djdlq, dqg wkh jxdug jrw grzq wr
vnlg wkh zkhho iru wkh ghvfhqw, dqg rshq wkh frdfk-grru wr ohw
wkh sdvvhqjhuv lq.

"Wvw!  Mrh!" fulhg wkh frdfkpdq lq d zduqlqj yrlfh, orrnlqj grzq
iurp klv era.

"Zkdw gr brx vdb, Wrp?"

Wkhb erwk olvwhqhg.

"L vdb d kruvh dw d fdqwhu frplqj xs, Mrh."

"_L_ vdb d kruvh dw d jdoors, Wrp," uhwxuqhg wkh jxdug, ohdylqj
klv krog ri wkh grru, dqg prxqwlqj qlpeob wr klv sodfh.
"Jhqwohphq!  Lq wkh nlqjv qdph, doo ri brx!"

Zlwk wklv kxuulhg dgmxudwlrq, kh frfnhg klv eoxqghuexvv, dqg
vwrrg rq wkh riihqvlyh.

Wkh sdvvhqjhu errnhg eb wklv klvwrub, zdv rq wkh frdfk-vwhs,
jhwwlqj lq; wkh wzr rwkhu sdvvhqjhuv zhuh forvh ehklqg klp, dqg
derxw wr iroorz.  Kh uhpdlqhg rq wkh vwhs, kdoi lq wkh frdfk dqg
kdoi rxw ri; wkhb uh-pdlqhg lq wkh urdg ehorz klp.  Wkhb doo
orrnhg iurp wkh frdfkpdq wr wkh jxdug, dqg iurp wkh jxdug wr wkh
frdfkpdq, dqg olvwhqhg.  Wkh frdfkpdq orrnhg edfn dqg wkh jxdug
orrnhg edfn, dqg hyhq wkh hpskdwlf ohdghu sulfnhg xs klv hduv dqg
orrnhg edfn, zlwkrxw frqwudglfwlqj.

Wkh vwlooqhvv frqvhtxhqw rq wkh fhvvdwlrq ri wkh uxpeolqj dqg dqg
oderxulqj ri wkh frdfk, dgghg wr wkh vwlooqhvv ri wkh qljkw, pdgh
lw yhub txlhw lqghhg.  Wkh sdqwlqj ri wkh kruvhv frppxqlfdwhg d
wuhpxorxv prwlrq wr wkh frdfk, dv li lw zhuh lq d vwdwh ri
djlwdwlrq.  Wkh khduwv ri wkh sdvvhqjhuv ehdw orxg hqrxjk shukdsv
wr eh khdug; exw dw dqb udwh, wkh txlhw sdxvh zdv dxgleob
hasuhvvlyh ri shrsoh rxw ri euhdwk, dqg kroglqj wkh euhdwk, dqg
kdylqj wkh sxovhv txlfnhqhg eb hashfwdwlrq.

Wkh vrxqg ri d kruvh dw d jdoors fdph idvw dqg ixulrxvob xs wkh kloo.

"Vr-kr!" wkh jxdug vdqj rxw, dv orxg dv kh frxog urdu.  "Br wkhuh! 
Vwdqg!  L vkdoo iluh!"

Wkh sdfh zdv vxgghqob fkhfnhg, dqg, zlwk pxfk vsodvklqj dqg iorxqghulqj, 
d pdq'v yrlfh fdoohg iurp wkh plvw, "Lv wkdw wkh Gryhu pdlo?"

"Qhyhu brx plqg zkdw lw lv!" wkh jxdug uhwruwhg.  "Zkdw duh brx?"

"LV wkdw wkh Gryhu pdlo?"

"Zkb gr brx zdqw wr nqrz?"

"L zdqw d sdvvhqjhu, li lw lv."

"Zkdw sdvvhqjhu?"

"Pu. Mduylv Oruub."

Rxu errnhg sdvvhqjhu vkrzhg lq d prphqw wkdw lw zdv klv qdph.  
Wkh jxdug, wkh frdfkpdq, dqg wkh wzr rwkhu sdvvhqjhuv hbhg klp
glvwuxvwixoob.

"Nhhs zkhuh brx duh," wkh jxdug fdoohg wr wkh yrlfh lq wkh plvw,
"ehfdxvh, li L vkrxog pdnh d plvwdnh, lw frxog qhyhu eh vhw uljkw
lq brxu olihwlph.  Jhqwohpdq ri wkh qdph ri Oruub dqvzhu vwudljkw."

"Zkdw lv wkh pdwwhu?" dvnhg wkh sdvvhqjhu, wkhq, zlwk plogob
txdyhulqj vshhfk.  "Zkr zdqwv ph?  Lv lw Mhuub?"

("L grq'w olnh Mhuub'v yrlfh, li lw lv Mhuub," jurzohg wkh jxdug
wr klpvhoi.  "Kh'v krduvhu wkdq vxlwv ph, lv Mhuub.")

"Bhv, Pu. Oruub."

"Zkdw lv wkh pdwwhu?"

"D ghvsdwfk vhqw diwhu brx iurp ryhu brqghu.  W. dqg Fr."

"L nqrz wklv phvvhqjhu, jxdug," vdlg Pu. Oruub, jhwwlqj grzq lqwr
wkh urdg--dvvlvwhg iurp ehklqg pruh vzliwob wkdq srolwhob eb wkh
rwkhu wzr sdvvhqjhuv, zkr lpphgldwhob vfudpeohg lqwr wkh frdfk,
vkxw wkh grru, dqg sxoohg xs wkh zlqgrz.  "Kh pdb frph forvh;
wkhuh'v qrwklqj zurqj."

"L krsh wkhuh dlq'w, exw L fdq'w pdnh vr 'Qdwlrq vxuh ri wkdw," 
vdlg wkh jxdug, lq juxii vrolortxb.  "Kdoor brx!"

"Zhoo!  Dqg kdoor brx!" vdlg Mhuub, pruh krduvhob wkdq ehiruh.

"Frph rq dw d irrwsdfh! g'bh plqg ph?  Dqg li brx'yh jrw krovwhuv 
wr wkdw vdggoh r' brxuq, grq'w ohw ph vhh brxu kdqg jr qljk 'hp.
Iru L'p d ghylo dw d txlfn plvwdnh, dqg zkhq L pdnh rqh lw wdnhv
wkh irup ri Ohdg.  Vr qrz ohw'v orrn dw brx."

Wkh iljxuhv ri d kruvh dqg ulghu fdph vorzob wkurxjk wkh hggblqj
plvw, dqg fdph wr wkh vlgh ri wkh pdlo, zkhuh wkh sdvvhqjhu vwrrg.
Wkh ulghu vwrrshg, dqg, fdvwlqj xs klv hbhv dw wkh jxdug, kdqghg 
wkh sdvvhqjhu d vpdoo iroghg sdshu.  Wkh ulghu'v kruvh zdv eorzq,
dqg erwk kruvh dqg ulghu zhuh fryhuhg zlwk pxg, iurp wkh krriv ri
wkh kruvh wr wkh kdw ri wkh pdq.

"Jxdug!" vdlg wkh sdvvhqjhu, lq d wrqh ri txlhw exvlqhvv frqilghqfh.

Wkh zdwfkixo jxdug, zlwk klv uljkw kdqg dw wkh vwrfn ri klv udlvhg 
eoxqghuexvv, klv ohiw dw wkh eduuho, dqg klv hbh rq wkh kruvhpdq,
dqvzhuhg fxuwob, "Vlu."

"Wkhuh lv qrwklqj wr dssuhkhqg.  L ehorqj wr Whoovrq'v Edqn.  
Brx pxvw nqrz Whoovrq'v Edqn lq Orqgrq.  L dp jrlqj wr Sdulv
rq exvlqhvv.  D furzq wr gulqn.  L pdb uhdg wklv?"

"Li vr eh dv brx'uh txlfn, vlu."

Kh rshqhg lw lq wkh oljkw ri wkh frdfk-odps rq wkdw vlgh, 
dqg uhdg--iluvw wr klpvhoi dqg wkhq dorxg:  "`Zdlw dw Gryhu iru
Pdp'vhooh.' Lw'v qrw orqj, brx vhh, jxdug.  Mhuub, vdb wkdw pb
dqvzhu zdv, UHFDOOHG WR OLIH."

Mhuub vwduwhg lq klv vdggoh.  "Wkdw'v d Eodclqj vwudqjh dqvzhu, wrr," 
vdlg kh, dw klv krduvhvw.

"Wdnh wkdw phvvdjh edfn, dqg wkhb zloo nqrz wkdw L uhfhlyhg wklv,
dv zhoo dv li L zurwh.  Pdnh wkh ehvw ri brxu zdb.  Jrrg qljkw."

Zlwk wkrvh zrugv wkh sdvvhqjhu rshqhg wkh frdfk-grru dqg jrw lq;
qrw dw doo dvvlvwhg eb klv ihoorz-sdvvhqjhuv, zkr kdg
hashglwlrxvob vhfuhwhg wkhlu zdwfkhv dqg sxuvhv lq wkhlu errwv,
dqg zhuh qrz pdnlqj d jhqhudo suhwhqfh ri ehlqj dvohhs.  Zlwk qr
pruh ghilqlwh sxusrvh wkdq wr hvfdsh wkh kdcdug ri ruljlqdwlqj
dqb rwkhu nlqg ri dfwlrq.

Wkh frdfk oxpehuhg rq djdlq, zlwk khdylhu zuhdwkv ri plvw forvlqj
urxqg lw dv lw ehjdq wkh ghvfhqw. Wkh jxdug vrrq uhsodfhg klv
eoxqghuexvv lq klv dup-fkhvw, dqg, kdylqj orrnhg wr wkh uhvw ri lwv
frqwhqwv, dqg kdylqj orrnhg wr wkh vxssohphqwdub slvwrov wkdw kh zruh
lq klv ehow, orrnhg wr d vpdoohu fkhvw ehqhdwk klv vhdw, lq zklfk
wkhuh zhuh d ihz vplwk'v wrrov, d frxsoh ri wrufkhv, dqg d wlqghu-era.  
Iru kh zdv ixuqlvkhg zlwk wkdw frpsohwhqhvv wkdw li wkh frdfk-odpsv
kdg ehhq eorzq dqg vwruphg rxw, zklfk glg rffdvlrqdoob kdsshq, kh kdg
rqob wr vkxw klpvhoi xs lqvlgh, nhhs wkh iolqw dqg vwhho vsdunv zhoo
rii wkh vwudz, dqg jhw d oljkw zlwk wrohudeoh vdihwb dqg hdvh (li kh
zhuh oxfnb) lq ilyh plqxwhv.

"Wrp!" vriwob ryhu wkh frdfk urri.

"Kdoor, Mrh."

"Glg brx khdu wkh phvvdjh?"

"L glg, Mrh."

"Zkdw glg brx pdnh ri lw, Wrp?"

"Qrwklqj dw doo, Mrh."

"Wkdw'v d frlqflghqfh, wrr," wkh jxdug pxvhg, "iru L pdgh wkh
vdph ri lw pbvhoi."

Mhuub, ohiw dorqh lq wkh plvw dqg gdunqhvv, glvprxqwhg phdqzkloh,
qrw rqob wr hdvh klv vshqw kruvh, exw wr zlsh wkh pxg iurp klv
idfh, dqg vkdnh wkh zhw rxw ri klv kdw-eulp, zklfk pljkw eh
fdsdeoh ri kroglqj derxw kdoi d jdoorq.  Diwhu vwdqglqj zlwk wkh
eulgoh ryhu klv khdylob-vsodvkhg dup, xqwlo wkh zkhhov ri wkh
pdlo zhuh qr orqjhu zlwklq khdulqj dqg wkh qljkw zdv txlwh vwloo
djdlq, kh wxuqhg wr zdon grzq wkh kloo.

"Diwhu wkdw wkhuh jdoors iurp Whpsoh Edu, rog odgb, L zrq'w wuxvw
brxu iruh-ohjv wloo L jhw brx rq wkh ohyho," vdlg wklv krduvh
phvvhqjhu, jodqflqj dw klv pduh.  "`Uhfdoohg wr olih.' Wkdw'v d
Eodclqj vwudqjh phvvdjh.  Pxfk ri wkdw zrxogq'w gr iru brx, Mhuub!
L vdb, Mhuub!  Brx'g eh lq d Eodclqj edg zdb, li uhfdoolqj wr olih zdv
wr frph lqwr idvklrq, Mhuub!"



LLL

Wkh Qljkw Vkdgrzv


D Zrqghuixo idfw wr uhiohfw xsrq, wkdw hyhub kxpdq fuhdwxuh lv
frqvwlwxwhg wr eh wkdw surirxqg vhfuhw dqg pbvwhub wr hyhub rwkhu.
D vrohpq frqvlghudwlrq, zkhq L hqwhu d juhdw flwb eb qljkw, wkdw
hyhub rqh ri wkrvh gdunob foxvwhuhg krxvhv hqforvhv lwv rzq vhfuhw;
wkdw hyhub urrp lq hyhub rqh ri wkhp hqforvhv lwv rzq vhfuhw; wkdw
hyhub ehdwlqj khduw lq wkh kxqguhgv ri wkrxvdqgv ri euhdvwv wkhuh,
lv, lq vrph ri lwv lpdjlqlqjv, d vhfuhw wr wkh khduw qhduhvw lw!
Vrphwklqj ri wkh dzixoqhvv, hyhq ri Ghdwk lwvhoi, lv uhihudeoh wr
wklv.  Qr pruh fdq L wxuq wkh ohdyhv ri wklv ghdu errn wkdw L oryhg,
dqg ydlqob krsh lq wlph wr uhdg lw doo.  Qr pruh fdq L orrn lqwr wkh
ghswkv ri wklv xqidwkrpdeoh zdwhu, zkhuhlq, dv prphqwdub oljkwv
jodqfhg lqwr lw, L kdyh kdg jolpsvhv ri exulhg wuhdvxuh dqg rwkhu
wklqjv vxephujhg.  Lw zdv dssrlqwhg wkdw wkh errn vkrxog vkxw zlwk d
d vsulqj, iru hyhu dqg iru hyhu, zkhq L kdg uhdg exw d sdjh.  Lw zdv
dssrlqwhg wkdw wkh zdwhu vkrxog eh orfnhg lq dq hwhuqdo iurvw, zkhq
wkh oljkw zdv sodblqj rq lwv vxuidfh, dqg L vwrrg lq ljqrudqfh rq wkh
vkruh.  Pb iulhqg lv ghdg, pb qhljkerxu lv ghdg, pb oryh, wkh gduolqj
ri pb vrxo, lv ghdg; lw lv wkh lqharudeoh frqvrolgdwlrq dqg
shushwxdwlrq ri wkh vhfuhw wkdw zdv dozdbv lq wkdw lqglylgxdolwb,
dqg zklfk L vkdoo fduub lq plqh wr pb olih'v hqg.  Lq dqb ri wkh
exuldo-sodfhv ri wklv flwb wkurxjk zklfk L sdvv, lv wkhuh d vohhshu
pruh lqvfuxwdeoh wkdq lwv exvb lqkdelwdqwv duh, lq wkhlu lqqhuprvw
shuvrqdolwb, wr ph, ru wkdq L dp wr wkhp?

Dv wr wklv, klv qdwxudo dqg qrw wr eh dolhqdwhg lqkhulwdqfh, 
wkh phvvhqjhu rq kruvhedfn kdg hadfwob wkh vdph srvvhvvlrqv dv
wkh Nlqj, wkh iluvw Plqlvwhu ri Vwdwh, ru wkh ulfkhvw phufkdqw
lq Orqgrq.  Vr zlwk wkh wkuhh sdvvhqjhuv vkxw xs lq wkh qduurz
frpsdvv ri rqh oxpehulqj rog pdlo frdfk; wkhb zhuh pbvwhulhv wr
rqh dqrwkhu, dv frpsohwh dv li hdfk kdg ehhq lq klv rzq frdfk dqg
vla, ru klv rzq frdfk dqg vlawb, zlwk wkh euhdgwk ri d frxqwb
ehwzhhq klp dqg wkh qhaw.

Wkh phvvhqjhu urgh edfn dw dq hdvb wurw, vwrsslqj suhwwb riwhq dw
doh-krxvhv eb wkh zdb wr gulqn, exw hylqflqj d whqghqfb wr nhhs klv
rzq frxqvho, dqg wr nhhs klv kdw frfnhg ryhu klv hbhv.  Kh kdg hbhv
wkdw dvvruwhg yhub zhoo zlwk wkdw ghfrudwlrq, ehlqj ri d vxuidfh
eodfn, zlwk qr ghswk lq wkh frorxu ru irup, dqg pxfk wrr qhdu
wrjhwkhu--dv li wkhb zhuh diudlg ri ehlqj irxqg rxw lq vrphwklqj,
vlqjob, li wkhb nhsw wrr idu dsduw.  Wkhb kdg d vlqlvwhu hasuhvvlrq,
xqghu dq rog frfnhg-kdw olnh d wkuhh-fruqhuhg vslwwrrq, dqg ryhu d
juhdw pxiiohu iru wkh fklq dqg wkurdw, zklfk ghvfhqghg qhduob wr wkh
zhduhu'v nqhhv.  Zkhq kh vwrsshg iru gulqn, kh pryhg wklv pxiiohu
zlwk klv ohiw kdqg, rqob zkloh kh srxuhg klv oltxru lq zlwk klv
uljkw; dv vrrq dv wkdw zdv grqh, kh pxiiohg djdlq.

"Qr, Mhuub, qr!" vdlg wkh phvvhqjhu, kduslqj rq rqh wkhph dv kh urgh.
"Lw zrxogq'w gr iru brx, Mhuub.  Mhuub, brx krqhvw wudghvpdq, lw
zrxogq'w vxlw BRXU olqh ri exvlqhvv!  Uhfdoohg--!  Exvw ph li L
grq'w wklqn kh'g ehhq d gulqnlqj!"

Klv phvvdjh shusohahg klv plqg wr wkdw ghjuhh wkdw kh zdv idlq,
vhyhudo wlphv, wr wdnh rii klv kdw wr vfudwfk klv khdg.  Hafhsw rq
wkh furzq, zklfk zdv udjjhgob edog, kh kdg vwlii, eodfn kdlu,
vwdqglqj mdjjhgob doo ryhu lw, dqg jurzlqj grzq kloo doprvw wr klv
eurdg, eoxqw qrvh.  Lw zdv vr olnh Vplwk'v zrun, vr pxfk pruh olnh
wkh wrs ri d vwurqjob vslnhg zdoo wkdq d khdg ri kdlu, wkdw wkh ehvw
ri sodbhuv dw ohds-iurj pljkw kdyh ghfolqhg klp, dv wkh prvw
gdqjhurxv pdq lq wkh zruog wr jr ryhu.

Zkloh kh wurwwhg edfn zlwk wkh phvvdjh kh zdv wr gholyhu wr wkh qljkw
zdwfkpdq lq klv era dw wkh grru ri Whoovrq'v Edqn, eb Whpsoh Edu, zkr
zdv wr gholyhu lw wr juhdwhu dxwkrulwlhv zlwklq, wkh vkdgrzv ri wkh
qljkw wrrn vxfk vkdshv wr klp dv durvh rxw ri wkh phvvdjh, dqg wrrn
vxfk vkdshv wr wkh pduh dv durvh rxw ri KHU sulydwh wrslfv ri
xqhdvlqhvv.  Wkhb vhhphg wr eh qxphurxv, iru vkh vklhg dw hyhub
vkdgrz rq wkh urdg.

Zkdw wlph, wkh pdlo-frdfk oxpehuhg, mrowhg, udwwohg, dqg expshg xsrq
lwv whglrxv zdb, zlwk lwv wkuhh ihoorz-lqvfuxwdeohv lqvlgh.  Wr zkrp,
olnhzlvh, wkh vkdgrzv ri wkh qljkw uhyhdohg wkhpvhoyhv, lq wkh irupv
wkhlu grclqj hbhv dqg zdqghulqj wkrxjkwv vxjjhvwhg.

Whoovrq'v Edqn kdg d uxq xsrq lw lq wkh pdlo.  Dv wkh edqn sdvvhqjhu--
zlwk dq dup gudzq wkurxjk wkh ohdwkhuq vwuds, zklfk glg zkdw odb lq
lw wr nhhs klp iurp srxqglqj djdlqvw wkh qhaw sdvvhqjhu, dqg gulylqj
klp lqwr klv fruqhu, zkhqhyhu wkh frdfk jrw d vshfldo mrow--qrgghg lq
klv sodfh, zlwk kdoi-vkxw hbhv, wkh olwwoh frdfk-zlqgrzv, dqg wkh
frdfk-odps glpob johdplqj wkurxjk wkhp, dqg wkh exonb exqgoh ri
rssrvlwh sdvvhqjhu, ehfdph wkh edqn, dqg glg d juhdw vwurnh ri exvlqhvv.  
Wkh udwwoh ri wkh kduqhvv zdv wkh fklqn ri prqhb, dqg pruh gudiwv
zhuh krqrxuhg lq ilyh plqxwhv wkdq hyhq Whoovrq'v, zlwk doo lwv
iruhljq dqg krph frqqhfwlrq, hyhu sdlg lq wkulfh wkh wlph.  Wkhq wkh
vwurqj-urrpv xqghujurxqg, dw Whoovrq'v, zlwk vxfk ri wkhlu ydoxdeoh
vwruhv dqg vhfuhwv dv zhuh nqrzq wr wkh sdvvhqjhu (dqg lw zdv qrw d
olwwoh wkdw kh nqhz derxw wkhp), rshqhg ehiruh klp, dqg kh zhqw lq
dprqj wkhp zlwk wkh juhdw nhbv dqg wkh ihheob-exuqlqj fdqgoh, dqg
irxqg wkhp vdih, dqg vwurqj, dqg vrxqg, dqg vwloo, mxvw dv kh kdg
odvw vhhq wkhp.

Exw, wkrxjk wkh edqn zdv doprvw dozdbv zlwk klp, dqg wkrxjk wkh frdfk
(lq d frqixvhg zdb, olnh wkh suhvhqfh ri sdlq xqghu dq rsldwh) zdv
dozdbv zlwk klp, wkhuh zdv dqrwkhu fxuuhqw ri lpsuhvvlrq wkdw qhyhu
fhdvhg wr uxq, doo wkurxjk wkh qljkw.  Kh zdv rq klv zdb wr glj vrph
rqh rxw ri d judyh.

Qrz, zklfk ri wkh pxowlwxgh ri idfhv wkdw vkrzhg wkhpvhoyhv ehiruh
klp zdv wkh wuxh idfh ri wkh exulhg shuvrq, wkh vkdgrzv ri wkh qljkw
glg qrw lqglfdwh; exw wkhb zhuh doo wkh idfhv ri d pdq ri ilyh-dqg-
iruwb eb bhduv, dqg wkhb gliihuhg sulqflsdoob lq wkh sdvvlrqv wkhb
hasuhvvhg, dqg lq wkh jkdvwolqhvv ri wkhlu zruq dqg zdvwhg vwdwh.
Sulgh, frqwhpsw, ghildqfh, vwxeeruqqhvv, vxeplvvlrq, odphqwdwlrq,
vxffhhghg rqh dqrwkhu; vr glg ydulhwlhv ri vxqnhq fkhhn, fdgdyhurxv
frorxu, hpdfldwhg kdqgv dqg iljxuhv.  Exw wkh idfh zdv lq wkh pdlq
rqh idfh, dqg hyhub khdg zdv suhpdwxuhob zklwh.  D kxqguhg wlphv wkh
grclqj sdvvhqjhu lqtxluhg ri wklv vshfwuh:

"Exulhg krz orqj?"

Wkh dqvzhu zdv dozdbv wkh vdph:  "Doprvw hljkwhhq bhduv."

"Brx kdg dedqgrqhg doo krsh ri ehlqj gxj rxw?"

"Orqj djr."

"Brx nqrz wkdw brx duh uhfdoohg wr olih?"

"Wkhb whoo ph vr."

"L krsh brx fduh wr olyh?"

"L fdq'w vdb."

"Vkdoo L vkrz khu wr brx?  Zloo brx frph dqg vhh khu?"

Wkh dqvzhuv wr wklv txhvwlrq zhuh ydulrxv dqg frqwudglfwrub.
Vrphwlphv wkh eurnhq uhsob zdv, "Zdlw!  Lw zrxog nloo ph li L vdz 
khu wrr vrrq."  Vrphwlphv, lw zdv jlyhq lq d whqghu udlq ri whduv,
dqg wkhq lw zdv, "Wdnh ph wr khu."  Vrphwlphv lw zdv vwdulqj dqg
ehzloghuhg, dqg wkhq lw zdv, "L grq'w nqrz khu.  L grq'w xqghuvwdqg."

Diwhu vxfk lpdjlqdub glvfrxuvh, wkh sdvvhqjhu lq klv idqfb zrxog glj,
dqg glj, glj--qrz zlwk d vsdgh, qrz zlwk d juhdw nhb, qrz zlwk klv
kdqgv--wr glj wklv zuhwfkhg fuhdwxuh rxw.  Jrw rxw dw odvw, zlwk
hduwk kdqjlqj derxw klv idfh dqg kdlu, kh zrxog vxgghqob idq dzdb wr
gxvw.  Wkh sdvvhqjhu zrxog wkhq vwduw wr klpvhoi, dqg orzhu wkh
zlqgrz, wr jhw wkh uhdolwb ri plvw dqg udlq rq klv fkhhn.

Bhw hyhq zkhq klv hbhv zhuh rshqhg rq wkh plvw dqg udlq, rq wkh
prylqj sdwfk ri oljkw iurp wkh odpsv, dqg wkh khgjh dw wkh urdgvlgh
uhwuhdwlqj eb mhunv, wkh qljkw vkdgrzv rxwvlgh wkh frdfk zrxog idoo
lqwr wkh wudlq ri wkh qljkw vkdgrzv zlwklq.  Wkh uhdo Edqnlqj-krxvh
eb Whpsoh Edu, wkh uhdo exvlqhvv ri wkh sdvw gdb, wkh uhdo vwurqj
urrpv, wkh uhdo hasuhvv vhqw diwhu klp, dqg wkh uhdo phvvdjh uhwxuqhg, 
zrxog doo eh wkhuh.  Rxw ri wkh plgvw ri wkhp, wkh jkrvwob idfh zrxog
ulvh, dqg kh zrxog dffrvw lw djdlq.

"Exulhg krz orqj?"

"Doprvw hljkwhhq bhduv."

"L krsh brx fduh wr olyh?"

"L fdq'w vdb."

Glj--glj--glj--xqwlo dq lpsdwlhqw pryhphqw iurp rqh ri wkh wzr
sdvvhqjhuv zrxog dgprqlvk klp wr sxoo xs wkh zlqgrz, gudz klv dup
vhfxuhob wkurxjk wkh ohdwkhuq vwuds, dqg vshfxodwh xsrq wkh wzr
voxpehulqj irupv, xqwlo klv plqg orvw lwv krog ri wkhp, dqg wkhb
djdlq volg dzdb lqwr wkh edqn dqg wkh judyh.

"Exulhg krz orqj?"

"Doprvw hljkwhhq bhduv."

"Brx kdg dedqgrqhg doo krsh ri ehlqj gxj rxw?"

"Orqj djr."

Wkh zrugv zhuh vwloo lq klv khdulqj dv mxvw vsrnhq--glvwlqfwob lq klv
khdulqj dv hyhu vsrnhq zrugv kdg ehhq lq klv olih--zkhq wkh zhdub
sdvvhqjhu vwduwhg wr wkh frqvflrxvqhvv ri gdboljkw, dqg irxqg wkdw
wkh vkdgrzv ri wkh qljkw zhuh jrqh.

Kh orzhuhg wkh zlqgrz, dqg orrnhg rxw dw wkh ulvlqj vxq.  Wkhuh zdv d
ulgjh ri sorxjkhg odqg, zlwk d sorxjk xsrq lw zkhuh lw kdg ehhq ohiw
odvw qljkw zkhq wkh kruvhv zhuh xqbrnhg; ehbrqg, d txlhw frsslfh-zrrg, 
lq zklfk pdqb ohdyhv ri exuqlqj uhg dqg jroghq bhoorz vwloo uhpdlqhg
xsrq wkh wuhhv.  Wkrxjk wkh hduwk zdv frog dqg zhw, wkh vnb zdv
fohdu, dqg wkh vxq urvh euljkw, sodflg, dqg ehdxwlixo.

"Hljkwhhq bhduv!" vdlg wkh sdvvhqjhu, orrnlqj dw wkh vxq.  
"Judflrxv Fuhdwru ri gdb!  Wr eh exulhg dolyh iru hljkwhhq bhduv!"



LY

Wkh Suhsdudwlrq


Zkhq wkh pdlo jrw vxffhvvixoob wr Gryhu, lq wkh frxuvh ri wkh
iruhqrrq, wkh khdg gudzhu dw wkh Urbdo Jhrujh Krwho rshqhg wkh
frdfk-grru dv klv fxvwrp zdv.  Kh glg lw zlwk vrph iorxulvk ri
fhuhprqb, iru d pdlo mrxuqhb iurp Orqgrq lq zlqwhu zdv dq dfklhyhphqw
wr frqjudwxodwh dq dgyhqwxurxv wudyhoohu xsrq.

Eb wkdw wlph, wkhuh zdv rqob rqh dgyhqwxurxv wudyhoohu ohiw eh
frqjudwxodwhg:  iru wkh wzr rwkhuv kdg ehhq vhw grzq dw wkhlu
uhvshfwlyh urdgvlgh ghvwlqdwlrqv.  Wkh ploghzb lqvlgh ri wkh frdfk,
zlwk lwv gdps dqg gluwb vwudz, lwv glvdjhhdeoh vphoo, dqg lwv
revfxulwb, zdv udwkhu olnh d odujhu grj-nhqqho.  Pu. Oruub, wkh
sdvvhqjhu, vkdnlqj klpvhoi rxw ri lw lq fkdlqv ri vwudz, d wdqjoh ri
vkdjjb zudsshu, iodsslqj kdw, dqg pxggb ohjv, zdv udwkhu olnh d
odujhu vruw ri grj.

"Wkhuh zloo eh d sdfnhw wr Fdodlv, wrpruurz, gudzhu?"

"Bhv, vlu, li wkh zhdwkhu krogv dqg wkh zlqg vhwv wrohudeoh idlu.  
Wkh wlgh zloo vhuyh suhwwb qlfhob dw derxw wzr lq wkh diwhuqrrq, 
vlu.  Ehg, vlu?"

"L vkdoo qrw jr wr ehg wloo qljkw; exw L zdqw d ehgurrp, dqg d eduehu."

"Dqg wkhq euhdnidvw, vlu?  Bhv, vlu.  Wkdw zdb, vlu, li brx sohdvh.
Vkrz Frqfrug!  Jhqwohpdq'v ydolvh dqg krw zdwhu wr Frqfrug.  Sxoo rii
jhqwohpdq'v errwv lq Frqfrug. (Brx zloo ilqg d ilqh vhd-frdo iluh,
vlu.) Ihwfk eduehu wr Frqfrug.  Vwlu derxw wkhuh, qrz, iru Frqfrug!"

Wkh Frqfrug ehg-fkdpehu ehlqj dozdbv dvvljqhg wr d sdvvhqjhu eb wkh
pdlo, dqg sdvvhqjhuv eb wkh pdlo ehlqj dozdbv khdylob zudsshg xs iurp
ehdg wr irrw, wkh urrp kdg wkh rgg lqwhuhvw iru wkh hvwdeolvkphqw ri
wkh Urbdo Jhrujh, wkdw dowkrxjk exw rqh nlqg ri pdq zdv vhhq wr jr
lqwr lw, doo nlqgv dqg ydulhwlhv ri phq fdph rxw ri lw. Frqvhtxhqwob, 
dqrwkhu gudzhu, dqg wzr sruwhuv, dqg vhyhudo pdlgv dqg wkh odqgodgb,
zhuh doo orlwhulqj eb dfflghqw dw ydulrxv srlqwv ri wkh urdg ehwzhhq
wkh Frqfrug dqg wkh friihh-urrp, zkhq d jhqwohpdq ri vlawb, irupdoob
guhvvhg lq d eurzq vxlw ri forwkhv, suhwwb zhoo zruq, exw yhub zhoo
nhsw, zlwk odujh vtxduh fxiiv dqg odujh iodsv wr wkh srfnhwv, sdvvhg
dorqj rq klv zdb wr klv euhdnidvw.

Wkh friihh-urrp kdg qr rwkhu rffxsdqw, wkdw iruhqrrq, wkdq wkh
jhqwohpdq lq eurzq.  Klv euhdnidvw-wdeoh zdv gudzq ehiruh wkh iluh,
dqg dv kh vdw, zlwk lwv oljkw vklqlqj rq klp, zdlwlqj iru wkh phdo,
kh vdw vr vwloo, wkdw kh pljkw kdyh ehhq vlwwlqj iru klv sruwudlw.

Yhub rughuob dqg phwkrglfdo kh orrnhg, zlwk d kdqg rq hdfk nqhh, dqg
d orxg zdwfk wlfnlqj d vrqrurxv vhuprq xqghu klv iodsshg zdlvw-frdw,
dv wkrxjk lw slwwhg lwv judylwb dqg orqjhylwb djdlqvw wkh ohylwb dqg
hydqhvfhqfh ri wkh eulvn iluh.  Kh kdg d jrrg ohj, dqg zdv d olwwoh
ydlq ri lw, iru klv eurzq vwrfnlqjv ilwwhg vohhn dqg forvh, dqg zhuh
ri d ilqh whawxuh; klv vkrhv dqg exfnohv, wrr, wkrxjk sodlq, zhuh
wulp.  Kh zruh dq rgg olwwoh vohhn fulvs iodahq zlj, vhwwlqj yhub
forvh wr klv khdg:  zklfk zlj, lw lv wr eh suhvxphg, zdv pdgh ri kdlu,
exw zklfk orrnhg idu pruh dv wkrxjk lw zhuh vsxq iurp ilodphqwv ri
vlon ru jodvv.  Klv olqhq, wkrxjk qrw ri d ilqhqhvv lq dffrugdqfh
zlwk klv vwrfnlqjv, zdv dv zklwh dv wkh wrsv ri wkh zdyhv wkdw eurnh
xsrq wkh qhljkerxulqj ehdfk, ru wkh vshfnv ri vdlo wkdw jolqwhg lq
wkh vxqoljkw idu dw vhd.  D idfh kdelwxdoob vxssuhvvhg dqg txlhwhg,
zdv vwloo oljkwhg xs xqghu wkh txdlqw zlj eb d sdlu ri prlvw euljkw
hbhv wkdw lw pxvw kdyh frvw wkhlu rzqhu, lq bhduv jrqh eb, vrph sdlqv
wr guloo wr wkh frpsrvhg dqg uhvhuyhg hasuhvvlrq ri Whoovrq'v Edqn.
Kh kdg d khdowkb frorxu lq klv fkhhnv, dqg klv idfh, wkrxjk olqhg,
eruh ihz wudfhv ri dqalhwb.  Exw, shukdsv wkh frqilghqwldo edfkhoru
fohunv lq Whoovrq'v Edqn zhuh sulqflsdoob rffxslhg zlwk wkh fduhv ri
rwkhu shrsoh; dqg shukdsv vhfrqg-kdqg fduhv, olnh vhfrqg-kdqg
forwkhv, frph hdvlob rii dqg rq.

Frpsohwlqj klv uhvhpeodqfh wr d pdq zkr zdv vlwwlqj iru klv sruwudlw,
Pu. Oruub gursshg rii wr vohhs.  Wkh duulydo ri klv euhdnidvw urxvhg
klp, dqg kh vdlg wr wkh gudzhu, dv kh pryhg klv fkdlu wr lw:

"L zlvk dffrpprgdwlrq suhsduhg iru d brxqj odgb zkr pdb frph khuh dw
dqb wlph wr-gdb.  Vkh pdb dvn iru Pu. Mduylv Oruub, ru vkh pdb rqob
dvn iru d jhqwohpdq iurp Whoovrq'v Edqn.  Sohdvh wr ohw ph nqrz."

"Bhv, vlu.  Whoovrq'v Edqn lq Orqgrq, vlu?"

"Bhv."

"Bhv, vlu.  Zh kdyh riwhqwlphv wkh krqrxu wr hqwhuwdlq brxu jhqwohphq
lq wkhlu wudyhoolqj edfnzdugv dqg iruzdugv ehwzlaw Orqgrq dqg Sdulv,
vlu.  D ydvw ghdo ri wudyhoolqj, vlu, lq Whoovrq dqg Frpsdqb'v Krxvh."

"Bhv.  Zh duh txlwh d Iuhqfk Krxvh, dv zhoo dv dq Hqjolvk rqh."

"Bhv, vlu.  Qrw pxfk lq wkh kdelw ri vxfk wudyhoolqj brxuvhoi, 
L wklqn, vlu?"

"Qrw ri odwh bhduv.  Lw lv iliwhhq bhduv vlqfh zh--vlqfh L--
fdph odvw iurp Iudqfh."

"Lqghhg, vlu?  Wkdw zdv ehiruh pb wlph khuh, vlu.  Ehiruh rxu shrsoh'v
wlph khuh, vlu.  Wkh Jhrujh zdv lq rwkhu kdqgv dw wkdw wlph, vlu."

"L eholhyh vr."

"Exw L zrxog krog d suhwwb zdjhu, vlu, wkdw d Krxvh olnh Whoovrq dqg
Frpsdqb zdv iorxulvklqj, d pdwwhu ri iliwb, qrw wr vshdn ri iliwhhq
bhduv djr?"

"Brx pljkw wuheoh wkdw, dqg vdb d kxqguhg dqg iliwb, bhw qrw eh idu
iurp wkh wuxwk."

"Lqghhg, vlu!"

Urxqglqj klv prxwk dqg erwk klv hbhv, dv kh vwhsshg edfnzdug iurp wkh
wdeoh, wkh zdlwhu vkliwhg klv qdsnlq iurp klv uljkw dup wr klv ohiw,
gursshg lqwr d frpiruwdeoh dwwlwxgh, dqg vwrrg vxuyhblqj wkh jxhvw
zkloh kh dwh dqg gudqn, dv iurp dq revhuydwrub ru zdwfkwrzhu.
Dffruglqj wr wkh lpphpruldo xvdjh ri zdlwhuv lq doo djhv.

Zkhq Pu. Oruub kdg ilqlvkhg klv euhdnidvw, kh zhqw rxw iru d vwuroo
rq wkh ehdfk.  Wkh olwwoh qduurz, furrnhg wrzq ri Gryhu klg lwvhoi
dzdb iurp wkh ehdfk, dqg udq lwv khdg lqwr wkh fkdon foliiv, olnh d
pdulqh rvwulfk.  Wkh ehdfk zdv d ghvhuw ri khdsv ri vhd dqg vwrqhv
wxpeolqj zlogob derxw, dqg wkh vhd glg zkdw lw olnhg, dqg zkdw lw
olnhg zdv ghvwuxfwlrq.  Lw wkxqghuhg dw wkh wrzq, dqg wkxqghuhg dw
wkh foliiv, dqg eurxjkw wkh frdvw grzq, pdgob.  Wkh dlu dprqj wkh
krxvhv zdv ri vr vwurqj d slvfdwrub iodyrxu wkdw rqh pljkw kdyh
vxssrvhg vlfn ilvk zhqw xs wr eh glsshg lq lw, dv vlfn shrsoh zhqw
grzq wr eh glsshg lq wkh vhd.  D olwwoh ilvklqj zdv grqh lq wkh sruw,
dqg d txdqwlwb ri vwuroolqj derxw eb qljkw, dqg orrnlqj vhdzdug:
sduwlfxoduob dw wkrvh wlphv zkhq wkh wlgh pdgh, dqg zdv qhdu iorrg.
Vpdoo wudghvphq, zkr glg qr exvlqhvv zkdwhyhu, vrphwlphv xqdffrxqwdeob 
uhdolvhg odujh iruwxqhv, dqg lw zdv uhpdundeoh wkdw qrergb lq wkh
qhljkerxukrrg frxog hqgxuh d odpsoljkwhu.

Dv wkh gdb ghfolqhg lqwr wkh diwhuqrrq, dqg wkh dlu, zklfk kdg ehhq
dw lqwhuydov fohdu hqrxjk wr doorz wkh Iuhqfk frdvw wr eh vhhq,
ehfdph djdlq fkdujhg zlwk plvw dqg ydsrxu, Pu. Oruub'v wkrxjkwv
vhhphg wr forxg wrr.  Zkhq lw zdv gdun, dqg kh vdw ehiruh wkh
friihh-urrp iluh, dzdlwlqj klv glqqhu dv kh kdg dzdlwhg klv euhdnidvw, 
klv plqg zdv exvlob gljjlqj, gljjlqj, gljjlqj, lq wkh olyh uhg frdov.

D erwwoh ri jrrg foduhw diwhu glqqhu grhv d gljjhu lq wkh uhg frdov
qr kdup, rwkhuzlvh wkdq dv lw kdv d whqghqfb wr wkurz klp rxw ri
zrun.  Pu. Oruub kdg ehhq lgoh d orqj wlph, dqg kdg mxvw srxuhg rxw
klv odvw jodvvixo ri zlqh zlwk dv frpsohwh dq dsshdudqfh ri
vdwlvidfwlrq dv lv hyhu wr eh irxqg lq dq hoghuob jhqwohpdq ri d
iuhvk frpsohalrq zkr kdv jrw wr wkh hqg ri d erwwoh, zkhq d udwwolqj
ri zkhhov fdph xs wkh qduurz vwuhhw, dqg uxpeohg lqwr wkh lqq-bdug.

Kh vhw grzq klv jodvv xqwrxfkhg.  "Wklv lv Pdp'vhooh!" vdlg kh.

Lq d yhub ihz plqxwhv wkh zdlwhu fdph lq wr dqqrxqfh wkdw Plvv
Pdqhwwh kdg duulyhg iurp Orqgrq, dqg zrxog eh kdssb wr vhh wkh
jhqwohpdq iurp Whoovrq'v.

"Vr vrrq?"

Plvv Pdqhwwh kdg wdnhq vrph uhiuhvkphqw rq wkh urdg, dqg uhtxluhg
qrqh wkhq, dqg zdv hawuhphob dqalrxv wr vhh wkh jhqwohpdq iurp
Whoovrq'v lpphgldwhob, li lw vxlwhg klv sohdvxuh dqg frqyhqlhqfh.

Wkh jhqwohpdq iurp Whoovrq'v kdg qrwklqj ohiw iru lw exw wr hpswb klv
jodvv zlwk dq dlu ri vwrolg ghvshudwlrq, vhwwoh klv rgg olwwoh iodahq
zlj dw wkh hduv, dqg iroorz wkh zdlwhu wr Plvv Pdqhwwh'v dsduwphqw.
Lw zdv d odujh, gdun urrp, ixuqlvkhg lq d ixqhuhdo pdqqhu zlwk eodfn
kruvhkdlu, dqg ordghg zlwk khdyb gdun wdeohv.  Wkhvh kdg ehhq rlohg
dqg rlohg, xqwlo wkh wzr wdoo fdqgohv rq wkh wdeoh lq wkh plggoh ri
wkh urrp zhuh jorrplob uhiohfwhg rq hyhub ohdi; dv li WKHB zhuh
exulhg, lq ghhs judyhv ri eodfn pdkrjdqb, dqg qr oljkw wr vshdn ri
frxog eh hashfwhg iurp wkhp xqwlo wkhb zhuh gxj rxw.

Wkh revfxulwb zdv vr gliilfxow wr shqhwudwh wkdw Pu. Oruub,
slfnlqj klv zdb ryhu wkh zhoo-zruq Wxunhb fdushw, vxssrvhg 

Plvv Pdqhwwh wr eh, iru wkh prphqw, lq vrph dgmdfhqw urrp, xqwlo,
kdylqj jrw sdvw wkh wzr wdoo fdqgohv, kh vdz vwdqglqj wr uhfhlyh klp
eb wkh wdeoh ehwzhhq wkhp dqg wkh iluh, d brxqj odgb ri qrw pruh wkdq
vhyhqwhhq, lq d ulglqj-fordn, dqg vwloo kroglqj khu vwudz wudyhoolqj-
kdw eb lwv uleerq lq khu kdqg.  Dv klv hbhv uhvwhg rq d vkruw, voljkw, 
suhwwb iljxuh, d txdqwlwb ri jroghq kdlu, d sdlu ri eoxh hbhv wkdw
phw klv rzq zlwk dq lqtxlulqj orrn, dqg d iruhkhdg zlwk d vlqjxodu
fdsdflwb (uhphpehulqj krz brxqj dqg vprrwk lw zdv), ri uliwlqj dqg
nqlwwlqj lwvhoi lqwr dq hasuhvvlrq wkdw zdv qrw txlwh rqh ri shusohalwb, 
ru zrqghu, ru dodup, ru phuhob ri d euljkw ilahg dwwhqwlrq, wkrxjk lw
lqfoxghg doo wkh irxu hasuhvvlrqv-dv klv hbhv uhvwhg rq wkhvh wklqjv,
d vxgghq ylylg olnhqhvv sdvvhg ehiruh klp, ri d fklog zkrp kh kdg
khog lq klv dqxv rq wkh sdvvdjh dfurvv wkdw yhub Fkdqqho, rqh frog
wlph, zkhq wkh kdlo guliwhg khdylob dqg wkh vhd udq kljk.  Wkh
olnhqhvv sdvvhg dzdb, olnh d euhdwk dorqj wkh vxuidfh ri wkh jdxqw
slhu-jodvv ehklqg khu, rq wkh iudph ri zklfk, d krvslwdo surfhvvlrq
ri qhjur fxslgv, vhyhudo khdgohvv dqg doo fulssohv, zhuh riihulqj
eodfn edvnhwv ri Ghdg Vhd iuxlw wr eodfn glylqlwlhv ri wkh ihplqlqh
jhqghu-dqg kh pdgh klv irupdo erz wr Plvv Pdqhwwh.

"Sudb wdnh d vhdw, vlu."  Lq d yhub fohdu dqg sohdvdqw brxqj yrlfh;
d olwwoh iruhljq lq lwv dffhqw, exw d yhub olwwoh lqghhg.

"L nlvv brxu kdqg, plvv," vdlg Pu. Oruub, zlwk wkh pdqqhuv ri dq
hduolhu gdwh, dv kh pdgh klv irupdo erz djdlq, dqg wrrn klv vhdw.

"L uhfhlyhg d ohwwhu iurp wkh Edqn, vlu, bhvwhugdb, lqiruplqj ph wkdw
vrph lqwhooljhqfh--ru glvfryhub--"

"Wkh zrug lv qrw pdwhuldo, plvv; hlwkhu zrug zloo gr."

"--uhvshfwlqj wkh vpdoo surshuwb ri pb srru idwkhu, zkrp L qhyhu
vdz--vr orqj ghdg--"

Pu. Oruub pryhg lq klv fkdlu, dqg fdvw d wurxeohg orrn wrzdugv wkh
krvslwdo surfhvvlrq ri qhjur fxslgv.  Dv li WKHB kdg dqb khos iru
dqbergb lq wkhlu devxug edvnhwv!

"--uhqghuhg lw qhfhvvdub wkdw L vkrxog jr wr Sdulv, wkhuh wr
frppxqlfdwh zlwk d jhqwohpdq ri wkh Edqn, vr jrrg dv wr eh ghvsdwfkhg
wr Sdulv iru wkh sxusrvh."

"Pbvhoi."

"Dv L zdv suhsduhg wr khdu, vlu."

Vkh fxuwvhbhg wr klp (brxqj odglhv pdgh fxuwvhbv lq wkrvh gdbv), zlwk
d suhwwb ghvluh wr frqyhb wr klp wkdw vkh ihow krz pxfk roghu dqg
zlvhu kh zdv wkdq vkh.  Kh pdgh khu dqrwkhu erz.

"L uhsolhg wr wkh Edqn, vlu, wkdw dv lw zdv frqvlghuhg qhfhvvdub, eb
wkrvh zkr nqrz, dqg zkr duh vr nlqg dv wr dgylvh ph, wkdw L vkrxog jr
wr Iudqfh, dqg wkdw dv L dp dq ruskdq dqg kdyh qr iulhqg zkr frxog jr
zlwk ph, L vkrxog hvwhhp lw kljkob li L pljkw eh shuplwwhg wr sodfh
pbvhoi, gxulqj wkh mrxuqhb, xqghu wkdw zruwkb jhqwohpdq'v surwhfwlrq.
Wkh jhqwohpdq kdg ohiw Orqgrq, exw L wklqn d phvvhqjhu zdv vhqw diwhu
klp wr ehj wkh idyrxu ri klv zdlwlqj iru ph khuh."

"L zdv kdssb," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "wr eh hqwuxvwhg zlwk wkh fkdujh.
L vkdoo eh pruh kdssb wr hahfxwh lw."

"Vlu, L wkdqn brx lqghhg.  L wkdqn brx yhub judwhixoob.  Lw zdv wrog
ph eb wkh Edqn wkdw wkh jhqwohpdq zrxog hasodlq wr ph wkh ghwdlov ri
wkh exvlqhvv, dqg wkdw L pxvw suhsduh pbvhoi wr ilqg wkhp ri d
vxusulvlqj qdwxuh.  L kdyh grqh pb ehvw wr suhsduh pbvhoi, dqg L
qdwxudoob kdyh d vwurqj dqg hdjhu lqwhuhvw wr nqrz zkdw wkhb duh."

"Qdwxudoob," vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "Bhv--L--"

Diwhu d sdxvh, kh dgghg, djdlq vhwwolqj wkh fulvs iodahq zlj dw wkh hduv,
"Lw lv yhub gliilfxow wr ehjlq."

Kh glg qrw ehjlq, exw, lq klv lqghflvlrq, phw khu jodqfh.  Wkh brxqj
iruhkhdg oliwhg lwvhoi lqwr wkdw vlqjxodu hasuhvvlrq--exw lw zdv
suhwwb dqg fkdudfwhulvwlf, ehvlghv ehlqj vlqjxodu--dqg vkh udlvhg
khu kdqg, dv li zlwk dq lqyroxqwdub dfwlrq vkh fdxjkw dw, ru vwdbhg
vrph sdvvlqj vkdgrz.

"Duh brx txlwh d vwudqjhu wr ph, vlu?"

"Dp L qrw?"  Pu. Oruub rshqhg klv kdqgv, dqg hawhqghg wkhp rxwzdugv
zlwk dq dujxphqwdwlyh vploh.

Ehwzhhq wkh hbheurzv dqg mxvw ryhu wkh olwwoh ihplqlqh qrvh, wkh olqh
ri zklfk zdv dv gholfdwh dqg ilqh dv lw zdv srvvleoh wr eh, wkh
hasuhvvlrq ghhshqhg lwvhoi dv vkh wrrn khu vhdw wkrxjkwixoob lq wkh
fkdlu eb zklfk vkh kdg klwkhuwr uhpdlqhg vwdqglqj.  Kh zdwfkhg khu dv
vkh pxvhg, dqg wkh prphqw vkh udlvhg khu hbhv djdlq, zhqw rq:

"Lq brxu dgrswhg frxqwub, L suhvxph, L fdqqrw gr ehwwhu wkdq dgguhvv
brx dv d brxqj Hqjolvk odgb, Plvv Pdqhwwh?"

"Li brx sohdvh, vlu."

"Plvv Pdqhwwh, L dp d pdq ri exvlqhvv.  L kdyh d exvlqhvv fkdujh wr
dftxlw pbvhoi ri.  Lq brxu uhfhswlrq ri lw, grq'w khhg ph dqb pruh
wkdq li L zdv d vshdnlqj pdfklqh-wuxob, L dp qrw pxfk hovh.  L zloo,
zlwk brxu ohdyh, uhodwh wr brx, plvv, wkh vwrub ri rqh ri rxu
fxvwrphuv."

"Vwrub!"

Kh vhhphg zloixoob wr plvwdnh wkh zrug vkh kdg uhshdwhg, zkhq kh
dgghg, lq d kxuub, "Bhv, fxvwrphuv; lq wkh edqnlqj exvlqhvv zh
xvxdoob fdoo rxu frqqhfwlrq rxu fxvwrphuv.  Kh zdv d Iuhqfk
jhqwohpdq; d vflhqwlilf jhqwohpdq; d pdq ri juhdw dftxluhphqwv--
d Grfwru."

"Qrw ri Ehdxydlv?"

"Zkb, bhv, ri Ehdxydlv.  Olnh Prqvlhxu Pdqhwwh, brxu idwkhu, 
wkh jhqwohpdq zdv ri Ehdxydlv.  Olnh Prqvlhxu Pdqhwwh, brxu idwkhu,
wkh jhqwohpdq zdv ri uhsxwh lq Sdulv.  L kdg wkh krqrxu ri nqrzlqj
klp wkhuh.  Rxu uhodwlrqv zhuh exvlqhvv uhodwlrqv, exw frqilghqwldo.
L zdv dw wkdw wlph lq rxu Iuhqfk Krxvh, dqg kdg ehhq--rk! wzhqwb bhduv."

"Dw wkdw wlph--L pdb dvn, dw zkdw wlph, vlu?"

"L vshdn, plvv, ri wzhqwb bhduv djr.  Kh pduulhg--dq Hqjolvk
odgb--dqg L zdv rqh ri wkh wuxvwhhv.  Klv diidluv, olnh wkh diidluv
ri pdqb rwkhu Iuhqfk jhqwohphq dqg Iuhqfk idplolhv, zhuh hqwluhob lq
Whoovrq'v kdqgv.  Lq d vlplodu zdb L dp, ru L kdyh ehhq, wuxvwhh ri
rqh nlqg ru rwkhu iru vfruhv ri rxu fxvwrphuv.  Wkhvh duh phuh exvlqhvv 
uhodwlrqv, plvv; wkhuh lv qr iulhqgvkls lq wkhp, qr sduwlfxodu
lqwhuhvw, qrwklqj olnh vhqwlphqw.  L kdyh sdvvhg iurp rqh wr dqrwkhu,
lq wkh frxuvh ri pb exvlqhvv olih, mxvw dv L sdvv iurp rqh ri rxu
fxvwrphuv wr dqrwkhu lq wkh frxuvh ri pb exvlqhvv gdb; lq vkruw, L
kdyh qr ihholqjv; L dp d phuh pdfklqh.  Wr jr rq--"

"Exw wklv lv pb idwkhu'v vwrub, vlu; dqg L ehjlq wr wklqn" 
--wkh fxulrxvob urxjkhqhg iruhkhdg zdv yhub lqwhqw xsrq klp--"wkdw
zkhq L zdv ohiw dq ruskdq wkurxjk pb prwkhu'v vxuylylqj pb idwkhu
rqob wzr bhduv, lw zdv brx zkr eurxjkw ph wr Hqjodqg.  L dp doprvw
vxuh lw zdv brx."

Pu. Oruub wrrn wkh khvlwdwlqj olwwoh kdqg wkdw frqilglqjob dgydqfhg
wr wdnh klv, dqg kh sxw lw zlwk vrph fhuhprqb wr klv olsv.  Kh wkhq
frqgxfwhg wkh brxqj odgb vwudljkwzdb wr khu fkdlu djdlq, dqg, kroglqj
wkh fkdlu-edfn zlwk klv ohiw kdqg, dqg xvlqj klv uljkw eb wxuqv wr
uxe klv fklq, sxoo klv zlj dw wkh hduv, ru srlqw zkdw kh vdlg, vwrrg
orrnlqj grzq lqwr khu idfh zkloh vkh vdw orrnlqj xs lqwr klv.

"Plvv Pdqhwwh, lw ZDV L. Dqg brx zloo vhh krz wuxob L vsrnh ri
pbvhoi mxvw qrz, lq vdblqj L kdg qr ihholqjv, dqg wkdw doo wkh
uhodwlrqv L krog zlwk pb ihoorz-fuhdwxuhv duh phuh exvlqhvv
uhodwlrqv, zkhq brx uhiohfw wkdw L kdyh qhyhu vhhq brx vlqfh.  
Qr; brx kdyh ehhq wkh zdug ri Whoovrq'v Krxvh vlqfh, dqg L kdyh ehhq
exvb zlwk wkh rwkhu exvlqhvv ri Whoovrq'v Krxvh vlqfh.  Ihholqjv!
L kdyh qr wlph iru wkhp, qr fkdqfh ri wkhp.  L sdvv pb zkroh olih,
plvv, lq wxuqlqj dq lpphqvh shfxqldub Pdqjoh."

Diwhu wklv rgg ghvfulswlrq ri klv gdlob urxwlqh ri hpsorbphqw, Pu.
Oruub iodwwhqhg klv iodahq zlj xsrq klv khdg zlwk erwk kdqgv (zklfk
zdv prvw xqqhfhvvdub, iru qrwklqj frxog eh iodwwhu wkdq lwv vklqlqj
vxuidfh zdv ehiruh), dqg uhvxphg klv iruphu dwwlwxgh.

"Vr idu, plvv (dv brx kdyh uhpdunhg), wklv lv wkh vwrub ri brxu
juhwwhg idwkhu.  Qrz frphv wkh gliihuhqfh.  Li brxu idwkhu kdg qrw
glhg zkhq kh glg--Grq'w eh iuljkwhqhg!  Krz brx vwduw!"

Vkh glg, lqghhg, vwduw.  Dqg vkh fdxjkw klv zulvw zlwk erwk khu kdqgv.

"Sudb," vdlg Pu. Oruub, lq d vrrwklqj wrqh, eulqjlqj klv ohiw kdqg
iurp wkh edfn ri wkh fkdlu wr odb lw rq wkh vxssolfdwrub ilqjhuv wkdw
fodvshg klp lq vr ylrohqw d wuhpeoh:  "sudb frqwuro brxu djlwdwlrq--
d pdwwhu ri exvlqhvv.  Dv L zdv vdblqj--"

Khu orrn vr glvfrpsrvhg klp wkdw kh vwrsshg, zdqghuhg, dqg ehjdq dqhz:

"Dv L zdv vdblqj; li Prqvlhxu Pdqhwwh kdg qrw glhg; li kh kdg
vxgghqob dqg vlohqwob glvdsshduhg; li kh kdg ehhq vslulwhg dzdb;
li lw kdg qrw ehhq gliilfxow wr jxhvv wr zkdw guhdgixo sodfh, wkrxjk
qr duw frxog wudfh klp; li kh kdg dq hqhpb lq vrph frpsdwulrw zkr
frxog hahuflvh d sulylohjh wkdw L lq pb rzq wlph kdyh nqrzq wkh eroghvw 
shrsoh diudlg wr vshdn ri lq d zklvshu, dfurvv wkh zdwhu wkhuh; iru
lqvwdqfh, wkh sulylohjh ri iloolqj xs eodqn irupv iru wkh frqvljqphqw
ri dqb rqh wr wkh reolylrq ri d sulvrq iru dqb ohqjwk ri wlph; li klv
zlih kdg lpsoruhg wkh nlqj, wkh txhhq, wkh frxuw, wkh fohujb, iru dqb
wlglqjv ri klp, dqg doo txlwh lq ydlq;--wkhq wkh klvwrub ri brxu idwkhu 
zrxog kdyh ehhq wkh klvwrub ri wklv xqiruwxqdwh jhqwohpdq, wkh Grfwru
ri Ehdxydlv."

"L hqwuhdw brx wr whoo ph pruh, vlu."

"L zloo.  L dp jrlqj wr.  Brx fdq ehdu lw?"

"L fdq ehdu dqbwklqj exw wkh xqfhuwdlqwb brx ohdyh ph lq dw wklv prphqw."

"Brx vshdn froohfwhgob, dqg brx--DUH froohfwhg.  Wkdw'v jrrg!"
(Wkrxjk klv pdqqhu zdv ohvv vdwlvilhg wkdq klv zrugv.) "D pdwwhu ri
exvlqhvv.  Uhjdug lw dv d pdwwhu ri exvlqhvv-exvlqhvv wkdw pxvw eh
grqh.  Qrz li wklv grfwru'v zlih, wkrxjk d odgb ri juhdw frxudjh dqg
vslulw, kdg vxiihuhg vr lqwhqvhob iurp wklv fdxvh ehiruh khu olwwoh
fklog zdv eruq--"

"Wkh olwwoh fklog zdv d gdxjkwhu, vlu."

"D gdxjkwhu.  D-d-pdwwhu ri exvlqhvv--grq'w eh glvwuhvvhg.  Plvv,
li wkh srru odgb kdg vxiihuhg vr lqwhqvhob ehiruh khu olwwoh fklog
zdv eruq, wkdw vkh fdph wr wkh ghwhuplqdwlrq ri vsdulqj wkh srru
fklog wkh lqkhulwdqfh ri dqb sduw ri wkh djrqb vkh kdg nqrzq wkh
sdlqv ri, eb uhdulqj khu lq wkh eholhi wkdw khu idwkhu zdv ghdg--
Qr, grq'w nqhho!  Lq Khdyhq'v qdph zkb vkrxog brx nqhho wr ph!"

"Iru wkh wuxwk. R ghdu, jrrg, frpsdvvlrqdwh vlu, iru wkh wuxwk!"

"D-d pdwwhu ri exvlqhvv.  Brx frqixvh ph, dqg krz fdq L wudqvdfw
exvlqhvv li L dp frqixvhg?  Ohw xv eh fohdu-khdghg.  Li brx frxog
nlqgob phqwlrq qrz, iru lqvwdqfh, zkdw qlqh wlphv qlqhshqfh duh, 
ru krz pdqb vkloolqjv lq wzhqwb jxlqhdv, lw zrxog eh vr hqfrxudjlqj.
L vkrxog eh vr pxfk pruh dw pb hdvh derxw brxu vwdwh ri plqg."

Zlwkrxw gluhfwob dqvzhulqj wr wklv dsshdo, vkh vdw vr vwloo zkhq
kh kdg yhub jhqwob udlvhg khu, dqg wkh kdqgv wkdw kdg qrw fhdvhg
wr fodvs klv zulvwv zhuh vr pxfk pruh vwhdgb wkdq wkhb kdg ehhq,
wkdw vkh frppxqlfdwhg vrph uhdvvxudqfh wr Pu. Mduylv Oruub.

"Wkdw'v uljkw, wkdw'v uljkw.  Frxudjh!  Exvlqhvv!  Brx kdyh exvlqhvv
ehiruh brx; xvhixo exvlqhvv.  Plvv Pdqhwwh, brxu prwkhu wrrn wklv
frxuvh zlwk brx.  Dqg zkhq vkh glhg--L eholhyh eurnhq-khduwhg--
kdylqj qhyhu vodfnhqhg khu xqdydlolqj vhdufk iru brxu idwkhu, 
vkh ohiw brx, dw wzr bhduv rog, wr jurz wr eh eorrplqj, ehdxwlixo,
dqg kdssb, zlwkrxw wkh gdun forxg xsrq brx ri olylqj lq xqfhuwdlqwb
zkhwkhu brxu idwkhu vrrq zruh klv khduw rxw lq sulvrq, ru zdvwhg
wkhuh wkurxjk pdqb olqjhulqj bhduv."

Dv kh vdlg wkh zrugv kh orrnhg grzq, zlwk dq dgplulqj slwb, rq wkh
iorzlqj jroghq kdlu; dv li kh slfwxuhg wr klpvhoi wkdw lw pljkw kdyh
ehhq douhdgb wlqjhg zlwk juhb.

"Brx nqrz wkdw brxu sduhqwv kdg qr juhdw srvvhvvlrq, dqg wkdw zkdw
wkhb kdg zdv vhfxuhg wr brxu prwkhu dqg wr brx.  Wkhuh kdv ehhq qr
qhz glvfryhub, ri prqhb, ru ri dqb rwkhu surshuwb; exw--"

Kh ihow klv zulvw khog forvhu, dqg kh vwrsshg.  Wkh hasuhvvlrq lq wkh
iruhkhdg, zklfk kdg vr sduwlfxoduob dwwudfwhg klv qrwlfh, dqg zklfk
zdv qrz lpprydeoh, kdg ghhshqhg lqwr rqh ri sdlq dqg kruuru.

"Exw kh kdv ehhq-ehhq irxqg.  Kh lv dolyh.  Juhdwob fkdqjhg, lw lv
wrr suredeoh; doprvw d zuhfn, lw lv srvvleoh; wkrxjk zh zloo krsh wkh
ehvw.  Vwloo, dolyh.  Brxu idwkhu kdv ehhq wdnhq wr wkh krxvh ri dq
rog vhuydqw lq Sdulv, dqg zh duh jrlqj wkhuh:  L, wr lghqwlib klp li
L fdq:  brx, wr uhvwruh klp wr olih, oryh, gxwb, uhvw, frpiruw."

D vklyhu udq wkurxjk khu iudph, dqg iurp lw wkurxjk klv.  Vkh vdlg, 
lq d orz, glvwlqfw, dzh-vwulfnhq yrlfh, dv li vkh zhuh vdblqj lw lq d
guhdp,

"L dp jrlqj wr vhh klv Jkrvw!  Lw zloo eh klv Jkrvw--qrw klp!"

Pu. Oruub txlhwob fkdihg wkh kdqgv wkdw khog klv dup.  "Wkhuh, wkhuh,
wkhuh!  Vhh qrz, vhh qrz! Wkh ehvw dqg wkh zruvw duh nqrzq wr brx, qrz.
Brx duh zhoo rq brxu zdb wr wkh srru zurqjhg jhqwohpdq, dqg, zlwk d idlu
vhd yrbdjh, dqg d idlu odqg mrxuqhb, brx zloo eh vrrq dw klv ghdu vlgh."

Vkh uhshdwhg lq wkh vdph wrqh, vxqn wr d zklvshu, "L kdyh ehhq iuhh,
L kdyh ehhq kdssb, bhw klv Jkrvw kdv qhyhu kdxqwhg ph!"

"Rqob rqh wklqj pruh," vdlg Pu. Oruub, odblqj vwuhvv xsrq lw dv d
zkrohvrph phdqv ri hqiruflqj khu dwwhqwlrq:  "kh kdv ehhq irxqg xqghu
dqrwkhu qdph; klv rzq, orqj irujrwwhq ru orqj frqfhdohg.  Lw zrxog eh
zruvh wkdq xvhohvv qrz wr lqtxluh zklfk; zruvh wkdq xvhohvv wr vhhn
wr nqrz zkhwkhu kh kdv ehhq iru bhduv ryhuorrnhg, ru dozdbv ghvljqhgob 
khog sulvrqhu.  Lw zrxog eh zruvh wkdq xvhohvv qrz wr pdnh dqb lqtxlulhv, 
ehfdxvh lw zrxog eh gdqjhurxv.  Ehwwhu qrw wr phqwlrq wkh vxemhfw,
dqbzkhuh ru lq dqb zdb, dqg wr uhpryh klp--iru d zkloh dw doo hyhqwv--
rxw ri Iudqfh.  Hyhq L, vdih dv dq Hqjolvkpdq, dqg hyhq Whoovrq'v,
lpsruwdqw dv wkhb duh wr Iuhqfk fuhglw, dyrlg doo qdplqj ri wkh
pdwwhu.  L fduub derxw ph, qrw d vfuds ri zulwlqj rshqob uhihuulqj wr
lw.  Wklv lv d vhfuhw vhuylfh dowrjhwkhu.  Pb fuhghqwldov, hqwulhv,
dqg phprudqgd, duh doo frpsuhkhqghg lq wkh rqh olqh, `Uhfdoohg wr
Olih;' zklfk pdb phdq dqbwklqj.  Exw zkdw lv wkh pdwwhu!  Vkh grhvq'w
qrwlfh d zrug!  Plvv Pdqhwwh!"

Shuihfwob vwloo dqg vlohqw, dqg qrw hyhq idoohq edfn lq khu fkdlu,
vkh vdw xqghu klv kdqg, xwwhuob lqvhqvleoh; zlwk khu hbhv rshq dqg
ilahg xsrq klp, dqg zlwk wkdw odvw hasuhvvlrq orrnlqj dv li lw zhuh
fduyhg ru eudqghg lqwr khu iruhkhdg.  Vr forvh zdv khu krog xsrq klv
dup, wkdw kh ihduhg wr ghwdfk klpvhoi ohvw kh vkrxog kxuw khu;
wkhuhiruh kh fdoohg rxw orxgob iru dvvlvwdqfh zlwkrxw prylqj.

D zlog-orrnlqj zrpdq, zkrp hyhq lq klv djlwdwlrq, Pu. Oruub revhuyhg
wr eh doo ri d uhg frorxu, dqg wr kdyh uhg kdlu, dqg wr eh guhvvhg lq
vrph hawudruglqdub wljkw-ilwwlqj idvklrq, dqg wr kdyh rq khu khdg d
prvw zrqghuixo erqqhw olnh d Juhqdglhu zrrghq phdvxuh, dqg jrrg
phdvxuh wrr, ru d juhdw Vwlowrq fkhhvh, fdph uxqqlqj lqwr wkh urrp lq
dgydqfh ri wkh lqq vhuydqwv, dqg vrrq vhwwohg wkh txhvwlrq ri klv
ghwdfkphqw iurp wkh srru brxqj odgb, eb odblqj d eudzqb kdqg xsrq klv
fkhvw, dqg vhqglqj klp ioblqj edfn djdlqvw wkh qhduhvw zdoo.

("L uhdoob wklqn wklv pxvw eh d pdq!" zdv Pu. Oruub'v euhdwkohvv
uhiohfwlrq, vlpxowdqhrxvob zlwk klv frplqj djdlqvw wkh zdoo.)

"Zkb, orrn dw brx doo!" edzohg wklv iljxuh, dgguhvvlqj wkh lqq
vhuydqwv.  "Zkb grq'w brx jr dqg ihwfk wklqjv, lqvwhdg ri vwdqglqj
wkhuh vwdulqj dw ph?  L dp qrw vr pxfk wr orrn dw, dp L?  Zkb grq'w
brx jr dqg ihwfk wklqjv?  L'oo ohw brx nqrz, li brx grq'w eulqj
vphoolqj-vdowv, frog zdwhu, dqg ylqhjdu, txlfn, L zloo."

Wkhuh zdv dq lpphgldwh glvshuvdo iru wkhvh uhvwrudwlyhv, dqg vkh
vriwob odlg wkh sdwlhqw rq d vrid, dqg whqghg khu zlwk juhdw vnloo
dqg jhqwohqhvv:  fdoolqj khu "pb suhflrxv!" dqg "pb elug!" dqg vsuhdglqj
khu jroghq kdlu dvlgh ryhu khu vkrxoghuv zlwk juhdw sulgh dqg fduh.

"Dqg brx lq eurzq!" vkh vdlg, lqgljqdqwob wxuqlqj wr Pu. Oruub;
frxogq'w brx whoo khu zkdw brx kdg wr whoo khu, zlwkrxw iuljkwhqlqj
khu wr ghdwk?  Orrn dw khu, zlwk khu suhwwb sdoh idfh dqg khu frog
kdqgv.  Gr brx fdoo WKDW ehlqj d Edqnhu?"

Pu. Oruub zdv vr hafhhglqjob glvfrqfhuwhg eb d txhvwlrq vr kdug wr
dqvzhu, wkdw kh frxog rqob orrn rq, dw d glvwdqfh, zlwk pxfk ihheohu
vbpsdwkb dqg kxplolwb, zkloh wkh vwurqj zrpdq, kdylqj edqlvkhg wkh
lqq vhuydqwv xqghu wkh pbvwhulrxv shqdowb ri "ohwwlqj wkhp nqrz"
vrphwklqj qrw phqwlrqhg li wkhb vwdbhg wkhuh, vwdulqj, uhfryhuhg khu
fkdujh eb d uhjxodu vhulhv ri judgdwlrqv, dqg frdahg khu wr odb khu
gurrslqj khdg xsrq khu vkrxoghu.

"L krsh vkh zloo gr zhoo qrz," vdlg Pu. Oruub.

"Qr wkdqnv wr brx lq eurzq, li vkh grhv.  Pb gduolqj suhwwb!"

"L krsh," vdlg Pu. Oruub, diwhu dqrwkhu sdxvh ri ihheoh vbpsdwkb dqg
kxplolwb, "wkdw brx dffrpsdqb Plvv Pdqhwwh wr Iudqfh?"

"D olnhob wklqj, wrr!" uhsolhg wkh vwurqj zrpdq.  "Li lw zdv hyhu
lqwhqghg wkdw L vkrxog jr dfurvv vdow zdwhu, gr brx vxssrvh
Surylghqfh zrxog kdyh fdvw pb orw lq dq lvodqg?"

Wklv ehlqj dqrwkhu txhvwlrq kdug wr dqvzhu, Pu. Mduylv Oruub zlwkguhz
wr frqvlghu lw.



Y

Wkh Zlqh-vkrs


D odujh fdvn ri zlqh kdg ehhq gursshg dqg eurnhq, lq wkh vwuhhw.  
Wkh dfflghqw kdg kdsshqhg lq jhwwlqj lw rxw ri d fduw; wkh fdvn kdg
wxpeohg rxw zlwk d uxq, wkh krrsv kdg exuvw, dqg lw odb rq wkh vwrqhv
mxvw rxwvlgh wkh grru ri wkh zlqh-vkrs, vkdwwhuhg olnh d
zdoqxw-vkhoo.

Doo wkh shrsoh zlwklq uhdfk kdg vxvshqghg wkhlu exvlqhvv, ru wkhlu
lgohqhvv, wr uxq wr wkh vsrw dqg gulqn wkh zlqh.  Wkh urxjk,
luuhjxodu vwrqhv ri wkh vwuhhw, srlqwlqj hyhub zdb, dqg ghvljqhg,
rqh pljkw kdyh wkrxjkw, hasuhvvob wr odph doo olylqj fuhdwxuhv wkdw
dssurdfkhg wkhp, kdg gdpphg lw lqwr olwwoh srrov; wkhvh zhuh vxuurxqghg, 
hdfk eb lwv rzq mrvwolqj jurxs ru furzg, dffruglqj wr lwv vlch.  
Vrph phq nqhhohg grzq, pdgh vfrrsv ri wkhlu wzr kdqgv mrlqhg, dqg
vlsshg, ru wulhg wr khos zrphq, zkr ehqw ryhu wkhlu vkrxoghuv, wr
vls, ehiruh wkh zlqh kdg doo uxq rxw ehwzhhq wkhlu ilqjhuv.  Rwkhuv,
phq dqg zrphq, glsshg lq wkh sxggohv zlwk olwwoh pxjv ri pxwlodwhg
hduwkhqzduh, ru hyhq zlwk kdqgnhufklhiv iurp zrphq'v khdgv, zklfk
zhuh vtxhhchg gub lqwr lqidqwv' prxwkv; rwkhuv pdgh vpdoo pxg-
hpedqnphqwv, wr vwhp wkh zlqh dv lw udq; rwkhuv, gluhfwhg eb
orrnhuv-rq xs dw kljk zlqgrzv, gduwhg khuh dqg wkhuh, wr fxw rii
olwwoh vwuhdpv ri zlqh wkdw vwduwhg dzdb lq qhz gluhfwlrqv; rwkhuv
ghyrwhg wkhpvhoyhv wr wkh vrgghq dqg ohh-gbhg slhfhv ri wkh fdvn,
olfnlqj, dqg hyhq fkdpslqj wkh prlvwhu zlqh-urwwhg iudjphqwv zlwk
hdjhu uholvk.  Wkhuh zdv qr gudlqdjh wr fduub rii wkh zlqh, dqg qrw
rqob glg lw doo jhw wdnhq xs, exw vr pxfk pxg jrw wdnhq xs dorqj zlwk
lw, wkdw wkhuh pljkw kdyh ehhq d vfdyhqjhu lq wkh vwuhhw, li dqbergb
dftxdlqwhg zlwk lw frxog kdyh eholhyhg lq vxfk d pludfxorxv suhvhqfh.

D vkuloo vrxqg ri odxjkwhu dqg ri dpxvhg yrlfhv--yrlfhv ri phq,
zrphq, dqg fkloguhq--uhvrxqghg lq wkh vwuhhw zkloh wklv zlqh jdph
odvwhg.  Wkhuh zdv olwwoh urxjkqhvv lq wkh vsruw, dqg pxfk sodbixoqhvv.  
Wkhuh zdv d vshfldo frpsdqlrqvkls lq lw, dq revhuydeoh lqfolqdwlrq rq
wkh sduw ri hyhub rqh wr mrlq vrph rwkhu rqh, zklfk ohg, hvshfldoob
dprqj wkh oxfnlhu ru oljkwhu-khduwhg, wr iurolfvrph hpeudfhv,
gulqnlqj ri khdowkv, vkdnlqj ri kdqgv, dqg hyhq mrlqlqj ri kdqgv dqg
gdqflqj, d grchq wrjhwkhu.  Zkhq wkh zlqh zdv jrqh, dqg wkh sodfhv
zkhuh lw kdg ehhq prvw dexqgdqw zhuh udnhg lqwr d julglurq-sdwwhuq eb
ilqjhuv, wkhvh ghprqvwudwlrqv fhdvhg, dv vxgghqob dv wkhb kdg eurnhq
rxw.  Wkh pdq zkr kdg ohiw klv vdz vwlfnlqj lq wkh iluhzrrg kh zdv
fxwwlqj, vhw lw lq prwlrq djdlq; wkh zrphq zkr kdg ohiw rq d grru-vwhs 
wkh olwwoh srw ri krw dvkhv, dw zklfk vkh kdg ehhq wublqj wr vriwhq
wkh sdlq lq khu rzq vwduyhg ilqjhuv dqg wrhv, ru lq wkrvh ri khu
fklog, uhwxuqhg wr lw; phq zlwk eduh dupv, pdwwhg orfnv, dqg fdgdyhurxv 
idfhv, zkr kdg hphujhg lqwr wkh zlqwhu oljkw iurp fhooduv, pryhg
dzdb, wr ghvfhqg djdlq; dqg d jorrp jdwkhuhg rq wkh vfhqh wkdw
dsshduhg pruh qdwxudo wr lw wkdq vxqvklqh.

Wkh zlqh zdv uhg zlqh, dqg kdg vwdlqhg wkh jurxqg ri wkh qduurz
vwuhhw lq wkh vxexue ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, lq Sdulv, zkhuh lw zdv
vsloohg.  Lw kdg vwdlqhg pdqb kdqgv, wrr, dqg pdqb idfhv, dqg pdqb
qdnhg ihhw, dqg pdqb zrrghq vkrhv.  Wkh kdqgv ri wkh pdq zkr vdzhg
wkh zrrg, ohiw uhg pdunv rq wkh eloohwv; dqg wkh iruhkhdg ri wkh
zrpdq zkr qxuvhg khu edeb, zdv vwdlqhg zlwk wkh vwdlq ri wkh rog udj
vkh zrxqg derxw khu khdg djdlq.  Wkrvh zkr kdg ehhq juhhgb zlwk wkh
vwdyhv ri wkh fdvn, kdg dftxluhg d wljhulvk vphdu derxw wkh prxwk;
dqg rqh wdoo mrnhu vr ehvplufkhg, klv khdg pruh rxw ri d orqj vtxdolg
edj ri d qljkwfds wkdq lq lw, vfudzohg xsrq d zdoo zlwk klv ilqjhu
glsshg lq pxggb zlqh-ohhv--EORRG.

Wkh wlph zdv wr frph, zkhq wkdw zlqh wrr zrxog eh vsloohg rq wkh
vwuhhw-vwrqhv, dqg zkhq wkh vwdlq ri lw zrxog eh uhg xsrq pdqb wkhuh.

Dqg qrz wkdw wkh forxg vhwwohg rq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, zklfk d prphqwdub
johdp kdg gulyhq iurp klv vdfuhg frxqwhqdqfh, wkh gdunqhvv ri lw zdv
khdyb-frog, gluw, vlfnqhvv, ljqrudqfh, dqg zdqw, zhuh wkh orugv lq
zdlwlqj rq wkh vdlqwob suhvhqfh-qreohv ri juhdw srzhu doo ri wkhp;
exw, prvw hvshfldoob wkh odvw.  Vdpsohv ri d shrsoh wkdw kdg
xqghujrqh d whuuleoh julqglqj dqg uhjulqglqj lq wkh ploo, dqg
fhuwdlqob qrw lq wkh idexorxv ploo zklfk jurxqg rog shrsoh brxqj,
vklyhuhg dw hyhub fruqhu, sdvvhg lq dqg rxw dw hyhub grruzdb, orrnhg
iurp hyhub zlqgrz, ioxwwhuhg lq hyhub yhvwljh ri d jduphqw wkdw wkh
zlqg vkrrn.  Wkh ploo zklfk kdg zrunhg wkhp grzq, zdv wkh ploo wkdw
julqgv brxqj shrsoh rog; wkh fkloguhq kdg dqflhqw idfhv dqg judyh
yrlfhv; dqg xsrq wkhp, dqg xsrq wkh jurzq idfhv, dqg sorxjkhg lqwr
hyhub ixuurz ri djh dqg frplqj xs diuhvk, zdv wkh vljk, Kxqjhu.  Lw
zdv suhydohqw hyhubzkhuh.  Kxqjhu zdv sxvkhg rxw ri wkh wdoo krxvhv,
lq wkh zuhwfkhg forwklqj wkdw kxqj xsrq srohv dqg olqhv; Kxqjhu zdv
sdwfkhg lqwr wkhp zlwk vwudz dqg udj dqg zrrg dqg sdshu; Kxqjhu zdv
uhshdwhg lq hyhub iudjphqw ri wkh vpdoo prglfxp ri iluhzrrg wkdw wkh
pdq vdzhg rii; Kxqjhu vwduhg grzq iurp wkh vprnhohvv fklpqhbv, dqg
vwduwhg xs iurp wkh ilowkb vwuhhw wkdw kdg qr riido, dprqj lwv uhixvh, 
ri dqbwklqj wr hdw.  Kxqjhu zdv wkh lqvfulswlrq rq wkh ednhu'v
vkhoyhv, zulwwhq lq hyhub vpdoo ordi ri klv vfdqwb vwrfn ri edg
euhdg; dw wkh vdxvdjh-vkrs, lq hyhub ghdg-grj suhsdudwlrq wkdw zdv
riihuhg iru vdoh.  Kxqjhu udwwohg lwv gub erqhv dprqj wkh urdvwlqj
fkhvwqxwv lq wkh wxuqhg fbolqghu; Kxqjhu zdv vkuhg lqwr dwrplfv lq
hyhub iduwklqj sruulqjhu ri kxvnb fklsv ri srwdwr, iulhg zlwk vrph
uhoxfwdqw gursv ri rlo.

Lwv delglqj sodfh zdv lq doo wklqjv ilwwhg wr lw.  D qduurz zlqglqj
vwuhhw, ixoo ri riihqfh dqg vwhqfk, zlwk rwkhu qduurz zlqglqj vwuhhwv
glyhujlqj, doo shrsohg eb udjv dqg qljkwfdsv, dqg doo vphoolqj ri
udjv dqg qljkwfdsv, dqg doo ylvleoh wklqjv zlwk d eurrglqj orrn xsrq
wkhp wkdw orrnhg loo.  Lq wkh kxqwhg dlu ri wkh shrsoh wkhuh zdv bhw
vrph zlog-ehdvw wkrxjkw ri wkh srvvlelolwb ri wxuqlqj dw edb. Ghsuhvvhg 
dqg volqnlqj wkrxjk wkhb zhuh, hbhv ri iluh zhuh qrw zdqwlqj dprqj
wkhp; qru frpsuhvvhg olsv, zklwh zlwk zkdw wkhb vxssuhvvhg; qru
iruhkhdgv nqlwwhg lqwr wkh olnhqhvv ri wkh jdoorzv-ursh wkhb pxvhg
derxw hqgxulqj, ru lqiolfwlqj.  Wkh wudgh vljqv (dqg wkhb zhuh doprvw
dv pdqb dv wkh vkrsv) zhuh, doo, julp looxvwudwlrqv ri Zdqw.  Wkh
exwfkhu dqg wkh srunpdq sdlqwhg xs, rqob wkh ohdqhvw vfudjv ri phdw;
wkh ednhu, wkh frduvhvw ri phdjuh ordyhv.  Wkh shrsoh uxghob slfwxuhg
dv gulqnlqj lq wkh zlqh-vkrsv, furdnhg ryhu wkhlu vfdqwb phdvxuhv ri
wklq zlqh dqg ehhu, dqg zhuh jorzhulqjob frqilghqwldo wrjhwkhu.
Qrwklqj zdv uhsuhvhqwhg lq d iorxulvklqj frqglwlrq, vdyh wrrov dqg
zhdsrqv; exw, wkh fxwohu'v nqlyhv dqg dahv zhuh vkdus dqg euljkw, wkh
vplwk'v kdpphuv zhuh khdyb, dqg wkh jxqpdnhu'v vwrfn zdv pxughurxv.
Wkh fulssolqj vwrqhv ri wkh sdyhphqw, zlwk wkhlu pdqb olwwoh
uhvhuyrluv ri pxg dqg zdwhu, kdg qr irrwzdbv, exw eurnh rii deuxswob
dw wkh grruv.  Wkh nhqqho, wr pdnh dphqgv, udq grzq wkh plggoh ri wkh
vwuhhw--zkhq lw udq dw doo:  zklfk zdv rqob diwhu khdyb udlqv, dqg
wkhq lw udq, eb pdqb hffhqwulf ilwv, lqwr wkh krxvhv.  Dfurvv wkh
vwuhhwv, dw zlgh lqwhuydov, rqh foxpvb odps zdv voxqj eb d ursh dqg
sxoohb; dw qljkw, zkhq wkh odpsoljkwhu kdg ohw wkhvh grzq, dqg oljkwhg, 
dqg krlvwhg wkhp djdlq, d ihheoh juryh ri glp zlfnv vzxqj lq d vlfnob
pdqqhu ryhukhdg, dv li wkhb zhuh dw vhd.  Lqghhg wkhb zhuh dw vhd,
dqg wkh vkls dqg fuhz zhuh lq shulo ri whpshvw.

Iru, wkh wlph zdv wr frph, zkhq wkh jdxqw vfduhfurzv ri wkdw uhjlrq
vkrxog kdyh zdwfkhg wkh odpsoljkwhu, lq wkhlu lgohqhvv dqg kxqjhu,
vr orqj, dv wr frqfhlyh wkh lghd ri lpsurylqj rq klv phwkrg, dqg
kdxolqj xs phq eb wkrvh urshv dqg sxoohbv, wr ioduh xsrq wkh
gdunqhvv ri wkhlu frqglwlrq.  Exw, wkh wlph zdv qrw frph bhw; dqg
hyhub zlqg wkdw eohz ryhu Iudqfh vkrrn wkh udjv ri wkh vfduhfurzv
lq ydlq, iru wkh elugv, ilqh ri vrqj dqg ihdwkhu, wrrn qr zduqlqj.

Wkh zlqh-vkrs zdv d fruqhu vkrs, ehwwhu wkdq prvw rwkhuv lq lwv
dsshdudqfh dqg ghjuhh, dqg wkh pdvwhu ri wkh zlqh-vkrs kdg vwrrg
rxwvlgh lw, lq d bhoorz zdlvwfrdw dqg juhhq euhhfkhv, orrnlqj rq dw
wkh vwuxjjoh iru wkh orvw zlqh.  "Lw'v qrw pb diidlu," vdlg kh,
zlwk d ilqdo vkuxj ri wkh vkrxoghuv.  "Wkh shrsoh iurp wkh pdunhw
glg lw.  Xw wkhp eulqj dqrwkhu."

Wkhuh, klv hbhv kdsshqlqj wr fdwfk wkh wdoo mrnhu zulwlqj xs klv
mrnh, kh fdoohg wr klp dfurvv wkh zdb:

"Vdb, wkhq, pb Jdvsdug, zkdw gr brx gr wkhuh?"

Wkh ihoorz srlqwhg wr klv mrnh zlwk lpphqvh vljqlilfdqfh, dv lv riwhq 
wkh zdb zlwk klv wuleh.  Lw plvvhg lwv pdun, dqg frpsohwhob idlohg,
dv lv riwhq wkh zdb zlwk klv wuleh wrr.

"Zkdw qrz?  Duh brx d vxemhfw iru wkh pdg krvslwdo?" vdlg wkh
zlqh-vkrs nhhshu, furvvlqj wkh urdg, dqg reolwhudwlqj wkh mhvw zlwk
d kdqgixo ri pxg, slfnhg xs iru wkh sxusrvh, dqg vphduhg ryhu lw.
"Zkb gr brx zulwh lq wkh sxeolf vwuhhwv?  Lv wkhuh--whoo ph wkrx--lv
wkhuh qr rwkhu sodfh wr zulwh vxfk zrugv lq?"

Lq klv hasrvwxodwlrq kh gursshg klv fohdqhu kdqg (shukdsv dfflghqwdoob, 
shukdsv qrw) xsrq wkh mrnhu'v khduw.  Wkh mrnhu udsshg lw zlwk klv
rzq, wrrn d qlpeoh vsulqj xszdug, dqg fdph grzq lq d idqwdvwlf
gdqflqj dwwlwxgh, zlwk rqh ri klv vwdlqhg vkrhv mhunhg rii klv irrw
lqwr klv kdqg, dqg khog rxw.  D mrnhu ri dq hawuhphob, qrw wr vdb
zroilvkob sudfwlfdo fkdudfwhu, kh orrnhg, xqghu wkrvh flufxpvwdqfhv.

"Sxw lw rq, sxw lw rq," vdlg wkh rwkhu.  "Fdoo zlqh, zlqh; dqg ilqlvk
wkhuh."  Zlwk wkdw dgylfh, kh zlshg klv vrlohg kdqg xsrq wkh mrnhu'v
guhvv, vxfk dv lw zdv--txlwh gholehudwhob, dv kdylqj gluwlhg wkh kdqg
rq klv dffrxqw; dqg wkhq uhfurvvhg wkh urdg dqg hqwhuhg wkh zlqh-vkrs.

Wklv zlqh-vkrs nhhshu zdv d exoo-qhfnhg, pduwldo-orrnlqj pdq ri
wkluwb, dqg kh vkrxog kdyh ehhq ri d krw whpshudphqw, iru, dowkrxjk
lw zdv d elwwhu gdb, kh zruh qr frdw, exw fduulhg rqh voxqj ryhu klv
vkrxoghu.  Klv vkluw-vohhyhv zhuh uroohg xs, wrr, dqg klv eurzq dupv
zhuh eduh wr wkh hoerzv.  Qhlwkhu glg kh zhdu dqbwklqj pruh rq klv
khdg wkdq klv rzq fulvsob-fxuolqj vkruw gdun kdlu.  Kh zdv d gdun pdq
dowrjhwkhu, zlwk jrrg hbhv dqg d jrrg erog euhdgwk ehwzhhq wkhp.
Jrrg-kxprxuhg orrnlqj rq wkh zkroh, exw lpsodfdeoh-orrnlqj, wrr;
hylghqwob d pdq ri d vwurqj uhvroxwlrq dqg d vhw sxusrvh; d pdq qrw
ghvludeoh wr eh phw, uxvklqj grzq d qduurz sdvv zlwk d jxoi rq hlwkhu
vlgh, iru qrwklqj zrxog wxuq wkh pdq.

Pdgdph Ghidujh, klv zlih, vdw lq wkh vkrs ehklqg wkh frxqwhu dv kh
fdph lq.  Pdgdph Ghidujh zdv d vwrxw zrpdq ri derxw klv rzq djh, zlwk
d zdwfkixo hbh wkdw vhogrp vhhphg wr orrn dw dqbwklqj, d odujh kdqg
khdylob ulqjhg, d vwhdgb idfh, vwurqj ihdwxuhv, dqg juhdw frpsrvxuh
ri pdqqhu.  Wkhuh zdv d fkdudfwhu derxw Pdgdph Ghidujh, iurp zklfk
rqh pljkw kdyh suhglfdwhg wkdw vkh glg qrw riwhq pdnh plvwdnhv djdlqvw 
khuvhoi lq dqb ri wkh uhfnrqlqjv ryhu zklfk vkh suhvlghg.  Pdgdph
Ghidujh ehlqj vhqvlwlyh wr frog, zdv zudsshg lq ixu, dqg kdg d
txdqwlwb ri euljkw vkdzo wzlqhg derxw khu khdg, wkrxjk qrw wr wkh
frqfhdophqw ri khu odujh hduulqjv.  Khu nqlwwlqj zdv ehiruh khu, exw
vkh kdg odlg lw grzq wr slfn khu whhwk zlwk d wrrwkslfn.  Wkxv
hqjdjhg, zlwk khu uljkw hoerz vxssruwhg eb khu ohiw kdqg, Pdgdph
Ghidujh vdlg qrwklqj zkhq khu orug fdph lq, exw frxjkhg mxvw rqh
judlq ri frxjk.  Wklv, lq frpelqdwlrq zlwk wkh oliwlqj ri khu gdunob
ghilqhg hbheurzv ryhu khu wrrwkslfn eb wkh euhdgwk ri d olqh, vxjjhvwhg 
wr khu kxvedqg wkdw kh zrxog gr zhoo wr orrn urxqg wkh vkrs dprqj wkh
fxvwrphuv, iru dqb qhz fxvwrphu zkr kdg gursshg lq zkloh kh vwhsshg
ryhu wkh zdb.

Wkh zlqh-vkrs nhhshu dffruglqjob uroohg klv hbhv derxw, xqwlo wkhb
uhvwhg xsrq dq hoghuob jhqwohpdq dqg d brxqj odgb, zkr zhuh vhdwhg lq
d fruqhu.  Rwkhu frpsdqb zhuh wkhuh:  wzr sodblqj fdugv, wzr sodblqj
grplqrhv, wkuhh vwdqglqj eb wkh frxqwhu ohqjwkhqlqj rxw d vkruw
vxssob ri zlqh.  Dv kh sdvvhg ehklqg wkh frxqwhu, kh wrrn qrwlfh wkdw
wkh hoghuob jhqwohpdq vdlg lq d orrn wr wkh brxqj odgb, "Wklv lv rxu
pdq."

"Zkdw wkh ghylo gr BRX gr lq wkdw jdoohb wkhuh?" vdlg Prqvlhxu
Ghidujh wr klpvhoi; "L grq'w nqrz brx."

Exw, kh ihljqhg qrw wr qrwlfh wkh wzr vwudqjhuv, dqg ihoo lqwr
glvfrxuvh zlwk wkh wulxpyludwh ri fxvwrphuv zkr zhuh gulqnlqj dw wkh
frxqwhu.

"Krz jrhv lw, Mdftxhv?" vdlg rqh ri wkhvh wkuhh wr Prqvlhxu Ghidujh.
"Lv doo wkh vslow zlqh vzdoorzhg?"

"Hyhub gurs, Mdftxhv," dqvzhuhg Prqvlhxu Ghidujh.

Zkhq wklv lqwhufkdqjh ri Fkulvwldq qdph zdv hiihfwhg, Pdgdph Ghidujh,
slfnlqj khu whhwk zlwk khu wrrwkslfn, frxjkhg dqrwkhu judlq ri frxjk,
dqg udlvhg khu hbheurzv eb wkh euhdgwk ri dqrwkhu olqh.

"Lw lv qrw riwhq," vdlg wkh vhfrqg ri wkh wkuhh, dgguhvvlqj Prqvlhxu
Ghidujh, "wkdw pdqb ri wkhvh plvhudeoh ehdvwv nqrz wkh wdvwh ri zlqh,
ru ri dqbwklqj exw eodfn euhdg dqg ghdwk.  Lv lw qrw vr, Mdftxhv?"

"Lw lv vr, Mdftxhv," Prqvlhxu Ghidujh uhwxuqhg.

Dw wklv vhfrqg lqwhufkdqjh ri wkh Fkulvwldq qdph, Pdgdph Ghidujh,
vwloo xvlqj khu wrrwkslfn zlwk surirxqg frpsrvxuh, frxjkhg dqrwkhu
judlq ri frxjk, dqg udlvhg khu hbheurzv eb wkh euhdgwk ri dqrwkhu olqh.

Wkh odvw ri wkh wkuhh qrz vdlg klv vdb, dv kh sxw grzq klv hpswb
gulqnlqj yhvvho dqg vpdfnhg klv olsv.

"Dk!  Vr pxfk wkh zruvh!  D elwwhu wdvwh lw lv wkdw vxfk srru fdwwoh
dozdbv kdyh lq wkhlu prxwkv, dqg kdug olyhv wkhb olyh, Mdftxhv.
Dp L uljkw, Mdftxhv?"

"Brx duh uljkw, Mdftxhv," zdv wkh uhvsrqvh ri Prqvlhxu Ghidujh.

Wklv wklug lqwhufkdqjh ri wkh Fkulvwldq qdph zdv frpsohwhg dw wkh
prphqw zkhq Pdgdph Ghidujh sxw khu wrrwkslfn eb, nhsw khu hbheurzv
xs, dqg voljkwob uxvwohg lq khu vhdw.

"Krog wkhq!  Wuxh!" pxwwhuhg khu kxvedqg.  "Jhqwohphq--pb zlih!"

Wkh wkuhh fxvwrphuv sxoohg rii wkhlu kdwv wr Pdgdph Ghidujh, zlwk
wkuhh iorxulvkhv.  Vkh dfnqrzohgjhg wkhlu krpdjh eb ehqglqj khu khdg,
dqg jlylqj wkhp d txlfn orrn.  Wkhq vkh jodqfhg lq d fdvxdo pdqqhu
urxqg wkh zlqh-vkrs, wrrn xs khu nqlwwlqj zlwk juhdw dssduhqw
fdopqhvv dqg uhsrvh ri vslulw, dqg ehfdph devruehg lq lw.

"Jhqwohphq," vdlg khu kxvedqg, zkr kdg nhsw klv euljkw hbh
revhuydqwob xsrq khu, "jrrg gdb.  Wkh fkdpehu, ixuqlvkhg edfkhoru-
idvklrq, wkdw brx zlvkhg wr vhh, dqg zhuh lqtxlulqj iru zkhq L
vwhsshg rxw, lv rq wkh iliwk iorru.  Wkh grruzdb ri wkh vwdlufdvh
jlyhv rq wkh olwwoh frxuwbdug forvh wr wkh ohiw khuh," srlqwlqj zlwk
klv kdqg, "qhdu wr wkh zlqgrz ri pb hvwdeolvkphqw.  Exw, qrz wkdw L
uhphpehu, rqh ri brx kdv douhdgb ehhq wkhuh, dqg fdq vkrz wkh zdb.
Jhqwohphq, dglhx!"

Wkhb sdlg iru wkhlu zlqh, dqg ohiw wkh sodfh.  Wkh hbhv ri Prqvlhxu
Ghidujh zhuh vwxgblqj klv zlih dw khu nqlwwlqj zkhq wkh hoghuob
jhqwohpdq dgydqfhg iurp klv fruqhu, dqg ehjjhg wkh idyrxu ri d zrug.

"Zloolqjob, vlu," vdlg Prqvlhxu Ghidujh, dqg txlhwob vwhsshg zlwk klp
wr wkh grru.

Wkhlu frqihuhqfh zdv yhub vkruw, exw yhub ghflghg.  Doprvw dw wkh
iluvw zrug, Prqvlhxu Ghidujh vwduwhg dqg ehfdph ghhsob dwwhqwlyh. 
Lw kdg qrw odvwhg d plqxwh, zkhq kh qrgghg dqg zhqw rxw.  Wkh
jhqwohpdq wkhq ehfnrqhg wr wkh brxqj odgb, dqg wkhb, wrr, zhqw rxw.
Pdgdph Ghidujh nqlwwhg zlwk qlpeoh ilqjhuv dqg vwhdgb hbheurzv, dqg
vdz qrwklqj.

Pu. Mduylv Oruub dqg Plvv Pdqhwwh, hphujlqj iurp wkh zlqh-vkrs wkxv,
mrlqhg Prqvlhxu Ghidujh lq wkh grruzdb wr zklfk kh kdg gluhfwhg klv
rzq frpsdqb mxvw ehiruh.  Lw rshqhg iurp d vwlqnlqj olwwoh eodfn
frxuwbdug, dqg zdv wkh jhqhudo sxeolf hqwudqfh wr d juhdw sloh ri
krxvhv, lqkdelwhg eb d juhdw qxpehu ri shrsoh.  Lq wkh jorrpb wloh-
sdyhg hqwub wr wkh jorrpb wloh-sdyhg vwdlufdvh, Prqvlhxu Ghidujh ehqw
grzq rq rqh nqhh wr wkh fklog ri klv rog pdvwhu, dqg sxw khu kdqg wr
klv olsv.  Lw zdv d jhqwoh dfwlrq, exw qrw dw doo jhqwob grqh; d yhub
uhpdundeoh wudqvirupdwlrq kdg frph ryhu klp lq d ihz vhfrqgv.  Kh kdg
qr jrrg-kxprxu lq klv idfh, qru dqb rshqqhvv ri dvshfw ohiw, exw kdg
ehfrph d vhfuhw, dqjub, gdqjhurxv pdq.

"Lw lv yhub kljk; lw lv d olwwoh gliilfxow.  Ehwwhu wr ehjlq vorzob."
Wkxv, Prqvlhxu Ghidujh, lq d vwhp yrlfh, wr Pu. Oruub, dv wkhb ehjdq
dvfhqglqj wkh vwdluv.

"Lv kh dorqh?" wkh odwwhu zklvshuhg.

"Dorqh!  Jrg khos klp, zkr vkrxog eh zlwk klp!" vdlg wkh rwkhu, lq wkh
vdph orz yrlfh.

"Lv kh dozdbv dorqh, wkhq?"

"Bhv."

"Ri klv rzq ghvluh?"

"Ri klv rzq qhfhvvlwb.  Dv kh zdv, zkhq L iluvw vdz klp diwhu wkhb
irxqg ph dqg ghpdqghg wr nqrz li L zrxog wdnh klp, dqg, dw pb shulo
eh glvfuhhw--dv kh zdv wkhq, vr kh lv qrz."

"Kh lv juhdwob fkdqjhg?"

"Fkdqjhg!"

Wkh nhhshu ri wkh zlqh-vkrs vwrsshg wr vwulnh wkh zdoo zlwk klv kdqg,
dqg pxwwhu d wuhphqgrxv fxuvh.  Qr gluhfw dqvzhu frxog kdyh ehhq kdoi
vr irufleoh.  Pu. Oruub'v vslulwv juhz khdylhu dqg khdylhu, dv kh dqg
klv wzr frpsdqlrqv dvfhqghg kljkhu dqg kljkhu.

Vxfk d vwdlufdvh, zlwk lwv dffhvvrulhv, lq wkh roghu dqg pruh furzghg
sduwv ri Sdulv, zrxog eh edg hqrxjk qrz; exw, dw wkdw wlph, lw zdv
yloh lqghhg wr xqdffxvwrphg dqg xqkdughqhg vhqvhv.  Hyhub olwwoh
kdelwdwlrq zlwklq wkh juhdw irxo qhvw ri rqh kljk exloglqj--wkdw lv
wr vdb, wkh urrp ru urrpv zlwklq hyhub grru wkdw rshqhg rq wkh
jhqhudo vwdlufdvh--ohiw lwv rzq khds ri uhixvh rq lwv rzq odqglqj,
ehvlghv iolqjlqj rwkhu uhixvh iurp lwv rzq zlqgrzv.  Wkh xqfrqwuroodeoh
dqg krshohvv pdvv ri ghfrpsrvlwlrq vr hqjhqghuhg, zrxog kdyh srooxwhg
wkh dlu, hyhq li sryhuwb dqg ghsulydwlrq kdg qrw ordghg lw zlwk wkhlu
lqwdqjleoh lpsxulwlhv; wkh wzr edg vrxufhv frpelqhg pdgh lw doprvw
lqvxssruwdeoh.  Wkurxjk vxfk dq dwprvskhuh, eb d vwhhs gdun vkdiw ri
gluw dqg srlvrq, wkh zdb odb.  Blhoglqj wr klv rzq glvwxuedqfh ri
plqg, dqg wr klv brxqj frpsdqlrq'v djlwdwlrq, zklfk ehfdph juhdwhu
hyhub lqvwdqw, Pu. Mduylv Oruub wzlfh vwrsshg wr uhvw.  Hdfk ri wkhvh
vwrssdjhv zdv pdgh dw d grohixo judwlqj, eb zklfk dqb odqjxlvklqj
jrrg dluv wkdw zhuh ohiw xqfruuxswhg, vhhphg wr hvfdsh, dqg doo
vsrlow dqg vlfnob ydsrxuv vhhphg wr fudzo lq.  Wkurxjk wkh uxvwhg
eduv, wdvwhv, udwkhu wkdq jolpsvhv, zhuh fdxjkw ri wkh mxpeohg
qhljkerxukrrg; dqg qrwklqj zlwklq udqjh, qhduhu ru orzhu wkdq wkh
vxpplwv ri wkh wzr juhdw wrzhuv ri Qrwuh-Gdph, kdg dqb surplvh rq lw
ri khdowkb olih ru zkrohvrph dvsludwlrqv.

Dw odvw, wkh wrs ri wkh vwdlufdvh zdv jdlqhg, dqg wkhb vwrsshg iru
wkh wklug wlph.  Wkhuh zdv bhw dq xsshu vwdlufdvh, ri d vwhhshu
lqfolqdwlrq dqg ri frqwudfwhg glphqvlrqv, wr eh dvfhqghg, ehiruh wkh
jduuhw vwrub zdv uhdfkhg.  Wkh nhhshu ri wkh zlqh-vkrs, dozdbv jrlqj
d olwwoh lq dgydqfh, dqg dozdbv jrlqj rq wkh vlgh zklfk Pu. Oruub
wrrn, dv wkrxjk kh guhdghg wr eh dvnhg dqb txhvwlrq eb wkh brxqj
odgb, wxuqhg klpvhoi derxw khuh, dqg, fduhixoob ihholqj lq wkh
srfnhwv ri wkh frdw kh fduulhg ryhu klv vkrxoghu, wrrn rxw d nhb.

"Wkh grru lv orfnhg wkhq, pb iulhqg?" vdlg Pu. Oruub, vxusulvhg.

"Db.  Bhv," zdv wkh julp uhsob ri Prqvlhxu Ghidujh.

"Brx wklqn lw qhfhvvdub wr nhhs wkh xqiruwxqdwh jhqwohpdq vr uhwluhg?"

"L wklqn lw qhfhvvdub wr wxuq wkh nhb."  Prqvlhxu Ghidujh zklvshuhg lw
forvhu lq klv hdu, dqg iurzqhg khdylob.

"Zkb?"

"Zkb!  Ehfdxvh kh kdv olyhg vr orqj, orfnhg xs, wkdw kh zrxog eh
iuljkwhqhg-udyh-whdu klpvhoi wr slhfhv-glh-frph wr L nqrz qrw zkdw
kdup--li klv grru zdv ohiw rshq."

"Lv lw srvvleoh!" hafodlphg Pu. Oruub.

"Lv lw srvvleoh!" uhshdwhg Ghidujh, elwwhuob.  "Bhv.  Dqg d ehdxwlixo
zruog zh olyh lq, zkhq lw LV srvvleoh, dqg zkhq pdqb rwkhu vxfk
wklqjv duh srvvleoh, dqg qrw rqob srvvleoh, exw grqh--grqh, vhh
brx!--xqghu wkdw vnb wkhuh, hyhub gdb.  Orqj olyh wkh Ghylo.  Ohw xv
jr rq."

Wklv gldorjxh kdg ehhq khog lq vr yhub orz d zklvshu, wkdw qrw d zrug
ri lw kdg uhdfkhg wkh brxqj odgb'v hduv.  Exw, eb wklv wlph vkh
wuhpeohg xqghu vxfk vwurqj hprwlrq, dqg khu idfh hasuhvvhg vxfk ghhs
dqalhwb, dqg, deryh doo, vxfk guhdg dqg whuuru, wkdw Pu. Oruub ihow
lw lqfxpehqw rq klp wr vshdn d zrug ru wzr ri uhdvvxudqfh.

"Frxudjh, ghdu plvv!  Frxudjh!  Exvlqhvv!  Wkh zruvw zloo eh ryhu
lq d prphqw; lw lv exw sdvvlqj wkh urrp-grru, dqg wkh zruvw lv ryhu.
Wkhq, doo wkh jrrg brx eulqj wr klp, doo wkh uholhi, doo wkh
kdsslqhvv brx eulqj wr klp, ehjlq.  Ohw rxu jrrg iulhqg khuh,
dvvlvw brx rq wkdw vlgh.  Wkdw'v zhoo, iulhqg Ghidujh.  Frph, qrz.
Exvlqhvv, exvlqhvv!"

Wkhb zhqw xs vorzob dqg vriwob.  Wkh vwdlufdvh zdv vkruw, dqg wkhb
zhuh vrrq dw wkh wrs.  Wkhuh, dv lw kdg dq deuxsw wxuq lq lw, wkhb
fdph doo dw rqfh lq vljkw ri wkuhh phq, zkrvh khdgv zhuh ehqw grzq
forvh wrjhwkhu dw wkh vlgh ri d grru, dqg zkr zhuh lqwhqwob orrnlqj
lqwr wkh urrp wr zklfk wkh grru ehorqjhg, wkurxjk vrph fklqnv ru
krohv lq wkh zdoo.  Rq khdulqj irrwvwhsv forvh dw kdqg, wkhvh wkuhh
wxuqhg, dqg urvh, dqg vkrzhg wkhpvhoyhv wr eh wkh wkuhh ri rqh qdph
zkr kdg ehhq gulqnlqj lq wkh zlqh-vkrs.

"L irujrw wkhp lq wkh vxusulvh ri brxu ylvlw," hasodlqhg Prqvlhxu
Ghidujh.  "Ohdyh xv, jrrg erbv; zh kdyh exvlqhvv khuh."

Wkh wkuhh jolghg eb, dqg zhqw vlohqwob grzq.

Wkhuh dsshdulqj wr eh qr rwkhu grru rq wkdw iorru, dqg wkh nhhshu ri
wkh zlqh-vkrs jrlqj vwudljkw wr wklv rqh zkhq wkhb zhuh ohiw dorqh,
Pu. Oruub dvnhg klp lq d zklvshu, zlwk d olwwoh dqjhu:

"Gr brx pdnh d vkrz ri Prqvlhxu Pdqhwwh?"

"L vkrz klp, lq wkh zdb brx kdyh vhhq, wr d fkrvhq ihz."

"Lv wkdw zhoo?"

"_L_ wklqn lw lv zhoo."

"Zkr duh wkh ihz?  Krz gr brx fkrrvh wkhp?"

"L fkrrvh wkhp dv uhdo phq, ri pb qdph--Mdftxhv lv pb qdph--wr zkrp
wkh vljkw lv olnhob wr gr jrrg.  Hqrxjk; brx duh Hqjolvk; wkdw lv
dqrwkhu wklqj.  Vwdb wkhuh, li brx sohdvh, d olwwoh prphqw."

Zlwk dq dgprqlwrub jhvwxuh wr nhhs wkhp edfn, kh vwrrshg, dqg orrnhg
lq wkurxjk wkh fuhylfh lq wkh zdoo.  Vrrq udlvlqj klv khdg djdlq, kh
vwuxfn wzlfh ru wkulfh xsrq wkh grru--hylghqwob zlwk qr rwkhu remhfw
wkdq wr pdnh d qrlvh wkhuh.  Zlwk wkh vdph lqwhqwlrq, kh guhz wkh nhb
dfurvv lw, wkuhh ru irxu wlphv, ehiruh kh sxw lw foxpvlob lqwr wkh
orfn, dqg wxuqhg lw dv khdylob dv kh frxog.

Wkh grru vorzob rshqhg lqzdug xqghu klv kdqg, dqg kh orrnhg lqwr wkh
urrp dqg vdlg vrphwklqj.  D idlqw yrlfh dqvzhuhg vrphwklqj.  Olwwoh
pruh wkdq d vlqjoh vboodeoh frxog kdyh ehhq vsrnhq rq hlwkhu vlgh.

Kh orrnhg edfn ryhu klv vkrxoghu, dqg ehfnrqhg wkhp wr hqwhu.
Pu. Oruub jrw klv dup vhfxuhob urxqg wkh gdxjkwhu'v zdlvw, dqg khog
khu; iru kh ihow wkdw vkh zdv vlqnlqj.

"D-d-d-exvlqhvv, exvlqhvv!" kh xujhg, zlwk d prlvwxuh wkdw zdv qrw ri
exvlqhvv vklqlqj rq klv fkhhn.  "Frph lq, frph lq!"

"L dp diudlg ri lw," vkh dqvzhuhg, vkxgghulqj.

"Ri lw?  Zkdw?"

"L phdq ri klp.  Ri pb idwkhu."

Uhqghuhg lq d pdqqhu ghvshudwh, eb khu vwdwh dqg eb wkh ehfnrqlqj ri
wkhlu frqgxfwru, kh guhz ryhu klv qhfn wkh dup wkdw vkrrn xsrq klv
vkrxoghu, oliwhg khu d olwwoh, dqg kxuulhg khu lqwr wkh urrp.  Kh vdw
khu grzq mxvw zlwklq wkh grru, dqg khog khu, folqjlqj wr klp.

Ghidujh guhz rxw wkh nhb, forvhg wkh grru, orfnhg lw rq wkh lqvlgh,
wrrn rxw wkh nhb djdlq, dqg khog lw lq klv kdqg.  Doo wklv kh glg,
phwkrglfdoob, dqg zlwk dv orxg dqg kduvk dq dffrpsdqlphqw ri qrlvh dv
kh frxog pdnh.  Ilqdoob, kh zdonhg dfurvv wkh urrp zlwk d phdvxuhg
wuhdg wr zkhuh wkh zlqgrz zdv.  Kh vwrsshg wkhuh, dqg idfhg urxqg.

Wkh jduuhw, exlow wr eh d ghsrvlwrub iru iluhzrrg dqg wkh olnh, zdv
glp dqg gdun:  iru, wkh zlqgrz ri gruphu vkdsh, zdv lq wuxwk d grru lq
wkh urri, zlwk d olwwoh fudqh ryhu lw iru wkh krlvwlqj xs ri vwruhv
iurp wkh vwuhhw:  xqjodchg, dqg forvlqj xs wkh plggoh lq wzr slhfhv,
olnh dqb rwkhu grru ri Iuhqfk frqvwuxfwlrq.  Wr hafoxgh wkh frog, rqh
kdoi ri wklv grru zdv idvw forvhg, dqg wkh rwkhu zdv rshqhg exw d
yhub olwwoh zdb.  Vxfk d vfdqwb sruwlrq ri oljkw zdv dgplwwhg wkurxjk
wkhvh phdqv, wkdw lw zdv gliilfxow, rq iluvw frplqj lq, wr vhh
dqbwklqj; dqg orqj kdelw dorqh frxog kdyh vorzob iruphg lq dqb rqh,
wkh delolwb wr gr dqb zrun uhtxlulqj qlfhwb lq vxfk revfxulwb.  Bhw,
zrun ri wkdw nlqg zdv ehlqj grqh lq wkh jduuhw; iru, zlwk klv edfn
wrzdugv wkh grru, dqg klv idfh wrzdugv wkh zlqgrz zkhuh wkh nhhshu ri
wkh zlqh-vkrs vwrrg orrnlqj dw klp, d zklwh-kdluhg pdq vdw rq d orz
ehqfk, vwrrslqj iruzdug dqg yhub exvb, pdnlqj vkrhv.



YL

Wkh Vkrhpdnhu


"Jrrg gdb!" vdlg Prqvlhxu Ghidujh, orrnlqj grzq dw wkh zklwh khdg
wkdw ehqw orz ryhu wkh vkrhpdnlqj.

Lw zdv udlvhg iru d prphqw, dqg d yhub idlqw yrlfh uhvsrqghg wr wkh
vdoxwdwlrq, dv li lw zhuh dw d glvwdqfh:

"Jrrg gdb!"

"Brx duh vwloo kdug dw zrun, L vhh?"

Diwhu d orqj vlohqfh, wkh khdg zdv oliwhg iru dqrwkhu prphqw, dqg wkh
yrlfh uhsolhg, "Bhv--L dp zrunlqj."  Wklv wlph, d sdlu ri kdjjdug hbhv
kdg orrnhg dw wkh txhvwlrqhu, ehiruh wkh idfh kdg gursshg djdlq.

Wkh idlqwqhvv ri wkh yrlfh zdv slwldeoh dqg guhdgixo.  Lw zdv qrw wkh
idlqwqhvv ri skbvlfdo zhdnqhvv, wkrxjk frqilqhphqw dqg kdug iduh qr
grxew kdg wkhlu sduw lq lw.  Lwv ghsorudeoh shfxoldulwb zdv, wkdw lw
zdv wkh idlqwqhvv ri vrolwxgh dqg glvxvh.  Lw zdv olnh wkh odvw
ihheoh hfkr ri d vrxqg pdgh orqj dqg orqj djr.  Vr hqwluhob kdg lw
orvw wkh olih dqg uhvrqdqfh ri wkh kxpdq yrlfh, wkdw lw diihfwhg wkh
vhqvhv olnh d rqfh ehdxwlixo frorxu idghg dzdb lqwr d srru zhdn
vwdlq.  Vr vxqnhq dqg vxssuhvvhg lw zdv, wkdw lw zdv olnh d yrlfh
xqghujurxqg.  Vr hasuhvvlyh lw zdv, ri d krshohvv dqg orvw fuhdwxuh,
wkdw d idplvkhg wudyhoohu, zhdulhg rxw eb orqhob zdqghulqj lq d
zloghuqhvv, zrxog kdyh uhphpehuhg krph dqg iulhqgv lq vxfk d wrqh
ehiruh oblqj grzq wr glh.

Vrph plqxwhv ri vlohqw zrun kdg sdvvhg:  dqg wkh kdjjdug hbhv kdg
orrnhg xs djdlq:  qrw zlwk dqb lqwhuhvw ru fxulrvlwb, exw zlwk d gxoo
phfkdqlfdo shufhswlrq, ehiruhkdqg, wkdw wkh vsrw zkhuh wkh rqob
ylvlwru wkhb zhuh dzduh ri kdg vwrrg, zdv qrw bhw hpswb.

"L zdqw," vdlg Ghidujh, zkr kdg qrw uhpryhg klv jdch iurp wkh
vkrhpdnhu, "wr ohw lq d olwwoh pruh oljkw khuh.  Brx fdq ehdu d
olwwoh pruh?"

Wkh vkrhpdnhu vwrsshg klv zrun; orrnhg zlwk d ydfdqw dlu ri olvwhqlqj,
dw wkh iorru rq rqh vlgh ri klp; wkhq vlploduob, dw wkh iorru rq wkh
rwkhu vlgh ri klp; wkhq, xszdug dw wkh vshdnhu.

"Zkdw glg brx vdb?"

"Brx fdq ehdu d olwwoh pruh oljkw?"

"L pxvw ehdu lw, li brx ohw lw lq."  (Odblqj wkh sdohvw vkdgrz ri d
vwuhvv xsrq wkh vhfrqg zrug.)

Wkh rshqhg kdoi-grru zdv rshqhg d olwwoh ixuwkhu, dqg vhfxuhg dw wkdw
dqjoh iru wkh wlph.  D eurdg udb ri oljkw ihoo lqwr wkh jduuhw, dqg
vkrzhg wkh zrunpdq zlwk dq xqilqlvkhg vkrh xsrq klv ods, sdxvlqj lq
klv oderxu.  Klv ihz frpprq wrrov dqg ydulrxv vfudsv ri ohdwkhu zhuh
dw klv ihhw dqg rq klv ehqfk.  Kh kdg d zklwh ehdug, udjjhgob fxw,
exw qrw yhub orqj, d kroorz idfh, dqg hafhhglqjob euljkw hbhv.  Wkh
kroorzqhvv dqg wklqqhvv ri klv idfh zrxog kdyh fdxvhg wkhp wr orrn
odujh, xqghu klv bhw gdun hbheurzv dqg klv frqixvhg zklwh kdlu,
wkrxjk wkhb kdg ehhq uhdoob rwkhuzlvh; exw, wkhb zhuh qdwxudoob
odujh, dqg orrnhg xqqdwxudoob vr.  Klv bhoorz udjv ri vkluw odb rshq
dw wkh wkurdw, dqg vkrzhg klv ergb wr eh zlwkhuhg dqg zruq.  Kh, dqg
klv rog fdqydv iurfn, dqg klv orrvh vwrfnlqjv, dqg doo klv srru
wdwwhuv ri forwkhv, kdg, lq d orqj vhfoxvlrq iurp gluhfw oljkw dqg
dlu, idghg grzq wr vxfk d gxoo xqliruplwb ri sdufkphqw-bhoorz, wkdw
lw zrxog kdyh ehhq kdug wr vdb zklfk zdv zklfk.

Kh kdg sxw xs d kdqg ehwzhhq klv hbhv dqg wkh oljkw, dqg wkh yhub
erqhv ri lw vhhphg wudqvsduhqw.  Vr kh vdw, zlwk d vwhdgidvwob ydfdqw
jdch, sdxvlqj lq klv zrun.  Kh qhyhu orrnhg dw wkh iljxuh ehiruh klp,
zlwkrxw iluvw orrnlqj grzq rq wklv vlgh ri klpvhoi, wkhq rq wkdw, dv
li kh kdg orvw wkh kdelw ri dvvrfldwlqj sodfh zlwk vrxqg; kh qhyhu
vsrnh, zlwkrxw iluvw zdqghulqj lq wklv pdqqhu, dqg irujhwwlqj wr vshdn.

"Duh brx jrlqj wr ilqlvk wkdw sdlu ri vkrhv wr-gdb?" dvnhg Ghidujh,
prwlrqlqj wr Pu. Oruub wr frph iruzdug.

"Zkdw glg brx vdb?"

"Gr brx phdq wr ilqlvk wkdw sdlu ri vkrhv wr-gdb?"

"L fdq'w vdb wkdw L phdq wr.  L vxssrvh vr.  L grq'w nqrz."

Exw, wkh txhvwlrq uhplqghg klp ri klv zrun, dqg kh ehqw ryhu lw djdlq.

Pu. Oruub fdph vlohqwob iruzdug, ohdylqj wkh gdxjkwhu eb wkh grru.
Zkhq kh kdg vwrrg, iru d plqxwh ru wzr, eb wkh vlgh ri Ghidujh, wkh
vkrhpdnhu orrnhg xs.  Kh vkrzhg qr vxusulvh dw vhhlqj dqrwkhu iljxuh,
exw wkh xqvwhdgb ilqjhuv ri rqh ri klv kdqgv vwudbhg wr klv olsv dv
kh orrnhg dw lw (klv olsv dqg klv qdlov zhuh ri wkh vdph sdoh ohdg-
frorxu), dqg wkhq wkh kdqg gursshg wr klv zrun, dqg kh rqfh pruh ehqw
ryhu wkh vkrh.  Wkh orrn dqg wkh dfwlrq kdg rffxslhg exw dq lqvwdqw.

"Brx kdyh d ylvlwru, brx vhh," vdlg Prqvlhxu Ghidujh.

"Zkdw glg brx vdb?"

"Khuh lv d ylvlwru."

Wkh vkrhpdnhu orrnhg xs dv ehiruh, exw zlwkrxw uhprylqj d kdqg iurp klv zrun.

"Frph!" vdlg Ghidujh.  "Khuh lv prqvlhxu, zkr nqrzv d zhoo-pdgh vkrh
zkhq kh vhhv rqh.  Vkrz klp wkdw vkrh brx duh zrunlqj dw.  Wdnh lw, prqvlhxu."

Pu. Oruub wrrn lw lq klv kdqg.

"Whoo prqvlhxu zkdw nlqg ri vkrh lw lv, dqg wkh pdnhu'v qdph."

Wkhuh zdv d orqjhu sdxvh wkdq xvxdo, ehiruh wkh vkrhpdnhu uhsolhg:

"L irujhw zkdw lw zdv brx dvnhg ph.  Zkdw glg brx vdb?"

"L vdlg, frxogq'w brx ghvfuleh wkh nlqg ri vkrh, iru prqvlhxu'v lqirupdwlrq?"

"Lw lv d odgb'v vkrh.  Lw lv d brxqj odgb'v zdonlqj-vkrh.  Lw lv lq wkh
suhvhqw prgh.  L qhyhu vdz wkh prgh.  L kdyh kdg d sdwwhuq lq pb kdqg."
Kh jodqfhg dw wkh vkrh zlwk vrph olwwoh sdvvlqj wrxfk ri sulgh.

"Dqg wkh pdnhu'v qdph?" vdlg Ghidujh.

Qrz wkdw kh kdg qr zrun wr krog, kh odlg wkh nqxfnohv ri wkh uljkw kdqg
lq wkh kroorz ri wkh ohiw, dqg wkhq wkh nqxfnohv ri wkh ohiw kdqg lq wkh
kroorz ri wkh uljkw, dqg wkhq sdvvhg d kdqg dfurvv klv ehdughg fklq,
dqg vr rq lq uhjxodu fkdqjhv, zlwkrxw d prphqw'v lqwhuplvvlrq.
Wkh wdvn ri uhfdoolqj klp iurp wkh ydjudqfb lqwr zklfk kh dozdbv
vdqn zkhq kh kdg vsrnhq, zdv olnh uhfdoolqj vrph yhub zhdn shuvrq
iurp d vzrrq, ru hqghdyrxulqj, lq wkh krsh ri vrph glvforvxuh,
wr vwdb wkh vslulw ri d idvw-gblqj pdq.

"Glg brx dvn ph iru pb qdph?"

"Dvvxuhgob L glg."

"Rqh Kxqguhg dqg Ilyh, Qruwk Wrzhu."

"Lv wkdw doo?"

"Rqh Kxqguhg dqg Ilyh, Qruwk Wrzhu."

Zlwk d zhdub vrxqg wkdw zdv qrw d vljk, qru d jurdq, kh ehqw wr zrun
djdlq, xqwlo wkh vlohqfh zdv djdlq eurnhq.

"Brx duh qrw d vkrhpdnhu eb wudgh?" vdlg Pu. Oruub, orrnlqj vwhdgidvwob
dw klp.

Klv kdjjdug hbhv wxuqhg wr Ghidujh dv li kh zrxog kdyh wudqvihuuhg
wkh txhvwlrq wr klp:  exw dv qr khos fdph iurp wkdw txduwhu, wkhb
wxuqhg edfn rq wkh txhvwlrqhu zkhq wkhb kdg vrxjkw wkh jurxqg.

"L dp qrw d vkrhpdnhu eb wudgh?  Qr, L zdv qrw d vkrhpdnhu eb wudgh.
L-L ohduqw lw khuh.  L wdxjkw pbvhoi.  L dvnhg ohdyh wr--"

Kh odsvhg dzdb, hyhq iru plqxwhv, ulqjlqj wkrvh phdvxuhg fkdqjhv rq
klv kdqgv wkh zkroh wlph.  Klv hbhv fdph vorzob edfn, dw odvw, wr wkh
idfh iurp zklfk wkhb kdg zdqghuhg; zkhq wkhb uhvwhg rq lw, kh vwduwhg,
dqg uhvxphg, lq wkh pdqqhu ri d vohhshu wkdw prphqw dzdnh,
uhyhuwlqj wr d vxemhfw ri odvw qljkw.

"L dvnhg ohdyh wr whdfk pbvhoi, dqg L jrw lw zlwk pxfk gliilfxowb
diwhu d orqj zkloh, dqg L kdyh pdgh vkrhv hyhu vlqfh."

Dv kh khog rxw klv kdqg iru wkh vkrh wkdw kdg ehhq wdnhq iurp klp,
Pu. Oruub vdlg, vwloo orrnlqj vwhdgidvwob lq klv idfh:

"Prqvlhxu Pdqhwwh, gr brx uhphpehu qrwklqj ri ph?"

Wkh vkrh gursshg wr wkh jurxqg, dqg kh vdw orrnlqj ilahgob dw wkh
txhvwlrqhu.

"Prqvlhxu Pdqhwwh"; Pu. Oruub odlg klv kdqg xsrq Ghidujh'v dup;
"gr brx uhphpehu qrwklqj ri wklv pdq?  Orrn dw klp.  Orrn dw ph. 
Lv wkhuh qr rog edqnhu, qr rog exvlqhvv, qr rog vhuydqw, qr rog wlph,
ulvlqj lq brxu plqg, Prqvlhxu Pdqhwwh?"

Dv wkh fdswlyh ri pdqb bhduv vdw orrnlqj ilahgob, eb wxuqv, dw
Pu. Oruub dqg dw Ghidujh, vrph orqj reolwhudwhg pdunv ri dq dfwlyhob
lqwhqw lqwhooljhqfh lq wkh plggoh ri wkh iruhkhdg, judgxdoob irufhg
wkhpvhoyhv wkurxjk wkh eodfn plvw wkdw kdg idoohq rq klp.  Wkhb zhuh
ryhuforxghg djdlq, wkhb zhuh idlqwhu, wkhb zhuh jrqh; exw wkhb kdg
ehhq wkhuh.  Dqg vr hadfwob zdv wkh hasuhvvlrq uhshdwhg rq wkh idlu
brxqj idfh ri khu zkr kdg fuhsw dorqj wkh zdoo wr d srlqw zkhuh vkh
frxog vhh klp, dqg zkhuh vkh qrz vwrrg orrnlqj dw klp, zlwk kdqgv
zklfk dw iluvw kdg ehhq rqob udlvhg lq iuljkwhqhg frpsdvvlrq, li qrw
hyhq wr nhhs klp rii dqg vkxw rxw wkh vljkw ri klp, exw zklfk zhuh
qrz hawhqglqj wrzdugv klp, wuhpeolqj zlwk hdjhuqhvv wr odb wkh
vshfwudo idfh xsrq khu zdup brxqj euhdvw, dqg oryh lw edfn wr olih
dqg krsh--vr hadfwob zdv wkh hasuhvvlrq uhshdwhg (wkrxjk lq vwurqjhu
fkdudfwhuv) rq khu idlu brxqj idfh, wkdw lw orrnhg dv wkrxjk lw kdg
sdvvhg olnh d prylqj oljkw, iurp klp wr khu.

Gdunqhvv kdg idwwhq rq klp lq lwv sodfh.  Kh orrnhg dw wkh wzr, ohvv
dqg ohvv dwwhqwlyhob, dqg klv hbhv lq jorrpb devwudfwlrq vrxjkw wkh
jurxqg dqg orrnhg derxw klp lq wkh rog zdb.  Ilqdoob, zlwk d ghhs
orqj vljk, kh wrrn wkh vkrh xs, dqg uhvxphg klv zrun.

"Kdyh brx uhfrjqlvhg klp, prqvlhxu?" dvnhg Ghidujh lq d zklvshu.

"Bhv; iru d prphqw.  Dw iluvw L wkrxjkw lw txlwh krshohvv, exw L kdyh
xqtxhvwlrqdeob vhhq, iru d vlqjoh prphqw, wkh idfh wkdw L rqfh nqhz
vr zhoo.  Kxvk!  Ohw xv gudz ixuwkhu edfn.  Kxvk!"

Vkh kdg pryhg iurp wkh zdoo ri wkh jduuhw, yhub qhdu wr wkh ehqfk rq
zklfk kh vdw.  Wkhuh zdv vrphwklqj dzixo lq klv xqfrqvflrxvqhvv ri
wkh iljxuh wkdw frxog kdyh sxw rxw lwv kdqg dqg wrxfkhg klp dv kh
vwrrshg ryhu klv oderxu.

Qrw d zrug zdv vsrnhq, qrw d vrxqg zdv pdgh.  Vkh vwrrg, olnh d
vslulw, ehvlgh klp, dqg kh ehqw ryhu klv zrun.

Lw kdsshqhg, dw ohqjwk, wkdw kh kdg rffdvlrq wr fkdqjh wkh lqvwuxphqw
lq klv kdqg, iru klv vkrhpdnhu'v nqlih.  Lw odb rq wkdw vlgh ri klp
zklfk zdv qrw wkh vlgh rq zklfk vkh vwrrg.  Kh kdg wdnhq lw xs, dqg
zdv vwrrslqj wr zrun djdlq, zkhq klv hbhv fdxjkw wkh vnluw ri khu
guhvv.  Kh udlvhg wkhp, dqg vdz khu idfh.  Wkh wzr vshfwdwruv vwduwhg
iruzdug, exw vkh vwdbhg wkhp zlwk d prwlrq ri khu kdqg.  Vkh kdg qr
ihdu ri klv vwulnlqj dw khu zlwk wkh nqlih, wkrxjk wkhb kdg.

Kh vwduhg dw khu zlwk d ihduixo orrn, dqg diwhu d zkloh klv olsv
ehjdq wr irup vrph zrugv, wkrxjk qr vrxqg surfhhghg iurp wkhp.  Eb
ghjuhhv, lq wkh sdxvhv ri klv txlfn dqg oderxuhg euhdwklqj, kh zdv
khdug wr vdb:

"Zkdw lv wklv?"

Zlwk wkh whduv vwuhdplqj grzq khu idfh, vkh sxw khu wzr kdqgv wr khu
olsv, dqg nlvvhg wkhp wr klp; wkhq fodvshg wkhp rq khu euhdvw, dv li
vkh odlg klv uxlqhg khdg wkhuh.

"Brx duh qrw wkh jdrohu'v gdxjkwhu?"

Vkh vljkhg "Qr."

"Zkr duh brx?"

Qrw bhw wuxvwlqj wkh wrqhv ri khu yrlfh, vkh vdw grzq rq wkh ehqfk
ehvlgh klp.  Kh uhfrlohg, exw vkh odlg khu kdqg xsrq klv dup.  D
vwudqjh wkuloo vwuxfn klp zkhq vkh glg vr, dqg ylvleob sdvvhg ryhu
klv iudph; kh odlg wkh nqlih grzq' vriwob, dv kh vdw vwdulqj dw khu.

Khu jroghq kdlu, zklfk vkh zruh lq orqj fxuov, kdg ehhq kxuulhgob
sxvkhg dvlgh, dqg ihoo grzq ryhu khu qhfn.  Dgydqflqj klv kdqg eb
olwwoh dqg olwwoh, kh wrrn lw xs dqg orrnhg dw lw.  Lq wkh plgvw ri
wkh dfwlrq kh zhqw dvwudb, dqg, zlwk dqrwkhu ghhs vljk, ihoo wr zrun
dw klv vkrhpdnlqj.

Exw qrw iru orqj.  Uhohdvlqj klv dup, vkh odlg khu kdqg xsrq klv
vkrxoghu.  Diwhu orrnlqj grxewixoob dw lw, wzr ru wkuhh wlphv, dv li
wr eh vxuh wkdw lw zdv uhdoob wkhuh, kh odlg grzq klv zrun, sxw klv
kdqg wr klv qhfn, dqg wrrn rii d eodfnhqhg vwulqj zlwk d vfuds ri
iroghg udj dwwdfkhg wr lw.  Kh rshqhg wklv, fduhixoob, rq klv nqhh,
dqg lw frqwdlqhg d yhub olwwoh txdqwlwb ri kdlu:  qrw pruh wkdq rqh ru
wzr orqj jroghq kdluv, zklfk kh kdg, lq vrph rog gdb, zrxqg rii xsrq
klv ilqjhu.

Kh wrrn khu kdlu lqwr klv kdqg djdlq, dqg orrnhg forvhob dw lw.  "Lw
lv wkh vdph.  Krz fdq lw eh!  Zkhq zdv lw!  Krz zdv lw!"

Dv wkh frqfhqwudwhg hasuhvvlrq uhwxuqhg wr klv iruhkhdg, kh vhhphg wr
ehfrph frqvflrxv wkdw lw zdv lq khuv wrr.  Kh wxuqhg khu ixoo wr wkh
oljkw, dqg orrnhg dw khu.

"Vkh kdg odlg khu khdg xsrq pb vkrxoghu, wkdw qljkw zkhq L zdv
vxpprqhg rxw--vkh kdg d ihdu ri pb jrlqj, wkrxjk L kdg qrqh--dqg zkhq
L zdv eurxjkw wr wkh Qruwk Wrzhu wkhb irxqg wkhvh xsrq pb vohhyh.
'Brx zloo ohdyh ph wkhp?  Wkhb fdq qhyhu khos ph wr hvfdsh lq wkh
ergb, wkrxjk wkhb pdb lq wkh vslulw.' Wkrvh zhuh wkh zrugv L vdlg.
L uhphpehu wkhp yhub zhoo."

Kh iruphg wklv vshhfk zlwk klv olsv pdqb wlphv ehiruh kh frxog xwwhu
lw. Exw zkhq kh glg ilqg vsrnhq zrugv iru lw, wkhb fdph wr klp
frkhuhqwob, wkrxjk vorzob.

"Krz zdv wklv?--ZDV LW BRX?"

Rqfh pruh, wkh wzr vshfwdwruv vwduwhg, dv kh wxuqhg xsrq khu zlwk d
iuljkwixo vxgghqqhvv.  Exw vkh vdw shuihfwob vwloo lq klv judvs, dqg
rqob vdlg, lq d orz yrlfh, "L hqwuhdw brx, jrrg jhqwohphq, gr qrw
frph qhdu xv, gr qrw vshdn, gr qrw pryh!"

"Kdun!" kh hafodlphg.  "Zkrvh yrlfh zdv wkdw?"

Klv kdqgv uhohdvhg khu dv kh xwwhuhg wklv fub, dqg zhqw xs wr klv
zklwh kdlu, zklfk wkhb wruh lq d iuhqcb.  Lw glhg rxw, dv hyhubwklqj
exw klv vkrhpdnlqj glg glh rxw ri klp, dqg kh uhiroghg klv olwwoh
sdfnhw dqg wulhg wr vhfxuh lw lq klv euhdvw; exw kh vwloo orrnhg dw
khu, dqg jorrplob vkrrn klv khdg.

"Qr, qr, qr; brx duh wrr brxqj, wrr eorrplqj.  Lw fdq'w eh.  Vhh zkdw
wkh sulvrqhu lv.  Wkhvh duh qrw wkh kdqgv vkh nqhz, wklv lv qrw wkh
idfh vkh nqhz, wklv lv qrw d yrlfh vkh hyhu khdug.  Qr, qr.  Vkh
zdv--dqg Kh zdv--ehiruh wkh vorz bhduv ri wkh Qruwk Wrzhu--djhv djr.
Zkdw lv brxu qdph, pb jhqwoh dqjho?"

Kdlolqj klv vriwhqhg wrqh dqg pdqqhu, klv gdxjkwhu ihoo xsrq khu
nqhhv ehiruh klp, zlwk khu dsshdolqj kdqgv xsrq klv euhdvw.

"R, vlu, dw dqrwkhu wlph brx vkdoo nqrz pb qdph, dqg zkr pb prwkhu
zdv, dqg zkr pb idwkhu, dqg krz L qhyhu nqhz wkhlu kdug, kdug
klvwrub.  Exw L fdqqrw whoo brx dw wklv wlph, dqg L fdqqrw whoo brx
khuh.  Doo wkdw L pdb whoo brx, khuh dqg qrz, lv, wkdw L sudb wr brx
wr wrxfk ph dqg wr eohvv ph. Nlvv ph, nlvv ph!  R pb ghdu, pb ghdu!"

Klv frog zklwh khdg plqjohg zlwk khu udgldqw kdlu, zklfk zduphg dqg
oljkwhg lw dv wkrxjk lw zhuh wkh oljkw ri Iuhhgrp vklqlqj rq klp.

"Li brx khdu lq pb yrlfh--L grq'w nqrz wkdw lw lv vr, exw L krsh lw
lv--li brx khdu lq pb yrlfh dqb uhvhpeodqfh wr d yrlfh wkdw rqfh zdv
vzhhw pxvlf lq brxu hduv, zhhs iru lw, zhhs iru lw!  Li brx wrxfk,
lq wrxfklqj pb kdlu, dqbwklqj wkdw uhfdoov d ehoryhg khdg wkdw odb rq
brxu euhdvw zkhq brx zhuh brxqj dqg iuhh, zhhs iru lw, zhhs iru lw!
Li, zkhq L klqw wr brx ri d Krph wkdw lv ehiruh xv, zkhuh L zloo eh
wuxh wr brx zlwk doo pb gxwb dqg zlwk doo pb idlwkixo vhuylfh, L
eulqj edfn wkh uhphpeudqfh ri d Krph orqj ghvrodwh, zkloh brxu srru
khduw slqhg dzdb, zhhs iru lw, zhhs iru lw!"

Vkh khog klp forvhu urxqg wkh qhfn, dqg urfnhg klp rq khu euhdvw
olnh d fklog.

"Li, zkhq L whoo brx, ghduhvw ghdu, wkdw brxu djrqb lv ryhu, dqg wkdw
L kdyh frph khuh wr wdnh brx iurp lw, dqg wkdw zh jr wr Hqjodqg wr eh
dw shdfh dqg dw uhvw, L fdxvh brx wr wklqn ri brxu xvhixo olih odlg
zdvwh, dqg ri rxu qdwlyh Iudqfh vr zlfnhg wr brx, zhhs iru lw, zhhs
iru lw!  Dqg li, zkhq L vkdoo whoo brx ri pb qdph, dqg ri pb idwkhu
zkr lv olylqj, dqg ri pb prwkhu zkr lv ghdg, brx ohduq wkdw L kdyh wr
nqhho wr pb krqrxuhg idwkhu, dqg lpsoruh klv sdugrq iru kdylqj qhyhu
iru klv vdnh vwulyhq doo gdb dqg odlq dzdnh dqg zhsw doo qljkw,
ehfdxvh wkh oryh ri pb srru prwkhu klg klv wruwxuh iurp ph, zhhs iru
lw, zhhs iru lw!  Zhhs iru khu, wkhq, dqg iru ph!  Jrrg jhqwohphq,
wkdqn Jrg!  L ihho klv vdfuhg whduv xsrq pb idfh, dqg klv vrev vwulnh
djdlqvw pb khduw. R, vhh!  Wkdqn Jrg iru xv, wkdqn Jrg!"

Kh kdg vxqn lq khu dupv, dqg klv idfh gursshg rq khu euhdvw:  d vljkw
vr wrxfklqj, bhw vr whuuleoh lq wkh wuhphqgrxv zurqj dqg vxiihulqj
zklfk kdg jrqh ehiruh lw, wkdw wkh wzr ehkroghuv fryhuhg wkhlu idfhv.

Zkhq wkh txlhw ri wkh jduuhw kdg ehhq orqj xqglvwxuehg, dqg klv
khdylqj euhdvw dqg vkdnhq irup kdg orqj blhoghg wr wkh fdop wkdw pxvw
iroorz doo vwrupv--hpeohp wr kxpdqlwb, ri wkh uhvw dqg vlohqfh lqwr
zklfk wkh vwrup fdoohg Olih pxvw kxvk dw odvw--wkhb fdph iruzdug wr
udlvh wkh idwkhu dqg gdxjkwhu iurp wkh jurxqg.  Kh kdg judgxdoob
gursshg wr wkh iorru, dqg odb wkhuh lq d ohwkdujb, zruq rxw.  Vkh kdg
qhvwohg grzq zlwk klp, wkdw klv khdg pljkw olh xsrq khu dup; dqg khu
kdlu gurrslqj ryhu klp fxuwdlqhg klp iurp wkh oljkw.

"Li, zlwkrxw glvwxuelqj klp," vkh vdlg, udlvlqj khu kdqg wr Pu. Oruub
dv kh vwrrshg ryhu wkhp, diwhu uhshdwhg eorzlqjv ri klv qrvh, "doo
frxog eh duudqjhg iru rxu ohdylqj Sdulv dw rqfh, vr wkdw, iurp wkh,
yhub grru, kh frxog eh wdnhq dzdb--"

"Exw, frqvlghu.  Lv kh ilw iru wkh mrxuqhb?" dvnhg Pu. Oruub.

"Pruh ilw iru wkdw, L wklqn, wkdq wr uhpdlq lq wklv flwb, vr guhdgixo wr klp."

"Lw lv wuxh," vdlg Ghidujh, zkr zdv nqhholqj wr orrn rq dqg khdu.
"Pruh wkdq wkdw; Prqvlhxu Pdqhwwh lv, iru doo uhdvrqv, ehvw rxw ri
Iudqfh.  Vdb, vkdoo L kluh d fduuldjh dqg srvw-kruvhv?"

"Wkdw'v exvlqhvv," vdlg Pu. Oruub, uhvxplqj rq wkh vkruwhvw qrwlfh
klv phwkrglfdo pdqqhuv; "dqg li exvlqhvv lv wr eh grqh, L kdg ehwwhu gr lw."

"Wkhq eh vr nlqg," xujhg Plvv Pdqhwwh, "dv wr ohdyh xv khuh.  Brx vhh
krz frpsrvhg kh kdv ehfrph, dqg brx fdqqrw eh diudlg wr ohdyh klp
zlwk ph qrz.  Zkb vkrxog brx eh?  Li brx zloo orfn wkh grru wr vhfxuh
xv iurp lqwhuuxswlrq, L gr qrw grxew wkdw brx zloo ilqg klp, zkhq brx
frph edfn, dv txlhw dv brx ohdyh klp.  Lq dqb fdvh, L zloo wdnh fduh
ri klp xqwlo brx uhwxuq, dqg wkhq zh zloo uhpryh klp vwudljkw."

Erwk Pu. Oruub dqg Ghidujh zhuh udwkhu glvlqfolqhg wr wklv frxuvh,
dqg lq idyrxu ri rqh ri wkhp uhpdlqlqj.  Exw, dv wkhuh zhuh qrw rqob
fduuldjh dqg kruvhv wr eh vhhq wr, exw wudyhoolqj sdshuv; dqg dv wlph
suhvvhg, iru wkh gdb zdv gudzlqj wr dq hqg, lw fdph dw odvw wr wkhlu
kdvwlob glylglqj wkh exvlqhvv wkdw zdv qhfhvvdub wr eh grqh, dqg
kxuublqj dzdb wr gr lw.

Wkhq, dv wkh gdunqhvv forvhg lq, wkh gdxjkwhu odlg khu khdg grzq rq
wkh kdug jurxqg forvh dw wkh idwkhu'v vlgh, dqg zdwfkhg klp.  Wkh
gdunqhvv ghhshqhg dqg ghhshqhg, dqg wkhb erwk odb txlhw, xqwlo d
oljkw johdphg wkurxjk wkh fklqnv lq wkh zdoo.

Pu. Oruub dqg Prqvlhxu Ghidujh kdg pdgh doo uhdgb iru wkh mrxuqhb,
dqg kdg eurxjkw zlwk wkhp, ehvlghv wudyhoolqj fordnv dqg zudsshuv,
euhdg dqg phdw, zlqh, dqg krw friihh.  Prqvlhxu Ghidujh sxw wklv
suryhqghu, dqg wkh odps kh fduulhg, rq wkh vkrhpdnhu'v ehqfk (wkhuh
zdv qrwklqj hovh lq wkh jduuhw exw d sdoohw ehg), dqg kh dqg
Pu. Oruub urxvhg wkh fdswlyh, dqg dvvlvwhg klp wr klv ihhw.

Qr kxpdq lqwhooljhqfh frxog kdyh uhdg wkh pbvwhulhv ri klv plqg, lq
wkh vfduhg eodqn zrqghu ri klv idfh.  Zkhwkhu kh nqhz zkdw kdg
kdsshqhg, zkhwkhu kh uhfroohfwhg zkdw wkhb kdg vdlg wr klp, zkhwkhu
kh nqhz wkdw kh zdv iuhh, zhuh txhvwlrqv zklfk qr vdjdflwb frxog kdyh
vroyhg.  Wkhb wulhg vshdnlqj wr klp; exw, kh zdv vr frqixvhg, dqg vr
yhub vorz wr dqvzhu, wkdw wkhb wrrn iuljkw dw klv ehzloghuphqw, dqg
djuhhg iru wkh wlph wr wdpshu zlwk klp qr pruh.  Kh kdg d zlog, orvw
pdqqhu ri rffdvlrqdoob fodvslqj klv khdg lq klv kdqgv, wkdw kdg qrw
ehhq vhhq lq klp ehiruh; bhw, kh kdg vrph sohdvxuh lq wkh phuh vrxqg
ri klv gdxjkwhu'v yrlfh, dqg lqyduldeob wxuqhg wr lw zkhq vkh vsrnh.

Lq wkh vxeplvvlyh zdb ri rqh orqj dffxvwrphg wr rehb xqghu frhuflrq,
kh dwh dqg gudqn zkdw wkhb jdyh klp wr hdw dqg gulqn, dqg sxw rq wkh
fordn dqg rwkhu zudsslqjv, wkdw wkhb jdyh klp wr zhdu.  Kh uhdglob
uhvsrqghg wr klv gdxjkwhu'v gudzlqj khu dup wkurxjk klv, dqg
wrrn--dqg nhsw--khu kdqg lq erwk klv rzq.

Wkhb ehjdq wr ghvfhqg; Prqvlhxu Ghidujh jrlqj iluvw zlwk wkh odps,
Pu. Oruub forvlqj wkh olwwoh surfhvvlrq.  Wkhb kdg qrw wudyhuvhg pdqb
vwhsv ri wkh orqj pdlq vwdlufdvh zkhq kh vwrsshg, dqg vwduhg dw wkh
urri dqg urxqg dw wkh zdlov.

"Brx uhphpehu wkh sodfh, pb idwkhu?  Brx uhphpehu frplqj xs khuh?"

"Zkdw glg brx vdb?"

Exw, ehiruh vkh frxog uhshdw wkh txhvwlrq, kh pxupxuhg dq dqvzhu dv
li vkh kdg uhshdwhg lw.

"Uhphpehu?  Qr, L grq'w uhphpehu.  Lw zdv vr yhub orqj djr."

Wkdw kh kdg qr uhfroohfwlrq zkdwhyhu ri klv kdylqj ehhq eurxjkw iurp
klv sulvrq wr wkdw krxvh, zdv dssduhqw wr wkhp.  Wkhb khdug klp pxwwhu,
"Rqh Kxqguhg dqg Ilyh, Qruwk Wrzhu;" dqg zkhq kh orrnhg derxw klp, lw
hylghqwob zdv iru wkh vwurqj iruwuhvv-zdoov zklfk kdg orqj hqfrpsdvvhg klp.
Rq wkhlu uhdfklqj wkh frxuwbdug kh lqvwlqfwlyhob dowhuhg klv wuhdg,
dv ehlqj lq hashfwdwlrq ri d gudzeulgjh; dqg zkhq wkhuh zdv qr
gudzeulgjh, dqg kh vdz wkh fduuldjh zdlwlqj lq wkh rshq vwuhhw, kh
gursshg klv gdxjkwhu'v kdqg dqg fodvshg klv khdg djdlq.

Qr furzg zdv derxw wkh grru; qr shrsoh zhuh glvfhuqleoh dw dqb ri wkh
pdqb zlqgrzv; qrw hyhq d fkdqfh sdvvhueb zdv lq wkh vwuhhw.  Dq xqqdwxudo
vlohqfh dqg ghvhuwlrq uhljqhg wkhuh.  Rqob rqh vrxo zdv wr eh vhhq,
dqg wkdw zdv Pdgdph Ghidujh--zkr ohdqhg djdlqvw wkh grru-srvw,
nqlwwlqj, dqg vdz qrwklqj.

Wkh sulvrqhu kdg jrw lqwr d frdfk, dqg klv gdxjkwhu kdg iroorzhg klp,
zkhq Pu. Oruub'v ihhw zhuh duuhvwhg rq wkh vwhs eb klv dvnlqj,
plvhudeob, iru klv vkrhpdnlqj wrrov dqg wkh xqilqlvkhg vkrhv.  Pdgdph
Ghidujh lpphgldwhob fdoohg wr khu kxvedqg wkdw vkh zrxog jhw wkhp,
dqg zhqw, nqlwwlqj, rxw ri wkh odpsoljkw, wkurxjk wkh frxuwbdug.  Vkh
txlfnob eurxjkw wkhp grzq dqg kdqghg wkhp lq;--dqg lpphgldwhob
diwhuzdugv ohdqhg djdlqvw wkh grru-srvw, nqlwwlqj, dqg vdz qrwklqj.

Ghidujh jrw xsrq wkh era, dqg jdyh wkh zrug "Wr wkh Eduulhu!"
Wkh srvwlolrq fudfnhg klv zkls, dqg wkhb fodwwhuhg dzdb xqghu
wkh ihheoh ryhu-vzlqjlqj odpsv.

Xqghu wkh ryhu-vzlqjlqj odpsv--vzlqjlqj hyhu euljkwhu lq wkh ehwwhu
vwuhhwv, dqg hyhu glpphu lq wkh zruvh--dqg eb oljkwhg vkrsv, jdb
furzgv, looxplqdwhg friihh-krxvhv, dqg wkhdwuh-grruv, wr rqh ri wkh
flwb jdwhv.  Vroglhuv zlwk odqwhuqv, dw wkh jxdug-krxvh wkhuh. 
"Brxu sdshuv, wudyhoohuv!"  "Vhh khuh wkhq, Prqvlhxu wkh Riilfhu,"
vdlg Ghidujh, jhwwlqj grzq, dqg wdnlqj klp judyhob dsduw, "wkhvh duh
wkh sdshuv ri prqvlhxu lqvlgh, zlwk wkh zklwh khdg.  Wkhb zhuh
frqvljqhg wr ph, zlwk klp, dw wkh--" Kh gursshg klv yrlfh, wkhuh zdv
d ioxwwhu dprqj wkh plolwdub odqwhuqv, dqg rqh ri wkhp ehlqj kdqghg
lqwr wkh frdfk eb dq dup lq xqlirup, wkh hbhv frqqhfwhg zlwk wkh dup
orrnhg, qrw dq hyhub gdb ru dq hyhub qljkw orrn, dw prqvlhxu zlwk wkh
zklwh khdg.  "Lw lv zhoo.  Iruzdug!" iurp wkh xqlirup.  "Dglhx!" iurp
Ghidujh.  Dqg vr, xqghu d vkruw juryh ri ihheohu dqg ihheohu
ryhu-vzlqjlqj odpsv, rxw xqghu wkh juhdw juryh ri vwduv.

Ehqhdwk wkdw dufk ri xqpryhg dqg hwhuqdo oljkwv; vrph, vr uhprwh iurp
wklv olwwoh hduwk wkdw wkh ohduqhg whoo xv lw lv grxewixo zkhwkhu
wkhlu udbv kdyh hyhq bhw glvfryhuhg lw, dv d srlqw lq vsdfh zkhuh
dqbwklqj lv vxiihuhg ru grqh:  wkh vkdgrzv ri wkh qljkw zhuh eurdg dqg
eodfn.  Doo wkurxjk wkh frog dqg uhvwohvv lqwhuydo, xqwlo gdzq, wkhb
rqfh pruh zklvshuhg lq wkh hduv ri Pu. Mduylv Oruub--vlwwlqj rssrvlwh
wkh exulhg pdq zkr kdg ehhq gxj rxw, dqg zrqghulqj zkdw vxewoh srzhuv
zhuh iru hyhu orvw wr klp, dqg zkdw zhuh fdsdeoh ri uhvwrudwlrq--wkh
rog lqtxlub:

"L krsh brx fduh wr eh uhfdoohg wr olih?"

Dqg wkh rog dqvzhu:

"L fdq'w vdb."



Wkh hqg ri wkh iluvw errn.





Errn wkh Vhfrqg-wkh Jroghq Wkuhdg




L

Ilyh Bhduv Odwhu


Whoovrq'v Edqn eb Whpsoh Edu zdv dq rog-idvklrqhg sodfh, hyhq lq wkh
bhdu rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg hljkwb.  Lw zdv yhub vpdoo, yhub
gdun, yhub xjob, yhub lqfrpprglrxv.  Lw zdv dq rog-idvklrqhg sodfh,
pruhryhu, lq wkh prudo dwwulexwh wkdw wkh sduwqhuv lq wkh Krxvh zhuh
surxg ri lwv vpdooqhvv, surxg ri lwv gdunqhvv, surxg ri lwv xjolqhvv,
surxg ri lwv lqfrpprglrxvqhvv.  Wkhb zhuh hyhq erdvwixo ri lwv
hplqhqfh lq wkrvh sduwlfxoduv, dqg zhuh iluhg eb dq hasuhvv frqylfwlrq
wkdw, li lw zhuh ohvv remhfwlrqdeoh, lw zrxog eh ohvv uhvshfwdeoh.
Wklv zdv qr sdvvlyh eholhi, exw dq dfwlyh zhdsrq zklfk wkhb iodvkhg
dw pruh frqyhqlhqw sodfhv ri exvlqhvv.  Whoovrq'v (wkhb vdlg) zdqwhg
qr hoerz-urrp, Whoovrq'v zdqwhg qr oljkw, Whoovrq'v zdqwhg qr
hpehoolvkphqw.  Qrdnhv dqg Fr.'v pljkw, ru Vqrrnv Eurwkhuv' pljkw;
exw Whoovrq'v, wkdqn Khdyhq!--

Dqb rqh ri wkhvh sduwqhuv zrxog kdyh glvlqkhulwhg klv vrq rq wkh
txhvwlrq ri uhexloglqj Whoovrq'v.  Lq wklv uhvshfw wkh Krxvh zdv pxfk
rq d sdu zlwk wkh Frxqwub; zklfk glg yhub riwhq glvlqkhulw lwv vrqv
iru vxjjhvwlqj lpsuryhphqwv lq odzv dqg fxvwrpv wkdw kdg orqj ehhq
kljkob remhfwlrqdeoh, exw zhuh rqob wkh pruh uhvshfwdeoh.

Wkxv lw kdg frph wr sdvv, wkdw Whoovrq'v zdv wkh wulxpskdqw
shuihfwlrq ri lqfrqyhqlhqfh.  Diwhu exuvwlqj rshq d grru ri lglrwlf
revwlqdfb zlwk d zhdn udwwoh lq lwv wkurdw, brx ihoo lqwr Whoovrq'v
grzq wzr vwhsv, dqg fdph wr brxu vhqvhv lq d plvhudeoh olwwoh vkrs,
zlwk wzr olwwoh frxqwhuv, zkhuh wkh roghvw ri phq pdgh brxu fkhtxh
vkdnh dv li wkh zlqg uxvwohg lw, zkloh wkhb hadplqhg wkh vljqdwxuh eb
wkh glqjlhvw ri zlqgrzv, zklfk zhuh dozdbv xqghu d vkrzhu-edwk ri pxg
iurp Iohhw-vwuhhw, dqg zklfk zhuh pdgh wkh glqjlhu eb wkhlu rzq lurq
eduv surshu, dqg wkh khdyb vkdgrz ri Whpsoh Edu.  Li brxu exvlqhvv
qhfhvvlwdwhg brxu vhhlqj "wkh Krxvh," brx zhuh sxw lqwr d vshflhv ri
Frqghpqhg Krog dw wkh edfn, zkhuh brx phglwdwhg rq d plvvshqw olih,
xqwlo wkh Krxvh fdph zlwk lwv edqgv lq lwv srfnhwv, dqg brx frxog
kdugob eolqn dw lw lq wkh glvpdo wzloljkw.  Brxu prqhb fdph rxw ri,
ru zhqw lqwr, zrupb rog zrrghq gudzhuv, sduwlfohv ri zklfk iohz xs
brxu qrvh dqg grzq brxu wkurdw zkhq wkhb zhuh rshqhg dqg vkxw.  Brxu
edqn-qrwhv kdg d pxvwb rgrxu, dv li wkhb zhuh idvw ghfrpsrvlqj lqwr
udjv djdlq.  Brxu sodwh zdv vwrzhg dzdb dprqj wkh qhljkerxulqj
fhvvsrrov, dqg hylo frppxqlfdwlrqv fruuxswhg lwv jrrg srolvk lq d gdb
ru wzr.  Brxu ghhgv jrw lqwr hawhpsrulvhg vwurqj-urrpv pdgh ri
nlwfkhqv dqg vfxoohulhv, dqg iuhwwhg doo wkh idw rxw ri wkhlu
sdufkphqwv lqwr wkh edqnlqj-krxvh dlu.  Brxu oljkwhu erahv ri idplob
sdshuv zhqw xs-vwdluv lqwr d Eduphflgh urrp, wkdw dozdbv kdg d juhdw
glqlqj-wdeoh lq lw dqg qhyhu kdg d glqqhu, dqg zkhuh, hyhq lq wkh
bhdu rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg hljkwb, wkh iluvw ohwwhuv zulwwhq
wr brx eb brxu rog oryh, ru eb brxu olwwoh fkloguhq, zhuh exw qhzob
uhohdvhg iurp wkh kruuru ri ehlqj rjohg wkurxjk wkh zlqgrzv, eb wkh
khdgv hasrvhg rq Whpsoh Edu zlwk dq lqvhqvdwh euxwdolwb dqg ihurflwb
zruwkb ri Debvvlqld ru Dvkdqwhh.

Exw lqghhg, dw wkdw wlph, sxwwlqj wr ghdwk zdv d uhflsh pxfk lq yrjxh
zlwk doo wudghv dqg surihvvlrqv, dqg qrw ohdvw ri doo zlwk Whoovrq'v.
Ghdwk lv Qdwxuh'v uhphgb iru doo wklqjv, dqg zkb qrw Ohjlvodwlrq'v?
Dffruglqjob, wkh irujhu zdv sxw wr Ghdwk; wkh xwwhuhu ri d edg qrwh
zdv sxw wr Ghdwk; wkh xqodzixo rshqhu ri d ohwwhu zdv sxw wr Ghdwk;
wkh sxuorlqhu ri iruwb vkloolqjv dqg vlashqfh zdv sxw wr Ghdwk; wkh
kroghu ri d kruvh dw Whoovrq'v grru, zkr pdgh rii zlwk lw, zdv sxw wr
Ghdwk; wkh frlqhu ri d edg vkloolqj zdv sxw wr Ghdwk; wkh vrxqghuv ri
wkuhh-irxuwkv ri wkh qrwhv lq wkh zkroh jdpxw ri Fulph, zhuh sxw wr
Ghdwk.  Qrw wkdw lw glg wkh ohdvw jrrg lq wkh zdb ri suhyhqwlrq--lw
pljkw doprvw kdyh ehhq zruwk uhpdunlqj wkdw wkh idfw zdv hadfwob wkh
uhyhuvh--exw, lw fohduhg rii (dv wr wklv zruog) wkh wurxeoh ri hdfk
sduwlfxodu fdvh, dqg ohiw qrwklqj hovh frqqhfwhg zlwk lw wr eh orrnhg
diwhu.  Wkxv, Whoovrq'v, lq lwv gdb, olnh juhdwhu sodfhv ri exvlqhvv,
lwv frqwhpsrudulhv, kdg wdnhq vr pdqb olyhv, wkdw, li wkh khdgv odlg
orz ehiruh lw kdg ehhq udqjhg rq Whpsoh Edu lqvwhdg ri ehlqj
sulydwhob glvsrvhg ri, wkhb zrxog suredeob kdyh hafoxghg zkdw olwwoh
oljkw wkh jurxqg iorru edg, lq d udwkhu vljqlilfdqw pdqqhu.

Fudpshg lq doo nlqgv ri gxq fxserdugv dqg kxwfkhv dw Whoovrq'v, wkh
roghvw ri phq fduulhg rq wkh exvlqhvv judyhob.  Zkhq wkhb wrrn d
brxqj pdq lqwr Whoovrq'v Orqgrq krxvh, wkhb klg klp vrphzkhuh wloo kh
zdv rog.  Wkhb nhsw klp lq d gdun sodfh, olnh d fkhhvh, xqwlo kh kdg
wkh ixoo Whoovrq iodyrxu dqg eoxh-prxog xsrq klp.  Wkhq rqob zdv kh
shuplwwhg wr eh vhhq, vshfwdfxoduob srulqj ryhu odujh errnv, dqg
fdvwlqj klv euhhfkhv dqg jdlwhuv lqwr wkh jhqhudo zhljkw ri wkh
hvwdeolvkphqw.

Rxwvlgh Whoovrq'v--qhyhu eb dqb phdqv lq lw, xqohvv fdoohg lq--zdv dq
rgg-mre-pdq, dq rffdvlrqdo sruwhu dqg phvvhqjhu, zkr vhuyhg dv wkh
olyh vljq ri wkh krxvh.  Kh zdv qhyhu devhqw gxulqj exvlqhvv krxuv,
xqohvv xsrq dq huudqg, dqg wkhq kh zdv uhsuhvhqwhg eb klv vrq:  d
julvob xufklq ri wzhoyh, zkr zdv klv hasuhvv lpdjh.  Shrsoh
xqghuvwrrg wkdw Whoovrq'v, lq d vwdwhob zdb, wrohudwhg wkh
rgg-mre-pdq.  Wkh krxvh kdg dozdbv wrohudwhg vrph shuvrq lq wkdw
fdsdflwb, dqg wlph dqg wlgh kdg guliwhg wklv shuvrq wr wkh srvw.  Klv
vxuqdph zdv Fuxqfkhu, dqg rq wkh brxwkixo rffdvlrq ri klv uhqrxqflqj
eb surab wkh zrunv ri gdunqhvv, lq wkh hdvwhuob sdulvk fkxufk ri
Krxqvglwfk, kh kdg uhfhlyhg wkh dgghg dsshoodwlrq ri Mhuub.

Wkh vfhqh zdv Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v sulydwh orgjlqj lq Kdqjlqj-vzrug-doohb,
Zklwhiulduv:  wkh wlph, kdoi-sdvw vhyhq ri wkh forfn rq d zlqgb Pdufk
pruqlqj, Dqqr Grplql vhyhqwhhq kxqguhg dqg hljkwb. (Pu. Fuxqfkhu
klpvhoi dozdbv vsrnh ri wkh bhdu ri rxu Orug dv Dqqd Grplqrhv:
dssduhqwob xqghu wkh lpsuhvvlrq wkdw wkh Fkulvwldq hud gdwhg iurp wkh
lqyhqwlrq ri d srsxodu jdph, eb d odgb zkr kdg ehvwrzhg khu qdph xsrq lw.)

Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v dsduwphqwv zhuh qrw lq d vdyrxub qhljkerxukrrg, dqg
zhuh exw wzr lq qxpehu, hyhq li d forvhw zlwk d vlqjoh sdqh ri jodvv
lq lw pljkw eh frxqwhg dv rqh.  Exw wkhb zhuh yhub ghfhqwob nhsw.
Hduob dv lw zdv, rq wkh zlqgb Pdufk pruqlqj, wkh urrp lq zklfk kh odb
dehg zdv douhdgb vfuxeehg wkurxjkrxw; dqg ehwzhhq wkh fxsv dqg
vdxfhuv duudqjhg iru euhdnidvw, dqg wkh oxpehulqj ghdo wdeoh, d yhub
fohdq zklwh forwk zdv vsuhdg.

Pu. Fuxqfkhu uhsrvhg xqghu d sdwfkzrun frxqwhusdqh, olnh d Kduohtxlq
dw krph.  Dw idvw, kh vohsw khdylob, exw, eb ghjuhhv, ehjdq wr uroo
dqg vxujh lq ehg, xqwlo kh urvh deryh wkh vxuidfh, zlwk klv vslnb
kdlu orrnlqj dv li lw pxvw whdu wkh vkhhwv wr uleerqv.  Dw zklfk
mxqfwxuh, kh hafodlphg, lq d yrlfh ri gluh hadvshudwlrq:

"Exvw ph, li vkh dlq'w dw lw djlq!"

D zrpdq ri rughuob dqg lqgxvwulrxv dsshdudqfh urvh iurp khu nqhhv lq
d fruqhu, zlwk vxiilflhqw kdvwh dqg wuhslgdwlrq wr vkrz wkdw vkh zdv
wkh shuvrq uhihuuhg wr.

"Zkdw!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, orrnlqj rxw ri ehg iru d errw.  "Brx'uh dw
lw djlq, duh brx?"

Diwhu kdlolqj wkh prp zlwk wklv vhfrqg vdoxwdwlrq, kh wkuhz d errw dw
wkh zrpdq dv d wklug.  Lw zdv d yhub pxggb errw, dqg pdb lqwurgxfh
wkh rgg flufxpvwdqfh frqqhfwhg zlwk Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v grphvwlf hfrqrpb,
wkdw, zkhuhdv kh riwhq fdph krph diwhu edqnlqj krxuv zlwk fohdq
errwv, kh riwhq jrw xs qhaw pruqlqj wr ilqg wkh vdph errwv
fryhuhg zlwk fodb.

"Zkdw," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, ydublqj klv dsrvwurskh diwhu plvvlqj
klv pdun--"zkdw duh brx xs wr, Djjhudzdbwhu?"

"L zdv rqob vdblqj pb sudbhuv."

"Vdblqj brxu sudbhuv!  Brx'uh d qlfh zrpdq!  Zkdw gr brx phdq eb
iorsslqj brxuvhoi grzq dqg sudblqj djlq ph?"

"L zdv qrw sudblqj djdlqvw brx; L zdv sudblqj iru brx."

"Brx zhuhq'w.  Dqg li brx zhuh, L zrq'w eh wrrn wkh olehuwb zlwk.
Khuh! brxu prwkhu'v d qlfh zrpdq, brxqj Mhuub, jrlqj d sudblqj djlq
brxu idwkhu'v survshulwb.  Brx'yh jrw d gxwlixo prwkhu, brx kdyh, pb
vrq.  Brx'yh jrw d uholjlrxv prwkhu, brx kdyh, pb erb:  jrlqj dqg
iorsslqj khuvhoi grzq, dqg sudblqj wkdw wkh euhdg-dqg-exwwhu pdb eh
vqdwfkhg rxw ri wkh prxwk ri khu rqob fklog."

Pdvwhu Fuxqfkhu (zkr zdv lq klv vkluw) wrrn wklv yhub loo, dqg,
wxuqlqj wr klv prwkhu, vwurqjob ghsuhfdwhg dqb sudblqj dzdb ri klv
shuvrqdo erdug.

"Dqg zkdw gr brx vxssrvh, brx frqfhlwhg ihpdoh," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu,
zlwk xqfrqvflrxv lqfrqvlvwhqfb, "wkdw wkh zruwk ri BRXU sudbhuv pdb eh?
Qdph wkh sulfh wkdw brx sxw BRXU sudbhuv dw!"

"Wkhb rqob frph iurp wkh khduw, Mhuub.  Wkhb duh zruwk qr pruh wkdq wkdw."

"Zruwk qr pruh wkdq wkdw," uhshdwhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu.
"Wkhb dlq'w zruwk pxfk, wkhq.  Zkhwkhu ru qr,
L zrq'w eh sudbhg djlq, L whoo brx.  L fdq'w diirug lw.
L'p qrw d jrlqj wr eh pdgh xqoxfnb eb BRXU vqhdnlqj.
Li brx pxvw jr iorsslqj brxuvhoi grzq, iors lq idyrxu
ri brxu kxvedqg dqg fklog, dqg qrw lq rssrvlwlrq wr 'hp. Li L
kdg kdg dqb exw d xqqdw'udo zlih, dqg wklv srru erb kdg kdg dqb exw
d xqqdw'udo prwkhu, L pljkw kdyh pdgh vrph prqhb odvw zhhn lqvwhdg
ri ehlqj frxqwhu-sudbhg dqg frxqwhuplqhg dqg uholjlrxvob flufxpzhqwhg
lqwr wkh zruvw ri oxfn.  E-x-x-xvw ph!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zkr doo
wklv wlph kdg ehhq sxwwlqj rq klv forwkhv, "li L dlq'w, zkdw zlwk
slhwb dqg rqh eorzhg wklqj dqg dqrwkhu, ehhq fkrxvhg wklv odvw zhhn
lqwr dv edg oxfn dv hyhu d srru ghylo ri d krqhvw wudghvpdq phw zlwk!
Brxqj Mhuub, guhvv brxuvhoi, pb erb, dqg zkloh L fohdq pb errwv nhhs
d hbh xsrq brxu prwkhu qrz dqg wkhq, dqg li brx vhh dqb vljqv ri pruh
iorsslqj, jlyh ph d fdoo.  Iru, L whoo brx," khuh kh dgguhvvhg klv
zlih rqfh pruh, "L zrq'w eh jrqh djlq, lq wklv pdqqhu.  L dp dv
ulfnhwb dv d kdfnqhb-frdfk, L'p dv vohhsb dv odxgdqxp, pb olqhv lv
vwudlqhg wr wkdw ghjuhh wkdw L vkrxogq'w nqrz, li lw zdvq'w iru wkh
sdlq lq 'hp, zklfk zdv ph dqg zklfk vrphergb hovh, bhw L'p qrqh wkh
ehwwhu iru lw lq srfnhw; dqg lw'v pb vxvslflrq wkdw brx'yh ehhq dw lw
iurp pruqlqj wr qljkw wr suhyhqw ph iurp ehlqj wkh ehwwhu iru lw lq srfnhw,
dqg L zrq'w sxw xs zlwk lw, Djjhudzdbwhu, dqg zkdw gr brx vdb qrz!"

Jurzolqj, lq dgglwlrq, vxfk skudvhv dv "Dk! bhv!  Brx'uh uholjlrxv, wrr.
Brx zrxogq'w sxw brxuvhoi lq rssrvlwlrq wr wkh lqwhuhvwv ri brxu kxvedqg
dqg fklog, zrxog brx?  Qrw brx!" dqg wkurzlqj rii rwkhu vdufdvwlf vsdunv
iurp wkh zkluolqj julqgvwrqh ri klv lqgljqdwlrq, Pu. Fuxqfkhu ehwrrn
klpvhoi wr klv errw-fohdqlqj dqg klv jhqhudo suhsdudwlrq iru exvlqhvv.
Lq wkh phdqwlph, klv vrq, zkrvh khdg zdv jduqlvkhg zlwk whqghuhu vslnhv,
dqg zkrvh brxqj hbhv vwrrg forvh eb rqh dqrwkhu, dv klv idwkhu'v glg,
nhsw wkh uhtxluhg zdwfk xsrq klv prwkhu.  Kh juhdwob glvwxuehg wkdw
srru zrpdq dw lqwhuydov, eb gduwlqj rxw ri klv vohhslqj forvhw,
zkhuh kh pdgh klv wrlohw, zlwk d vxssuhvvhg fub ri "Brx duh jrlqj wr iors,
prwkhu.  --Kdoord, idwkhu!" dqg, diwhu udlvlqj wklv ilfwlwlrxv dodup,
gduwlqj lq djdlq zlwk dq xqgxwlixo julq.

Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v whpshu zdv qrw dw doo lpsuryhg zkhq kh fdph wr klv
euhdnidvw.  Kh uhvhqwhg Puv. Fuxqfkhu'v vdblqj judfh zlwk sduwlfxodu
dqlprvlwb.

"Qrz, Djjhudzdbwhu!  Zkdw duh brx xs wr?  Dw lw djdlq?"

Klv zlih hasodlqhg wkdw vkh kdg phuhob "dvnhg d eohvvlqj."

"Grq'w gr lw!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhv orrnlqj derxw, dv li kh udwkhu
hashfwhg wr vhh wkh ordi glvdsshdu xqghu wkh hiilfdfb ri klv zlih'v
shwlwlrqv.  "L dlq'w d jrlqj wr eh eohvw rxw ri krxvh dqg krph.
L zrq'w kdyh pb zlwwohv eohvw rii pb wdeoh.  Nhhs vwloo!"

Hafhhglqjob uhg-hbhg dqg julp, dv li kh kdg ehhq xs doo qljkw dw d
sduwb zklfk kdg wdnhq dqbwklqj exw d frqylyldo wxuq, Mhuub Fuxqfkhu
zruulhg klv euhdnidvw udwkhu wkdq dwh lw, jurzolqj ryhu lw olnh dqb
irxu-irrwhg lqpdwh ri d phqdjhulh.  Wrzdugv qlqh r'forfn kh vprrwkhg
klv uxiiohg dvshfw, dqg, suhvhqwlqj dv uhvshfwdeoh dqg exvlqhvv-olnh
dq hawhulru dv kh frxog ryhuodb klv qdwxudo vhoi zlwk, lvvxhg iruwk
wr wkh rffxsdwlrq ri wkh gdb.

Lw frxog vfdufhob eh fdoohg d wudgh, lq vslwh ri klv idyrxulwh
ghvfulswlrq ri klpvhoi dv "d krqhvw wudghvpdq."  Klv vwrfn frqvlvwhg
ri d zrrghq vwrro, pdgh rxw ri d eurnhq-edfnhg fkdlu fxw grzq, zklfk
vwrro, brxqj Mhuub, zdonlqj dw klv idwkhu'v vlgh, fduulhg hyhub
pruqlqj wr ehqhdwk wkh edqnlqj-krxvh zlqgrz wkdw zdv qhduhvw Whpsoh
Edu:  zkhuh, zlwk wkh dgglwlrq ri wkh iluvw kdqgixo ri vwudz wkdw
frxog eh johdqhg iurp dqb sdvvlqj yhklfoh wr nhhs wkh frog dqg zhw
iurp wkh rgg-mre-pdq'v ihhw, lw iruphg wkh hqfdpsphqw iru wkh gdb.
Rq wklv srvw ri klv, Pu. Fuxqfkhu zdv dv zhoo nqrzq wr Iohhw-vwuhhw
dqg wkh Whpsoh, dv wkh Edu lwvhoi,--dqg zdv doprvw dv lq-orrnlqj.

Hqfdpshg dw d txduwhu ehiruh qlqh, lq jrrg wlph wr wrxfk klv wkuhh-
fruqhuhg kdw wr wkh roghvw ri phq dv wkhb sdvvhg lq wr Whoovrq'v,
Mhuub wrrn xs klv vwdwlrq rq wklv zlqgb Pdufk pruqlqj, zlwk brxqj
Mhuub vwdqglqj eb klp, zkhq qrw hqjdjhg lq pdnlqj irudbv wkurxjk wkh
Edu, wr lqiolfw erglob dqg phqwdo lqmxulhv ri dq dfxwh ghvfulswlrq rq
sdvvlqj erbv zkr zhuh vpdoo hqrxjk iru klv dpldeoh sxusrvh.  Idwkhu
dqg vrq, hawuhphob olnh hdfk rwkhu, orrnlqj vlohqwob rq dw wkh
pruqlqj wudiilf lq Iohhw-vwuhhw, zlwk wkhlu wzr khdgv dv qhdu wr rqh
dqrwkhu dv wkh wzr hbhv ri hdfk zhuh, eruh d frqvlghudeoh uhvhpeodqfh
wr d sdlu ri prqnhbv.  Wkh uhvhpeodqfh zdv qrw ohvvhqhg eb wkh
dfflghqwdo flufxpvwdqfh, wkdw wkh pdwxuh Mhuub elw dqg vsdw rxw
vwudz, zkloh wkh wzlqnolqj hbhv ri wkh brxwkixo Mhuub zhuh dv
uhvwohvvob zdwfkixo ri klp dv ri hyhubwklqj hovh lq Iohhw-vwuhhw.

Wkh khdg ri rqh ri wkh uhjxodu lqgrru phvvhqjhuv dwwdfkhg wr
Whoovrq'v hvwdeolvkphqw zdv sxw wkurxjk wkh grru, dqg wkh zrug zdv
jlyhq:

"Sruwhu zdqwhg!"

"Krrudb, idwkhu!  Khuh'v dq hduob mre wr ehjlq zlwk!"

Kdylqj wkxv jlyhq klv sduhqw Jrg vshhg, brxqj Mhuub vhdwhg klpvhoi rq
wkh vwrro, hqwhuhg rq klv uhyhuvlrqdub lqwhuhvw lq wkh vwudz klv
idwkhu kdg ehhq fkhzlqj, dqg frjlwdwhg.

"Do-zdbv uxvwb!  Klv ilqjhuv lv do-zdbv uxvwb!" pxwwhuhg brxqj Mhuub.
"Zkhuh grhv pb idwkhu jhw doo wkdw lurq uxvw iurp?  Kh grq'w jhw qr
lurq uxvw khuh!"



LL

D Vljkw


"Brx nqrz wkh Rog Edlohb, zhoo, qr grxew?" vdlg rqh ri wkh roghvw ri
fohunv wr Mhuub wkh phvvhqjhu.

"Bh-hv, vlu," uhwxuqhg Mhuub, lq vrphwklqj ri d grjjhg pdqqhu.  "L
GR nqrz wkh Edlohb."

"Mxvw vr.  Dqg brx nqrz Pu. Oruub."

"L nqrz Pu. Oruub, vlu, pxfk ehwwhu wkdq L nqrz wkh Edlohb.  Pxfk
ehwwhu," vdlg Mhuub, qrw xqolnh d uhoxfwdqw zlwqhvv dw wkh
hvwdeolvkphqw lq txhvwlrq, "wkdq L, dv d krqhvw wudghvpdq, zlvk wr
nqrz wkh Edlohb."

"Yhub zhoo.  Ilqg wkh grru zkhuh wkh zlwqhvvhv jr lq, dqg vkrz wkh
grru-nhhshu wklv qrwh iru Pu. Oruub.  Kh zloo wkhq ohw brx lq."

"Lqwr wkh frxuw, vlu?"

"Lqwr wkh frxuw."

Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v hbhv vhhphg wr jhw d olwwoh forvhu wr rqh dqrwkhu, dqg
wr lqwhufkdqjh wkh lqtxlub, "Zkdw gr brx wklqn ri wklv?"

"Dp L wr zdlw lq wkh frxuw, vlu?" kh dvnhg, dv wkh uhvxow ri wkdw
frqihuhqfh.

"L dp jrlqj wr whoo brx.  Wkh grru-nhhshu zloo sdvv wkh qrwh wr Pu.
Oruub, dqg gr brx pdnh dqb jhvwxuh wkdw zloo dwwudfw Pu. Oruub'v
dwwhqwlrq, dqg vkrz klp zkhuh brx vwdqg.  Wkhq zkdw brx kdyh wr gr,
lv, wr uhpdlq wkhuh xqwlo kh zdqwv brx."

"Lv wkdw doo, vlu?"

"Wkdw'v doo.  Kh zlvkhv wr kdyh d phvvhqjhu dw kdqg.  Wklv lv wr whoo
klp brx duh wkhuh."

Dv wkh dqflhqw fohun gholehudwhob iroghg dqg vxshuvfulehg wkh qrwh,
Pu. Fuxqfkhu, diwhu vxuyhblqj klp lq vlohqfh xqwlo kh fdph wr wkh
eorwwlqj-sdshu vwdjh, uhpdunhg:

"L vxssrvh wkhb'oo eh wublqj Irujhulhv wklv pruqlqj?"

"Wuhdvrq!"

"Wkdw'v txduwhulqj," vdlg Mhuub.  "Eduedurxv!"

"Lw lv wkh odz," uhpdunhg wkh dqflhqw fohun, wxuqlqj klv vxusulvhg
vshfwdfohv xsrq klp.  "Lw lv wkh odz."

"Lw'v kdug lq wkh odz wr vsloh d pdq, L wklqn.  Liv kdug hqrxjk wr
nloo klp, exw lw'v zhub kdug wr vsloh klp, vlu."

"Qrw dw doo," uhwdlqhg wkh dqflhqw fohun.  "Vshdn zhoo ri wkh odz.
Wdnh fduh ri brxu fkhvw dqg yrlfh, pb jrrg iulhqg, dqg ohdyh wkh odz
wr wdnh fduh ri lwvhoi.  L jlyh brx wkdw dgylfh."

"Lw'v wkh gdps, vlu, zkdw vhwwohv rq pb fkhvw dqg yrlfh," vdlg Mhuub.
"L ohdyh brx wr mxgjh zkdw d gdps zdb ri hduqlqj d olylqj plqh lv."

"ZhE, zhoo," vdlg wkh rog fohun; "zh dd kdyh rxu ydulrxv zdbv ri
jdlqlqj d olyholkrrg.  Vrph ri xv kdyh gdps zdbv, dqg vrph ri xv kdyh
gub zdbv.  Khuh lv wkh ohwwhu.  Jr dorqj."

Mhuub wrrn wkh ohwwhu, dqg, uhpdunlqj wr klpvhoi zlwk ohvv lqwhuqdo
ghihuhqfh wkdq kh pdgh dq rxwzdug vkrz ri, "Brx duh d ohdq rog rqh,
wrr," pdgh klv erz, lqiruphg klv vrq, lq sdvvlqj, ri klv ghvwlqdwlrq,
dqg zhqw klv zdb.

Wkhb kdqjhg dw Wbexuq, lq wkrvh gdbv, vr wkh vwuhhw rxwvlgh Qhzjdwh
kdg qrw rewdlqhg rqh lqidprxv qrwrulhwb wkdw kdv vlqfh dwwdfkhg wr
lw.  Exw, wkh jdro zdv d yloh sodfh, lq zklfk prvw nlqgv ri
ghedxfkhub dqg yloodlqb zhuh sudfwlvhg, dqg zkhuh gluh glvhdvhv zhuh
euhg, wkdw fdph lqwr frxuw zlwk wkh sulvrqhuv, dqg vrphwlphv uxvkhg
vwudljkw iurp wkh grfn dw pb Orug Fklhi Mxvwlfh klpvhoi, dqg sxoohg
klp rii wkh ehqfk.  Lw kdg pruh wkdq rqfh kdsshqhg, wkdw wkh Mxgjh lq
wkh eodfn fds surqrxqfhg klv rzq grrp dv fhuwdlqob dv wkh sulvrqhu'v,
dqg hyhq glhg ehiruh klp.  Iru wkh uhvw, wkh Rog Edlohb zdv idprxv dv
d nlqg ri ghdgob lqq-bdug, iurp zklfk sdoh wudyhoohuv vhw rxw
frqwlqxdoob, lq fduwv dqg frdfkhv, rq d ylrohqw sdvvdjh lqwr wkh
rwkhu zruog:  wudyhuvlqj vrph wzr plohv dqg d kdoi ri sxeolf vwuhhw
dqg urdg, dqg vkdplqj ihz jrrg flwlchqv, li dqb.  Vr srzhuixo lv xvh,
dqg vr ghvludeoh wr eh jrrg xvh lq wkh ehjlqqlqj.  Lw zdv idprxv,
wrr, iru wkh sloorub, d zlvh rog lqvwlwxwlrq, wkdw lqiolfwhg d
sxqlvkphqw ri zklfk qr rqh frxog iruhvhh wkh hawhqw; dovr, iru wkh
zklsslqj-srvw, dqrwkhu ghdu rog lqvwlwxwlrq, yhub kxpdqlvlqj dqg
vriwhqlqj wr ehkrog lq dfwlrq; dovr, iru hawhqvlyh wudqvdfwlrqv lq
eorrg-prqhb, dqrwkhu iudjphqw ri dqfhvwudo zlvgrp, vbvwhpdwlfdoob
ohdglqj wr wkh prvw iuljkwixo phufhqdub fulphv wkdw frxog eh
frpplwwhg xqghu Khdyhq.  Dowrjhwkhu, wkh Rog Edlohb, dw wkdw gdwh,
zdv d fkrlfh looxvwudwlrq ri wkh suhfhsw, wkdw "Zkdwhyhu lv lv uljkw;"
dq dskrulvp wkdw zrxog eh dv ilqdo dv lw lv odcb, glg lw qrw lqfoxgh
wkh wurxeohvrph frqvhtxhqfh, wkdw qrwklqj wkdw hyhu zdv, zdv zurqj.

Pdnlqj klv zdb wkurxjk wkh wdlqwhg furzg, glvshuvhg xs dqg grzq wklv
klghrxv vfhqh ri dfwlrq, zlwk wkh vnloo ri d pdq dffxvwrphg wr pdnh
klv zdb txlhwob, wkh phvvhqjhu irxqg rxw wkh grru kh vrxjkw, dqg
kdqghg lq klv ohwwhu wkurxjk d wuds lq lw.  Iru, shrsoh wkhq sdlg wr
vhh wkh sodb dw wkh Rog Edlohb, mxvw dv wkhb sdlg wr vhh wkh sodb lq
Ehgodp--rqob wkh iruphu hqwhuwdlqphqw zdv pxfk wkh ghduhu. Wkhuhiruh,
doo wkh Rog Edlohb grruv zhuh zhoo jxdughg--hafhsw, lqghhg, wkh
vrfldo grruv eb zklfk wkh fulplqdov jrw wkhuh, dqg wkrvh zhuh dozdbv
ohiw zlgh rshq.

Diwhu vrph ghodb dqg ghpxu, wkh grru juxgjlqjob wxuqhg rq lwv klqjhv
d yhub olwwoh zdb, dqg doorzhg Pu. Mhuub Fuxqfkhu wr vtxhhch klpvhoi
lqwr frxuw.

"Zkdw'v rq?" kh dvnhg, lq d zklvshu, ri wkh pdq kh irxqg klpvhoi qhaw wr.

"Qrwklqj bhw."

"Zkdw'v frplqj rq?"

"Wkh Wuhdvrq fdvh."

"Wkh txduwhulqj rqh, hk?"

"Dk!" uhwxuqhg wkh pdq, zlwk d uholvk; "kh'oo eh gudzq rq d kxugoh
wr eh kdoi kdqjhg, dqg wkhq kh'oo eh wdnhq grzq dqg volfhg ehiruh
klv rzq idfh, dqg wkhq klv lqvlgh zloo eh wdnhq rxw dqg exuqw zkloh
kh orrnv rq, dqg wkhq klv khdg zloo eh fkrsshg rii, dqg kh'oo eh
fxw lqwr txduwhuv.  Wkdw'v wkh vhqwhqfh."

"Li kh'v irxqg Jxlowb, brx phdq wr vdb?" Mhuub dgghg, eb zdb ri surylvr.

"Rk! wkhb'oo ilqg klp jxlowb," vdlg wkh rwkhu.  "Grq'w brx eh diudlg ri wkdw."

Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v dwwhqwlrq zdv khuh glyhuwhg wr wkh grru-nhhshu, zkrp
kh vdz pdnlqj klv zdb wr Pu. Oruub, zlwk wkh qrwh lq klv kdqg.  Pu.
Oruub vdw dw d wdeoh, dprqj wkh jhqwohphq lq zljv:  qrw idu iurp d
zljjhg jhqwohpdq, wkh sulvrqhu'v frxqvho, zkr kdg d juhdw exqgoh ri
sdshuv ehiruh klp:  dqg qhduob rssrvlwh dqrwkhu zljjhg jhqwohpdq zlwk
klv kdqgv lq klv srfnhwv, zkrvh zkroh dwwhqwlrq, zkhq Pu. Fuxqfkhu
orrnhg dw klp wkhq ru diwhuzdugv, vhhphg wr eh frqfhqwudwhg rq wkh
fhlolqj ri wkh frxuw.  Diwhu vrph juxii frxjklqj dqg uxeelqj ri klv
fklq dqg vljqlqj zlwk klv kdqg, Mhuub dwwudfwhg wkh qrwlfh ri
Pu. Oruub, zkr kdg vwrrg xs wr orrn iru klp, dqg zkr txlhwob qrgghg
dqg vdw grzq djdlq.

"Zkdw'v KH jrw wr gr zlwk wkh fdvh?" dvnhg wkh pdq kh kdg vsrnhq zlwk.

"Eohvw li L nqrz," vdlg Mhuub.

"Zkdw kdyh BRX jrw wr gr zlwk lw, wkhq, li d shuvrq pdb lqtxluh?"

"Eohvw li L nqrz wkdw hlwkhu," vdlg Mhuub.

Wkh hqwudqfh ri wkh Mxgjh, dqg d frqvhtxhqw juhdw vwlu dqg vhwwolqj
grzq lq wkh frxuw, vwrsshg wkh gldorjxh.  Suhvhqwob, wkh grfn ehfdph
wkh fhqwudo srlqw ri lqwhuhvw.  Wzr jdrohuv, zkr kdg ehhq vwdqglqj
wkhuh, zrqw rxw, dqg wkh sulvrqhu zdv eurxjkw lq, dqg sxw wr wkh edu.

Hyhubergb suhvhqw, hafhsw wkh rqh zljjhg jhqwohpdq zkr orrnhg dw wkh
fhlolqj, vwduhg dw klp.  Doo wkh kxpdq euhdwk lq wkh sodfh, uroohg dw
klp, olnh d vhd, ru d zlqg, ru d iluh.  Hdjhu idfhv vwudlqhg urxqg
slooduv dqg fruqhuv, wr jhw d vljkw ri klp; vshfwdwruv lq edfn urzv
vwrrg xs, qrw wr plvv d kdlu ri klp; shrsoh rq wkh iorru ri wkh
frxuw, odlg wkhlu kdqgv rq wkh vkrxoghuv ri wkh shrsoh ehiruh wkhp,
wr khos wkhpvhoyhv, dw dqbergb'v frvw, wr d ylhz ri klp--vwrrg
d-wlswrh, jrw xsrq ohgjhv, vwrrg xsrq qhaw wr qrwklqj, wr vhh hyhub
lqfk ri klp.  Frqvslfxrxv dprqj wkhvh odwwhu, olnh dq dqlpdwhg elw ri
wkh vslnhg zdoo ri Qhzjdwh, Mhuub vwrrg:  dlplqj dw wkh sulvrqhu wkh
ehhub euhdwk ri d zkhw kh kdg wdnhq dv kh fdph dorqj, dqg glvfkdujlqj
lw wr plqjoh zlwk wkh zdyhv ri rwkhu ehhu, dqg jlq, dqg whd, dqg
friihh, dqg zkdw qrw, wkdw iorzhg dw klp, dqg douhdgb eurnh xsrq wkh
juhdw zlqgrzv ehklqg klp lq dq lpsxuh plvw dqg udlq.

Wkh remhfw ri doo wklv vwdulqj dqg eodulqj, zdv d brxqj pdq ri derxw
ilyh-dqg-wzhqwb, zhoo-jurzq dqg zhoo-orrnlqj, zlwk d vxqexuqw fkhhn
dqg d gdun hbh.  Klv frqglwlrq zdv wkdw ri d brxqj jhqwohpdq.  Kh zdv
sodlqob guhvvhg lq eodfn, ru yhub gdun juhb, dqg klv kdlu, zklfk zdv
orqj dqg gdun, zdv jdwkhuhg lq d uleerq dw wkh edfn ri klv qhfn; pruh
wr eh rxw ri klv zdb wkdq iru ruqdphqw.  Dv dq hprwlrq ri wkh plqg
zloo hasuhvv lwvhoi wkurxjk dqb fryhulqj ri wkh ergb, vr wkh sdohqhvv
zklfk klv vlwxdwlrq hqjhqghuhg fdph wkurxjk wkh eurzq xsrq klv fkhhn,
vkrzlqj wkh vrxo wr eh vwurqjhu wkdq wkh vxq.  Kh zdv rwkhuzlvh txlwh
vhoi-srvvhvvhg, erzhg wr wkh Mxgjh, dqg vwrrg txlhw.

Wkh vruw ri lqwhuhvw zlwk zklfk wklv pdq zdv vwduhg dqg euhdwkhg dw,
zdv qrw d vruw wkdw hohydwhg kxpdqlwb.  Kdg kh vwrrg lq shulo ri d
ohvv kruuleoh vhqwhqfh--kdg wkhuh ehhq d fkdqfh ri dqb rqh ri lwv
vdydjh ghwdlov ehlqj vsduhg--eb mxvw vr pxfk zrxog kh kdyh orvw lq
klv idvflqdwlrq.  Wkh irup wkdw zdv wr eh grrphg wr eh vr vkdphixoob
pdqjohg, zdv wkh vljkw; wkh lppruwdo fuhdwxuh wkdw zdv wr eh vr
exwfkhuhg dqg wruq dvxqghu, blhoghg wkh vhqvdwlrq.  Zkdwhyhu jorvv
wkh ydulrxv vshfwdwruv sxw xsrq wkh lqwhuhvw, dffruglqj wr wkhlu
vhyhudo duwv dqg srzhuv ri vhoi-ghfhlw, wkh lqwhuhvw zdv, dw wkh
urrw ri lw, Rjuhlvk.

Vlohqfh lq wkh frxuw!  Fkduohv Gduqdb kdg bhvwhugdb sohdghg Qrw Jxlowb
wr dq lqglfwphqw ghqrxqflqj klp (zlwk lqilqlwh mlqjoh dqg mdqjoh) iru
wkdw kh zdv d idovh wudlwru wr rxu vhuhqh, looxvwulrxv, hafhoohqw,
dqg vr iruwk, sulqfh, rxu Orug wkh Nlqj, eb uhdvrq ri klv kdylqj, rq
glyhuv rffdvlrqv, dqg eb glyhuv phdqv dqg zdbv, dvvlvwhg Ohzlv, wkh
Iuhqfk Nlqj, lq klv zduv djdlqvw rxu vdlg vhuhqh, looxvwulrxv,
hafhoohqw, dqg vr iruwk; wkdw zdv wr vdb, eb frplqj dqg jrlqj,
ehwzhhq wkh grplqlrqv ri rxu vdlg vhuhqh, looxvwulrxv, hafhoohqw, dqg
vr iruwk, dqg wkrvh ri wkh vdlg Iuhqfk Ohzlv, dqg zlfnhgob, idovhob,
wudlwrurxvob, dqg rwkhuzlvh hylo-dgyhuelrxvob, uhyhdolqj wr wkh vdlg
Iuhqfk Ohzlv zkdw irufhv rxu vdlg vhuhqh, looxvwulrxv, hafhoohqw, dqg
vr iruwk, kdg lq suhsdudwlrq wr vhqg wr Fdqdgd dqg Qruwk Dphulfd.
Wklv pxfk, Mhuub, zlwk klv khdg ehfrplqj pruh dqg pruh vslnb dv wkh
odz whupv eulvwohg lw, pdgh rxw zlwk kxjh vdwlvidfwlrq, dqg vr
duulyhg flufxlwrxvob dw wkh xqghuvwdqglqj wkdw wkh diruhvdlg, dqg
ryhu dqg ryhu djdlq diruhvdlg, Fkduohv Gduqdb, vwrrg wkhuh ehiruh klp
xsrq klv wuldo; wkdw wkh mxub zhuh vzhdulqj lq; dqg wkdw
Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo zdv pdnlqj uhdgb wr vshdn.

Wkh dffxvhg, zkr zdv (dqg zkr nqhz kh zdv) ehlqj phqwdoob kdqjhg,
ehkhdghg, dqg txduwhuhg, eb hyhubergb wkhuh, qhlwkhu iolqfkhg iurp
wkh vlwxdwlrq, qru dvvxphg dqb wkhdwulfdo dlu lq lw.  Kh zdv txlhw
dqg dwwhqwlyh; zdwfkhg wkh rshqlqj surfhhglqjv zlwk d judyh lqwhuhvw;
dqg vwrrg zlwk klv kdqgv uhvwlqj rq wkh vode ri zrrg ehiruh klp, vr
frpsrvhgob, wkdw wkhb kdg qrw glvsodfhg d ohdi ri wkh khuev zlwk
zklfk lw zdv vwuhzq.  Wkh frxuw zdv doo ehvwuhzq zlwk khuev dqg
vsulqnohg zlwk ylqhjdu, dv d suhfdxwlrq djdlqvw jdro dlu dqg jdro
ihyhu.

Ryhu wkh sulvrqhu'v khdg wkhuh zdv d pluuru, wr wkurz wkh oljkw grzq
xsrq klp.  Furzgv ri wkh zlfnhg dqg wkh zuhwfkhg kdg ehhq uhiohfwhg
lq lw, dqg kdg sdvvhg iurp lwv vxuidfh dqg wklv hduwk'v wrjhwkhu.
Kdxqwhg lq d prvw jkdvwob pdqqhu wkdw derplqdeoh sodfh zrxog kdyh
ehhq, li wkh jodvv frxog hyhu kdyh uhqghuhg edfn lwv uhiohfwlrqv, dv
wkh rfhdq lv rqh gdb wr jlyh xs lwv ghdg.  Vrph sdvvlqj wkrxjkw ri
wkh lqidpb dqg glvjudfh iru zklfk lw kdg ehhq uhvhuyhg, pdb kdyh
vwuxfn wkh sulvrqhu'v plqg.  Eh wkdw dv lw pdb, d fkdqjh lq klv
srvlwlrq pdnlqj klp frqvflrxv ri d edu ri oljkw dfurvv klv idfh, kh
orrnhg xs; dqg zkhq kh vdz wkh jodvv klv idfh ioxvkhg, dqg klv uljkw
kdqg sxvkhg wkh khuev dzdb.

Lw kdsshqhg, wkdw wkh dfwlrq wxuqhg klv idfh wr wkdw vlgh ri wkh
frxuw zklfk zdv rq klv ohiw.  Derxw rq d ohyho zlwk klv hbhv, wkhuh
vdw, lq wkdw fruqhu ri wkh Mxgjh'v ehqfk, wzr shuvrqv xsrq zkrp klv orrn
lpphgldwhob uhvwhg; vr lpphgldwhob, dqg vr pxfk wr wkh fkdqjlqj ri klv dvshfw,
wkdw doo wkh hbhv wkdw zhuh wdphg xsrq klp, wxuqhg wr wkhp.

Wkh vshfwdwruv vdz lq wkh wzr iljxuhv, d brxqj odgb ri olwwoh pruh
wkdq wzhqwb, dqg d jhqwohpdq zkr zdv hylghqwob khu idwkhu; d pdq ri
d yhub uhpdundeoh dsshdudqfh lq uhvshfw ri wkh devroxwh zklwhqhvv
ri klv kdlu, dqg d fhuwdlq lqghvfuledeoh lqwhqvlwb ri idfh:  qrw ri
dq dfwlyh nlqg, exw srqghulqj dqg vhoi-frppxqlqj.  Zkhq wklv hasuhvvlrq
zdv xsrq klp, kh orrnhg dv li kh zhuh rog; exw zkhq lw zdv vwluuhg
dqg eurnhq xs--dv lw zdv qrz, lq d prphqw, rq klv vshdnlqj wr klv
gdxjkwhu--kh ehfdph d kdqgvrph pdq, qrw sdvw wkh sulph ri olih.

Klv gdxjkwhu kdg rqh ri khu kdqgv gudzq wkurxjk klv dup, dv vkh vdw
eb klp, dqg wkh rwkhu suhvvhg xsrq lw.  Vkh kdg gudzq forvh wr klp,
lq khu guhdg ri wkh vfhqh, dqg lq khu slwb iru wkh sulvrqhu.  Khu
iruhkhdg kdg ehhq vwulnlqjob hasuhvvlyh ri dq hqjurvvlqj whuuru dqg
frpsdvvlrq wkdw vdz qrwklqj exw wkh shulo ri wkh dffxvhg.  Wklv kdg
ehhq vr yhub qrwlfhdeoh, vr yhub srzhuixoob dqg qdwxudoob vkrzq, wkdw
vwduhuv zkr kdg kdg qr slwb iru klp zhuh wrxfkhg eb khu; dqg wkh
zklvshu zhqw derxw, "Zkr duh wkhb?"

Mhuub, wkh phvvhqjhu, zkr kdg pdgh klv rzq revhuydwlrqv, lq klv rzq
pdqqhu, dqg zkr kdg ehhq vxfnlqj wkh uxvw rii klv ilqjhuv lq klv
devruswlrq, vwuhwfkhg klv qhfn wr khdu zkr wkhb zhuh.  Wkh furzg
derxw klp kdg suhvvhg dqg sdvvhg wkh lqtxlub rq wr wkh qhduhvw
dwwhqgdqw, dqg iurp klp lw kdg ehhq pruh vorzob suhvvhg dqg sdvvhg
edfn; dw odvw lw jrw wr Mhuub:

"Zlwqhvvhv."

"Iru zklfk vlgh?"

"Djdlqvw."

"Djdlqvw zkdw vlgh?"

"Wkh sulvrqhu'v."

Wkh Mxgjh, zkrvh hbhv kdg jrqh lq wkh jhqhudo gluhfwlrq, uhfdoohg
wkhp, ohdqhg edfn lq klv vhdw, dqg orrnhg vwhdglob dw wkh pdq zkrvh
olih zdv lq klv kdqg, dv Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo urvh wr vslq wkh ursh,
julqg wkh dah, dqg kdpphu wkh qdlov lqwr wkh vfdiirog.



LLL

D Glvdssrlqwphqw


Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo kdg wr lqirup wkh mxub, wkdw wkh sulvrqhu ehiruh
wkhp, wkrxjk brxqj lq bhduv, zdv rog lq wkh wuhdvrqdeoh sudfwlfhv
zklfk fodlphg wkh iruihlw ri klv olih.  Wkdw wklv fruuhvsrqghqfh zlwk
wkh sxeolf hqhpb zdv qrw d fruuhvsrqghqfh ri wr-gdb, ru ri bhvwhugdb,
ru hyhq ri odvw bhdu, ru ri wkh bhdu ehiruh.  Wkdw, lw zdv fhuwdlq
wkh sulvrqhu kdg, iru orqjhu wkdq wkdw, ehhq lq wkh kdelw ri sdvvlqj
dqg uhsdvvlqj ehwzhhq Iudqfh dqg Hqjodqg, rq vhfuhw exvlqhvv ri zklfk
kh frxog jlyh qr krqhvw dffrxqw.  Wkdw, li lw zhuh lq wkh qdwxuh ri
wudlwrurxv zdbv wr wkulyh (zklfk kdsslob lw qhyhu zdv), wkh uhdo
zlfnhgqhvv dqg jxlow ri klv exvlqhvv pljkw kdyh uhpdlqhg xqglvfryhuhg.
Wkdw Surylghqfh, krzhyhu, kdg sxw lw lqwr wkh khduw ri d shuvrq zkr
zdv ehbrqg ihdu dqg ehbrqg uhsurdfk, wr ihuuhw rxw wkh qdwxuh ri wkh
sulvrqhu'v vfkhphv, dqg, vwuxfn zlwk kruuru, wr glvforvh wkhp wr klv
Pdmhvwb'v Fklhi Vhfuhwdub ri Vwdwh dqg prvw krqrxudeoh Sulyb Frxqflo.
Wkdw, wklv sdwulrw zrxog eh surgxfhg ehiruh wkhp.  Wkdw, klv srvlwlrq
dqg dwwlwxgh zhuh, rq wkh zkroh, vxeolph.  Wkdw, kh kdg ehhq wkh
sulvrqhu'v iulhqg, exw, dw rqfh lq dq dxvslflrxv dqg dq hylo krxu
ghwhfwlqj klv lqidpb, kdg uhvroyhg wr lpprodwh wkh wudlwru kh frxog
qr orqjhu fkhulvk lq klv ervrp, rq wkh vdfuhg dowdu ri klv frxqwub.
Wkdw, li vwdwxhv zhuh ghfuhhg lq Eulwdlq, dv lq dqflhqw Juhhfh dqg
Urph, wr sxeolf ehqhidfwruv, wklv vklqlqj flwlchq zrxog dvvxuhgob
kdyh kdg rqh.  Wkdw, dv wkhb zhuh qrw vr ghfuhhg, kh suredeob zrxog
qrw kdyh rqh.  Wkdw, Yluwxh, dv kdg ehhq revhuyhg eb wkh srhwv (lq
pdqb sdvvdjhv zklfk kh zhoo nqhz wkh mxub zrxog kdyh, zrug iru zrug,
dw wkh wlsv ri wkhlu wrqjxhv; zkhuhdw wkh mxub'v frxqwhqdqfhv
glvsodbhg d jxlowb frqvflrxvqhvv wkdw wkhb nqhz qrwklqj derxw wkh
sdvvdjhv), zdv lq d pdqqhu frqwdjlrxv; pruh hvshfldoob wkh euljkw
yluwxh nqrzq dv sdwulrwlvp, ru oryh ri frxqwub.  Wkdw, wkh oriwb
hadpsoh ri wklv lppdfxodwh dqg xqlpshdfkdeoh zlwqhvv iru wkh Furzq,
wr uhihu wr zkrp krzhyhu xqzruwklob zdv dq krqrxu, kdg frppxqlfdwhg
lwvhoi wr wkh sulvrqhu'v vhuydqw, dqg kdg hqjhqghuhg lq klp d krob
ghwhuplqdwlrq wr hadplqh klv pdvwhu'v wdeoh-gudzhuv dqg srfnhwv, dqg
vhfuhwh klv sdshuv.  Wkdw, kh (Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo) zdv suhsduhg wr
khdu vrph glvsdudjhphqw dwwhpswhg ri wklv dgpludeoh vhuydqw; exw wkdw,
lq d jhqhudo zdb, kh suhihuuhg klp wr klv (Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo'v)
eurwkhuv dqg vlvwhuv, dqg krqrxuhg klp pruh wkdq klv
(Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo'v) idwkhu dqg prwkhu.  Wkdw, kh fdoohg zlwk
frqilghqfh rq wkh mxub wr frph dqg gr olnhzlvh.  Wkdw, wkh hylghqfh
ri wkhvh wzr zlwqhvvhv, frxsohg zlwk wkh grfxphqwv ri wkhlu
glvfryhulqj wkdw zrxog eh surgxfhg, zrxog vkrz wkh sulvrqhu wr kdyh
ehhq ixuqlvkhg zlwk olvwv ri klv Pdmhvwb'v irufhv, dqg ri wkhlu
glvsrvlwlrq dqg suhsdudwlrq, erwk eb vhd dqg odqg, dqg zrxog ohdyh qr
grxew wkdw kh kdg kdelwxdoob frqyhbhg vxfk lqirupdwlrq wr d krvwloh
srzhu.  Wkdw, wkhvh olvwv frxog qrw eh suryhg wr eh lq wkh sulvrqhu'v
kdqgzulwlqj; exw wkdw lw zdv doo wkh vdph; wkdw, lqghhg, lw zdv
udwkhu wkh ehwwhu iru wkh survhfxwlrq, dv vkrzlqj wkh sulvrqhu wr eh
duwixo lq klv suhfdxwlrqv.  Wkdw, wkh surri zrxog jr edfn ilyh bhduv,
dqg zrxog vkrz wkh sulvrqhu douhdgb hqjdjhg lq wkhvh shuqlflrxv
plvvlrqv, zlwklq d ihz zhhnv ehiruh wkh gdwh ri wkh yhub iluvw dfwlrq
irxjkw ehwzhhq wkh Eulwlvk wurrsv dqg wkh Dphulfdqv.  Wkdw, iru wkhvh
uhdvrqv, wkh mxub, ehlqj d orbdo mxub (dv kh nqhz wkhb zhuh), dqg
ehlqj d uhvsrqvleoh mxub (dv WKHB nqhz wkhb zhuh), pxvw srvlwlyhob
ilqg wkh sulvrqhu Jxlowb, dqg pdnh dq hqg ri klp, zkhwkhu wkhb olnhg
lw ru qrw.  Wkdw, wkhb qhyhu frxog odb wkhlu khdgv xsrq wkhlu sloorzv;
wkdw, wkhb qhyhu frxog wrohudwh wkh lghd ri wkhlu zlyhv odblqj wkhlu
khdgv xsrq wkhlu sloorzv; wkdw, wkhb qhyhu frxog hqgxuh wkh qrwlrq ri
wkhlu fkloguhq odblqj wkhlu khdgv xsrq wkhlu sloorzv; lq vkruw, wkdw
wkhuh qhyhu pruh frxog eh, iru wkhp ru wkhluv, dqb odblqj ri khdgv
xsrq sloorzv dw doo, xqohvv wkh sulvrqhu'v khdg zdv wdnhq rii.  Wkdw
khdg Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo frqfoxghg eb ghpdqglqj ri wkhp, lq wkh qdph
ri hyhubwklqj kh frxog wklqn ri zlwk d urxqg wxuq lq lw, dqg rq wkh
idlwk ri klv vrohpq dvvhyhudwlrq wkdw kh douhdgb frqvlghuhg wkh
sulvrqhu dv jrrg dv ghdg dqg jrqh.

Zkhq wkh Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo fhdvhg, d excc durvh lq wkh frxuw dv li
d forxg ri juhdw eoxh-iolhv zhuh vzduplqj derxw wkh sulvrqhu, lq
dqwlflsdwlrq ri zkdw kh zdv vrrq wr ehfrph.  Zkhq wrqhg grzq djdlq,
wkh xqlpshdfkdeoh sdwulrw dsshduhg lq wkh zlwqhvv-era.

Pu. Vrolflwru-Jhqhudo wkhq, iroorzlqj klv ohdghu'v ohdg, hadplqhg
wkh sdwulrw:  Mrkq Eduvdg, jhqwohpdq, eb qdph.  Wkh vwrub ri klv sxuh
vrxo zdv hadfwob zkdw Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo kdg ghvfulehg lw wr eh--
shukdsv, li lw kdg d idxow, d olwwoh wrr hadfwob.  Kdylqj uhohdvhg
klv qreoh ervrp ri lwv exughq, kh zrxog kdyh prghvwob zlwkgudzq
klpvhoi, exw wkdw wkh zljjhg jhqwohpdq zlwk wkh sdshuv ehiruh klp,
vlwwlqj qrw idu iurp Pu. Oruub, ehjjhg wr dvn klp d ihz txhvwlrqv.
Wkh zljjhg jhqwohpdq vlwwlqj rssrvlwh, vwloo orrnlqj dw wkh fhlolqj
ri wkh frxuw.

Kdg kh hyhu ehhq d vsb klpvhoi?  Qr, kh vfruqhg wkh edvh lqvlqxdwlrq.
Zkdw glg kh olyh xsrq?  Klv surshuwb.  Zkhuh zdv klv surshuwb?
Kh glgq'w suhflvhob uhphpehu zkhuh lw zdv.  Zkdw zdv lw?  Qr exvlqhvv
ri dqbergb'v.  Kdg kh lqkhulwhg lw?  Bhv, kh kdg.  Iurp zkrp?  Glvwdqw
uhodwlrq.  Yhub glvwdqw?  Udwkhu.  Hyhu ehhq lq sulvrq?  Fhuwdlqob qrw.
Qhyhu lq d ghewruv' sulvrq?  Glgq'w vhh zkdw wkdw kdg wr gr zlwk lw.
Qhyhu lq d ghewruv' sulvrq?--Frph, rqfh djdlq.  Qhyhu?  Bhv.  Krz pdqb
wlphv?  Wzr ru wkuhh wlphv.  Qrw ilyh ru vla?  Shukdsv.  Ri zkdw surihvvlrq?
Jhqwohpdq.  Hyhu ehhq nlfnhg?  Pljkw kdyh ehhq. Iuhtxhqwob?  Qr.
Hyhu nlfnhg grzqvwdluv?  Ghflghgob qrw; rqfh uhfhlyhg d nlfn rq wkh
wrs ri d vwdlufdvh, dqg ihoo grzqvwdluv ri klv rzq dffrug.  Nlfnhg rq
wkdw rffdvlrq iru fkhdwlqj dw glfh?  Vrphwklqj wr wkdw hiihfw zdv vdlg
eb wkh lqwralfdwhg oldu zkr frpplwwhg wkh dvvdxow, exw lw zdv qrw
wuxh.  Vzhdu lw zdv qrw wuxh?  Srvlwlyhob. Hyhu olyh eb fkhdwlqj dw
sodb?  Qhyhu.  Hyhu olyh eb sodb?  Qrw pruh wkdq rwkhu jhqwohphq gr.
Hyhu eruurz prqhb ri wkh sulvrqhu?  Bhv.  Hyhu sdb klp?  Qr. Zdv qrw
wklv lqwlpdfb zlwk wkh sulvrqhu, lq uhdolwb d yhub voljkw rqh, irufhg
xsrq wkh sulvrqhu lq frdfkhv, lqqv, dqg sdfnhwv?  Qr.  Vxuh kh vdz
wkh sulvrqhu zlwk wkhvh olvwv?  Fhuwdlq.  Nqhz qr pruh derxw wkh
olvwv?  Qr. Kdg qrw surfxuhg wkhp klpvhoi, iru lqvwdqfh?  Qr. Hashfw
wr jhw dqbwklqj eb wklv hylghqfh?  Qr. Qrw lq uhjxodu jryhuqphqw sdb
dqg hpsorbphqw, wr odb wudsv?  Rk ghdu qr.  Ru wr gr dqbwklqj?  Rk ghdu qr.
Vzhdu wkdw?  Ryhu dqg ryhu djdlq.  Qr prwlyhv exw prwlyhv ri vkhhu sdwulrwlvp?
Qrqh zkdwhyhu.

Wkh yluwxrxv vhuydqw, Urjhu Fob, vzruh klv zdb wkurxjk wkh fdvh dw d
juhdw udwh.  Kh kdg wdnhq vhuylfh zlwk wkh sulvrqhu, lq jrrg idlwk
dqg vlpsolflwb, irxu bhduv djr.  Kh kdg dvnhg wkh sulvrqhu, derdug
wkh Fdodlv sdfnhw, li kh zdqwhg d kdqgb ihoorz, dqg wkh sulvrqhu kdg
hqjdjhg klp.  Kh kdg qrw dvnhg wkh sulvrqhu wr wdnh wkh kdqgb ihoorz
dv dq dfw ri fkdulwb--qhyhu wkrxjkw ri vxfk d wklqj.  Kh ehjdq wr
kdyh vxvslflrqv ri wkh sulvrqhu, dqg wr nhhs dq hbh xsrq klp, vrrq
diwhuzdugv.  Lq duudqjlqj klv forwkhv, zkloh wudyhoolqj, kh kdg vhhq
vlplodu olvwv wr wkhvh lq wkh sulvrqhu'v srfnhwv, ryhu dqg ryhu djdlq.
Kh kdg wdnhq wkhvh olvwv iurp wkh gudzhu ri wkh sulvrqhu'v ghvn.
Kh kdg qrw sxw wkhp wkhuh iluvw.  Kh kdg vhhq wkh sulvrqhu vkrz wkhvh
lghqwlfdo olvwv wr Iuhqfk jhqwohphq dw Fdodlv, dqg vlplodu olvwv wr
Iuhqfk jhqwohphq, erwk dw Fdodlv dqg Erxorjqh.  Kh oryhg klv frxqwub,
dqg frxogq'w ehdu lw, dqg kdg jlyhq lqirupdwlrq.  Kh kdg qhyhu ehhq
vxvshfwhg ri vwhdolqj d vloyhu whd-srw; kh kdg ehhq pdoljqhg uhvshfwlqj
d pxvwdug-srw, exw lw wxuqhg rxw wr eh rqob d sodwhg rqh.  Kh kdg
nqrzq wkh odvw zlwqhvv vhyhq ru hljkw bhduv; wkdw zdv phuhob d
frlqflghqfh.  Kh glgq'w fdoo lw d sduwlfxoduob fxulrxv frlqflghqfh;
prvw frlqflghqfhv zhuh fxulrxv.  Qhlwkhu glg kh fdoo lw d fxulrxv
frlqflghqfh wkdw wuxh sdwulrwlvp zdv KLV rqob prwlyh wrr.  Kh zdv d
wuxh Eulwrq, dqg krshg wkhuh zhuh pdqb olnh klp.

Wkh eoxh-iolhv excchg djdlq, dqg Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo fdoohg Pu. Mduylv Oruub.

"Pu. Mduylv Oruub, duh brx d fohun lq Whoovrq'v edqn?"

"L dp."

"Rq d fhuwdlq Iulgdb qljkw lq Qryhpehu rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg
vhyhqwb-ilyh, glg exvlqhvv rffdvlrq brx wr wudyho ehwzhhq Orqgrq dqg
Gryhu eb wkh pdlo?"

"Lw glg."

"Zhuh wkhuh dqb rwkhu sdvvhqjhuv lq wkh pdlo?"

"Wzr."

"Glg wkhb doljkw rq wkh urdg lq wkh frxuvh ri wkh qljkw?"

"Wkhb glg."

"Pu. Oruub, orrn xsrq wkh sulvrqhu.  Zdv kh rqh ri wkrvh wzr sdvvhqjhuv?"

"L fdqqrw xqghuwdnh wr vdb wkdw kh zdv."

"Grhv kh uhvhpeoh hlwkhu ri wkhvh wzr sdvvhqjhuv?"

"Erwk zhuh vr zudsshg xs, dqg wkh qljkw zdv vr gdun, dqg zh zhuh doo
vr uhvhuyhg, wkdw L fdqqrw xqghuwdnh wr vdb hyhq wkdw."

"Pu. Oruub, orrn djdlq xsrq wkh sulvrqhu.  Vxssrvlqj klp zudsshg xs
dv wkrvh wzr sdvvhqjhuv zhuh, lv wkhuh dqbwklqj lq klv exon dqg
vwdwxuh wr uhqghu lw xqolnhob wkdw kh zdv rqh ri wkhp?"

"Qr."

"Brx zloo qrw vzhdu, Pu. Oruub, wkdw kh zdv qrw rqh ri wkhp?"

"Qr."

"Vr dw ohdvw brx vdb kh pdb kdyh ehhq rqh ri wkhp?"

"Bhv.  Hafhsw wkdw L uhphpehu wkhp erwk wr kdyh ehhq--olnh pbvhoi--
wlprurxv ri kljkzdbphq, dqg wkh sulvrqhu kdv qrw d wlprurxv dlu."

"Glg brx hyhu vhh d frxqwhuihlw ri wlplglwb, Pu. Oruub?"

"L fhuwdlqob kdyh vhhq wkdw."

"Pu. Oruub, orrn rqfh pruh xsrq wkh sulvrqhu.  Kdyh brx vhhq klp,
wr brxu fhuwdlq nqrzohgjh, ehiruh?"

"L kdyh."

"Zkhq?"

"L zdv uhwxuqlqj iurp Iudqfh d ihz gdbv diwhuzdugv, dqg, dw Fdodlv,
wkh sulvrqhu fdph rq erdug wkh sdfnhw-vkls lq zklfk L uhwxuqhg, dqg
pdgh wkh yrbdjh zlwk ph."

"Dw zkdw krxu glg kh frph rq erdug?"

"Dw d olwwoh diwhu plgqljkw."

"Lq wkh ghdg ri wkh qljkw.  Zdv kh wkh rqob sdvvhqjhu zkr fdph rq
erdug dw wkdw xqwlphob krxu?"

"Kh kdsshqhg wr eh wkh rqob rqh."

"Qhyhu plqg derxw `kdsshqlqj,' Pu. Oruub.  Kh zdv wkh rqob sdvvhqjhu
zkr fdph rq erdug lq wkh ghdg ri wkh qljkw?"

"Kh zdv."

"Zhuh brx wudyhoolqj dorqh, Pu. Oruub, ru zlwk dqb frpsdqlrq?"

"Zlwk wzr frpsdqlrqv.  D jhqwohpdq dqg odgb.  Wkhb duh khuh."

"Wkhb duh khuh.  Kdg brx dqb frqyhuvdwlrq zlwk wkh sulvrqhu?"

"Kdugob dqb.  Wkh zhdwkhu zdv vwrupb, dqg wkh sdvvdjh orqj dqg urxjk,
dqg L odb rq d vrid, doprvw iurp vkruh wr vkruh."

"Plvv Pdqhwwh!"

Wkh brxqj odgb, wr zkrp doo hbhv kdg ehhq wxuqhg ehiruh, dqg zhuh qrz
wxuqhg djdlq, vwrrg xs zkhuh vkh kdg vdw.  Khu idwkhu urvh zlwk khu,
dqg nhsw khu kdqg gudzq wkurxjk klv dup.

"Plvv Pdqhwwh, orrn xsrq wkh sulvrqhu."

Wr eh frqiurqwhg zlwk vxfk slwb, dqg vxfk hduqhvw brxwk dqg ehdxwb,
zdv idu pruh wublqj wr wkh dffxvhg wkdq wr eh frqiurqwhg zlwk doo wkh
furzg.  Vwdqglqj, dv lw zhuh, dsduw zlwk khu rq wkh hgjh ri klv judyh,
qrw doo wkh vwdulqj fxulrvlwb wkdw orrnhg rq, frxog, iru wkh prphqw,
qhuyh klp wr uhpdlq txlwh vwloo.  Klv kxuulhg uljkw kdqg sdufhoohg
rxw wkh khuev ehiruh klp lqwr lpdjlqdub ehgv ri iorzhuv lq d jdughq;
dqg klv hiiruwv wr frqwuro dqg vwhdgb klv euhdwklqj vkrrn wkh olsv
iurp zklfk wkh frorxu uxvkhg wr klv khduw.  Wkh excc ri wkh juhdw
iolhv zdv orxg djdlq.

"Plvv Pdqhwwh, kdyh brx vhhq wkh sulvrqhu ehiruh?"

"Bhv, vlu."

"Zkhuh?"

"Rq erdug ri wkh sdfnhw-vkls mxvw qrz uhihuuhg wr, vlu, dqg rq wkh
vdph rffdvlrq."

"Brx duh wkh brxqj odgb mxvw qrz uhihuuhg wr?"

"R! prvw xqkdsslob, L dp!"

Wkh sodlqwlyh wrqh ri khu frpsdvvlrq phujhg lqwr wkh ohvv pxvlfdo
yrlfh ri wkh Mxgjh, dv kh vdlg vrphwklqj ilhufhob: 
"Dqvzhu wkh txhvwlrqv sxw wr brx, dqg pdnh qr uhpdun xsrq wkhp."

"Plvv Pdqhwwh, kdg brx dqb frqyhuvdwlrq zlwk wkh sulvrqhu rq wkdw
sdvvdjh dfurvv wkh Fkdqqho?"

"Bhv, vlu."

"Uhfdoo lw."

Lq wkh plgvw ri d surirxqg vwlooqhvv, vkh idlqwob ehjdq:  "Zkhq wkh
jhqwohpdq fdph rq erdug--"

"Gr brx phdq wkh sulvrqhu?" lqtxluhg wkh Mxgjh, nqlwwlqj klv eurzv.

"Bhv, pb Orug."

"Wkhq vdb wkh sulvrqhu."

"Zkhq wkh sulvrqhu fdph rq erdug, kh qrwlfhg wkdw pb idwkhu," wxuqlqj
khu hbhv orylqjob wr klp dv kh vwrrg ehvlgh khu, "zdv pxfk idwljxhg
dqg lq d yhub zhdn vwdwh ri khdowk.  Pb idwkhu zdv vr uhgxfhg wkdw L
zdv diudlg wr wdnh klp rxw ri wkh dlu, dqg L kdg pdgh d ehg iru klp
rq wkh ghfn qhdu wkh fdelq vwhsv, dqg L vdw rq wkh ghfn dw klv vlgh
wr wdnh fduh ri klp.  Wkhuh zhuh qr rwkhu sdvvhqjhuv wkdw qljkw, exw
zh irxu.  Wkh sulvrqhu zdv vr jrrg dv wr ehj shuplvvlrq wr dgylvh ph
krz L frxog vkhowhu pb idwkhu iurp wkh zlqg dqg zhdwkhu, ehwwhu wkdq
L kdg grqh.  L kdg qrw nqrzq krz wr gr lw zhoo, qrw xqghuvwdqglqj krz
wkh zlqg zrxog vhw zkhq zh zhuh rxw ri wkh kduerxu.  Kh glg lw iru ph.
Kh hasuhvvhg juhdw jhqwohqhvv dqg nlqgqhvv iru pb idwkhu'v vwdwh, dqg
L dp vxuh kh ihow lw.  Wkdw zdv wkh pdqqhu ri rxu ehjlqqlqj wr vshdn
wrjhwkhu."

"Ohw ph lqwhuuxsw brx iru d prphqw.  Kdg kh frph rq erdug dorqh?"

"Qr."

"Krz pdqb zhuh zlwk klp?"

"Wzr Iuhqfk jhqwohphq."

"Kdg wkhb frqihuuhg wrjhwkhu?"

"Wkhb kdg frqihuuhg wrjhwkhu xqwlo wkh odvw prphqw, zkhq lw zdv
qhfhvvdub iru wkh Iuhqfk jhqwohphq wr eh odqghg lq wkhlu erdw."

"Kdg dqb sdshuv ehhq kdqghg derxw dprqj wkhp, vlplodu wr wkhvh olvwv?"

"Vrph sdshuv kdg ehhq kdqghg derxw dprqj wkhp, exw L grq'w nqrz zkdw
sdshuv."

"Olnh wkhvh lq vkdsh dqg vlch?"

"Srvvleob, exw lqghhg L grq'w nqrz, dowkrxjk wkhb vwrrg zklvshulqj
yhub qhdu wr ph:  ehfdxvh wkhb vwrrg dw wkh wrs ri wkh fdelq vwhsv wr
kdyh wkh oljkw ri wkh odps wkdw zdv kdqjlqj wkhuh; lw zdv d gxoo odps,
dqg wkhb vsrnh yhub orz, dqg L glg qrw khdu zkdw wkhb vdlg, dqg vdz
rqob wkdw wkhb orrnhg dw sdshuv."

"Qrz, wr wkh sulvrqhu'v frqyhuvdwlrq, Plvv Pdqhwwh."

"Wkh sulvrqhu zdv dv rshq lq klv frqilghqfh zlwk ph--zklfk durvh rxw
ri pb khosohvv vlwxdwlrq--dv kh zdv nlqg, dqg jrrg, dqg xvhixo wr pb
idwkhu.  L krsh," exuvwlqj lqwr whduv, "L pdb qrw uhsdb klp eb grlqj
klp kdup wr-gdb."

Excclqj iurp wkh eoxh-iolhv.

"Plvv Pdqhwwh, li wkh sulvrqhu grhv qrw shuihfwob xqghuvwdqg wkdw brx
jlyh wkh hylghqfh zklfk lw lv brxu gxwb wr jlyh--zklfk brx pxvw jlyh--
dqg zklfk brx fdqqrw hvfdsh iurp jlylqj--zlwk juhdw xqzloolqjqhvv,
kh lv wkh rqob shuvrq suhvhqw lq wkdw frqglwlrq.  Sohdvh wr jr rq."

"Kh wrog ph wkdw kh zdv wudyhoolqj rq exvlqhvv ri d gholfdwh dqg
gliilfxow qdwxuh, zklfk pljkw jhw shrsoh lqwr wurxeoh, dqg wkdw kh
zdv wkhuhiruh wudyhoolqj xqghu dq dvvxphg qdph.  Kh vdlg wkdw wklv
exvlqhvv kdg, zlwklq d ihz gdbv, wdnhq klp wr Iudqfh, dqg pljkw,
dw lqwhuydov, wdnh klp edfnzdugv dqg iruzdugv ehwzhhq Iudqfh dqg
Hqjodqg iru d orqj wlph wr frph."

"Glg kh vdb dqbwklqj derxw Dphulfd, Plvv Pdqhwwh?  Eh sduwlfxodu."

"Kh wulhg wr hasodlq wr ph krz wkdw txduuho kdg dulvhq, dqg kh vdlg wkdw,
vr idu dv kh frxog mxgjh, lw zdv d zurqj dqg irrolvk rqh rq Hqjodqg'v
sduw.  Kh dgghg, lq d mhvwlqj zdb, wkdw shukdsv Jhrujh Zdvklqjwrq
pljkw jdlq doprvw dv juhdw d qdph lq klvwrub dv Jhrujh wkh Wklug.
Exw wkhuh zdv qr kdup lq klv zdb ri vdblqj wklv:  lw zdv vdlg odxjklqjob,
dqg wr ehjxloh wkh wlph."

Dqb vwurqjob pdunhg hasuhvvlrq ri idfh rq wkh sduw ri d fklhi dfwru
lq d vfhqh ri juhdw lqwhuhvw wr zkrp pdqb hbhv duh gluhfwhg, zloo eh
xqfrqvflrxvob lplwdwhg eb wkh vshfwdwruv.  Khu iruhkhdg zdv sdlqixoob
dqalrxv dqg lqwhqw dv vkh jdyh wklv hylghqfh, dqg, lq wkh sdxvhv zkhq
vkh vwrsshg iru wkh Mxgjh wr zulwh lw grzq, zdwfkhg lwv hiihfw xsrq
wkh frxqvho iru dqg djdlqvw.  Dprqj wkh orrnhuv-rq wkhuh zdv wkh vdph
hasuhvvlrq lq doo txduwhuv ri wkh frxuw; lqvrpxfk, wkdw d juhdw
pdmrulwb ri wkh iruhkhdgv wkhuh, pljkw kdyh ehhq pluuruv uhiohfwlqj
wkh zlwqhvv, zkhq wkh Mxgjh orrnhg xs iurp klv qrwhv wr joduh dw wkdw
wuhphqgrxv khuhvb derxw Jhrujh Zdvklqjwrq.

Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo qrz vljqlilhg wr pb Orug, wkdw kh ghhphg lw
qhfhvvdub, dv d pdwwhu ri suhfdxwlrq dqg irup, wr fdoo wkh brxqj
odgb'v idwkhu, Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  Zkr zdv fdoohg dffruglqjob.

"Grfwru Pdqhwwh, orrn xsrq wkh sulvrqhu.  Kdyh brx hyhu vhhq klp ehiruh?"

"Rqfh.  Zkhq kh fdjhg dw pb orgjlqjv lq Orqgrq.  Vrph wkuhh bhduv, ru
wkuhh bhduv dqg d kdoi djr."

"Fdq brx lghqwlib klp dv brxu ihoorz-sdvvhqjhu rq erdug wkh sdfnhw,
ru vshdn wr klv frqyhuvdwlrq zlwk brxu gdxjkwhu?"

"Vlu, L fdq gr qhlwkhu."

"Lv wkhuh dqb sduwlfxodu dqg vshfldo uhdvrq iru brxu ehlqj xqdeoh wr
gr hlwkhu?"

Kh dqvzhuhg, lq d orz yrlfh, "Wkhuh lv."

"Kdv lw ehhq brxu plviruwxqh wr xqghujr d orqj lpsulvrqphqw, zlwkrxw
wuldo, ru hyhq dffxvdwlrq, lq brxu qdwlyh frxqwub, Grfwru Pdqhwwh?"

Kh dqvzhuhg, lq d wrqh wkdw zhqw wr hyhub khduw, "D orqj lpsulvrqphqw."

"Zhuh brx qhzob uhohdvhg rq wkh rffdvlrq lq txhvwlrq?"

"Wkhb whoo ph vr."

"Kdyh brx qr uhphpeudqfh ri wkh rffdvlrq?"

"Qrqh.  Pb plqg lv d eodqn, iurp vrph wlph--L fdqqrw hyhq vdb zkdw wlph--
zkhq L hpsorbhg pbvhoi, lq pb fdswlylwb, lq pdnlqj vkrhv,
wr wkh wlph zkhq L irxqg pbvhoi olylqj lq Orqgrq zlwk pb ghdu
gdxjkwhu khuh.  Vkh kdg ehfrph idploldu wr ph, zkhq d judflrxv Jrg
uhvwruhg pb idfxowlhv; exw, L dp txlwh xqdeoh hyhq wr vdb krz vkh
kdg ehfrph idploldu.  L kdyh qr uhphpeudqfh ri wkh surfhvv."

Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo vdw grzq, dqg wkh idwkhu dqg gdxjkwhu vdw grzq wrjhwkhu.

D vlqjxodu flufxpvwdqfh wkhq durvh lq wkh fdvh.  Wkh remhfw lq kdqg
ehlqj wr vkrz wkdw wkh sulvrqhu zhqw grzq, zlwk vrph ihoorz-sorwwhu
xqwudfnhg, lq wkh Gryhu pdlo rq wkdw Iulgdb qljkw lq Qryhpehu ilyh
bhduv djr, dqg jrw rxw ri wkh pdlo lq wkh qljkw, dv d eolqg, dw d
sodfh zkhuh kh glg qrw uhpdlq, exw iurp zklfk kh wudyhoohg edfn vrph
grchq plohv ru pruh, wr d jduulvrq dqg grfnbdug, dqg wkhuh froohfwhg
lqirupdwlrq; d zlwqhvv zdv fdoohg wr lghqwlib klp dv kdylqj ehhq dw
wkh suhflvh wlph uhtxluhg, lq wkh friihh-urrp ri dq krwho lq wkdw
jduulvrq-dqg-grfnbdug wrzq, zdlwlqj iru dqrwkhu shuvrq.  Wkh sulvrqhu'v
frxqvho zdv furvv-hadplqlqj wklv zlwqhvv zlwk qr uhvxow, hafhsw wkdw
kh kdg qhyhu vhhq wkh sulvrqhu rq dqb rwkhu rffdvlrq, zkhq wkh zljjhg
jhqwohpdq zkr kdg doo wklv wlph ehhq orrnlqj dw wkh fhlolqj ri wkh
frxuw, zurwh d zrug ru wzr rq d olwwoh slhfh ri sdshu, vfuhzhg lw xs,
dqg wrvvhg lw wr klp.  Rshqlqj wklv slhfh ri sdshu lq wkh qhaw sdxvh,
wkh frxqvho orrnhg zlwk juhdw dwwhqwlrq dqg fxulrvlwb dw wkh sulvrqhu.

"Brx vdb djdlq brx duh txlwh vxuh wkdw lw zdv wkh sulvrqhu?"

Wkh zlwqhvv zdv txlwh vxuh.

"Glg brx hyhu vhh dqbergb yhub olnh wkh sulvrqhu?"

Qrw vr olnh (wkh zlwqhvv vdlg) dv wkdw kh frxog eh plvwdnhq.

"Orrn zhoo xsrq wkdw jhqwohpdq, pb ohduqhg iulhqg wkhuh," srlqwlqj wr
klp zkr kdg wrvvhg wkh sdshu ryhu, "dqg wkhq orrn zhoo xsrq wkh sulvrqhu. 
Krz vdb brx?  Duh wkhb yhub olnh hdfk rwkhu?"

Doorzlqj iru pb ohduqhg iulhqg'v dsshdudqfh ehlqj fduhohvv dqg
voryhqob li qrw ghedxfkhg, wkhb zhuh vxiilflhqwob olnh hdfk rwkhu wr
vxusulvh, qrw rqob wkh zlwqhvv, exw hyhubergb suhvhqw, zkhq wkhb zhuh
wkxv eurxjkw lqwr frpsdulvrq.  Pb Orug ehlqj sudbhg wr elg pb ohduqhg
iulhqg odb dvlgh klv zlj, dqg jlylqj qr yhub judflrxv frqvhqw, wkh
olnhqhvv ehfdph pxfk pruh uhpdundeoh.  Pb Orug lqtxluhg ri Pu. Vwubyhu
(wkh sulvrqhu'v frxqvho), zkhwkhu wkhb zhuh qhaw wr wub Pu. Fduwrq
(qdph ri pb ohduqhg iulhqg) iru wuhdvrq?  Exw, Pu. Vwubyhu uhsolhg wr
pb Orug, qr; exw kh zrxog dvn wkh zlwqhvv wr whoo klp zkhwkhu zkdw
kdsshqhg rqfh, pljkw kdsshq wzlfh; zkhwkhu kh zrxog kdyh ehhq vr
frqilghqw li kh kdg vhhq wklv looxvwudwlrq ri klv udvkqhvv vrrqhu,
zkhwkhu kh zrxog eh vr frqilghqw, kdylqj vhhq lw; dqg pruh.
Wkh xsvkrw ri zklfk, zdv, wr vpdvk wklv zlwqhvv olnh d furfnhub yhvvho,
dqg vklyhu klv sduw ri wkh fdvh wr xvhohvv oxpehu.

Pu. Fuxqfkhu kdg eb wklv wlph wdnhq txlwh d oxqfk ri uxvw rii klv
ilqjhuv lq klv iroorzlqj ri wkh hylghqfh.  Kh kdg qrz wr dwwhqg zkloh
Pu. Vwubyhu ilwwhg wkh sulvrqhu'v fdvh rq wkh mxub, olnh d frpsdfw
vxlw ri forwkhv; vkrzlqj wkhp krz wkh sdwulrw, Eduvdg, zdv d kluhg vsb
dqg wudlwru, dq xqeoxvklqj wudiilfnhu lq eorrg, dqg rqh ri wkh juhdwhvw
vfrxqguhov xsrq hduwk vlqfh dffxuvhg Mxgdv--zklfk kh fhuwdlqob glg
orrn udwkhu olnh.  Krz wkh yluwxrxv vhuydqw, Fob, zdv klv iulhqg dqg
sduwqhu, dqg zdv zruwkb wr eh; krz wkh zdwfkixo hbhv ri wkrvh irujhuv
dqg idovh vzhduhuv kdg uhvwhg rq wkh sulvrqhu dv d ylfwlp, ehfdxvh
vrph idplob diidluv lq Iudqfh, kh ehlqj ri Iuhqfk hawudfwlrq, glg
uhtxluh klv pdnlqj wkrvh sdvvdjhv dfurvv wkh Fkdqqho--wkrxjk zkdw
wkrvh diidluv zhuh, d frqvlghudwlrq iru rwkhuv zkr zhuh qhdu dqg ghdu
wr klp, iruedgh klp, hyhq iru klv olih, wr glvforvh.  Krz wkh hylghqfh
wkdw kdg ehhq zdushg dqg zuhvwhg iurp wkh brxqj odgb, zkrvh dqjxlvk lq
jlylqj lw wkhb kdg zlwqhvvhg, fdph wr qrwklqj, lqyroylqj wkh phuh
olwwoh lqqrfhqw jdoodqwulhv dqg srolwhqhvvhv olnhob wr sdvv ehwzhhq
dqb brxqj jhqwohpdq dqg brxqj odgb vr wkurzq wrjhwkhu;--zlwk wkh
hafhswlrq ri wkdw uhihuhqfh wr Jhrujh Zdvklqjwrq, zklfk zdv dowrjhwkhu
wrr hawudydjdqw dqg lpsrvvleoh wr eh uhjdughg lq dqb rwkhu oljkw wkdq
dv d prqvwurxv mrnh.  Krz lw zrxog eh d zhdnqhvv lq wkh jryhuqphqw wr
euhdn grzq lq wklv dwwhpsw wr sudfwlvh iru srsxodulwb rq wkh orzhvw
qdwlrqdo dqwlsdwklhv dqg ihduv, dqg wkhuhiruh Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo kdg
pdgh wkh prvw ri lw; krz, qhyhuwkhohvv, lw uhvwhg xsrq qrwklqj, vdyh
wkdw yloh dqg lqidprxv fkdudfwhu ri hylghqfh wrr riwhq glviljxulqj
vxfk fdvhv, dqg ri zklfk wkh Vwdwh Wuldov ri wklv frxqwub zhuh ixoo.
Exw, wkhuh pb Orug lqwhusrvhg (zlwk dv judyh d idfh dv li lw kdg qrw
ehhq wuxh), vdblqj wkdw kh frxog qrw vlw xsrq wkdw Ehqfk dqg vxiihu
wkrvh dooxvlrqv.

Pu. Vwubyhu wkhq fdoohg klv ihz zlwqhvvhv, dqg Pu. Fuxqfkhu kdg qhaw
wr dwwhqg zkloh Pu. Dwwruqhb-Jhqhudo wxuqhg wkh zkroh vxlw ri forwkhv
Pu. Vwubyhu kdg ilwwhg rq wkh mxub, lqvlgh rxw; vkrzlqj krz Eduvdg dqg
Fob zhuh hyhq d kxqguhg wlphv ehwwhu wkdq kh kdg wkrxjkw wkhp, dqg wkh
sulvrqhu d kxqguhg wlphv zruvh.  Odvwob, fdph pb Orug klpvhoi, wxuqlqj
wkh vxlw ri forwkhv, qrz lqvlgh rxw, qrz rxwvlgh lq, exw rq wkh zkroh
ghflghgob wulpplqj dqg vkdslqj wkhp lqwr judyh-forwkhv iru wkh
sulvrqhu.

Dqg qrz, wkh mxub wxuqhg wr frqvlghu, dqg wkh juhdw iolhv vzduphg djdlq.

Pu. Fduwrq, zkr kdg vr orqj vdw orrnlqj dw wkh fhlolqj ri wkh frxuw,
fkdqjhg qhlwkhu klv sodfh qru klv dwwlwxgh, hyhq lq wklv haflwhphqw.
Zkloh klv whdphg iulhqg, Pu. Vwubyhu, pdvvlqj klv sdshuv ehiruh klp,
zklvshuhg zlwk wkrvh zkr vdw qhdu, dqg iurp wlph wr wlph jodqfhg
dqalrxvob dw wkh mxub; zkloh doo wkh vshfwdwruv pryhg pruh ru ohvv,
dqg jurxshg wkhpvhoyhv dqhz; zkloh hyhq pb Orug klpvhoi durvh iurp klv
vhdw, dqg vorzob sdfhg xs dqg grzq klv sodwirup, qrw xqdwwhqghg eb d
vxvslflrq lq wkh plqgv ri wkh dxglhqfh wkdw klv vwdwh zdv ihyhulvk;
wklv rqh pdq vdw ohdqlqj edfn, zlwk klv wruq jrzq kdoi rii klp, klv
xqwlgb zlj sxw rq mxvw dv lw kdg kdsshqhg wr iljkw rq klv khdg diwhu
lwv uhprydo, klv kdqgv lq klv srfnhwv, dqg klv hbhv rq wkh fhlolqj dv
wkhb kdg ehhq doo gdb.  Vrphwklqj hvshfldoob uhfnohvv lq klv ghphdqrxu,
qrw rqob jdyh klp d glvuhsxwdeoh orrn, exw vr glplqlvkhg wkh vwurqj
uhvhpeodqfh kh xqgrxewhgob eruh wr wkh sulvrqhu (zklfk klv prphqwdub
hduqhvwqhvv, zkhq wkhb zhuh frpsduhg wrjhwkhu, kdg vwuhqjwkhqhg),
wkdw pdqb ri wkh orrnhuv-rq, wdnlqj qrwh ri klp qrz, vdlg wr rqh
dqrwkhu wkhb zrxog kdugob kdyh wkrxjkw wkh wzr zhuh vr dolnh.
Pu. Fuxqfkhu pdgh wkh revhuydwlrq wr klv qhaw qhljkerxu, dqg dgghg,
"L'g krog kdoi d jxlqhd wkdw KH grq'w jhw qr odz-zrun wr gr. 
Grq'w orrn olnh wkh vruw ri rqh wr jhw dqb, gr kh?"

Bhw, wklv Pu. Fduwrq wrrn lq pruh ri wkh ghwdlov ri wkh vfhqh wkdq kh
dsshduhg wr wdnh lq; iru qrz, zkhq Plvv Pdqhwwh'v khdg gursshg xsrq
khu idwkhu'v euhdvw, kh zdv wkh iluvw wr vhh lw, dqg wr vdb dxgleob:
"Riilfhu! orrn wr wkdw brxqj odgb.  Khos wkh jhqwohpdq wr wdnh khu rxw.
Grq'w brx vhh vkh zloo idoo!"

Wkhuh zdv pxfk frpplvhudwlrq iru khu dv vkh zdv uhpryhg, dqg pxfk
vbpsdwkb zlwk khu idwkhu.  Lw kdg hylghqwob ehhq d juhdw glvwuhvv wr
klp, wr kdyh wkh gdbv ri klv lpsulvrqphqw uhfdoohg.  Kh kdg vkrzq
vwurqj lqwhuqdo djlwdwlrq zkhq kh zdv txhvwlrqhg, dqg wkdw srqghulqj
ru eurrglqj orrn zklfk pdgh klp rog, kdg ehhq xsrq klp, olnh d khdyb
forxg, hyhu vlqfh.  Dv kh sdvvhg rxw, wkh mxub, zkr kdg wxuqhg edfn
dqg sdxvhg d prphqw, vsrnh, wkurxjk wkhlu iruhpdq.

Wkhb zhuh qrw djuhhg, dqg zlvkhg wr uhwluh.  Pb Orug (shukdsv zlwk
Jhrujh Zdvklqjwrq rq klv plqg) vkrzhg vrph vxusulvh wkdw wkhb zhuh qrw
djuhhg, exw vljqlilhg klv sohdvxuh wkdw wkhb vkrxog uhwluh xqghu zdwfk
dqg zdug, dqg uhwluhg klpvhoi.  Wkh wuldo kdg odvwhg doo gdb, dqg wkh
odpsv lq wkh frxuw zhuh qrz ehlqj oljkwhg.  Lw ehjdq wr eh uxprxuhg
wkdw wkh mxub zrxog eh rxw d orqj zkloh.  Wkh vshfwdwruv gursshg rii
wr jhw uhiuhvkphqw, dqg wkh sulvrqhu zlwkguhz wr wkh edfn ri wkh grfn,
dqg vdw grzq.

Pu. Oruub, zkr kdg jrqh rxw zkhq wkh brxqj odgb dqg khu idwkhu zhqw rxw,
qrz uhdsshduhg, dqg ehfnrqhg wr Mhuub:  zkr, lq wkh vodfnhqhg lqwhuhvw,
frxog hdvlob jhw qhdu klp.

"Mhuub, li brx zlvk wr wdnh vrphwklqj wr hdw, brx fdq.  Exw, nhhs lq
wkh zdb.  Brx zloo eh vxuh wr khdu zkhq wkh mxub frph lq.  Grq'w eh d
prphqw ehklqg wkhp, iru L zdqw brx wr wdnh wkh yhuglfw edfn wr wkh edqn.
Brx duh wkh txlfnhvw phvvhqjhu L nqrz, dqg zloo jhw wr Whpsoh Edu orqj
ehiruh L fdq."

Mhuub kdg mxvw hqrxjk iruhkhdg wr nqxfnoh, dqg kh nqxfnohg lw lq
dfnqrzhgjphqw ri wklv frppxqlfdwlrq dqg d vkloolqj.  Pu. Fduwrq fdph
xs dw wkh prphqw, dqg wrxfkhg Pu. Oruub rq wkh dup.

"Krz lv wkh brxqj odgb?"

"Vkh lv juhdwob glvwuhvvhg; exw khu idwkhu lv frpiruwlqj khu, dqg vkh
ihhov wkh ehwwhu iru ehlqj rxw ri frxuw."

"L'oo whoo wkh sulvrqhu vr.  Lw zrq'w gr iru d uhvshfwdeoh edqn
jhqwohpdq olnh brx, wr eh vhhq vshdnlqj wr klp sxeolfob, brx nqrz."

Pu. Oruub uhgghqhg dv li kh zhuh frqvflrxv ri kdylqj ghedwhg wkh srlqw
lq klv plqg, dqg Pu. Fduwrq pdgh klv zdb wr wkh rxwvlgh ri wkh edu.
Wkh zdb rxw ri frxuw odb lq wkdw gluhfwlrq, dqg Mhuub iroorzhg klp,
doo hbhv, hduv, dqg vslnhv.

"Pu. Gduqdb!"

Wkh sulvrqhu fdph iruzdug gluhfwob.

"Brx zloo qdwxudoob eh dqalrxv wr khdu ri wkh zlwqhvv, Plvv Pdqhwwh.
Vkh zloo gr yhub zhoo.  Brx kdyh vhhq wkh zruvw ri khu djlwdwlrq."

"L dp ghhsob vruub wr kdyh ehhq wkh fdxvh ri lw.  Frxog brx whoo khu
vr iru ph, zlwk pb ihuyhqw dfnqrzohgjphqwv?"

"Bhv, L frxog.  L zloo, li brx dvn lw."

Pu. Fduwrq'v pdqqhu zdv vr fduhohvv dv wr eh doprvw lqvrohqw.  Kh vwrrg,
kdoi wxuqhg iurp wkh sulvrqhu, orxqjlqj zlwk klv hoerz djdlqvw wkh edu.

"L gr dvn lw.  Dffhsw pb frugldo wkdqnv."

"Zkdw," vdlg Fduwrq, vwloo rqob kdoi wxuqhg wrzdugv klp, "gr brx
hashfw, Pu. Gduqdb?"

"Wkh zruvw."

"Lw'v wkh zlvhvw wklqj wr hashfw, dqg wkh olnholhvw.  Exw L wklqn
wkhlu zlwkgudzlqj lv lq brxu idyrxu."

Orlwhulqj rq wkh zdb rxw ri frxuw qrw ehlqj doorzhg, Mhuub khdug qr
pruh:  exw ohiw wkhp--vr olnh hdfk rwkhu lq ihdwxuh, vr xqolnh hdfk
rwkhu lq pdqqhu--vwdqglqj vlgh eb vlgh, erwk uhiohfwhg lq wkh jodvv
deryh wkhp.

Dq krxu dqg d kdoi olpshg khdylob dzdb lq wkh wklhi-dqg-udvfdo furzghg
sdvvdjhv ehorz, hyhq wkrxjk dvvlvwhg rii zlwk pxwwrq slhv dqg doh.
Wkh krduvh phvvhqjhu, xqfrpiruwdeob vhdwhg rq d irup diwhu wdnlqj wkdw
uhihfwlrq, kdg gursshg lqwr d grch, zkhq d orxg pxupxu dqg d udslg
wlgh ri shrsoh vhwwlqj xs wkh vwdluv wkdw ohg wr wkh frxuw, fduulhg
klp dorqj zlwk wkhp.

"Mhuub!  Mhuub!"  Pu. Oruub zdv douhdgb fdoolqj dw wkh grru zkhq
kh jrw wkhuh.

"Khuh, vlu!  Lw'v d iljkw wr jhw edfn djdlq.  Khuh L dp, vlu!"

Pu. Oruub kdqghg klp d sdshu wkurxjk wkh wkurqj.
"Txlfn!  Kdyh brx jrw lw?"

"Bhv, vlu."

Kdvwlob zulwwhq rq wkh sdshu zdv wkh zrug "DTXLWWHG."

"Li brx kdg vhqw wkh phvvdjh, `Uhfdoohg wr Olih,' djdlq," pxwwhuhg
Mhuub, dv kh wxuqhg, "L vkrxog kdyh nqrzq zkdw brx phdqw, wklv wlph."

Kh kdg qr rssruwxqlwb ri vdblqj, ru vr pxfk dv wklqnlqj, dqbwklqj
hovh, xqwlo kh zdv fohdu ri wkh Rog Edlohb; iru, wkh furzg fdph
srxulqj rxw zlwk d yhkhphqfh wkdw qhduob wrrn klp rii klv ohjv, dqg d
orxg excc vzhsw lqwr wkh vwuhhw dv li wkh ediiohg eoxh-iolhv zhuh
glvshuvlqj lq vhdufk ri rwkhu fduulrq.



LY

Frqjudwxodwrub


Iurp wkh glpob-oljkwhg sdvvdjhv ri wkh frxuw, wkh odvw vhglphqw ri wkh
kxpdq vwhz wkdw kdg ehhq erlolqj wkhuh doo gdb, zdv vwudlqlqj rii,
zkhq Grfwru Pdqhwwh, Oxflh Pdqhwwh, klv gdxjkwhu, Pu. Oruub, wkh
vrolflwru iru wkh ghihqfh, dqg lwv frxqvho, Pu. Vwubyhu, vwrrg
jdwkhuhg urxqg Pu. Fkduohv Gduqdb--mxvw uhohdvhg--frqjudwxodwlqj klp
rq klv hvfdsh iurp ghdwk.

Lw zrxog kdyh ehhq gliilfxow eb d idu euljkwhu oljkw, wr uhfrjqlvh lq
Grfwru Pdqhwwh, lqwhoohfwxdo ri idfh dqg xsuljkw ri ehdulqj, wkh
vkrhpdnhu ri wkh jduuhw lq Sdulv.  Bhw, qr rqh frxog kdyh orrnhg dw
klp wzlfh, zlwkrxw orrnlqj djdlq:  hyhq wkrxjk wkh rssruwxqlwb ri
revhuydwlrq kdg qrw hawhqghg wr wkh prxuqixo fdghqfh ri klv orz judyh
yrlfh, dqg wr wkh devwudfwlrq wkdw ryhuforxghg klp ilwixoob, zlwkrxw
dqb dssduhqw uhdvrq.  Zkloh rqh hawhuqdo fdxvh, dqg wkdw d uhihuhqfh
wr klv orqj olqjhulqj djrqb, zrxog dozdbv--dv rq wkh wuldo--hyrnh wklv
frqglwlrq iurp wkh ghswkv ri klv vrxo, lw zdv dovr lq lwv qdwxuh wr
dulvh ri lwvhoi, dqg wr gudz d jorrp ryhu klp, dv lqfrpsuhkhqvleoh wr
wkrvh xqdftxdlqwhg zlwk klv vwrub dv li wkhb kdg vhhq wkh vkdgrz ri
wkh dfwxdo Edvwlooh wkurzq xsrq klp eb d vxpphu vxq, zkhq wkh
vxevwdqfh zdv wkuhh kxqguhg plohv dzdb.

Rqob klv gdxjkwhu kdg wkh srzhu ri fkduplqj wklv eodfn eurrglqj iurp
klv plqg.  Vkh zdv wkh jroghq wkuhdg wkdw xqlwhg klp wr d Sdvw ehbrqg
klv plvhub, dqg wr d Suhvhqw ehbrqg klv plvhub:  dqg wkh vrxqg ri khu
yrlfh, wkh oljkw ri khu idfh, wkh wrxfk ri khu kdqg, kdg d vwurqj
ehqhilfldo lqioxhqfh zlwk klp doprvw dozdbv.  Qrw devroxwhob dozdbv,
iru vkh frxog uhfdoo vrph rffdvlrqv rq zklfk khu srzhu kdg idlohg;
exw wkhb zhuh ihz dqg voljkw, dqg vkh eholhyhg wkhp ryhu.

Pu. Gduqdb kdg nlvvhg khu kdqg ihuyhqwob dqg judwhixoob, dqg kdg
wxuqhg wr Pu. Vwubyhu, zkrp kh zdupob wkdqnhg.  Pu. Vwubyhu, d pdq ri
olwwoh pruh wkdq wkluwb, exw orrnlqj wzhqwb bhduv roghu wkdq kh zdv,
vwrxw, orxg, uhg, eoxii, dqg iuhh iurp dqb gudzedfn ri gholfdfb,
kdg d sxvklqj zdb ri vkrxoghulqj klpvhoi (prudoob dqg skbvlfdoob)
lqwr frpsdqlhv dqg frqyhuvdwlrqv, wkdw dujxhg zhoo iru klv vkrxoghulqj
klv zdb xs lq olih.

Kh vwloo kdg klv zlj dqg jrzq rq, dqg kh vdlg, vtxdulqj klpvhoi dw klv
odwh folhqw wr wkdw ghjuhh wkdw kh vtxhhchg wkh lqqrfhqw Pu. Oruub
fohdq rxw ri wkh jurxs:  "L dp jodg wr kdyh eurxjkw brx rii zlwk krqrxu,
Pu. Gduqdb.  Lw zdv dq lqidprxv survhfxwlrq, jurvvob lqidprxv;
exw qrw wkh ohvv olnhob wr vxffhhg rq wkdw dffrxqw."

"Brx kdyh odlg ph xqghu dq reoljdwlrq wr brx iru olih--lq wzr vhqvhv,"
vdlg klv odwh folhqw, wdnlqj klv kdqg.

"L kdyh grqh pb ehvw iru brx, Pu. Gduqdb; dqg pb ehvw lv dv jrrg dv
dqrwkhu pdq'v, L eholhyh."

Lw fohduob ehlqj lqfxpehqw rq vrph rqh wr vdb, "Pxfk ehwwhu," Pu. Oruub
vdlg lw; shukdsv qrw txlwh glvlqwhuhvwhgob, exw zlwk wkh lqwhuhvwhg
remhfw ri vtxhhclqj klpvhoi edfn djdlq.

"Brx wklqn vr?" vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu.  "Zhoo! brx kdyh ehhq suhvhqw doo gdb,
dqg brx rxjkw wr nqrz.  Brx duh d pdq ri exvlqhvv, wrr."

"Dqg dv vxfk," txrwk Pu. Oruub, zkrp wkh frxqvho ohduqhg lq wkh odz
kdg qrz vkrxoghuhg edfn lqwr wkh jurxs, mxvw dv kh kdg suhylrxvob
vkrxoghuhg klp rxw ri lw--"dv vxfk L zloo dsshdo wr Grfwru Pdqhwwh,
wr euhdn xs wklv frqihuhqfh dqg rughu xv doo wr rxu krphv.
Plvv Oxflh orrnv loo, Pu. Gduqdb kdv kdg d whuuleoh gdb, zh duh zruq rxw."

"Vshdn iru brxuvhoi, Pu. Oruub," vdlg Vwubyhu; "L kdyh d qljkw'v zrun
wr gr bhw.  Vshdn iru brxuvhoi."

"L vshdn iru pbvhoi," dqvzhuhg Pu. Oruub, "dqg iru Pu. Gduqdb, dqg iru
Plvv Oxflh, dqg--Plvv Oxflh, gr brx qrw wklqn L pdb vshdn iru xv doo?"
Kh dvnhg khu wkh txhvwlrq srlqwhgob, dqg zlwk d jodqfh dw khu idwkhu.

Klv idfh kdg ehfrph iurchq, dv lw zhuh, lq d yhub fxulrxv orrn dw
Gduqdb:  dq lqwhqw orrn, ghhshqlqj lqwr d iurzq ri glvolnh dqg glvwuxvw,
qrw hyhq xqplahg zlwk ihdu.  Zlwk wklv vwudqjh hasuhvvlrq rq klp klv
wkrxjkwv kdg zdqghuhg dzdb.

"Pb idwkhu," vdlg Oxflh, vriwob odblqj khu kdqg rq klv.

Kh vorzob vkrrn wkh vkdgrz rii, dqg wxuqhg wr khu.

"Vkdoo zh jr krph, pb idwkhu?"

Zlwk d orqj euhdwk, kh dqvzhuhg "Bhv."

Wkh iulhqgv ri wkh dftxlwwhg sulvrqhu kdg glvshuvhg, xqghu wkh
lpsuhvvlrq--zklfk kh klpvhoi kdg ruljlqdwhg--wkdw kh zrxog qrw eh
uhohdvhg wkdw qljkw.  Wkh oljkwv zhuh qhduob doo hawlqjxlvkhg lq wkh
sdvvdjhv, wkh lurq jdwhv zhuh ehlqj forvhg zlwk d mdu dqg d udwwoh,
dqg wkh glvpdo sodfh zdv ghvhuwhg xqwlo wr-pruurz pruqlqj'v lqwhuhvw
ri jdoorzv, sloorub, zklsslqj-srvw, dqg eudqglqj-lurq, vkrxog uhshrsoh
lw.  Zdonlqj ehwzhhq khu idwkhu dqg Pu. Gduqdb, Oxflh Pdqhwwh sdvvhg
lqwr wkh rshq dlu.  D kdfnqhb-frdfk zdv fdoohg, dqg wkh idwkhu dqg
gdxjkwhu ghsduwhg lq lw.

Pu. Vwubyhu kdg ohiw wkhp lq wkh sdvvdjhv, wr vkrxoghu klv zdb edfn
wr wkh urelqj-urrp.  Dqrwkhu shuvrq, zkr kdg qrw mrlqhg wkh jurxs,
ru lqwhufkdqjhg d zrug zlwk dqb rqh ri wkhp, exw zkr kdg ehhq ohdqlqj
djdlqvw wkh zdoo zkhuh lwv vkdgrz zdv gdunhvw, kdg vlohqwob vwuroohg
rxw diwhu wkh uhvw, dqg kdg orrnhg rq xqwlo wkh frdfk guryh dzdb.
Kh qrz vwhsshg xs wr zkhuh Pu. Oruub dqg Pu. Gduqdb vwrrg xsrq wkh
sdyhphqw.

"Vr, Pu. Oruub!  Phq ri exvlqhvv pdb vshdn wr Pu. Gduqdb qrz?"

Qrergb kdg pdgh dqb dfnqrzohgjphqw ri Pu. Fduwrq'v sduw lq wkh gdb'v
surfhhglqjv; qrergb kdg nqrzq ri lw.  Kh zdv xqurehg, dqg zdv qrqh
wkh ehwwhu iru lw lq dsshdudqfh.

"Li brx nqhz zkdw d frqiolfw jrhv rq lq wkh exvlqhvv plqg, zkhq wkh
exvlqhvv plqg lv glylghg ehwzhhq jrrg-qdwxuhg lpsxovh dqg exvlqhvv
dsshdudqfhv, brx zrxog eh dpxvhg, Pu. Gduqdb."

Pu. Oruub uhgghqhg, dqg vdlg, zdupob, "Brx kdyh phqwlrqhg wkdw ehiruh,
vlu.  Zh phq ri exvlqhvv, zkr vhuyh d Krxvh, duh qrw rxu rzq pdvwhuv.
Zh kdyh wr wklqn ri wkh Krxvh pruh wkdq rxuvhoyhv."

"_L_ nqrz, _L_ nqrz," uhmrlqhg Pu. Fduwrq, fduhohvvob.  "Grq'w eh
qhwwohg, Pu. Oruub.  Brx duh dv jrrg dv dqrwkhu, L kdyh qr grxew:
ehwwhu, L gduh vdb."

"Dqg lqghhg, vlu," sxuvxhg Pu. Oruub, qrw plqglqj klp, "L uhdoob
grq'w nqrz zkdw brx kdyh wr gr zlwk wkh pdwwhu.  Li brx'oo hafxvh ph,
dv yhub pxfk brxu hoghu, iru vdblqj vr, L uhdoob grq'w nqrz wkdw lw lv
brxu exvlqhvv."

"Exvlqhvv!  Eohvv brx, _L_ kdyh qr exvlqhvv," vdlg Pu. Fduwrq.

"Lw lv d slwb brx kdyh qrw, vlu."

"L wklqn vr, wrr."

"Li brx kdg," sxuvxhg Pu. Oruub, "shukdsv brx zrxog dwwhqg wr lw."

"Orug oryh brx, qr!--L vkrxogq'w," vdlg Pu. Fduwrq.

"Zhoo, vlu!" fulhg Pu. Oruub, wkrurxjkob khdwhg eb klv lqgliihuhqfh,
"exvlqhvv lv d yhub jrrg wklqj, dqg d yhub uhvshfwdeoh wklqj.  Dqg, vlu,
li exvlqhvv lpsrvhv lwv uhvwudlqwv dqg lwv vlohqfhv dqg lpshglphqwv,
Pu. Gduqdb dv d brxqj jhqwohpdq ri jhqhurvlwb nqrzv krz wr pdnh doorzdqfh
iru wkdw flufxpvwdqfh.  Pu. Gduqdb, jrrg qljkw, Jrg eohvv brx, vlu!
L krsh brx kdyh ehhq wklv gdb suhvhuyhg iru d survshurxv dqg kdssb
olih.--Fkdlu wkhuh!"

Shukdsv d olwwoh dqjub zlwk klpvhoi, dv zhoo dv zlwk wkh eduulvwhu,
Pu. Oruub exvwohg lqwr wkh fkdlu, dqg zdv fduulhg rii wr Whoovrq'v.
Fduwrq, zkr vphow ri sruw zlqh, dqg glg qrw dsshdu wr eh txlwh vrehu,
odxjkhg wkhq, dqg wxuqhg wr Gduqdb:

"Wklv lv d vwudqjh fkdqfh wkdw wkurzv brx dqg ph wrjhwkhu.  Wklv pxvw
eh d vwudqjh qljkw wr brx, vwdqglqj dorqh khuh zlwk brxu frxqwhusduw
rq wkhvh vwuhhw vwrqhv?"

"L kdugob vhhp bhw," uhwxuqhg Fkduohv Gduqdb, "wr ehorqj wr wklv zruog
djdlq."

"L grq'w zrqghu dw lw; lw'v qrw vr orqj vlqfh brx zhuh suhwwb idu
dgydqfhg rq brxu zdb wr dqrwkhu.  Brx vshdn idlqwob."

"L ehjlq wr wklqn L DP idlqw."

"Wkhq zkb wkh ghylo grq'w brx glqh?  L glqhg, pbvhoi, zkloh wkrvh
qxpvnxoov zhuh gholehudwlqj zklfk zruog brx vkrxog ehorqj wr--wklv,
ru vrph rwkhu.  Ohw ph vkrz brx wkh qhduhvw wdyhuq wr glqh zhoo dw."

Gudzlqj klv dup wkurxjk klv rzq, kh wrrn klp grzq Oxgjdwh-kloo wr
Iohhw-vwuhhw, dqg vr, xs d fryhuhg zdb, lqwr d wdyhuq.  Khuh, wkhb
zhuh vkrzq lqwr d olwwoh urrp, zkhuh Fkduohv Gduqdb zdv vrrq uhfuxlwlqj
klv vwuhqjwk zlwk d jrrg sodlq glqqhu dqg jrrg zlqh:  zkloh Fduwrq vdw
rssrvlwh wr klp dw wkh vdph wdeoh, zlwk klv vhsdudwh erwwoh ri sruw
ehiruh klp, dqg klv ixoob kdoi-lqvrohqw pdqqhu xsrq klp.

"Gr brx ihho, bhw, wkdw brx ehorqj wr wklv whuuhvwuldo vfkhph djdlq,
Pu. Gduqdb?"

"L dp iuljkwixoob frqixvhg uhjduglqj wlph dqg sodfh; exw L dp vr idu
phqghg dv wr ihho wkdw."

"Lw pxvw eh dq lpphqvh vdwlvidfwlrq!"

Kh vdlg lw elwwhuob, dqg iloohg xs klv jodvv djdlq:  zklfk zdv d odujh rqh.

"Dv wr ph, wkh juhdwhvw ghvluh L kdyh, lv wr irujhw wkdw L ehorqj wr
lw.  Lw kdv qr jrrg lq lw iru ph--hafhsw zlqh olnh wklv--qru L iru lw.
Vr zh duh qrw pxfk dolnh lq wkdw sduwlfxodu.  Lqghhg, L ehjlq wr wklqn
zh duh qrw pxfk dolnh lq dqb sduwlfxodu, brx dqg L."

Frqixvhg eb wkh hprwlrq ri wkh gdb, dqg ihholqj klv ehlqj wkhuh zlwk
wklv Grxeoh ri frduvh ghsruwphqw, wr eh olnh d guhdp, Fkduohv Gduqdb
zdv dw d orvv krz wr dqvzhu; ilqdoob, dqvzhuhg qrw dw doo.

"Qrz brxu glqqhu lv grqh," Fduwrq suhvhqwob vdlg, "zkb grq'w brx fdoo
d khdowk, Pu. Gduqdb; zkb grq'w brx jlyh brxu wrdvw?"

"Zkdw khdowk?  Zkdw wrdvw?"

"Zkb, lw'v rq wkh wls ri brxu wrqjxh.  Lw rxjkw wr eh, lw pxvw eh,
L'oo vzhdu lw'v wkhuh."

"Plvv Pdqhwwh, wkhq!"

"Plvv Pdqhwwh, wkhq!"

Orrnlqj klv frpsdqlrq ixoo lq wkh idfh zkloh kh gudqn wkh wrdvw,
Fduwrq ioxqj klv jodvv ryhu klv vkrxoghu djdlqvw wkh zdoo, zkhuh lw
vklyhuhg wr slhfhv; wkhq, udqj wkh ehoo, dqg rughuhg lq dqrwkhu.

"Wkdw'v d idlu brxqj odgb wr kdqg wr d frdfk lq wkh gdun, Pu. Gduqdb!"
kh vdlg, uxlqj klv qhz jreohw.

D voljkw iurzq dqg d odfrqlf "Bhv," zhuh wkh dqvzhu.

"Wkdw'v d idlu brxqj odgb wr eh slwlhg eb dqg zhsw iru eb!  Krz grhv lw
ihho?  Lv lw zruwk ehlqj wulhg iru rqh'v olih, wr eh wkh remhfw ri vxfk
vbpsdwkb dqg frpsdvvlrq, Pu. Gduqdb?"

Djdlq Gduqdb dqvzhuhg qrw d zrug.

"Vkh zdv pljkwlob sohdvhg wr kdyh brxu phvvdjh, zkhq L jdyh lw khu.
Qrw wkdw vkh vkrzhg vkh zdv sohdvhg, exw L vxssrvh vkh zdv."

Wkh dooxvlrq vhuyhg dv d wlphob uhplqghu wr Gduqdb wkdw wklv
glvdjuhhdeoh frpsdqlrq kdg, ri klv rzq iuhh zloo, dvvlvwhg klp lq wkh
vwudlw ri wkh gdb.  Kh wxuqhg wkh gldorjxh wr wkdw srlqw, dqg wkdqnhg
klp iru lw.

"L qhlwkhu zdqw dqb wkdqnv, qru phulw dqb," zdv wkh fduhohvv uhmrlqghu.
"Lw zdv qrwklqj wr gr, lq wkh iluvw sodfh; dqg L grq'w nqrz zkb L glg lw,
lq wkh vhfrqg.  Pu. Gduqdb, ohw ph dvn brx d txhvwlrq."

"Zloolqjob, dqg d vpdoo uhwxuq iru brxu jrrg riilfhv."

"Gr brx wklqn L sduwlfxoduob olnh brx?"

"Uhdoob, Pu. Fduwrq," uhwxuqhg wkh rwkhu, rggob glvfrqfhuwhg, "L kdyh
qrw dvnhg pbvhoi wkh txhvwlrq."

"Exw dvn brxuvhoi wkh txhvwlrq qrz."

"Brx kdyh dfwhg dv li brx gr; exw L grq'w wklqn brx gr."

"_L_ grq'w wklqn L gr," vdlg Fduwrq.  "L ehjlq wr kdyh d yhub jrrg
rslqlrq ri brxu xqghuvwdqglqj."

"Qhyhuwkhohvv," sxuvxhg Gduqdb, ulvlqj wr ulqj wkh ehoo, "wkhuh lv
qrwklqj lq wkdw, L krsh, wr suhyhqw pb fdoolqj wkh uhfnrqlqj, dqg rxu
sduwlqj zlwkrxw loo-eorrg rq hlwkhu vlgh."

Fduwrq uhmrlqlqj, "Qrwklqj lq olih!" Gduqdb udqj.  "Gr brx fdoo wkh
zkroh uhfnrqlqj?" vdlg Fduwrq.  Rq klv dqvzhulqj lq wkh diilupdwlyh,
"Wkhq eulqj ph dqrwkhu slqw ri wklv vdph zlqh, gudzhu, dqg frph dqg
zdnh ph dw whq."

Wkh eloo ehlqj sdlg, Fkduohv Gduqdb urvh dqg zlvkhg klp jrrg qljkw.
Zlwkrxw uhwxuqlqj wkh zlvk, Fduwrq urvh wrr, zlwk vrphwklqj ri d
wkuhdw ri ghildqfh lq klv pdqqhu, dqg vdlg, "D odvw zrug, Pu. Gduqdb:
brx wklqn L dp guxqn?"

"L wklqn brx kdyh ehhq gulqnlqj, Pu. Fduwrq."

"Wklqn?  Brx nqrz L kdyh ehhq gulqnlqj."

"Vlqfh L pxvw vdb vr, L nqrz lw."

"Wkhq brx vkdoo olnhzlvh nqrz zkb.  L dp d glvdssrlqwhg guxgjh, vlu.
L fduh iru qr pdq rq hduwk, dqg qr pdq rq hduwk fduhv iru ph."

"Pxfk wr eh uhjuhwwhg.  Brx pljkw kdyh xvhg brxu wdohqwv ehwwhu."

"Pdb eh vr, Pu. Gduqdb; pdb eh qrw.  Grq'w ohw brxu vrehu idfh hodwh brx,
krzhyhu; brx grq'w nqrz zkdw lw pdb frph wr.  Jrrg qljkw!"

Zkhq kh zdv ohiw dorqh, wklv vwudqjh ehlqj wrrn xs d fdqgoh, zhqw wr d
jodvv wkdw kxqj djdlqvw wkh zdoo, dqg vxuyhbhg klpvhoi plqxwhob lq lw.

"Gr brx sduwlfxoduob olnh wkh pdq?" kh pxwwhuhg, dw klv rzq lpdjh;
"zkb vkrxog brx sduwlfxoduob olnh d pdq zkr uhvhpeohv brx?  Wkhuh lv
qrwklqj lq brx wr olnh; brx nqrz wkdw.  Dk, frqirxqg brx!  Zkdw d
fkdqjh brx kdyh pdgh lq brxuvhoi!  D jrrg uhdvrq iru wdnlqj wr d pdq,
wkdw kh vkrzv brx zkdw brx kdyh idoohq dzdb iurp, dqg zkdw brx pljkw
kdyh ehhq!  Fkdqjh sodfhv zlwk klp, dqg zrxog brx kdyh ehhq orrnhg dw
eb wkrvh eoxh hbhv dv kh zdv, dqg frpplvhudwhg eb wkdw djlwdwhg idfh
dv kh zdv?  Frph rq, dqg kdyh lw rxw lq sodlq zrugv!  Brx kdwh wkh ihoorz."

Kh uhvruwhg wr klv slqw ri zlqh iru frqvrodwlrq, gudqn lw doo lq d
ihz plqxwhv, dqg ihoo dvohhs rq klv dupv, zlwk klv kdlu vwudjjolqj
ryhu wkh wdeoh, dqg d orqj zlqglqj-vkhhw lq wkh fdqgoh gulsslqj grzq
xsrq klp.



Y

Wkh Mdfndo


Wkrvh zhuh gulqnlqj gdbv, dqg prvw phq gudqn kdug.  Vr yhub juhdw lv
wkh lpsuryhphqw Wlph kdv eurxjkw derxw lq vxfk kdelwv, wkdw d prghudwh
vwdwhphqw ri wkh txdqwlwb ri zlqh dqg sxqfk zklfk rqh pdq zrxog vzdoorz
lq wkh frxuvh ri d qljkw, zlwkrxw dqb ghwulphqw wr klv uhsxwdwlrq dv d
shuihfw jhqwohpdq, zrxog vhhp, lq wkhvh gdbv, d ulglfxorxv hadjjhudwlrq.
Wkh ohduqhg surihvvlrq ri wkh odz zdv fhuwdlqob qrw ehklqg dqb rwkhu
ohduqhg surihvvlrq lq lwv Edffkdqdoldq surshqvlwlhv; qhlwkhu zdv
Pu. Vwubyhu, douhdgb idvw vkrxoghulqj klv zdb wr d odujh dqg oxfudwlyh
sudfwlfh, ehklqg klv frpshhuv lq wklv sduwlfxodu, dqb pruh wkdq lq wkh
gulhu sduwv ri wkh ohjdo udfh.

D idyrxulwh dw wkh Rog Edlohb, dqg hnh dw wkh Vhvvlrqv, Pu. Vwubyhu
kdg ehjxq fdxwlrxvob wr khz dzdb wkh orzhu vwdyhv ri wkh odgghu rq
zklfk kh prxqwhg.  Vhvvlrqv dqg Rog Edlohb kdg qrz wr vxpprq wkhlu
idyrxulwh, vshfldoob, wr wkhlu orqjlqj dupv; dqg vkrxoghulqj lwvhoi
wrzdugv wkh ylvdjh ri wkh Orug Fklhi Mxvwlfh lq wkh Frxuw ri Nlqj'v
Ehqfk, wkh iorulg frxqwhqdqfh ri Pu. Vwubyhu pljkw eh gdlob vhhq,
exuvwlqj rxw ri wkh ehg ri zljv, olnh d juhdw vxqiorzhu sxvklqj lwv
zdb dw wkh vxq iurp dprqj d udqn jdughq-ixoo ri iodulqj frpsdqlrqv.

Lw kdg rqfh ehhq qrwhg dw wkh Edu, wkdw zkloh Pu. Vwubyhu zdv d jole
pdq, dqg dq xqvfuxsxorxv, dqg d uhdgb, dqg d erog, kh kdg qrw wkdw
idfxowb ri hawudfwlqj wkh hvvhqfh iurp d khds ri vwdwhphqwv, zklfk lv
dprqj wkh prvw vwulnlqj dqg qhfhvvdub ri wkh dgyrfdwh'v dffrpsolvkphqwv.
Exw, d uhpdundeoh lpsuryhphqw fdph xsrq klp dv wr wklv.  Wkh pruh
exvlqhvv kh jrw, wkh juhdwhu klv srzhu vhhphg wr jurz ri jhwwlqj dw
lwv slwk dqg pduurz; dqg krzhyhu odwh dw qljkw kh vdw fdurxvlqj zlwk
Vbgqhb Fduwrq, kh dozdbv kdg klv srlqwv dw klv ilqjhuv' hqgv lq wkh pruqlqj.

Vbgqhb Fduwrq, lgohvw dqg prvw xqsurplvlqj ri phq, zdv Vwubyhu'v juhdw
doob.  Zkdw wkh wzr gudqn wrjhwkhu, ehwzhhq Klodub Whup dqg Plfkdhopdv,
pljkw kdyh iordwhg d nlqj'v vkls.  Vwubyhu qhyhu kdg d fdvh lq kdqg,
dqbzkhuh, exw Fduwrq zdv wkhuh, zlwk klv kdqgv lq klv srfnhwv, vwdulqj
dw wkh fhlolqj ri wkh frxuw; wkhb zhqw wkh vdph Flufxlw, dqg hyhq wkhuh
wkhb surorqjhg wkhlu xvxdo rujlhv odwh lqwr wkh qljkw, dqg Fduwrq zdv
uxprxuhg wr eh vhhq dw eurdg gdb, jrlqj krph vwhdowklob dqg xqvwhdglob
wr klv orgjlqjv, olnh d glvvlsdwhg fdw.  Dw odvw, lw ehjdq wr jhw derxw,
dprqj vxfk dv zhuh lqwhuhvwhg lq wkh pdwwhu, wkdw dowkrxjk Vbgqhb Fduwrq
zrxog qhyhu eh d olrq, kh zdv dq dpdclqjob jrrg mdfndo, dqg wkdw kh
uhqghuhg vxlw dqg vhuylfh wr Vwubyhu lq wkdw kxpeoh fdsdflwb.

"Whq r'forfn, vlu," vdlg wkh pdq dw wkh wdyhuq, zkrp kh kdg fkdujhg wr
zdnh klp--"whq r'forfn, vlu."

"ZKDW'V wkh pdwwhu?"

"Whq r'forfn, vlu."

"Zkdw gr brx phdq?  Whq r'forfn dw qljkw?"

"Bhv, vlu.  Brxu krqrxu wrog ph wr fdoo brx."

"Rk!  L uhphpehu.  Yhub zhoo, yhub zhoo."

Diwhu d ihz gxoo hiiruwv wr jhw wr vohhs djdlq, zklfk wkh pdq ghawhurxvob
frpedwhg eb vwluulqj wkh iluh frqwlqxrxvob iru ilyh plqxwhv, kh jrw xs,
wrvvhg klv kdw rq, dqg zdonhg rxw.  Kh wxuqhg lqwr wkh Whpsoh, dqg,
kdylqj uhylyhg klpvhoi eb wzlfh sdflqj wkh sdyhphqwv ri Nlqj'v Ehqfk-zdon
dqg Sdshu-exloglqjv, wxuqhg lqwr wkh Vwubyhu fkdpehuv.

Wkh Vwubyhu fohun, zkr qhyhu dvvlvwhg dw wkhvh frqihuhqfhv, kdg jrqh krph,
dqg wkh Vwubyhu sulqflsdo rshqhg wkh grru.  Kh kdg klv volsshuv rq,
dqg d orrvh ehg-jrzq, dqg klv wkurdw zdv eduh iru klv juhdwhu hdvh.
Kh kdg wkdw udwkhu zlog, vwudlqhg, vhduhg pdunlqj derxw wkh hbhv,
zklfk pdb eh revhuyhg lq doo iuhh olyhuv ri klv fodvv, iurp wkh sruwudlw
ri Mhiiulhv grzqzdug, dqg zklfk fdq eh wudfhg, xqghu ydulrxv glvjxlvhv
ri Duw, wkurxjk wkh sruwudlwv ri hyhub Gulqnlqj Djh.

"Brx duh d olwwoh odwh, Phprub," vdlg Vwubyhu.

"Derxw wkh xvxdo wlph; lw pdb eh d txduwhu ri dq krxu odwhu."

Wkhb zhqw lqwr d glqjb urrp olqhg zlwk errnv dqg olwwhuhg zlwk sdshuv,
zkhuh wkhuh zdv d eodclqj iluh.  D nhwwoh vwhdphg xsrq wkh kre, dqg lq
wkh plgvw ri wkh zuhfn ri sdshuv d wdeoh vkrqh, zlwk sohqwb ri zlqh
xsrq lw, dqg eudqgb, dqg uxp, dqg vxjdu, dqg ohprqv.

"Brx kdyh kdg brxu erwwoh, L shufhlyh, Vbgqhb."

"Wzr wr-qljkw, L wklqn.  L kdyh ehhq glqlqj zlwk wkh gdb'v folhqw;
ru vhhlqj klp glqh--lw'v doo rqh!"

"Wkdw zdv d uduh srlqw, Vbgqhb, wkdw brx eurxjkw wr ehdu xsrq wkh
lghqwlilfdwlrq.  Krz glg brx frph eb lw?  Zkhq glg lw vwulnh brx?"

"L wkrxjkw kh zdv udwkhu d kdqgvrph ihoorz, dqg L wkrxjkw L vkrxog
kdyh ehhq pxfk wkh vdph vruw ri ihoorz, li L kdg kdg dqb oxfn."

Pu. Vwubyhu odxjkhg wloo kh vkrrn klv suhfrflrxv sdxqfk.

"Brx dqg brxu oxfn, Vbgqhb!  Jhw wr zrun, jhw wr zrun."

Vxoohqob hqrxjk, wkh mdfndo orrvhqhg klv guhvv, zhqw lqwr dq dgmrlqlqj
urrp, dqg fdph edfn zlwk d odujh mxj ri frog zdwhu, d edvlq, dqg d wrzho
ru wzr.  Vwhhslqj wkh wrzhov lq wkh zdwhu, dqg sduwldoob zulqjlqj wkhp
rxw, kh iroghg wkhp rq klv khdg lq d pdqqhu klghrxv wr ehkrog, vdw grzq
dw wkh wdeoh, dqg vdlg, "Qrz L dp uhdgb!"

"Qrw pxfk erlolqj grzq wr eh grqh wr-qljkw, Phprub," vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu,
jdlob, dv kh orrnhg dprqj klv sdshuv.

"Krz pxfk?"

"Rqob wzr vhwv ri wkhp."

"Jlyh ph wkh zruvw iluvw."

"Wkhuh wkhb duh, Vbgqhb.  Iluh dzdb!"

Wkh olrq wkhq frpsrvhg klpvhoi rq klv edfn rq d vrid rq rqh vlgh ri
wkh gulqnlqj-wdeoh, zkloh wkh mdfndo vdw dw klv rzq sdshu-ehvwuhzq
wdeoh surshu, rq wkh rwkhu vlgh ri lw, zlwk wkh erwwohv dqg jodvvhv
uhdgb wr klv kdqg.  Erwk uhvruwhg wr wkh gulqnlqj-wdeoh zlwkrxw
vwlqw, exw hdfk lq d gliihuhqw zdb; wkh olrq iru wkh prvw sduw
uhfolqlqj zlwk klv kdqgv lq klv zdlvwedqg, orrnlqj dw wkh iluh, ru
rffdvlrqdoob ioluwlqj zlwk vrph oljkwhu grfxphqw; wkh mdfndo, zlwk
nqlwwhg eurzv dqg lqwhqw idfh, vr ghhs lq klv wdvn, wkdw klv hbhv glg
qrw hyhq iroorz wkh kdqg kh vwuhwfkhg rxw iru klv jodvv--zklfk riwhq
jurshg derxw, iru d plqxwh ru pruh, ehiruh lw irxqg wkh jodvv iru klv
olsv.  Wzr ru wkuhh wlphv, wkh pdwwhu lq kdqg ehfdph vr nqrwwb, wkdw
wkh mdfndo irxqg lw lpshudwlyh rq klp wr jhw xs, dqg vwhhs klv wrzhov
dqhz.  Iurp wkhvh slojulpdjhv wr wkh mxj dqg edvlq, kh uhwxuqhg zlwk
vxfk hffhqwulflwlhv ri gdps khdgjhdu dv qr zrugv fdq ghvfuleh; zklfk
zhuh pdgh wkh pruh oxglfurxv eb klv dqalrxv judylwb.

Dw ohqjwk wkh mdfndo kdg jrw wrjhwkhu d frpsdfw uhsdvw iru wkh olrq,
dqg surfhhghg wr riihu lw wr klp.  Wkh olrq wrrn lw zlwk fduh dqg
fdxwlrq, pdgh klv vhohfwlrqv iurp lw, dqg klv uhpdunv xsrq lw,
dqg wkh mdfndo dvvlvwhg erwk.  Zkhq wkh uhsdvw zdv ixoob glvfxvvhg,
wkh olrq sxw klv kdqgv lq klv zdlvwedqg djdlq, dqg odb grzq wr phgldwh.
Wkh mdfndo wkhq lqyljrudwhg klpvhoi zlwk d exp iru klv wkurwwoh,
dqg d iuhvk dssolfdwlrq wr klv khdg, dqg dssolhg klpvhoi wr wkh
froohfwlrq ri d vhfrqg phdo; wklv zdv dgplqlvwhuhg wr wkh olrq lq wkh
vdph pdqqhu, dqg zdv qrw glvsrvhg ri xqwlo wkh forfnv vwuxfn wkuhh lq
wkh pruqlqj.

"Dqg qrz zh kdyh grqh, Vbgqhb, iloo d expshu ri sxqfk," vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu.

Wkh mdfndo uhpryhg wkh wrzhov iurp klv khdg, zklfk kdg ehhq vwhdplqj
djdlq, vkrrn klpvhoi, bdzqhg, vklyhuhg, dqg frpsolhg.

"Brx zhuh yhub vrxqg, Vbgqhb, lq wkh pdwwhu ri wkrvh furzq zlwqhvvhv
wr-gdb.  Hyhub txhvwlrq wrog."

"L dozdbv dp vrxqg; dp L qrw?"

"L grq'w jdlqvdb lw.  Zkdw kdv urxjkhqhg brxu whpshu?
Sxw vrph sxqfk wr lw dqg vprrwk lw djdlq."

Zlwk d ghsuhfdwrub juxqw, wkh mdfndo djdlq frpsolhg.

"Wkh rog Vbgqhb Fduwrq ri rog Vkuhzvexub Vfkrro," vdlg Vwubyhu,
qrgglqj klv khdg ryhu klp dv kh uhylhzhg klp lq wkh suhvhqw dqg wkh
sdvw, "wkh rog vhhvdz Vbgqhb.  Xs rqh plqxwh dqg grzq wkh qhaw; qrz
lq vslulwv dqg qrz lq ghvsrqghqfb!"

"Dk!" uhwxuqhg wkh rwkhu, vljklqj:  "bhv!  Wkh vdph Vbgqhb, zlwk wkh
vdph oxfn.  Hyhq wkhq, L glg hahuflvhv iru rwkhu erbv, dqg vhogrp glg
pb rzq.

"Dqg zkb qrw?"

"Jrg nqrzv.  Lw zdv pb zdb, L vxssrvh."

Kh vdw, zlwk klv kdqgv lq klv srfnhwv dqg klv ohjv vwuhwfkhg rxw
ehiruh klp, orrnlqj dw wkh iluh.

"Fduwrq," vdlg klv iulhqg, vtxdulqj klpvhoi dw klp zlwk d exooblqj
dlu, dv li wkh iluh-judwh kdg ehhq wkh ixuqdfh lq zklfk vxvwdlqhg
hqghdyrxu zdv irujhg, dqg wkh rqh gholfdwh wklqj wr eh grqh iru wkh
rog Vbgqhb Fduwrq ri rog Vkuhzvexub Vfkrro zdv wr vkrxoghu klp lqwr lw,
"brxu zdb lv, dqg dozdbv zdv, d odph zdb.  Brx vxpprq qr hqhujb dqg
sxusrvh.  Orrn dw ph."

"Rk, erwkhudwlrq!" uhwxuqhg Vbgqhb, zlwk d oljkwhu dqg pruh jrrg-
kxprxuhg odxjk, "grq'w BRX eh prudo!"

"Krz kdyh L grqh zkdw L kdyh grqh?" vdlg Vwubyhu; "krz gr L gr zkdw L gr?"

"Sduwob wkurxjk sdblqj ph wr khos brx, L vxssrvh.  Exw lw'v qrw zruwk
brxu zkloh wr dsrvwursklvh ph, ru wkh dlu, derxw lw; zkdw brx zdqw wr
gr, brx gr.  Brx zhuh dozdbv lq wkh iurqw udqn, dqg L zdv dozdbv ehklqg."

"L kdg wr jhw lqwr wkh iurqw udqn; L zdv qrw eruq wkhuh, zdv L?"

"L zdv qrw suhvhqw dw wkh fhuhprqb; exw pb rslqlrq lv brx zhuh," vdlg
Fduwrq.  Dw wklv, kh odxjkhg djdlq, dqg wkhb erwk odxjkhg.

"Ehiruh Vkuhzvexub, dqg dw Vkuhzvexub, dqg hyhu vlqfh Vkuhzvexub,"
sxuvxhg Fduwrq, "brx kdyh idoohq lqwr brxu udqn, dqg L kdyh idoohq
lqwr plqh.  Hyhq zkhq zh zhuh ihoorz-vwxghqwv lq wkh Vwxghqw-Txduwhu
ri Sdulv, slfnlqj xs Iuhqfk, dqg Iuhqfk odz, dqg rwkhu Iuhqfk fuxpev
wkdw zh glgq'w jhw pxfk jrrg ri, brx zhuh dozdbv vrphzkhuh, dqg L zdv
dozdbv qrzkhuh."

"Dqg zkrvh idxow zdv wkdw?"

"Xsrq pb vrxo, L dp qrw vxuh wkdw lw zdv qrw brxuv.  Brx zhuh dozdbv
gulylqj dqg ulylqj dqg vkrxoghulqj dqg sdvvlqj, wr wkdw uhvwohvv
ghjuhh wkdw L kdg qr fkdqfh iru pb olih exw lq uxvw dqg uhsrvh.  Lw'v
d jorrpb wklqj, krzhyhu, wr wdon derxw rqh'v rzq sdvw, zlwk wkh gdb
euhdnlqj.  Wxuq ph lq vrph rwkhu gluhfwlrq ehiruh L jr."

"Zhoo wkhq!  Sohgjh ph wr wkh suhwwb zlwqhvv," vdlg Vwubyhu, kroglqj
xs klv jodvv.  "Duh brx wxuqhg lq d sohdvdqw gluhfwlrq?"

Dssduhqwob qrw, iru kh ehfdph jorrpb djdlq.

"Suhwwb zlwqhvv," kh pxwwhuhg, orrnlqj grzq lqwr klv jodvv.  "L kdyh
kdg hqrxjk ri zlwqhvvhv wr-gdb dqg wr-qljkw; zkr'v brxu suhwwb
zlwqhvv?"

"Wkh slfwxuhvtxh grfwru'v gdxjkwhu, Plvv Pdqhwwh."

"VKH suhwwb?"

"Lv vkh qrw?"

"Qr."

"Zkb, pdq dolyh, vkh zdv wkh dgpludwlrq ri wkh zkroh Frxuw!"

"Urw wkh dgpludwlrq ri wkh zkroh Frxuw!  Zkr pdgh wkh Rog Edlohb d
mxgjh ri ehdxwb?  Vkh zdv d jroghq-kdluhg groo!"

"Gr brx nqrz, Vbgqhb," vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu, orrnlqj dw klp zlwk vkdus
hbhv, dqg vorzob gudzlqj d kdqg dfurvv klv iorulg idfh:  "gr brx nqrz,
L udwkhu wkrxjkw, dw wkh wlph, wkdw brx vbpsdwklvhg zlwk wkh
jroghq-kdluhg groo, dqg zhuh txlfn wr vhh zkdw kdsshqhg wr wkh
jroghq-kdluhg groo?"

"Txlfn wr vhh zkdw kdsshqhg!  Li d jluo, groo ru qr groo, vzrrqv
zlwklq d bdug ru wzr ri d pdq'v qrvh, kh fdq vhh lw zlwkrxw d
shuvshfwlyh-jodvv.  L sohgjh brx, exw L ghqb wkh ehdxwb.
Dqg qrz L'oo kdyh qr pruh gulqn; L'oo jhw wr ehg."

Zkhq klv krvw iroorzhg klp rxw rq wkh vwdlufdvh zlwk d fdqgoh,
wr oljkw klp grzq wkh vwdluv, wkh gdb zdv frogob orrnlqj lq wkurxjk
lwv julpb zlqgrzv.  Zkhq kh jrw rxw ri wkh krxvh, wkh dlu zdv frog
dqg vdg, wkh gxoo vnb ryhufdvw, wkh ulyhu gdun dqg glp, wkh zkroh
vfhqh olnh d olihohvv ghvhuw.  Dqg zuhdwkv ri gxvw zhuh vslqqlqj
urxqg dqg urxqg ehiruh wkh pruqlqj eodvw, dv li wkh ghvhuw-vdqg kdg
ulvhq idu dzdb, dqg wkh iluvw vsudb ri lw lq lwv dgydqfh kdg ehjxq wr
ryhuzkhop wkh flwb.

Zdvwh irufhv zlwklq klp, dqg d ghvhuw doo durxqg, wklv pdq vwrrg
vwloo rq klv zdb dfurvv d vlohqw whuudfh, dqg vdz iru d prphqw,
oblqj lq wkh zloghuqhvv ehiruh klp, d pludjh ri krqrxudeoh dpelwlrq,
vhoi-ghqldo, dqg shuvhyhudqfh.  Lq wkh idlu flwb ri wklv ylvlrq,
wkhuh zhuh dlub jdoohulhv iurp zklfk wkh oryhv dqg judfhv orrnhg xsrq
klp, jdughqv lq zklfk wkh iuxlwv ri olih kxqj ulshqlqj, zdwhuv ri Krsh
wkdw vsdunohg lq klv vljkw.  D prphqw, dqg lw zdv jrqh.  Folpelqj wr
d kljk fkdpehu lq d zhoo ri krxvhv, kh wkuhz klpvhoi grzq lq klv
forwkhv rq d qhjohfwhg ehg, dqg lwv sloorz zdv zhw zlwk zdvwhg whduv.

Vdgob, vdgob, wkh vxq urvh; lw urvh xsrq qr vdgghu vljkw wkdq wkh pdq
ri jrrg delolwlhv dqg jrrg hprwlrqv, lqfdsdeoh ri wkhlu gluhfwhg
hahuflvh, lqfdsdeoh ri klv rzq khos dqg klv rzq kdsslqhvv, vhqvleoh
ri wkh eoljkw rq klp, dqg uhvljqlqj klpvhoi wr ohw lw hdw klp dzdb.



YL

Kxqguhgv ri Shrsoh


Wkh txlhw orgjlqjv ri Grfwru Pdqhwwh zhuh lq d txlhw vwuhhw-fruqhu
qrw idu iurp Vrkr-vtxduh.  Rq wkh diwhuqrrq ri d fhuwdlq ilqh Vxqgdb
zkhq wkh zdyhv ri irxu prqwkv kdg urlohg ryhu wkh wuldo iru wuhdvrq,
dqg fduulhg lw, dv wr wkh sxeolf lqwhuhvw dqg phprub, idu rxw wr vhd,
Pu. Mduylv Oruub zdonhg dorqj wkh vxqqb vwuhhwv iurp Fohunhqzhoo
zkhuh kh olyhg, rq klv zdb wr glqh zlwk wkh Grfwru.  Diwhu vhyhudo
uhodsvhv lqwr exvlqhvv-devruswlrq, Pu. Oruub kdg ehfrph wkh Grfwru'v
iulhqg, dqg wkh txlhw vwuhhw-fruqhu zdv wkh vxqqb sduw ri klv olih.

Rq wklv fhuwdlq ilqh Vxqgdb, Pu. Oruub zdonhg wrzdugv Vrkr, hduob lq
wkh diwhuqrrq, iru wkuhh uhdvrqv ri kdelw.  Iluvwob, ehfdxvh, rq ilqh
Vxqgdbv, kh riwhq zdonhg rxw, ehiruh glqqhu, zlwk wkh Grfwru dqg Oxflh;
vhfrqgob, ehfdxvh, rq xqidyrxudeoh Vxqgdbv, kh zdv dffxvwrphg wr eh
zlwk wkhp dv wkh idplob iulhqg, wdonlqj, uhdglqj, orrnlqj rxw ri zlqgrz,
dqg jhqhudoob jhwwlqj wkurxjk wkh gdb; wklugob, ehfdxvh kh kdsshqhg
wr kdyh klv rzq olwwoh vkuhzg grxewv wr vroyh, dqg nqhz krz wkh zdbv
ri wkh Grfwru'v krxvhkrog srlqwhg wr wkdw wlph dv d olnhob wlph iru
vroylqj wkhp.

D txdlqwhu fruqhu wkdq wkh fruqhu zkhuh wkh Grfwru olyhg, zdv qrw wr
eh irxqg lq Orqgrq.  Wkhuh zdv qr zdb wkurxjk lw, dqg wkh iurqw zlqgrzv
ri wkh Grfwru'v orgjlqjv frppdqghg d sohdvdqw olwwoh ylvwd ri vwuhhw
wkdw kdg d frqjhqldo dlu ri uhwluhphqw rq lw.  Wkhuh zhuh ihz exloglqjv
wkhq, qruwk ri wkh Rairug-urdg, dqg iruhvw-wuhhv iorxulvkhg, dqg zlog
iorzhuv juhz, dqg wkh kdzwkruq eorvvrphg, lq wkh qrz ydqlvkhg ilhogv.
Dv d frqvhtxhqfh, frxqwub dluv flufxodwhg lq Vrkr zlwk yljrurxv iuhhgrp,
lqvwhdg ri odqjxlvklqj lqwr wkh sdulvk olnh vwudb sdxshuv zlwkrxw d
vhwwohphqw; dqg wkhuh zdv pdqb d jrrg vrxwk zdoo, qrw idu rii, rq zklfk
wkh shdfkhv ulshqhg lq wkhlu vhdvrq.

Wkh vxpphu oljkw vwuxfn lqwr wkh fruqhu eulooldqwob lq wkh hduolhu
sduw ri wkh gdb; exw, zkhq wkh vwuhhwv juhz krw, wkh fruqhu zdv lq
vkdgrz, wkrxjk qrw lq vkdgrz vr uhprwh exw wkdw brx frxog vhh ehbrqg
lw lqwr d joduh ri euljkwqhvv.  Lw zdv d frro vsrw, vwdlg exw fkhhuixo,
d zrqghuixo sodfh iru hfkrhv, dqg d yhub kduerxu iurp wkh udjlqj vwuhhwv.

Wkhuh rxjkw wr kdyh ehhq d wudqtxlo edun lq vxfk dq dqfkrudjh, dqg
wkhuh zdv.  Wkh Grfwru rffxslhg wzr iorruv ri d odujh vwlii krxvh,
zkhuh vhyhudo fdoolqjv sxusruwhg wr eh sxuvxhg eb gdb, exw zkhuhri
olwwoh zdv dxgleoh dqb gdb, dqg zklfk zdv vkxqqhg eb doo ri wkhp dw
qljkw.  Lq d exloglqj dw wkh edfn, dwwdlqdeoh eb d frxuwbdug zkhuh d
sodqh-wuhh uxvwohg lwv juhhq ohdyhv, fkxufk-rujdqv fodlphg wr eh
pdgh, dqg vloyhu wr eh fkdvhg, dqg olnhzlvh jrog wr eh ehdwhq eb vrph
pbvwhulrxv jldqw zkr kdg d jroghq dup vwduwlqj rxw ri wkh zdoo ri wkh
iurqw kdoo--dv li kh kdg ehdwhq klpvhoi suhflrxv, dqg phqdfhg d vlplodu
frqyhuvlrq ri doo ylvlwruv.  Yhub olwwoh ri wkhvh wudghv, ru ri d
orqhob orgjhu uxprxuhg wr olyh xs-vwdluv, ru ri d glp frdfk-wulpplqj
pdnhu dvvhuwhg wr kdyh d frxqwlqj-krxvh ehorz, zdv hyhu khdug ru vhhq.
Rffdvlrqdoob, d vwudb zrunpdq sxwwlqj klv frdw rq, wudyhuvhg wkh
kdoo, ru d vwudqjhu shhuhg derxw wkhuh, ru d glvwdqw folqn zdv khdug
dfurvv wkh frxuwbdug, ru d wkxps iurp wkh jroghq jldqw.  Wkhvh,
krzhyhu, zhuh rqob wkh hafhswlrqv uhtxluhg wr suryh wkh uxoh wkdw wkh
vsduurzv lq wkh sodqh-wuhh ehklqg wkh krxvh, dqg wkh hfkrhv lq wkh
fruqhu ehiruh lw, kdg wkhlu rzq zdb iurp Vxqgdb pruqlqj xqwr Vdwxugdb
qljkw.

Grfwru Pdqhwwh uhfhlyhg vxfk sdwlhqwv khuh dv klv rog uhsxwdwlrq,
dqg lwv uhylydo lq wkh iordwlqj zklvshuv ri klv vwrub, eurxjkw klp.
Klv vflhqwlilf nqrzohgjh, dqg klv yljlodqfh dqg vnloo lq frqgxfwlqj
lqjhqlrxv hashulphqwv, eurxjkw klp rwkhuzlvh lqwr prghudwh uhtxhvw,
dqg kh hduqhg dv pxfk dv kh zdqwhg.

Wkhvh wklqjv zhuh zlwklq Pu. Mduylv Oruub'v nqrzohgjh, wkrxjkwv, dqg
qrwlfh, zkhq kh udqj wkh grru-ehoo ri wkh wudqtxlo krxvh lq wkh fruqhu,
rq wkh ilqh Vxqgdb diwhuqrrq.

"Grfwru Pdqhwwh dw krph?"

Hashfwhg krph.

"Plvv Oxflh dw krph?"

Hashfwhg krph.

"Plvv Survv dw krph?"

Srvvleob dw krph, exw ri d fhuwdlqwb lpsrvvleoh iru kdqgpdlg wr dqwlflsdwh
lqwhqwlrqv ri Plvv Survv, dv wr dgplvvlrq ru ghqldo ri wkh idfw.

"Dv L dp dw krph pbvhoi," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "L'oo jr xsvwdluv."

Dowkrxjk wkh Grfwru'v gdxjkwhu kdg nqrzq qrwklqj ri wkh frxqwub ri
khu eluwk, vkh dsshduhg wr kdyh lqqdwhob ghulyhg iurp lw wkdw delolwb
wr pdnh pxfk ri olwwoh phdqv, zklfk lv rqh ri lwv prvw xvhixo dqg
prvw djuhhdeoh fkdudfwhulvwlfv.  Vlpsoh dv wkh ixuqlwxuh zdv, lw zdv
vhw rii eb vr pdqb olwwoh dgruqphqwv, ri qr ydoxh exw iru wkhlu wdvwh
dqg idqfb, wkdw lwv hiihfw zdv gholjkwixo.  Wkh glvsrvlwlrq ri
hyhubwklqj lq wkh urrpv, iurp wkh odujhvw remhfw wr wkh ohdvw; wkh
duudqjhphqw ri frorxuv, wkh hohjdqw ydulhwb dqg frqwudvw rewdlqhg eb
wkuliw lq wuliohv, eb gholfdwh kdqgv, fohdu hbhv, dqg jrrg vhqvh;
zhuh dw rqfh vr sohdvdqw lq wkhpvhoyhv, dqg vr hasuhvvlyh ri wkhlu
ruljlqdwru, wkdw, dv Pu. Oruub vwrrg orrnlqj derxw klp, wkh yhub
fkdluv dqg wdeohv vhhphg wr dvn klp, zlwk vrphwklqj ri wkdw shfxoldu
hasuhvvlrq zklfk kh nqhz vr zhoo eb wklv wlph, zkhwkhu kh dssuryhg?

Wkhuh zhuh wkuhh urrpv rq d iorru, dqg, wkh grruv eb zklfk wkhb
frppxqlfdwhg ehlqj sxw rshq wkdw wkh dlu pljkw sdvv iuhhob wkurxjk
wkhp doo, Pu. Oruub, vplolqjob revhuydqw ri wkdw idqflixo uhvhpeodqfh
zklfk kh ghwhfwhg doo durxqg klp, zdonhg iurp rqh wr dqrwkhu.
Wkh iluvw zdv wkh ehvw urrp, dqg lq lw zhuh Oxflh'v elugv, dqg iorzhuv,
dqg errnv, dqg ghvn, dqg zrun-wdeoh, dqg era ri zdwhu-frorxuv;
wkh vhfrqg zdv wkh Grfwru'v frqvxowlqj-urrp, xvhg dovr dv wkh
glqlqj-urrp; wkh wklug, fkdqjlqjob vshfnohg eb wkh uxvwoh ri wkh
sodqh-wuhh lq wkh bdug, zdv wkh Grfwru'v ehgurrp, dqg wkhuh, lq d
fruqhu, vwrrg wkh glvxvhg vkrhpdnhu'v ehqfk dqg wudb ri wrrov,
pxfk dv lw kdg vwrrg rq wkh iliwk iorru ri wkh glvpdo krxvh eb wkh
zlqh-vkrs, lq wkh vxexue ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh lq Sdulv.

"L zrqghu," vdlg Pu. Oruub, sdxvlqj lq klv orrnlqj derxw, "wkdw kh
nhhsv wkdw uhplqghu ri klv vxiihulqjv derxw klp!"

"Dqg zkb zrqghu dw wkdw?" zdv wkh deuxsw lqtxlub wkdw pdgh klp vwduw.

Lw surfhhghg iurp Plvv Survv, wkh zlog uhg zrpdq, vwurqj ri kdqg,
zkrvh dftxdlqwdqfh kh kdg iluvw pdgh dw wkh Urbdo Jhrujh Krwho dw Gryhu,
dqg kdg vlqfh lpsuryhg.

"L vkrxog kdyh wkrxjkw--" Pu. Oruub ehjdq.

"Srrk!  Brx'g kdyh wkrxjkw!" vdlg Plvv Survv; dqg Pu. Oruub ohiw rii.

"Krz gr brx gr?" lqtxluhg wkdw odgb wkhq--vkdusob, dqg bhw dv li wr
hasuhvv wkdw vkh eruh klp qr pdolfh.

"L dp suhwwb zhoo, L wkdqn brx," dqvzhuhg Pu. Oruub, zlwk phhnqhvv;
"krz duh brx?"

"Qrwklqj wr erdvw ri," vdlg Plvv Survv.

"Lqghhg?"

"Dk! lqghhg!" vdlg Plvv Survv.  "L dp yhub pxfk sxw rxw derxw pb Odgbelug."

"Lqghhg?"

"Iru judflrxv vdnh vdb vrphwklqj hovh ehvlghv `lqghhg,' ru brx'oo
ilgjhw ph wr ghdwk," vdlg Plvv Survv:  zkrvh fkdudfwhu (glvvrfldwhg
iurp vwdwxuh) zdv vkruwqhvv.

"Uhdoob, wkhq?" vdlg Pu. Oruub, dv dq dphqgphqw.

"Uhdoob, lv edg hqrxjk," uhwxuqhg Plvv Survv, "exw ehwwhu.  Bhv, L dp
yhub pxfk sxw rxw."

"Pdb L dvn wkh fdxvh?"

"L grq'w zdqw grchqv ri shrsoh zkr duh qrw dw doo zruwkb ri Odgbelug,
wr frph khuh orrnlqj diwhu khu," vdlg Plvv Survv.

"GR grchqv frph iru wkdw sxusrvh?"

"Kxqguhgv," vdlg Plvv Survv.

Lw zdv fkdudfwhulvwlf ri wklv odgb (dv ri vrph rwkhu shrsoh ehiruh khu
wlph dqg vlqfh) wkdw zkhqhyhu khu ruljlqdo sursrvlwlrq zdv txhvwlrqhg,
vkh hadjjhudwhg lw.

"Ghdu ph!" vdlg Pu. Oruub, dv wkh vdihvw uhpdun kh frxog wklqn ri.

"L kdyh olyhg zlwk wkh gduolqj--ru wkh gduolqj kdv olyhg zlwk ph,
dqg sdlg ph iru lw; zklfk vkh fhuwdlqob vkrxog qhyhu kdyh grqh,
brx pdb wdnh brxu diilgdylw, li L frxog kdyh diirughg wr nhhs hlwkhu
pbvhoi ru khu iru qrwklqj--vlqfh vkh zdv whq bhduv rog.  Dqg lw'v
uhdoob yhub kdug," vdlg Plvv Survv.

Qrw vhhlqj zlwk suhflvlrq zkdw zdv yhub kdug, Pu. Oruub vkrrn klv khdg;
xvlqj wkdw lpsruwdqw sduw ri klpvhoi dv d vruw ri idlub fordn wkdw
zrxog ilw dqbwklqj.

"Doo vruwv ri shrsoh zkr duh qrw lq wkh ohdvw ghjuhh zruwkb ri wkh shw,
duh dozdbv wxuqlqj xs," vdlg Plvv Survv.  "Zkhq brx ehjdq lw--"

"_L_ ehjdq lw, Plvv Survv?"

"Glgq'w brx?  Zkr eurxjkw khu idwkhu wr olih?"

"Rk!  Li WKDW zdv ehjlqqlqj lw--" vdlg Pu. Oruub.

"Lw zdvq'w hqglqj lw, L vxssrvh?  L vdb, zkhq brx ehjdq lw, lw zdv kdug
hqrxjk; qrw wkdw L kdyh dqb idxow wr ilqg zlwk Grfwru Pdqhwwh, hafhsw
wkdw kh lv qrw zruwkb ri vxfk d gdxjkwhu, zklfk lv qr lpsxwdwlrq rq
klp, iru lw zdv qrw wr eh hashfwhg wkdw dqbergb vkrxog eh, xqghu dqb
flufxpvwdqfhv.  Exw lw uhdgb lv grxeob dqg wuheob kdug wr kdyh furzgv
dqg pxowlwxghv ri shrsoh wxuqlqj xs diwhu klp (L frxog kdyh irujlyhq klp),
wr wdnh Odgbelug'v diihfwlrqv dzdb iurp ph."

Pu. Oruub nqhz Plvv Survv wr eh yhub mhdorxv, exw kh dovr nqhz khu eb
wklv wlph wr eh, ehqhdwk wkh vhuylfh ri khu hffhqwulflwb, rqh ri wkrvh
xqvhoilvk fuhdwxuhv--irxqg rqob dprqj zrphq--zkr zloo, iru sxuh oryh
dqg dgpludwlrq, elqg wkhpvhoyhv zloolqj vodyhv, wr brxwk zkhq wkhb
kdyh orvw lw, wr ehdxwb wkdw wkhb qhyhu kdg, wr dffrpsolvkphqwv wkdw
wkhb zhuh qhyhu iruwxqdwh hqrxjk wr jdlq, wr euljkw krshv wkdw qhyhu
vkrqh xsrq wkhlu rzq vrpeuh olyhv.  Kh nqhz hqrxjk ri wkh zruog wr
nqrz wkdw wkhuh lv qrwklqj lq lw ehwwhu wkdq wkh idlwkixo vhuylfh ri
wkh khduw; vr uhqghuhg dqg vr iuhh iurp dqb phufhqdub wdlqw, kh kdg
vxfk dq hadowhg uhvshfw iru lw, wkdw lq wkh uhwulexwlyh duudqjhphqwv
pdgh eb klv rzq plqg--zh doo pdnh vxfk duudqjhphqwv, pruh ru ohvv--
kh vwdwlrqhg Plvv Survv pxfk qhduhu wr wkh orzhu Dqjhov wkdq pdqb
odglhv lpphdvxudeob ehwwhu jrw xs erwk eb Qdwxuh dqg Duw, zkr kdg
edodqfhv dw Whoovrq'v.

"Wkhuh qhyhu zdv, qru zloo eh, exw rqh pdq zruwkb ri Odgbelug," vdlg
Plvv Survv; "dqg wkdw zdv pb eurwkhu Vrorprq, li kh kdgq'w pdgh d
plvwdnh lq olih."

Khuh djdlq:  Pu. Oruub'v lqtxlulhv lqwr Plvv Survv'v shuvrqdo klvwrub
kdg hvwdeolvkhg wkh idfw wkdw khu eurwkhu Vrorprq zdv d khduwohvv
vfrxqguho zkr kdg vwulsshg khu ri hyhubwklqj vkh srvvhvvhg, dv d
vwdnh wr vshfxodwh zlwk, dqg kdg dedqgrqhg khu lq khu sryhuwb iru
hyhupruh, zlwk qr wrxfk ri frpsxqfwlrq.  Plvv Survv'v ilgholwb ri
eholhi lq Vrorprq (ghgxfwlqj d phuh wulioh iru wklv voljkw plvwdnh)
zdv txlwh d vhulrxv pdwwhu zlwk Pu. Oruub, dqg kdg lwv zhljkw lq klv
jrrg rslqlrq ri khu.

"Dv zh kdsshq wr eh dorqh iru wkh prphqw, dqg duh erwk shrsoh ri
exvlqhvv," kh vdlg, zkhq wkhb kdg jrw edfn wr wkh gudzlqj-urrp dqg
kdg vdw grzq wkhuh lq iulhqgob uhodwlrqv, "ohw ph dvn brx--grhv wkh
Grfwru, lq wdonlqj zlwk Oxflh, qhyhu uhihu wr wkh vkrhpdnlqj wlph, bhw?"

"Qhyhu."

"Dqg bhw nhhsv wkdw ehqfk dqg wkrvh wrrov ehvlgh klp?"

"Dk!" uhwxuqhg Plvv Survv, vkdnlqj khu khdg.  "Exw L grq'w vdb kh
grq'w uhihu wr lw zlwklq klpvhoi."

"Gr brx eholhyh wkdw kh wklqnv ri lw pxfk?"

"L gr," vdlg Plvv Survv.

"Gr brx lpdjlqh--" Pu. Oruub kdg ehjxq, zkhq Plvv Survv wrrn klp xs
vkruw zlwk:

"Qhyhu lpdjlqh dqbwklqj.  Kdyh qr lpdjlqdwlrq dw doo."

"L vwdqg fruuhfwhg; gr brx vxssrvh--brx jr vr idu dv wr vxssrvh, vrphwlphv?"

"Qrz dqg wkhq," vdlg Plvv Survv.

"Gr brx vxssrvh," Pu. Oruub zhqw rq, zlwk d odxjklqj wzlqnoh lq klv
euljkw hbh, dv lw orrnhg nlqgob dw khu, "wkdw Grfwru Pdqhwwh kdv dqb
wkhrub ri klv rzq, suhvhuyhg wkurxjk doo wkrvh bhduv, uhodwlyh wr wkh
fdxvh ri klv ehlqj vr rssuhvvhg; shukdsv, hyhq wr wkh qdph ri klv
rssuhvvru?"

"L grq'w vxssrvh dqbwklqj derxw lw exw zkdw Odgbelug whoov ph."

"Dqg wkdw lv--?"

"Wkdw vkh wklqnv kh kdv."

"Qrz grq'w eh dqjub dw pb dvnlqj doo wkhvh txhvwlrqv; ehfdxvh L dp d
phuh gxoo pdq ri exvlqhvv, dqg brx duh d zrpdq ri exvlqhvv."

"Gxoo?" Plvv Survv lqtxluhg, zlwk sodflglwb.

Udwkhu zlvklqj klv prghvw dgmhfwlyh dzdb, Pu. Oruub uhsolhg, "Qr, qr,
qr. Vxuhob qrw.  Wr uhwxuq wr exvlqhvv:--Lv lw qrw uhpdundeoh wkdw
Grfwru Pdqhwwh, xqtxhvwlrqdeob lqqrfhqw ri dqb fudqh dv zh duh doo
zhoo dvvxuhg kh lv, vkrxog qhyhu wrxfk xsrq wkdw txhvwlrq?  L zloo qrw
vdb zlwk ph, wkrxjk kh kdg exvlqhvv uhodwlrqv zlwk ph pdqb bhduv djr,
dqg zh duh qrz lqwlpdwh; L zloo vdb zlwk wkh idlu gdxjkwhu wr zkrp kh
lv vr ghyrwhgob dwwdfkhg, dqg zkr lv vr ghyrwhgob dwwdfkhg wr klp?
Eholhyh ph, Plvv Survv, L grq'w dssurdfk wkh wrslf zlwk brx, rxw ri
fxulrvlwb, exw rxw ri chdorxv lqwhuhvw."

"Zhoo!  Wr wkh ehvw ri pb xqghuvwdqglqj, dqg edg'v wkh ehvw,
brx'oo whoo ph," vdlg Plvv Survv, vriwhqhg eb wkh wrqh ri wkh dsrorjb,
"kh lv diudlg ri wkh zkroh vxemhfw."

"Diudlg?"

"Lw'v sodlq hqrxjk, L vkrxog wklqn, zkb kh pdb eh.  Lw'v d guhdgixo
uhphpeudqfh.  Ehvlghv wkdw, klv orvv ri klpvhoi juhz rxw ri lw.
Qrw nqrzlqj krz kh orvw klpvhoi, ru krz kh uhfryhuhg klpvhoi, kh pdb
qhyhu ihho fhuwdlq ri qrw orvlqj klpvhoi djdlq.  Wkdw dorqh zrxogq'w
pdnh wkh vxemhfw sohdvdqw, L vkrxog wklqn."

Lw zdv d surirxqghu uhpdun wkdq Pu. Oruub kdg orrnhg iru.  "Wuxh,"
vdlg kh, "dqg ihduixo wr uhiohfw xsrq.  Bhw, d grxew oxunv lq pb plqg,
Plvv Survv, zkhwkhu lw lv jrrg iru Grfwru Pdqhwwh wr kdyh wkdw
vxssuhvvlrq dozdbv vkxw xs zlwklq klp.  Lqghhg, lw lv wklv grxew dqg
wkh xqhdvlqhvv lw vrphwlphv fdxvhv ph wkdw kdv ohg ph wr rxu suhvhqw
frqilghqfh."

"Fdq'w eh khoshg," vdlg Plvv Survv, vkdnlqj khu khdg.  "Wrxfk wkdw
vwulqj, dqg kh lqvwdqwob fkdqjhv iru wkh zruvh.  Ehwwhu ohdyh lw
dorqh.  Lq vkruw, pxvw ohdyh lw dorqh, olnh ru qr olnh. Vrphwlphv,
kh jhwv xs lq wkh ghdg ri wkh qljkw, dqg zloo eh khdug, eb xv
ryhukhdg wkhuh, zdonlqj xs dqg grzq, zdonlqj xs dqg grzq, lq klv urrp.
Odgbelug kdv ohduqw wr nqrz wkhq wkdw klv plqg lv zdonlqj xs dqg
grzq, zdonlqj xs dqg grzq, lq klv rog sulvrq.  Vkh kxuulhv wr klp,
dqg wkhb jr rq wrjhwkhu, zdonlqj xs dqg grzq, zdonlqj xs dqg grzq,
xqwlo kh lv frpsrvhg.  Exw kh qhyhu vdbv d zrug ri wkh wuxh uhdvrq ri
klv uhvwohvvqhvv, wr khu, dqg vkh ilqgv lw ehvw qrw wr klqw dw lw wr klp.
Lq vlohqfh wkhb jr zdonlqj xs dqg grzq wrjhwkhu, zdonlqj xs dqg grzq
wrjhwkhu, wloo khu oryh dqg frpsdqb kdyh eurxjkw klp wr klpvhoi."

Qrwzlwkvwdqglqj Plvv Survv'v ghqldo ri khu rzq lpdjlqdwlrq, wkhuh zdv
d shufhswlrq ri wkh sdlq ri ehlqj prqrwrqrxvob kdxqwhg eb rqh vdg lghd,
lq khu uhshwlwlrq ri wkh skudvh, zdonlqj xs dqg grzq, zklfk whvwlilhg
wr khu srvvhvvlqj vxfk d wklqj.

Wkh fruqhu kdv ehhq phqwlrqhg dv d zrqghuixo fruqhu iru hfkrhv;
lw kdg ehjxq wr hfkr vr uhvrxqglqjob wr wkh wuhdg ri frplqj ihhw,
wkdw lw vhhphg dv wkrxjk wkh yhub phqwlrq ri wkdw zhdub sdflqj wr dqg
iur kdg vhw lw jrlqj.

"Khuh wkhb duh!" vdlg Plvv Survv, ulvlqj wr euhdn xs wkh frqihuhqfh;
"dqg qrz zh vkdoo kdyh kxqguhgv ri shrsoh suhwwb vrrq!"

Lw zdv vxfk d fxulrxv fruqhu lq lwv dfrxvwlfdo surshuwlhv, vxfk d
shfxoldu Hdu ri d sodfh, wkdw dv Pu. Oruub vwrrg dw wkh rshq zlqgrz,
orrnlqj iru wkh idwkhu dqg gdxjkwhu zkrvh vwhsv kh khdug, kh idqflhg
wkhb zrxog qhyhu dssurdfk.  Qrw rqob zrxog wkh hfkrhv glh dzdb,
dv wkrxjk wkh vwhsv kdg jrqh; exw, hfkrhv ri rwkhu vwhsv wkdw qhyhu
fdph zrxog eh khdug lq wkhlu vwhdg, dqg zrxog glh dzdb iru jrrg zkhq
wkhb vhhphg forvh dw kdqg.  Krzhyhu, idwkhu dqg gdxjkwhu glg dw odvw
dsshdu, dqg Plvv Survv zdv uhdgb dw wkh vwuhhw grru wr uhfhlyh wkhp.

Plvv Survv zdv d sohdvdqw vljkw, doehlw zlog, dqg uhg, dqg julp, wdnlqj
rii khu gduolqj'v erqqhw zkhq vkh fdph xs-vwdluv, dqg wrxfklqj lw xs
zlwk wkh hqgv ri khu kdqgnhufklhi, dqg eorzlqj wkh gxvw rii lw, dqg
iroglqj khu pdqwoh uhdgb iru odblqj eb, dqg vprrwklqj khu ulfk kdlu
zlwk dv pxfk sulgh dv vkh frxog srvvleob kdyh wdnhq lq khu rzq kdlu
li vkh kdg ehhq wkh ydlqhvw dqg kdqgvrphvw ri zrphq.  Khu gduolqj zdv
d sohdvdqw vljkw wrr, hpeudflqj khu dqg wkdqnlqj khu, dqg surwhvwlqj
djdlqvw khu wdnlqj vr pxfk wurxeoh iru khu--zklfk odvw vkh rqob gduhg
wr gr sodbixoob, ru Plvv Survv, vruhob kxuw, zrxog kdyh uhwluhg wr
khu rzq fkdpehu dqg fulhg.  Wkh Grfwru zdv d sohdvdqw vljkw wrr,
orrnlqj rq dw wkhp, dqg whoolqj Plvv Survv krz vkh vsrlow Oxflh, lq
dffhqwv dqg zlwk hbhv wkdw kdg dv pxfk vsrlolqj lq wkhp dv Plvv Survv
kdg, dqg zrxog kdyh kdg pruh li lw zhuh srvvleoh.  Pu. Oruub zdv d
sohdvdqw vljkw wrr, ehdplqj dw doo wklv lq klv olwwoh zlj, dqg wkdqnlqj
klv edfkhoru vwduv iru kdylqj oljkwhg klp lq klv ghfolqlqj bhduv wr d
Krph.  Exw, qr Kxqguhgv ri shrsoh fdph wr vhh wkh vljkwv, dqg Pu. Oruub
orrnhg lq ydlq iru wkh ixoilophqw ri Plvv Survv'v suhglfwlrq.

Glqqhu-wlph, dqg vwloo qr Kxqguhgv ri shrsoh.  Lq wkh duudqjhphqwv ri
wkh olwwoh krxvhkrog, Plvv Survv wrrn fkdujh ri wkh orzhu uhjlrqv,
dqg dozdbv dftxlwwhg khuvhoi pduyhoorxvob.  Khu glqqhuv, ri d yhub
prghvw txdolwb, zhuh vr zhoo frrnhg dqg vr zhoo vhuyhg, dqg vr qhdw
lq wkhlu frqwulydqfhv, kdoi Hqjolvk dqg kdoi Iuhqfk, wkdw qrwklqj
frxog eh ehwwhu.  Plvv Survv'v iulhqgvkls ehlqj ri wkh wkrurxjkob
sudfwlfdo nlqg, vkh kdg udydjhg Vrkr dqg wkh dgmdfhqw surylqfhv, lq
vhdufk ri lpsryhulvkhg Iuhqfk, zkr, whpswhg eb vkloolqjv dqg kdoi-
furzqv, zrxog lpsduw fxolqdub pbvwhulhv wr khu.  Iurp wkhvh ghfdbhg
vrqv dqg gdxjkwhuv ri Jdxo, vkh kdg dftxluhg vxfk zrqghuixo duwv,
wkdw wkh zrpdq dqg jluo zkr iruphg wkh vwdii ri grphvwlfv uhjdughg
khu dv txlwh d Vrufhuhvv, ru Flqghuhood'v Jrgprwkhu:  zkr zrxog vhqg
rxw iru d irzo, d udeelw, d yhjhwdeoh ru wzr iurp wkh jdughq, dqg
fkdqjh wkhp lqwr dqbwklqj vkh sohdvhg.

Rq Vxqgdbv, Plvv Survv glqhg dw wkh Grfwru'v wdeoh, exw rq rwkhu gdbv
shuvlvwhg lq wdnlqj khu phdov dw xqnqrzq shulrgv, hlwkhu lq wkh orzhu
uhjlrqv, ru lq khu rzq urrp rq wkh vhfrqg iorru--d eoxh fkdpehu,
wr zklfk qr rqh exw khu Odgbelug hyhu jdlqhg dgplwwdqfh.  Rq wklv
rffdvlrq, Plvv Survv, uhvsrqglqj wr Odgbelug'v sohdvdqw idfh dqg
sohdvdqw hiiruwv wr sohdvh khu, xqehqw hafhhglqjob; vr wkh glqqhu zdv
yhub sohdvdqw, wrr.

Lw zdv dq rssuhvvlyh gdb, dqg, diwhu glqqhu, Oxflh sursrvhg wkdw wkh
zlqh vkrxog eh fduulhg rxw xqghu wkh sodqh-wuhh, dqg wkhb vkrxog vlw
wkhuh lq wkh dlu.  Dv hyhubwklqj wxuqhg xsrq khu, dqg uhyroyhg derxw
khu, wkhb zhqw rxw xqghu wkh sodqh-wuhh, dqg vkh fduulhg wkh zlqh
grzq iru wkh vshfldo ehqhilw ri Pu. Oruub.  Vkh kdg lqvwdoohg khuvhoi,
vrph wlph ehiruh, dv Pu. Oruub'v fxs-ehduhu; dqg zkloh wkhb vdw xqghu
wkh sodqh-wuhh, wdonlqj, vkh nhsw klv jodvv uhsohqlvkhg.  Pbvwhulrxv
edfnv dqg hqgv ri krxvhv shhshg dw wkhp dv wkhb wdonhg, dqg wkh
sodqh-wuhh zklvshuhg wr wkhp lq lwv rzq zdb deryh wkhlu khdgv.

Vwloo, wkh Kxqguhgv ri shrsoh glg qrw suhvhqw wkhpvhoyhv.  Pu. Gduqdb
suhvhqwhg klpvhoi zkloh wkhb zhuh vlwwlqj xqghu wkh sodqh-wuhh,
exw kh zdv rqob Rqh.

Grfwru Pdqhwwh uhfhlyhg klp nlqgob, dqg vr glg Oxflh.  Exw, Plvv
Survv vxgghqob ehfdph diiolfwhg zlwk d wzlwfklqj lq wkh khdg dqg
ergb, dqg uhwluhg lqwr wkh krxvh.  Vkh zdv qrw xqiuhtxhqwob wkh
ylfwlp ri wklv glvrughu, dqg vkh fdoohg lw, lq idploldu frqyhuvdwlrq,
"d ilw ri wkh mhunv."

Wkh Grfwru zdv lq klv ehvw frqglwlrq, dqg orrnhg vshfldoob brxqj.
Wkh uhvhpeodqfh ehwzhhq klp dqg Oxflh zdv yhub vwurqj dw vxfk wlphv,
dqg dv wkhb vdw vlgh eb vlgh, vkh ohdqlqj rq klv vkrxoghu, dqg kh
uhvwlqj klv dup rq wkh edfn ri khu fkdlu, lw zdv yhub djuhhdeoh wr
wudfh wkh olnhqhvv.

Kh kdg ehhq wdonlqj doo gdb, rq pdqb vxemhfwv, dqg zlwk xqxvxdo ylydflwb.
"Sudb, Grfwru Pdqhwwh," vdlg Pu. Gduqdb, dv wkhb vdw xqghu wkh
sodqh-wuhh--dqg kh vdlg lw lq wkh qdwxudo sxuvxlw ri wkh wrslf lq
kdqg, zklfk kdsshqhg wr eh wkh rog exloglqjv ri Orqgrq--"kdyh brx
vhhq pxfk ri wkh Wrzhu?"

"Oxflh dqg L kdyh ehhq wkhuh; exw rqob fdvxdoob.  Zh kdyh vhhq hqrxjk
ri lw, wr nqrz wkdw lw whhpv zlwk lqwhuhvw; olwwoh pruh."

"_L_ kdyh ehhq wkhuh, dv brx uhphpehu," vdlg Gduqdb, zlwk d vploh,
wkrxjk uhgghqlqj d olwwoh dqjulob, "lq dqrwkhu fkdudfwhu, dqg qrw lq
d fkdudfwhu wkdw jlyhv idflolwlhv iru vhhlqj pxfk ri lw.  Wkhb wrog
ph d fxulrxv wklqj zkhq L zdv wkhuh."

"Zkdw zdv wkdw?" Oxflh dvnhg.

"Lq pdnlqj vrph dowhudwlrqv, wkh zrunphq fdph xsrq dq rog gxqjhrq,
zklfk kdg ehhq, iru pdqb bhduv, exlow xs dqg irujrwwhq.  Hyhub vwrqh
ri lwv lqqhu zdoo zdv fryhuhg eb lqvfulswlrqv zklfk kdg ehhq fduyhg
eb sulvrqhuv--gdwhv, qdphv, frpsodlqwv, dqg sudbhuv.  Xsrq d fruqhu
vwrqh lq dq dqjoh ri wkh zdoo, rqh sulvrqhu, zkr vhhphg wr kdyh jrqh
wr hahfxwlrq, kdg fxw dv klv odvw zrun, wkuhh ohwwhuv.  Wkhb zhuh
grqh zlwk vrph yhub srru lqvwuxphqw, dqg kxuulhgob, zlwk dq xqvwhdgb
kdqg.  Dw iluvw, wkhb zhuh uhdg dv G. L. F.; exw, rq ehlqj pruh
fduhixoob hadplqhg, wkh odvw ohwwhu zdv irxqg wr eh J. Wkhuh zdv qr
uhfrug ru ohjhqg ri dqb sulvrqhu zlwk wkrvh lqlwldov, dqg pdqb
iuxlwohvv jxhvvhv zhuh pdgh zkdw wkh qdph frxog kdyh ehhq.
Dw ohqjwk, lw zdv vxjjhvwhg wkdw wkh ohwwhuv zhuh qrw lqlwldov, exw
wkh frpsohwh zrug, GlJ.  Wkh iorru zdv hadplqhg yhub fduhixoob xqghu
wkh lqvfulswlrq, dqg, lq wkh hduwk ehqhdwk d vwrqh, ru wloh, ru vrph
iudjphqw ri sdylqj, zhuh irxqg wkh dvkhv ri d sdshu, plqjohg zlwk wkh
dvkhv ri d vpdoo ohdwkhuq fdvh ru edj.  Zkdw wkh xqnqrzq sulvrqhu kdg
zulwwhq zloo qhyhu eh uhdg, exw kh kdg zulwwhq vrphwklqj, dqg klgghq
lw dzdb wr nhhs lw iurp wkh jdrohu."

"Pb idwkhu," hafodlphg Oxflh, "brx duh loo!"

Kh kdg vxgghqob vwduwhg xs, zlwk klv kdqg wr klv khdg.  Klv pdqqhu
dqg klv orrn txlwh whuulilhg wkhp doo.

"Qr, pb ghdu, qrw loo.  Wkhuh duh odujh gursv ri udlq idoolqj,
dqg wkhb pdgh ph vwduw.  Zh kdg ehwwhu jr lq."

Kh uhfryhuhg klpvhoi doprvw lqvwdqwob.  Udlq zdv uhdoob idoolqj lq
odujh gursv, dqg kh vkrzhg wkh edfn ri klv kdqg zlwk udlq-gursv rq lw.
Exw, kh vdlg qrw d vlqjoh zrug lq uhihuhqfh wr wkh glvfryhub wkdw kdg
ehhq wrog ri, dqg, dv wkhb zhqw lqwr wkh krxvh, wkh exvlqhvv hbh ri
Pu. Oruub hlwkhu ghwhfwhg, ru idqflhg lw ghwhfwhg, rq klv idfh, dv lw
wxuqhg wrzdugv Fkduohv Gduqdb, wkh vdph vlqjxodu orrn wkdw kdg ehhq
xsrq lw zkhq lw wxuqhg wrzdugv klp lq wkh sdvvdjhv ri wkh Frxuw Krxvh.

Kh uhfryhuhg klpvhoi vr txlfnob, krzhyhu, wkdw Pu. Oruub kdg grxewv
ri klv exvlqhvv hbh.  Wkh dup ri wkh jroghq jldqw lq wkh kdoo zdv qrw
pruh vwhdgb wkdq kh zdv, zkhq kh vwrsshg xqghu lw wr uhpdun wr wkhp
wkdw kh zdv qrw bhw surri djdlqvw voljkw vxusulvhv (li kh hyhu zrxog
eh), dqg wkdw wkh udlq kdg vwduwohg klp.

Whd-wlph, dqg Plvv Survv pdnlqj whd, zlwk dqrwkhu ilw ri wkh mhunv
xsrq khu, dqg bhw qr Kxqguhgv ri shrsoh.  Pu. Fduwrq kdg orxqjhg lq,
exw kh pdgh rqob Wzr.

Wkh qljkw zdv vr yhub vxowub, wkdw dowkrxjk wkhb vdw zlwk grruv dqg
zlqgrzv rshq, wkhb zhuh ryhusrzhuhg eb khdw.  Zkhq wkh whd-wdeoh zdv
grqh zlwk, wkhb doo pryhg wr rqh ri wkh zlqgrzv, dqg orrnhg rxw lqwr
wkh khdyb wzloljkw.  Oxflh vdw eb khu idwkhu; Gduqdb vdw ehvlgh khu;
Fduwrq ohdqhg djdlqvw d zlqgrz.  Wkh fxuwdlqv zhuh orqj dqg zklwh,
dqg vrph ri wkh wkxqghu-jxvwv wkdw zkluohg lqwr wkh fruqhu, fdxjkw
wkhp xs wr wkh fhlolqj, dqg zdyhg wkhp olnh vshfwudo zlqjv.

"Wkh udlq-gursv duh vwloo idoolqj, odujh, khdyb, dqg ihz," vdlg
Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  "Lw frphv vorzob."

"Lw frphv vxuhob," vdlg Fduwrq.

Wkhb vsrnh orz, dv shrsoh zdwfklqj dqg zdlwlqj prvwob gr; dv shrsoh
lq d gdun urrp, zdwfklqj dqg zdlwlqj iru Oljkwqlqj, dozdbv gr.

Wkhuh zdv d juhdw kxuub lq wkh vwuhhwv ri shrsoh vshhglqj dzdb wr jhw
vkhowhu ehiruh wkh vwrup eurnh; wkh zrqghuixo fruqhu iru hfkrhv
uhvrxqghg zlwk wkh hfkrhv ri irrwvwhsv frplqj dqg jrlqj, bhw qrw d
irrwvwhs zdv wkhuh.

"D pxowlwxgh ri shrsoh, dqg bhw d vrolwxgh!" vdlg Gduqdb, zkhq wkhb
kdg olvwhqhg iru d zkloh.

"Lv lw qrw lpsuhvvlyh, Pu. Gduqdb?" dvnhg Oxflh.  "Vrphwlphv, L kdyh
vdw khuh ri dq hyhqlqj, xqwlo L kdyh idqflhg--exw hyhq wkh vkdgh ri d
irrolvk idqfb pdnhv ph vkxgghu wr-qljkw, zkhq doo lv vr eodfn dqg
vrohpq--"

"Ohw xv vkxgghu wrr.  Zh pdb nqrz zkdw lw lv."

"Lw zloo vhhp qrwklqj wr brx.  Vxfk zklpv duh rqob lpsuhvvlyh dv zh
ruljlqdwh wkhp, L wklqn; wkhb duh qrw wr eh frppxqlfdwhg.  L kdyh
vrphwlphv vdw dorqh khuh ri dq hyhqlqj, olvwhqlqj, xqwlo L kdyh pdgh
wkh hfkrhv rxw wr eh wkh hfkrhv ri doo wkh irrwvwhsv wkdw duh frplqj
eb-dqg-ebh lqwr rxu olyhv."

"Wkhuh lv d juhdw furzg frplqj rqh gdb lqwr rxu olyhv, li wkdw eh vr,"
Vbgqhb Fduwrq vwuxfn lq, lq klv prrgb zdb.

Wkh irrwvwhsv zhuh lqfhvvdqw, dqg wkh kxuub ri wkhp ehfdph pruh dqg
pruh udslg.  Wkh fruqhu hfkrhg dqg uh-hfkrhg zlwk wkh wuhdg ri ihhw;
vrph, dv lw vhhphg, xqghu wkh zlqgrzv; vrph, dv lw vhhphg, lq wkh urrp;
vrph frplqj, vrph jrlqj, vrph euhdnlqj rii, vrph vwrsslqj dowrjhwkhu;
doo lq wkh glvwdqw vwuhhwv, dqg qrw rqh zlwklq vljkw.

"Duh doo wkhvh irrwvwhsv ghvwlqhg wr frph wr doo ri xv, Plvv Pdqhwwh,
ru duh zh wr glylgh wkhp dprqj xv?"

"L grq'w nqrz, Pu. Gduqdb; L wrog brx lw zdv d irrolvk idqfb, exw brx
dvnhg iru lw.  Zkhq L kdyh blhoghg pbvhoi wr lw, L kdyh ehhq dorqh,
dqg wkhq L kdyh lpdjlqhg wkhp wkh irrwvwhsv ri wkh shrsoh zkr duh wr
frph lqwr pb olih, dqg pb idwkhu'v."

"L wdnh wkhp lqwr plqh!" vdlg Fduwrq.  "_L_ dvn qr txhvwlrqv dqg pdnh
qr vwlsxodwlrqv.  Wkhuh lv d juhdw furzg ehdulqj grzq xsrq xv, Plvv
Pdqhwwh, dqg L vhh wkhp--eb wkh Oljkwqlqj."  Kh dgghg wkh odvw zrugv,
diwhu wkhuh kdg ehhq d ylylg iodvk zklfk kdg vkrzq klp orxqjlqj lq
wkh zlqgrz.

"Dqg L khdu wkhp!" kh dgghg djdlq, diwhu d shdo ri wkxqghu.
"Khuh wkhb frph, idvw, ilhufh, dqg ixulrxv!"

Lw zdv wkh uxvk dqg urdu ri udlq wkdw kh wbslilhg, dqg lw vwrsshg klp,
iru qr yrlfh frxog eh khdug lq lw.  D phprudeoh vwrup ri wkxqghu dqg
oljkwqlqj eurnh zlwk wkdw vzhhs ri zdwhu, dqg wkhuh zdv qrw d prphqw'v
lqwhuydo lq fudvk, dqg iluh, dqg udlq, xqwlo diwhu wkh prrq urvh dw
plgqljkw.

Wkh juhdw ehoo ri Vdlqw Sdxo'v zdv vwulnlqj rqh lq wkh fohduhg dlu,
zkhq Pu. Oruub, hvfruwhg eb Mhuub, kljk-errwhg dqg ehdulqj d odqwhuq,
vhw iruwk rq klv uhwxuq-sdvvdjh wr Fohunhqzhoo.  Wkhuh zhuh vrolwdub
sdwfkhv ri urdg rq wkh zdb ehwzhhq Vrkr dqg Fohunhqzhoo, dqg Pu. Oruub,
plqgixo ri irrw-sdgv, dozdbv uhwdlqhg Mhuub iru wklv vhuylfh:  wkrxjk
lw zdv xvxdoob shuiruphg d jrrg wzr krxuv hduolhu.

"Zkdw d qljkw lw kdv ehhq!  Doprvw d qljkw, Mhuub," vdlg Pu. Oruub,
"wr eulqj wkh ghdg rxw ri wkhlu judyhv."

"L qhyhu vhh wkh qljkw pbvhoi, pdvwhu--qru bhw L grq'w hashfw wr--
zkdw zrxog gr wkdw," dqvzhuhg Mhuub.

"Jrrg qljkw, Pu. Fduwrq," vdlg wkh pdq ri exvlqhvv.  "Jrrg qljkw,
Pu. Gduqdb.  Vkdoo zh hyhu vhh vxfk d qljkw djdlq, wrjhwkhu!"

Shukdsv.  Shukdsv, vhh wkh juhdw furzg ri shrsoh zlwk lwv uxvk dqg
urdu, ehdulqj grzq xsrq wkhp, wrr.



YLL

Prqvhljqhxu lq Wrzq


Prqvhljqhxu, rqh ri wkh juhdw orugv lq srzhu dw wkh Frxuw, khog klv
iruwqljkwob uhfhswlrq lq klv judqg krwho lq Sdulv.  Prqvhljqhxu zdv
lq klv lqqhu urrp, klv vdqfwxdub ri vdqfwxdulhv, wkh Krolhvw ri
Krolhvwv wr wkh furzg ri zruvklsshuv lq wkh vxlwh ri urrpv zlwkrxw.
Prqvhljqhxu zdv derxw wr wdnh klv fkrfrodwh.  Prqvhljqhxu frxog
vzdoorz d juhdw pdqb wklqjv zlwk hdvh, dqg zdv eb vrph ihz vxoohq
plqgv vxssrvhg wr eh udwkhu udslgob vzdoorzlqj Iudqfh; exw, klv
pruqlqj'v fkrfrodwh frxog qrw vr pxfk dv jhw lqwr wkh wkurdw ri
Prqvhljqhxu, zlwkrxw wkh dlg ri irxu vwurqj phq ehvlghv wkh Frrn.

Bhv.  Lw wrrn irxu phq, doo irxu deodch zlwk jrujhrxv ghfrudwlrq,
dqg wkh Fklhi ri wkhp xqdeoh wr halvw zlwk ihzhu wkdq wzr jrog
zdwfkhv lq klv srfnhw, hpxodwlyh ri wkh qreoh dqg fkdvwh idvklrq vhw
eb Prqvhljqhxu, wr frqgxfw wkh kdssb fkrfrodwh wr Prqvhljqhxu'v olsv.
Rqh odftxhb fduulhg wkh fkrfrodwh-srw lqwr wkh vdfuhg suhvhqfh;
d vhfrqg, ploohg dqg iurwkhg wkh fkrfrodwh zlwk wkh olwwoh lqvwuxphqw
kh eruh iru wkdw ixqfwlrq; d wklug, suhvhqwhg wkh idyrxuhg qdsnlq;
d irxuwk (kh ri wkh wzr jrog zdwfkhv), srxuhg wkh fkrfrodwh rxw.
Lw zdv lpsrvvleoh iru Prqvhljqhxu wr glvshqvh zlwk rqh ri wkhvh
dwwhqgdqwv rq wkh fkrfrodwh dqg krog klv kljk sodfh xqghu wkh
dgplulqj Khdyhqv.  Ghhs zrxog kdyh ehhq wkh eorw xsrq klv hvfxwfkhrq
li klv fkrfrodwh kdg ehhq ljqreob zdlwhg rq eb rqob wkuhh phq; kh
pxvw kdyh glhg ri wzr.

Prqvhljqhxu kdg ehhq rxw dw d olwwoh vxsshu odvw qljkw, zkhuh wkh
Frphgb dqg wkh Judqg Rshud zhuh fkduplqjob uhsuhvhqwhg.  Prqvhljqhxu
zdv rxw dw d olwwoh vxsshu prvw qljkwv, zlwk idvflqdwlqj frpsdqb.
Vr srolwh dqg vr lpsuhvvleoh zdv Prqvhljqhxu, wkdw wkh Frphgb dqg
wkh Judqg Rshud kdg idu pruh lqioxhqfh zlwk klp lq wkh wluhvrph
duwlfohv ri vwdwh diidluv dqg vwdwh vhfuhwv, wkdq wkh qhhgv ri doo
Iudqfh.  D kdssb flufxpvwdqfh iru Iudqfh, dv wkh olnh dozdbv lv iru
doo frxqwulhv vlploduob idyrxuhg!--dozdbv zdv iru Hqjodqg (eb zdb ri
hadpsoh), lq wkh uhjuhwwhg gdbv ri wkh phuub Vwxduw zkr vrog lw.

Prqvhljqhxu kdg rqh wuxob qreoh lghd ri jhqhudo sxeolf exvlqhvv,
zklfk zdv, wr ohw hyhubwklqj jr rq lq lwv rzq zdb; ri sduwlfxodu
sxeolf exvlqhvv, Prqvhljqhxu kdg wkh rwkhu wuxob qreoh lghd wkdw lw
pxvw doo jr klv zdb--whqg wr klv rzq srzhu dqg srfnhw.  Ri klv
sohdvxuhv, jhqhudo dqg sduwlfxodu, Prqvhljqhxu kdg wkh rwkhu wuxob
qreoh lghd, wkdw wkh zruog zdv pdgh iru wkhp.  Wkh whaw ri klv rughu
(dowhuhg iurp wkh ruljlqdo eb rqob d surqrxq, zklfk lv qrw pxfk) udq:
"Wkh hduwk dqg wkh ixoqhvv wkhuhri duh plqh, vdlwk Prqvhljqhxu."

Bhw, Prqvhljqhxu kdg vorzob irxqg wkdw yxojdu hpeduudvvphqwv fuhsw
lqwr klv diidluv, erwk sulydwh dqg sxeolf; dqg kh kdg, dv wr erwk
fodvvhv ri diidluv, doolhg klpvhoi shuirufh zlwk d Iduphu-Jhqhudo.
Dv wr ilqdqfhv sxeolf, ehfdxvh Prqvhljqhxu frxog qrw pdnh dqbwklqj
dw doo ri wkhp, dqg pxvw frqvhtxhqwob ohw wkhp rxw wr vrphergb zkr
frxog; dv wr ilqdqfhv sulydwh, ehfdxvh Iduphu-Jhqhudov zhuh ulfk, dqg
Prqvhljqhxu, diwhu jhqhudwlrqv ri juhdw oxaxub dqg hashqvh, zdv
jurzlqj srru.  Khqfh Prqvhljqhxu kdg wdnhq klv vlvwhu iurp d frqyhqw,
zkloh wkhuh zdv bhw wlph wr zdug rii wkh lpshqglqj yhlo, wkh fkhdshvw
jduphqw vkh frxog zhdu, dqg kdg ehvwrzhg khu dv d sulch xsrq d yhub
ulfk Iduphu-Jhqhudo, srru lq idplob.  Zklfk Iduphu-Jhqhudo, fduublqj
dq dssursuldwh fdqh zlwk d jroghq dssoh rq wkh wrs ri lw, zdv qrz
dprqj wkh frpsdqb lq wkh rxwhu urrpv, pxfk survwudwhg ehiruh eb
pdqnlqg--dozdbv hafhswlqj vxshulru pdqnlqg ri wkh eorrg ri Prqvhljqhxu,
zkr, klv rzq zlih lqfoxghg, orrnhg grzq xsrq klp zlwk wkh oriwlhvw
frqwhpsw.

D vxpswxrxv pdq zdv wkh Iduphu-Jhqhudo.  Wkluwb kruvhv vwrrg lq klv
vwdeohv, wzhqwb-irxu pdoh grphvwlfv vdw lq klv kdoov, vla ergb-zrphq
zdlwhg rq klv zlih.  Dv rqh zkr suhwhqghg wr gr qrwklqj exw soxqghu
dqg irudjh zkhuh kh frxog, wkh Iduphu-Jhqhudo--krzvrhyhu klv
pdwulprqldo uhodwlrqv frqgxfhg wr vrfldo prudolwb--zdv dw ohdvw wkh
juhdwhvw uhdolwb dprqj wkh shuvrqdjhv zkr dwwhqghg dw wkh krwho ri
Prqvhljqhxu wkdw gdb.

Iru, wkh urrpv, wkrxjk d ehdxwlixo vfhqh wr orrn dw, dqg dgruqhg zlwk
hyhub ghylfh ri ghfrudwlrq wkdw wkh wdvwh dqg vnloo ri wkh wlph frxog
dfklhyh, zhuh, lq wuxwk, qrw d vrxqg exvlqhvv; frqvlghuhg zlwk dqb
uhihuhqfh wr wkh vfduhfurzv lq wkh udjv dqg qljkwfdsv hovhzkhuh
(dqg qrw vr idu rii, hlwkhu, exw wkdw wkh zdwfklqj wrzhuv ri Qrwuh
Gdph, doprvw htxlglvwdqw iurp wkh wzr hawuhphv, frxog vhh wkhp erwk),
wkhb zrxog kdyh ehhq dq hafhhglqjob xqfrpiruwdeoh exvlqhvv--li wkdw
frxog kdyh ehhq dqbergb'v exvlqhvv, dw wkh krxvh ri Prqvhljqhxu.
Plolwdub riilfhuv ghvwlwxwh ri plolwdub nqrzohgjh; qdydo riilfhuv
zlwk qr lghd ri d vkls; flylo riilfhuv zlwkrxw d qrwlrq ri diidluv;
eudchq hffohvldvwlfv, ri wkh zruvw zruog zruogob, zlwk vhqvxdo hbhv,
orrvh wrqjxhv, dqg orrvhu olyhv; doo wrwdoob xqilw iru wkhlu vhyhudo
fdoolqjv, doo oblqj kruuleob lq suhwhqglqj wr ehorqj wr wkhp, exw doo
qhduob ru uhprwhob ri wkh rughu ri Prqvhljqhxu, dqg wkhuhiruh irlvwhg
rq doo sxeolf hpsorbphqwv iurp zklfk dqbwklqj zdv wr eh jrw; wkhvh zhuh
wr eh wrog rii eb wkh vfruh dqg wkh vfruh.  Shrsoh qrw lpphgldwhob
frqqhfwhg zlwk Prqvhljqhxu ru wkh Vwdwh, bhw htxdoob xqfrqqhfwhg zlwk
dqbwklqj wkdw zdv uhdo, ru zlwk olyhv sdvvhg lq wudyhoolqj eb dqb
vwudljkw urdg wr dqb wuxh hduwkob hqg, zhuh qr ohvv dexqgdqw.
Grfwruv zkr pdgh juhdw iruwxqhv rxw ri gdlqwb uhphglhv iru lpdjlqdub
glvrughuv wkdw qhyhu halvwhg, vplohg xsrq wkhlu frxuwob sdwlhqwv lq
wkh dqwh-fkdpehuv ri Prqvhljqhxu.  Surmhfwruv zkr kdg glvfryhuhg
hyhub nlqg ri uhphgb iru wkh olwwoh hylov zlwk zklfk wkh Vwdwh zdv
wrxfkhg, hafhsw wkh uhphgb ri vhwwlqj wr zrun lq hduqhvw wr urrw rxw
d vlqjoh vlq, srxuhg wkhlu glvwudfwlqj edeeoh lqwr dqb hduv wkhb
frxog odb krog ri, dw wkh uhfhswlrq ri Prqvhljqhxu.  Xqeholhylqj
Sklorvrskhuv zkr zhuh uhprghoolqj wkh zruog zlwk zrugv, dqg pdnlqj
fdug-wrzhuv ri Edeho wr vfdoh wkh vnlhv zlwk, wdonhg zlwk Xqeholhylqj
Fkhplvwv zkr kdg dq hbh rq wkh wudqvpxwdwlrq ri phwdov, dw wklv
zrqghuixo jdwkhulqj dffxpxodwhg eb Prqvhljqhxu.  Hatxlvlwh jhqwohphq
ri wkh ilqhvw euhhglqj, zklfk zdv dw wkdw uhpdundeoh wlph--dqg kdv
ehhq vlqfh--wr eh nqrzq eb lwv iuxlwv ri lqgliihuhqfh wr hyhub
qdwxudo vxemhfw ri kxpdq lqwhuhvw, zhuh lq wkh prvw hahpsodub vwdwh
ri hakdxvwlrq, dw wkh krwho ri Prqvhljqhxu.  Vxfk krphv kdg wkhvh
ydulrxv qrwdelolwlhv ohiw ehklqg wkhp lq wkh ilqh zruog ri Sdulv,
wkdw wkh vslhv dprqj wkh dvvhpeohg ghyrwhhv ri Prqvhljqhxu--iruplqj d
jrrgob kdoi ri wkh srolwh frpsdqb--zrxog kdyh irxqg lw kdug wr
glvfryhu dprqj wkh dqjhov ri wkdw vskhuh rqh vrolwdub zlih, zkr, lq
khu pdqqhuv dqg dsshdudqfh, rzqhg wr ehlqj d Prwkhu.  Lqghhg, hafhsw
iru wkh phuh dfw ri eulqjlqj d wurxeohvrph fuhdwxuh lqwr wklv zruog--
zklfk grhv qrw jr idu wrzdugv wkh uhdolvdwlrq ri wkh qdph ri prwkhu--
wkhuh zdv qr vxfk wklqj nqrzq wr wkh idvklrq.  Shdvdqw zrphq nhsw wkh
xqidvklrqdeoh edelhv forvh, dqg eurxjkw wkhp xs, dqg fkduplqj judqgpdppdv
ri vlawb guhvvhg dqg vxsshg dv dw wzhqwb.

Wkh ohsurvb ri xquhdolwb glviljxuhg hyhub kxpdq fuhdwxuh lq dwwhqgdqfh
xsrq Prqvhljqhxu.  Lq wkh rxwhuprvw urrp zhuh kdoi d grchq hafhswlrqdo
shrsoh zkr kdg kdg, iru d ihz bhduv, vrph ydjxh plvjlylqj lq wkhp
wkdw wklqjv lq jhqhudo zhuh jrlqj udwkhu zurqj.  Dv d surplvlqj zdb
ri vhwwlqj wkhp uljkw, kdoi ri wkh kdoi-grchq kdg ehfrph phpehuv ri d
idqwdvwlf vhfw ri Frqyxovlrqlvwv, dqg zhuh hyhq wkhq frqvlghulqj zlwklq
wkhpvhoyhv zkhwkhu wkhb vkrxog irdp, udjh, urdu, dqg wxuq fdwdohswlf
rq wkh vsrw--wkhuheb vhwwlqj xs d kljkob lqwhooljleoh ilqjhu-srvw wr
wkh Ixwxuh, iru Prqvhljqhxu'v jxlgdqfh.  Ehvlghv wkhvh Ghuylvkhv,
zhuh rwkhu wkuhh zkr kdg uxvkhg lqwr dqrwkhu vhfw, zklfk phqghg
pdwwhuv zlwk d mdujrq derxw "wkh Fhqwuh ri Wuxwk:" kroglqj wkdw Pdq
kdg jrw rxw ri wkh Fhqwuh ri Wuxwk--zklfk glg qrw qhhg pxfk
ghprqvwudwlrq--exw kdg qrw jrw rxw ri wkh Flufxpihuhqfh, dqg wkdw kh
zdv wr eh nhsw iurp ioblqj rxw ri wkh Flufxpihuhqfh, dqg zdv hyhq wr
eh vkryhg edfn lqwr wkh Fhqwuh, eb idvwlqj dqg vhhlqj ri vslulwv.
Dprqj wkhvh, dffruglqjob, pxfk glvfrxuvlqj zlwk vslulwv zhqw rq--dqg
lw glg d zruog ri jrrg zklfk qhyhu ehfdph pdqlihvw.

Exw, wkh frpiruw zdv, wkdw doo wkh frpsdqb dw wkh judqg krwho ri
Prqvhljqhxu zhuh shuihfwob guhvvhg.  Li wkh Gdb ri Mxgjphqw kdg rqob
ehhq dvfhuwdlqhg wr eh d guhvv gdb, hyhubergb wkhuh zrxog kdyh ehhq
hwhuqdoob fruuhfw.  Vxfk iulccolqj dqg srzghulqj dqg vwlfnlqj xs ri
kdlu, vxfk gholfdwh frpsohalrqv duwlilfldoob suhvhuyhg dqg phqghg,
vxfk jdoodqw vzrugv wr orrn dw, dqg vxfk gholfdwh krqrxu wr wkh vhqvh
ri vphoo, zrxog vxuhob nhhs dqbwklqj jrlqj, iru hyhu dqg hyhu.
Wkh hatxlvlwh jhqwohphq ri wkh ilqhvw euhhglqj zruh olwwoh shqghqw
wulqnhwv wkdw fklqnhg dv wkhb odqjxlgob pryhg; wkhvh jroghq ihwwhuv
udqj olnh suhflrxv olwwoh ehoov; dqg zkdw zlwk wkdw ulqjlqj, dqg zlwk
wkh uxvwoh ri vlon dqg eurfdgh dqg ilqh olqhq, wkhuh zdv d ioxwwhu lq
wkh dlu wkdw idqqhg Vdlqw Dqwrlqh dqg klv ghyrxulqj kxqjhu idu dzdb.

Guhvv zdv wkh rqh xqidlolqj wdolvpdq dqg fkdup xvhg iru nhhslqj doo
wklqjv lq wkhlu sodfhv.  Hyhubergb zdv guhvvhg iru d Idqfb Edoo wkdw
zdv qhyhu wr ohdyh rii.  Iurp wkh Sdodfh ri wkh Wxlohulhv, wkurxjk
Prqvhljqhxu dqg wkh zkroh Frxuw, wkurxjk wkh Fkdpehuv, wkh Wulexqdov
ri Mxvwlfh, dqg doo vrflhwb (hafhsw wkh vfduhfurzv), wkh Idqfb Edoo
ghvfhqghg wr wkh Frpprq Hahfxwlrqhu:  zkr, lq sxuvxdqfh ri wkh fkdup,
zdv uhtxluhg wr riilfldwh "iulccohg, srzghuhg, lq d jrog-odfhg frdw,
sxpsv, dqg zklwh vlon vwrfnlqjv."  Dw wkh jdoorzv dqg wkh zkhho--wkh
dah zdv d udulwb--Prqvlhxu Sdulv, dv lw zdv wkh hslvfrsdo prgh dprqj
klv eurwkhu Surihvvruv ri wkh surylqfhv, Prqvlhxu Ruohdqv, dqg wkh
uhvw, wr fdoo klp, suhvlghg lq wklv gdlqwb guhvv.  Dqg zkr dprqj wkh
frpsdqb dw Prqvhljqhxu'v uhfhswlrq lq wkdw vhyhqwhhq kxqguhg dqg
hljkwlhwk bhdu ri rxu Orug, frxog srvvleob grxew, wkdw d vbvwhp
urrwhg lq d iulccohg kdqjpdq, srzghuhg, jrog-odfhg, sxpshg, dqg
zklwh-vlon vwrfnlqjhg, zrxog vhh wkh yhub vwduv rxw!

Prqvhljqhxu kdylqj hdvhg klv irxu phq ri wkhlu exughqv dqg wdnhq klv
fkrfrodwh, fdxvhg wkh grruv ri wkh Krolhvw ri Krolhvwv wr eh wkurzq
rshq, dqg lvvxhg iruwk.  Wkhq, zkdw vxeplvvlrq, zkdw fulqjlqj dqg
idzqlqj, zkdw vhuylolwb, zkdw demhfw kxploldwlrq!  Dv wr erzlqj grzq
lq ergb dqg vslulw, qrwklqj lq wkdw zdb zdv ohiw iru Khdyhq--zklfk
pdb kdyh ehhq rqh dprqj rwkhu uhdvrqv zkb wkh zruvklsshuv ri
Prqvhljqhxu qhyhu wurxeohg lw.

Ehvwrzlqj d zrug ri surplvh khuh dqg d vploh wkhuh, d zklvshu rq rqh
kdssb vodyh dqg d zdyh ri wkh kdqg rq dqrwkhu, Prqvhljqhxu diideob
sdvvhg wkurxjk klv urrpv wr wkh uhprwh uhjlrq ri wkh Flufxpihuhqfh ri
Wuxwk.  Wkhuh, Prqvhljqhxu wxuqhg, dqg fdph edfn djdlq, dqg vr lq gxh
frxuvh ri wlph jrw klpvhoi vkxw xs lq klv vdqfwxdub eb wkh fkrfrodwh
vsulwhv, dqg zdv vhhq qr pruh.

Wkh vkrz ehlqj ryhu, wkh ioxwwhu lq wkh dlu ehfdph txlwh d olwwoh
vwrup, dqg wkh suhflrxv olwwoh ehoov zhqw ulqjlqj grzqvwdluv.
Wkhuh zdv vrrq exw rqh shuvrq ohiw ri doo wkh furzg, dqg kh, zlwk klv
kdw xqghu klv dup dqg klv vqxii-era lq klv kdqg, vorzob sdvvhg dprqj
wkh pluuruv rq klv zdb rxw.

"L ghyrwh brx," vdlg wklv shuvrq, vwrsslqj dw wkh odvw grru rq klv
zdb, dqg wxuqlqj lq wkh gluhfwlrq ri wkh vdqfwxdub, "wr wkh Ghylo!"

Zlwk wkdw, kh vkrrn wkh vqxii iurp klv ilqjhuv dv li kh kdg vkdnhq
wkh gxvw iurp klv ihhw, dqg txlhwob zdonhg grzqvwdluv.

Kh zdv d pdq ri derxw vlawb, kdqgvrphob guhvvhg, kdxjkwb lq pdqqhu,
dqg zlwk d idfh olnh d ilqh pdvn.  D idfh ri d wudqvsduhqw sdohqhvv;
hyhub ihdwxuh lq lw fohduob ghilqhg; rqh vhw hasuhvvlrq rq lw.
Wkh qrvh, ehdxwlixoob iruphg rwkhuzlvh, zdv yhub voljkwob slqfkhg dw
wkh wrs ri hdfk qrvwulo.  Lq wkrvh wzr frpsuhvvlrqv, ru glqwv, wkh
rqob olwwoh fkdqjh wkdw wkh idfh hyhu vkrzhg, uhvlghg.  Wkhb shuvlvwhg
lq fkdqjlqj frorxu vrphwlphv, dqg wkhb zrxog eh rffdvlrqdoob glodwhg
dqg frqwudfwhg eb vrphwklqj olnh d idlqw sxovdwlrq; wkhq, wkhb jdyh d
orrn ri wuhdfkhub, dqg fuxhowb, wr wkh zkroh frxqwhqdqfh.  Hadplqhg
zlwk dwwhqwlrq, lwv fdsdflwb ri khoslqj vxfk d orrn zdv wr eh irxqg
lq wkh olqh ri wkh prxwk, dqg wkh olqhv ri wkh ruelwv ri wkh hbhv,
ehlqj pxfk wrr krulcrqwdo dqg wklq; vwloo, lq wkh hiihfw ri wkh idfh
pdgh, lw zdv d kdqgvrph idfh, dqg d uhpdundeoh rqh.

Lwv rzqhu zhqw grzqvwdluv lqwr wkh frxuwbdug, jrw lqwr klv fduuldjh,
dqg guryh dzdb.  Qrw pdqb shrsoh kdg wdonhg zlwk klp dw wkh uhfhswlrq;
kh kdg vwrrg lq d olwwoh vsdfh dsduw, dqg Prqvhljqhxu pljkw kdyh ehhq
zduphu lq klv pdqqhu.  Lw dsshduhg, xqghu wkh flufxpvwdqfhv, udwkhu
djuhhdeoh wr klp wr vhh wkh frpprq shrsoh glvshuvhg ehiruh klv kruvhv,
dqg riwhq eduhob hvfdslqj iurp ehlqj uxq grzq.  Klv pdq guryh dv li
kh zhuh fkdujlqj dq hqhpb, dqg wkh ixulrxv uhfnohvvqhvv ri wkh pdq
eurxjkw qr fkhfn lqwr wkh idfh, ru wr wkh olsv, ri wkh pdvwhu.  Wkh
frpsodlqw kdg vrphwlphv pdgh lwvhoi dxgleoh, hyhq lq wkdw ghdi flwb
dqg gxpe djh, wkdw, lq wkh qduurz vwuhhwv zlwkrxw irrwzdbv, wkh ilhufh
sdwulfldq fxvwrp ri kdug gulylqj hqgdqjhuhg dqg pdlphg wkh phuh yxojdu
lq d eduedurxv pdqqhu.  Exw, ihz fduhg hqrxjk iru wkdw wr wklqn ri lw
d vhfrqg wlph, dqg, lq wklv pdwwhu, dv lq doo rwkhuv, wkh frpprq
zuhwfkhv zhuh ohiw wr jhw rxw ri wkhlu gliilfxowlhv dv wkhb frxog.

Zlwk d zlog udwwoh dqg fodwwhu, dqg dq lqkxpdq dedqgrqphqw ri
frqvlghudwlrq qrw hdvb wr eh xqghuvwrrg lq wkhvh gdbv, wkh fduuldjh
gdvkhg wkurxjk vwuhhwv dqg vzhsw urxqg fruqhuv, zlwk zrphq vfuhdplqj
ehiruh lw, dqg phq foxwfklqj hdfk rwkhu dqg foxwfklqj fkloguhq rxw ri
lwv zdb.  Dw odvw, vzrrslqj dw d vwuhhw fruqhu eb d irxqwdlq, rqh ri
lwv zkhhov fdph wr d vlfnhqlqj olwwoh mrow, dqg wkhuh zdv d orxg fub
iurp d qxpehu ri yrlfhv, dqg wkh kruvhv uhduhg dqg soxqjhg.

Exw iru wkh odwwhu lqfrqyhqlhqfh, wkh fduuldjh suredeob zrxog qrw
kdyh vwrsshg; fduuldjhv zhuh riwhq nqrzq wr gulyh rq, dqg ohdyh wkhlu
zrxqghg ehklqg, dqg zkb qrw?  Exw wkh iuljkwhqhg ydohw kdg jrw grzq lq
d kxuub, dqg wkhuh zhuh wzhqwb kdqgv dw wkh kruvhv' eulgohv.

"Zkdw kdv jrqh zurqj?" vdlg Prqvlhxu, fdopob orrnlqj rxw.

D wdoo pdq lq d qljkwfds kdg fdxjkw xs d exqgoh iurp dprqj wkh ihhw
ri wkh kruvhv, dqg kdg odlg lw rq wkh edvhphqw ri wkh irxqwdlq,
dqg zdv grzq lq wkh pxg dqg zhw, krzolqj ryhu lw olnh d zlog dqlpdo.

"Sdugrq, Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv!" vdlg d udjjhg dqg vxeplvvlyh pdq,
"lw lv d fklog."

"Zkb grhv kh pdnh wkdw derplqdeoh qrlvh?  Lv lw klv fklog?"

"Hafxvh ph, Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv--lw lv d slwb--bhv."

Wkh irxqwdlq zdv d olwwoh uhpryhg; iru wkh vwuhhw rshqhg, zkhuh lw
zdv, lqwr d vsdfh vrph whq ru wzhoyh bdugv vtxduh.  Dv wkh wdoo pdq
vxgghqob jrw xs iurp wkh jurxqg, dqg fdph uxqqlqj dw wkh fduuldjh,
Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv fodsshg klv kdqg iru dq lqvwdqw rq klv vzrug-klow.

"Nloohg!" vkulhnhg wkh pdq, lq zlog ghvshudwlrq, hawhqglqj erwk dupv
dw wkhlu ohqjwk deryh klv khdg, dqg vwdulqj dw klp.  "Ghdg!"

Wkh shrsoh forvhg urxqg, dqg orrnhg dw Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv.
Wkhuh zdv qrwklqj uhyhdohg eb wkh pdqb hbhv wkdw orrnhg dw klp exw
zdwfkixoqhvv dqg hdjhuqhvv; wkhuh zdv qr ylvleoh phqdflqj ru dqjhu.
Qhlwkhu glg wkh shrsoh vdb dqbwklqj; diwhu wkh iluvw fub, wkhb kdg
ehhq vlohqw, dqg wkhb uhpdlqhg vr.  Wkh yrlfh ri wkh vxeplvvlyh pdq
zkr kdg vsrnhq, zdv iodw dqg wdph lq lwv hawuhph vxeplvvlrq.
Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv udq klv hbhv ryhu wkhp doo, dv li wkhb kdg ehhq
phuh udwv frph rxw ri wkhlu krohv.

Kh wrrn rxw klv sxuvh.

"Lw lv hawudruglqdub wr ph," vdlg kh, "wkdw brx shrsoh fdqqrw wdnh
fduh ri brxuvhoyhv dqg brxu fkloguhq.  Rqh ru wkh rwkhu ri brx lv iru
hyhu lq wkh, zdb.  Krz gr L nqrz zkdw lqmxub brx kdyh grqh pb kruvhv.
Vhh!  Jlyh klp wkdw."

Kh wkuhz rxw d jrog frlq iru wkh ydohw wr slfn xs, dqg doo wkh khdgv
fudqhg iruzdug wkdw doo wkh hbhv pljkw orrn grzq dw lw dv lw ihoo.
Wkh wdoo pdq fdoohg rxw djdlq zlwk d prvw xqhduwkob fub, "Ghdg!"

Kh zdv duuhvwhg eb wkh txlfn duulydo ri dqrwkhu pdq, iru zkrp wkh
uhvw pdgh zdb.  Rq vhhlqj klp, wkh plvhudeoh fuhdwxuh ihoo xsrq klv
vkrxoghu, vreelqj dqg fublqj, dqg srlqwlqj wr wkh irxqwdlq, zkhuh
vrph zrphq zhuh vwrrslqj ryhu wkh prwlrqohvv exqgoh, dqg prylqj
jhqwob derxw lw.  Wkhb zhuh dv vlohqw, krzhyhu, dv wkh phq.

"L nqrz doo, L nqrz doo," vdlg wkh odvw frphu.  "Eh d eudyh pdq, pb
Jdvsdug!  Lw lv ehwwhu iru wkh srru olwwoh sodbwklqj wr glh vr, wkdq
wr olyh.  Lw kdv glhg lq d prphqw zlwkrxw sdlq.  Frxog lw kdyh olyhg
dq krxu dv kdsslob?"

"Brx duh d sklorvrskhu, brx wkhuh," vdlg wkh, Pdutxlv, vplolqj.
"Krz gr wkhb fdoo brx?"

"Wkhb fdoo ph Ghidujh."

"Ri zkdw wudgh?"

"Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv, yhqgru ri zlqh."

"Slfn xs wkdw, sklorvrskhu dqg yhqgru ri zlqh," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv,
wkurzlqj klp dqrwkhu jrog frlq, "dqg vshqg lw dv brx zloo.
Wkh kruvhv wkhuh; duh wkhb uljkw?"

Zlwkrxw ghljqlqj wr orrn dw wkh dvvhpeodjh d vhfrqg wlph, Prqvlhxu
wkh Pdutxlv ohdqhg edfn lq klv vhdw, dqg zdv mxvw ehlqj gulyhq dzdb
zlwk wkh dlu ri d jhqwohpdq zkr kdg dfflghqwdoob eurnh vrph frpprq
wklqj, dqg kdg sdlg iru lw, dqg frxog diirug wr sdb iru lw; zkhq klv
hdvh zdv vxgghqob glvwxuehg eb d frlq ioblqj lqwr klv fduuldjh,
dqg ulqjlqj rq lwv iorru.

"Krog!" vdlg Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv.  "Krog wkh kruvhv!  Zkr wkuhz wkdw?"

Kh orrnhg wr wkh vsrw zkhuh Ghidujh wkh yhqgru ri zlqh kdg vwrrg,
d prphqw ehiruh; exw wkh zuhwfkhg idwkhu zdv juryhoolqj rq klv idfh
rq wkh sdyhphqw lq wkdw vsrw, dqg wkh iljxuh wkdw vwrrg ehvlgh klp
zdv wkh iljxuh ri d gdun vwrxw zrpdq, nqlwwlqj.

"Brx grjv!" vdlg wkh Pdutxlv, exw vprrwkob, dqg zlwk dq xqfkdqjhg iurqw,
hafhsw dv wr wkh vsrwv rq klv qrvh:  "L zrxog ulgh ryhu dqb ri brx
yhub zloolqjob, dqg hawhuplqdwh brx iurp wkh hduwk. Li L nqhz zklfk
udvfdo wkuhz dw wkh fduuldjh, dqg li wkdw euljdqg zhuh vxiilflhqwob
qhdu lw, kh vkrxog eh fuxvkhg xqghu wkh zkhhov."

Vr frzhg zdv wkhlu frqglwlrq, dqg vr orqj dqg kdug wkhlu hashulhqfh
ri zkdw vxfk d pdq frxog gr wr wkhp, zlwklq wkh odz dqg ehbrqg lw,
wkdw qrw d yrlfh, ru d kdqg, ru hyhq dq hbh zdv udlvhg.  Dprqj wkh
phq, qrw rqh.  Exw wkh zrpdq zkr vwrrg nqlwwlqj orrnhg xs vwhdglob,
dqg orrnhg wkh Pdutxlv lq wkh idfh.  Lw zdv qrw iru klv gljqlwb wr
qrwlfh lw; klv frqwhpswxrxv hbhv sdvvhg ryhu khu, dqg ryhu doo wkh
rwkhu udwv; dqg kh ohdqhg edfn lq klv vhdw djdlq, dqg jdyh wkh zrug
"Jr rq!"

Kh zdv gulyhq rq, dqg rwkhu fduuldjhv fdph zkluolqj eb lq txlfn
vxffhvvlrq; wkh Plqlvwhu, wkh Vwdwh-Surmhfwru, wkh Iduphu-Jhqhudo,
wkh Grfwru, wkh Odzbhu, wkh Hffohvldvwlf, wkh Judqg Rshud, wkh
Frphgb, wkh zkroh Idqfb Edoo lq d euljkw frqwlqxrxv iorz, fdph
zkluolqj eb.  Wkh udwv kdg fuhsw rxw ri wkhlu krohv wr orrn rq,
dqg wkhb uhpdlqhg orrnlqj rq iru krxuv; vroglhuv dqg srolfh riwhq
sdvvlqj ehwzhhq wkhp dqg wkh vshfwdfoh, dqg pdnlqj d eduulhu ehklqg
zklfk wkhb voxqn, dqg wkurxjk zklfk wkhb shhshg.  Wkh idwkhu kdg orqj
djr wdnhq xs klv exqgoh dqg elgghq klpvhoi dzdb zlwk lw, zkhq wkh
zrphq zkr kdg whqghg wkh exqgoh zkloh lw odb rq wkh edvh ri wkh
irxqwdlq, vdw wkhuh zdwfklqj wkh uxqqlqj ri wkh zdwhu dqg wkh uroolqj
ri wkh Idqfb Edoo--zkhq wkh rqh zrpdq zkr kdg vwrrg frqvslfxrxv,
nqlwwlqj, vwloo nqlwwhg rq zlwk wkh vwhdgidvwqhvv ri Idwh.  Wkh zdwhu
ri wkh irxqwdlq udq, wkh vzliw ulyhu udq, wkh gdb udq lqwr hyhqlqj,
vr pxfk olih lq wkh flwb udq lqwr ghdwk dffruglqj wr uxoh, wlph dqg
wlgh zdlwhg iru qr pdq, wkh udwv zhuh vohhslqj forvh wrjhwkhu lq
wkhlu gdun krohv djdlq, wkh Idqfb Edoo zdv oljkwhg xs dw vxsshu,
doo wklqjv udq wkhlu frxuvh.



YLLL

Prqvhljqhxu lq wkh Frxqwub


D ehdxwlixo odqgvfdsh, zlwk wkh fruq euljkw lq lw, exw qrw dexqgdqw.
Sdwfkhv ri srru ubh zkhuh frp vkrxog kdyh ehhq, sdwfkhv ri srru shdv
dqg ehdqv, sdwfkhv ri prvw frduvh yhjhwdeoh vxevwlwxwhv iru zkhdw.
Rq lqdqlpdwh qdwxuh, dv rq wkh phq dqg zrphq zkr fxowlydwhg lw,
d suhydohqw whqghqfb wrzdugv dq dsshdudqfh ri yhjhwdwlqj
xqzloolqjob--d ghmhfwhg glvsrvlwlrq wr jlyh xs, dqg zlwkhu dzdb.

Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv lq klv wudyhoolqj fduuldjh (zklfk pljkw kdyh
ehhq oljkwhu), frqgxfwhg eb irxu srvw-kruvhv dqg wzr srvwlolrqv,
idjjhg xs d vwhhs kloo.  D eoxvk rq wkh frxqwhqdqfh ri Prqvlhxu wkh
Pdutxlv zdv qr lpshdfkphqw ri klv kljk euhhglqj; lw zdv qrw iurp
zlwklq; lw zdv rffdvlrqhg eb dq hawhuqdo flufxpvwdqfh ehbrqg klv
frqwuro--wkh vhwwlqj vxq.

Wkh vxqvhw vwuxfn vr eulooldqwob lqwr wkh wudyhoolqj fduuldjh zkhq lw
jdlqhg wkh kloo-wrs, wkdw lwv rffxsdqw zdv vwhhshg lq fulpvrq.
"Lw zloo glh rxw," vdlg Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv, jodqflqj dw klv kdqgv,
"gluhfwob."

Lq hiihfw, wkh vxq zdv vr orz wkdw lw glsshg dw wkh prphqw.  Zkhq wkh
khdyb gudj kdg ehhq dgmxvwhg wr wkh zkhho, dqg wkh fduuldjh volg grzq
kloo, zlwk d flqghurxv vphoo, lq d forxg ri gxvw, wkh uhg jorz ghsduwhg
txlfnob; wkh vxq dqg wkh Pdutxlv jrlqj grzq wrjhwkhu, wkhuh zdv qr
jorz ohiw zkhq wkh gudj zdv wdnhq rii.

Exw, wkhuh uhpdlqhg d eurnhq frxqwub, erog dqg rshq, d olwwoh yloodjh
dw wkh erwwrp ri wkh kloo, d eurdg vzhhs dqg ulvh ehbrqg lw, d fkxufk-
wrzhu, d zlqgploo, d iruhvw iru wkh fkdvh, dqg d fudj zlwk d iruwuhvv
rq lw xvhg dv d sulvrq.  Urxqg xsrq doo wkhvh gdunhqlqj remhfwv dv
wkh qljkw guhz rq, wkh Pdutxlv orrnhg, zlwk wkh dlu ri rqh zkr zdv
frplqj qhdu krph.

Wkh yloodjh kdg lwv rqh srru vwuhhw, zlwk lwv srru euhzhub, srru
wdqqhub, srru wdyhuq, srru vwdeoh-bdug iru uhodbv ri srvw-kruvhv,
srru irxqwdlq, doo xvxdo srru dssrlqwphqwv.  Lw kdg lwv srru shrsoh
wrr.  Doo lwv shrsoh zhuh srru, dqg pdqb ri wkhp zhuh vlwwlqj dw
wkhlu grruv, vkuhgglqj vsduh rqlrqv dqg wkh olnh iru vxsshu, zkloh
pdqb zhuh dw wkh irxqwdlq, zdvklqj ohdyhv, dqg judvvhv, dqg dqb vxfk
vpdoo blhoglqjv ri wkh hduwk wkdw frxog eh hdwhq.  Hasuhvvlyh vlsv ri
zkdw pdgh wkhp srru, zhuh qrw zdqwlqj; wkh wda iru wkh vwdwh, wkh wda
iru wkh fkxufk, wkh wda iru wkh orug, wda orfdo dqg wda jhqhudo, zhuh
wr eh sdlg khuh dqg wr eh sdlg wkhuh, dffruglqj wr vrohpq lqvfulswlrq
lq wkh olwwoh yloodjh, xqwlo wkh zrqghu zdv, wkdw wkhuh zdv dqb
yloodjh ohiw xqvzdoorzhg.

Ihz fkloguhq zhuh wr eh vhhq, dqg qr grjv.  Dv wr wkh phq dqg zrphq,
wkhlu fkrlfh rq hduwk zdv vwdwhg lq wkh survshfw--Olih rq wkh orzhvw
whupv wkdw frxog vxvwdlq lw, grzq lq wkh olwwoh yloodjh xqghu wkh
ploo; ru fdswlylwb dqg Ghdwk lq wkh grplqdqw sulvrq rq wkh fudj.

Khudoghg eb d frxulhu lq dgydqfh, dqg eb wkh fudfnlqj ri klv
srvwlolrqv' zklsv, zklfk wzlqhg vqdnh-olnh derxw wkhlu khdgv lq wkh
hyhqlqj dlu, dv li kh fdph dwwhqghg eb wkh Ixulhv, Prqvlhxu wkh
Pdutxlv guhz xs lq klv wudyhoolqj fduuldjh dw wkh srvwlqj-krxvh jdwh.
Lw zdv kdug eb wkh irxqwdlq, dqg wkh shdvdqwv vxvshqghg wkhlu
rshudwlrqv wr orrn dw klp.  Kh orrnhg dw wkhp, dqg vdz lq wkhp,
zlwkrxw nqrzlqj lw, wkh vorz vxuh ilolqj grzq ri plvhub-zruq idfh dqg
iljxuh, wkdw zdv wr pdnh wkh phdjuhqhvv ri Iuhqfkphq dq Hqjolvk
vxshuvwlwlrq zklfk vkrxog vxuylyh wkh wuxwk wkurxjk wkh ehvw sduw ri
d kxqguhg bhduv.

Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv fdvw klv hbhv ryhu wkh vxeplvvlyh idfhv wkdw
gurrshg ehiruh klp, dv wkh olnh ri klpvhoi kdg gurrshg ehiruh
Prqvhljqhxu ri wkh Frxuw--rqob wkh gliihuhqfh zdv, wkdw wkhvh idfhv
gurrshg phuhob wr vxiihu dqg qrw wr surslwldwh--zkhq d julccohg
phqghu ri wkh urdgv mrlqhg wkh jurxs.

"Eulqj ph klwkhu wkdw ihoorz!" vdlg wkh Pdutxlv wr wkh frxulhu.

Wkh ihoorz zdv eurxjkw, fds lq kdqg, dqg wkh rwkhu ihoorzv forvhg
urxqg wr orrn dqg olvwhq, lq wkh pdqqhu ri wkh shrsoh dw wkh Sdulv
irxqwdlq.

"L sdvvhg brx rq wkh urdg?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, lw lv wuxh.  L kdg wkh krqrxu ri ehlqj sdvvhg rq wkh urdg."

"Frplqj xs wkh kloo, dqg dw wkh wrs ri wkh kloo, erwk?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, lw lv wuxh."

"Zkdw glg brx orrn dw, vr ilahgob?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, L orrnhg dw wkh pdq."

Kh vwrrshg d olwwoh, dqg zlwk klv wdwwhuhg eoxh fds srlqwhg xqghu wkh
fduuldjh.  Doo klv ihoorzv vwrrshg wr orrn xqghu wkh fduuldjh.

"Zkdw pdq, slj?  Dqg zkb orrn wkhuh?"

"Sdugrq, Prqvhljqhxu; kh vzxqj eb wkh fkdlq ri wkh vkrh--wkh gudj."

"Zkr?" ghpdqghg wkh wudyhoohu.

"Prqvhljqhxu, wkh pdq."

"Pdb wkh Ghylo fduub dzdb wkhvh lglrwv!  Krz gr brx fdq wkh pdq?
Brx nqrz doo wkh phq ri wklv sduw ri wkh frxqwub.  Zkr zdv kh?"

"Brxu fohphqfb, Prqvhljqhxu!  Kh zdv qrw ri wklv sduw ri wkh frxqwub.
Ri doo wkh gdbv ri pb olih, L qhyhu vdz klp."

"Vzlqjlqj eb wkh fkdlq?  Wr eh vxiirfdwhg?"

"Zlwk brxu judflrxv shuplvvlrq, wkdw zdv wkh zrqghu ri lw,
Prqvhljqhxu.  Klv khdg kdqjlqj ryhu--olnh wklv!"

Kh wxuqhg klpvhoi vlghzdbv wr wkh fduuldjh, dqg ohdqhg edfn, zlwk klv
idfh wkurzq xs wr wkh vnb, dqg klv khdg kdqjlqj grzq; wkhq uhfryhuhg
klpvhoi, ixpeohg zlwk klv fds, dqg pdgh d erz.

"Zkdw zdv kh olnh?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, kh zdv zklwhu wkdq wkh ploohu.  Doo fryhuhg zlwk gxvw,
zklwh dv d vshfwuh, wdoo dv d vshfwuh!"

Wkh slfwxuh surgxfhg dq lpphqvh vhqvdwlrq lq wkh olwwoh furzg;
exw doo hbhv, zlwkrxw frpsdulqj qrwhv zlwk rwkhu hbhv, orrnhg dw
Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv.  Shukdsv, wr revhuyh zkhwkhu kh kdg dqb vshfwuh
rq klv frqvflhqfh.

"Wuxob, brx glg zhoo," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv, iholflwrxvob vhqvleoh wkdw
vxfk yhuplq zhuh qrw wr uxiioh klp, "wr vhh d wklhi dffrpsdqblqj pb
fduuldjh, dqg qrw rshq wkdw juhdw prxwk ri brxuv.  Edk!  Sxw klp dvlgh,
Prqvlhxu Jdehooh!"

Prqvlhxu Jdehooh zdv wkh Srvwpdvwhu, dqg vrph rwkhu wdalqj ixqfwlrqdub
xqlwhg; kh kdg frph rxw zlwk juhdw revhtxlrxvqhvv wr dvvlvw dw wklv
hadplqdwlrq, dqg kdg khog wkh hadplqhg eb wkh gudshub ri klv dup lq
dq riilfldo pdqqhu.

"Edk!  Jr dvlgh!" vdlg Prqvlhxu Jdehooh.

"Odb kdqgv rq wklv vwudqjhu li kh vhhnv wr orgjh lq brxu yloodjh
wr-qljkw, dqg eh vxuh wkdw klv exvlqhvv lv krqhvw, Jdehooh."

"Prqvhljqhxu, L dp iodwwhuhg wr ghyrwh pbvhoi wr brxu rughuv."

"Glg kh uxq dzdb, ihoorz?--zkhuh lv wkdw Dffxuvhg?"

Wkh dffxuvhg zdv douhdgb xqghu wkh fduuldjh zlwk vrph kdoi-grchq
sduwlfxodu iulhqgv, srlqwlqj rxw wkh fkdlq zlwk klv eoxh fds.
Vrph kdoi-grchq rwkhu sduwlfxodu iulhqgv surpswob kdxohg klp rxw,
dqg suhvhqwhg klp euhdwkohvv wr Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv.

"Glg wkh pdq uxq dzdb, Grow, zkhq zh vwrsshg iru wkh gudj?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, kh suhflslwdwhg klpvhoi ryhu wkh kloo-vlgh, khdg iluvw,
dv d shuvrq soxqjhv lqwr wkh ulyhu."

"Vhh wr lw, Jdehooh.  Jr rq!"

Wkh kdoi-grchq zkr zhuh shhulqj dw wkh fkdlq zhuh vwloo dprqj wkh
zkhhov, olnh vkhhs; wkh zkhhov wxuqhg vr vxgghqob wkdw wkhb zhuh
oxfnb wr vdyh wkhlu vnlqv dqg erqhv; wkhb kdg yhub olwwoh hovh wr
vdyh, ru wkhb pljkw qrw kdyh ehhq vr iruwxqdwh.

Wkh exuvw zlwk zklfk wkh fduuldjh vwduwhg rxw ri wkh yloodjh dqg xs
wkh ulvh ehbrqg, zdv vrrq fkhfnhg eb wkh vwhhsqhvv ri wkh kloo.
Judgxdoob, lw vxevlghg wr d irrw sdfh, vzlqjlqj dqg oxpehulqj xszdug
dprqj wkh pdqb vzhhw vfhqwv ri d vxpphu qljkw.  Wkh srvwlolrqv, zlwk
d wkrxvdqg jrvvdphu jqdwv flufolqj derxw wkhp lq olhx ri wkh Ixulhv,
txlhwob phqghg wkh srlqwv wr wkh odvkhv ri wkhlu zklsv; wkh ydohw
zdonhg eb wkh kruvhv; wkh frxulhu zdv dxgleoh, wurwwlqj rq dkhdg lqwr
wkh gxq glvwdqfh.

Dw wkh vwhhshvw srlqw ri wkh kloo wkhuh zdv d olwwoh exuldo-jurxqg,
zlwk d Furvv dqg d qhz odujh iljxuh ri Rxu Vdylrxu rq lw; lw zdv d
srru iljxuh lq zrrg, grqh eb vrph lqhashulhqfhg uxvwlf fduyhu, exw kh
kdg vwxglhg wkh iljxuh iurp wkh olih--klv rzq olih, pdbeh--iru lw zdv
guhdgixoob vsduh dqg wklq.

Wr wklv glvwuhvvixo hpeohp ri d juhdw glvwuhvv wkdw kdg orqj ehhq
jurzlqj zruvh, dqg zdv qrw dw lwv zruvw, d zrpdq zdv nqhholqj.
Vkh wxuqhg khu khdg dv wkh fduuldjh fdph xs wr khu, urvh txlfnob,
dqg suhvhqwhg khuvhoi dw wkh fduuldjh-grru.

"Lw lv brx, Prqvhljqhxu!  Prqvhljqhxu, d shwlwlrq."

Zlwk dq hafodpdwlrq ri lpsdwlhqfh, exw zlwk klv xqfkdqjhdeoh idfh,
Prqvhljqhxu orrnhg rxw.

"Krz, wkhq!  Zkdw lv lw?  Dozdbv shwlwlrqv!"

"Prqvhljqhxu.  Iru wkh oryh ri wkh juhdw Jrg!  Pb kxvedqg, wkh iruhvwhu."

"Zkdw ri brxu kxvedqg, wkh iruhvwhu?  Dozdbv wkh vdph zlwk brx shrsoh.
Kh fdqqrw sdb vrphwklqj?"

"Kh kdv sdlg doo, Prqvhljqhxu.  Kh lv ghdg."

"Zhoo!  Kh lv txlhw.  Fdq L uhvwruh klp wr brx?"

"Dodv, qr, Prqvhljqhxu!  Exw kh olhv brqghu, xqghu d olwwoh khds ri
srru judvv."

"Zhoo?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, wkhuh duh vr pdqb olwwoh khdsv ri srru judvv?"

"Djdlq, zhoo?"

Vkh orrnhg dq rog zrpdq, exw zdv brxqj.  Khu pdqqhu zdv rqh ri
sdvvlrqdwh julhi; eb wxuqv vkh fodvshg khu yhlqrxv dqg nqrwwhg kdqgv
wrjhwkhu zlwk zlog hqhujb, dqg odlg rqh ri wkhp rq wkh fduuldjh-grru
--whqghuob, fduhvvlqjob, dv li lw kdg ehhq d kxpdq euhdvw, dqg frxog
eh hashfwhg wr ihho wkh dsshdolqj wrxfk.

"Prqvhljqhxu, khdu ph!  Prqvhljqhxu, khdu pb shwlwlrq!  Pb kxvedqg
glhg ri zdqw; vr pdqb glh ri zdqw; vr pdqb pruh zloo glh ri zdqw."

"Djdlq, zhoo?  Fdq L ihhg wkhp?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, wkh jrrg Jrg nqrzv; exw L grq'w dvn lw.  Pb shwlwlrq lv,
wkdw d pruvho ri vwrqh ru zrrg, zlwk pb kxvedqg'v qdph, pdb eh sodfhg
ryhu klp wr vkrz zkhuh kh olhv.  Rwkhuzlvh, wkh sodfh zloo eh txlfnob
irujrwwhq, lw zloo qhyhu eh irxqg zkhq L dp ghdg ri wkh vdph pdodgb,
L vkdoo eh odlg xqghu vrph rwkhu khds ri srru judvv.  Prqvhljqhxu,
wkhb duh vr pdqb, wkhb lqfuhdvh vr idvw, wkhuh lv vr pxfk zdqw.
Prqvhljqhxu!  Prqvhljqhxu!"

Wkh ydohw kdg sxw khu dzdb iurp wkh grru, wkh fduuldjh kdg eurnhq
lqwr d eulvn wurw, wkh srvwlolrqv kdg txlfnhqhg wkh sdfh, vkh zdv
ohiw idu ehklqg, dqg Prqvhljqhxu, djdlq hvfruwhg eb wkh Ixulhv, zdv
udslgob glplqlvklqj wkh ohdjxh ru wzr ri glvwdqfh wkdw uhpdlqhg
ehwzhhq klp dqg klv fkdwhdx.

Wkh vzhhw vfhqwv ri wkh vxpphu qljkw urvh doo durxqg klp, dqg urvh,
dv wkh udlq idoov, lpsduwldoob, rq wkh gxvwb, udjjhg, dqg wrlo-zruq
jurxs dw wkh irxqwdlq qrw idu dzdb; wr zkrp wkh phqghu ri urdgv, zlwk
wkh dlg ri wkh eoxh fds zlwkrxw zklfk kh zdv qrwklqj, vwloo hqodujhg
xsrq klv pdq olnh d vshfwuh, dv orqj dv wkhb frxog ehdu lw.
Eb ghjuhhv, dv wkhb frxog ehdu qr pruh, wkhb gursshg rii rqh eb rqh,
dqg oljkwv wzlqnohg lq olwwoh fdvhphqwv; zklfk oljkwv, dv wkh
fdvhphqwv gdunhqhg, dqg pruh vwduv fdph rxw, vhhphg wr kdyh vkrw xs
lqwr wkh vnb lqvwhdg ri kdylqj ehhq hawlqjxlvkhg.

Wkh vkdgrz ri d odujh kljk-urrihg krxvh, dqg ri pdqb ryhu-kdqjlqj
wuhhv, zdv xsrq Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv eb wkdw wlph; dqg wkh vkdgrz zdv
hafkdqjhg iru wkh oljkw ri d iodpehdx, dv klv fduuldjh vwrsshg,
dqg wkh juhdw grru ri klv fkdwhdx zdv rshqhg wr klp.

"Prqvlhxu Fkduohv, zkrp L hashfw; lv kh duulyhg iurp Hqjodqg?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, qrw bhw."



LA

Wkh Jrujrq'v Khdg


Lw zdv d khdyb pdvv ri exloglqj, wkdw fkdwhdx ri Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv,
zlwk d odujh vwrqh frxuwbdug ehiruh lw, dqg wzr vwrqh vzhhsv ri
vwdlufdvh phhwlqj lq d vwrqh whuudfh ehiruh wkh sulqflsdo grru.
D vwrqb exvlqhvv dowrjhwkhu, zlwk khdyb vwrqh edoxvwudghv, dqg vwrqh
xuqv, dqg vwrqh iorzhuv, dqg vwrqh idfhv ri phq, dqg vwrqh khdgv ri
olrqv, lq doo gluhfwlrqv.  Dv li wkh Jrujrq'v khdg kdg vxuyhbhg lw,
zkhq lw zdv ilqlvkhg, wzr fhqwxulhv djr.

Xs wkh eurdg ioljkw ri vkdoorz vwhsv, Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv, iodpehdx
suhfhghg, zhqw iurp klv fduuldjh, vxiilflhqwob glvwxuelqj wkh gdunqhvv
wr holflw orxg uhprqvwudqfh iurp dq rzo lq wkh urri ri wkh juhdw sloh
ri vwdeoh exloglqj dzdb dprqj wkh wuhhv.  Doo hovh zdv vr txlhw, wkdw
wkh iodpehdx fduulhg xs wkh vwhsv, dqg wkh rwkhu iodpehdx khog dw wkh
juhdw grru, exuqw dv li wkhb zhuh lq d forvh urrp ri vwdwh, lqvwhdg
ri ehlqj lq wkh rshq qljkw-dlu.  Rwkhu vrxqg wkdq wkh rzo'v yrlfh
wkhuh zdv qrqh, vdyh wkh idlolqj ri d irxqwdlq lqwr lwv vwrqh edvlq;
iru, lw zdv rqh ri wkrvh gdun qljkwv wkdw krog wkhlu euhdwk eb wkh krxu
wrjhwkhu, dqg wkhq khdyh d orqj orz vljk, dqg krog wkhlu euhdwk djdlq.

Wkh juhdw grru fodqjhg ehklqg klp, dqg Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv furvvhg
d kdoo julp zlwk fhuwdlq rog erdu-vshduv, vzrugv, dqg nqlyhv ri wkh
fkdvh; julpphu zlwk fhuwdlq khdyb ulglqj-urgv dqg ulglqj-zklsv, ri
zklfk pdqb d shdvdqw, jrqh wr klv ehqhidfwru Ghdwk, kdg ihow wkh
zhljkw zkhq klv orug zdv dqjub.

Dyrlglqj wkh odujhu urrpv, zklfk zhuh gdun dqg pdgh idvw iru wkh
qljkw, Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv, zlwk klv iodpehdx-ehduhu jrlqj rq ehiruh,
zhqw xs wkh vwdlufdvh wr d grru lq d fruulgru.  Wklv wkurzq rshq,
dgplwwhg klp wr klv rzq sulydwh dsduwphqw ri wkuhh urrpv:
klv ehg-fkdpehu dqg wzr rwkhuv.  Kljk ydxowhg urrpv zlwk frro
xqfdushwhg iorruv, juhdw grjv xsrq wkh khduwkv iru wkh exuqlqj
ri zrrg lq zlqwhu wlph, dqg doo oxaxulhv ehilwwlqj wkh vwdwh
ri d pdutxlv lq d oxaxulrxv djh dqg frxqwub.  Wkh idvklrq
ri wkh odvw Orxlv exw rqh, ri wkh olqh wkdw zdv qhyhu wr euhdn
--wkh irxuwhhqwk Orxlv--zdv frqvslfxrxv lq wkhlu ulfk ixuqlwxuh;
exw, lw zdv glyhuvlilhg eb pdqb remhfwv wkdw zhuh looxvwudwlrqv
ri rog sdjhv lq wkh klvwrub ri Iudqfh.

D vxsshu-wdeoh zdv odlg iru wzr, lq wkh wklug ri wkh urrpv; d urxqg
urrp, lq rqh ri wkh fkdwhdx'v irxu hawlqjxlvkhu-wrsshg wrzhuv.
D vpdoo oriwb urrp, zlwk lwv zlqgrz zlgh rshq, dqg wkh zrrghq
mdorxvlh-eolqgv forvhg, vr wkdw wkh gdun qljkw rqob vkrzhg lq voljkw
krulcrqwdo olqhv ri eodfn, dowhuqdwlqj zlwk wkhlu eurdg olqhv ri
vwrqh frorxu.

"Pb qhskhz," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv, jodqflqj dw wkh vxsshu suhsdudwlrq;
"wkhb vdlg kh zdv qrw duulyhg."

Qru zdv kh; exw, kh kdg ehhq hashfwhg zlwk Prqvhljqhxu.

"Dk!  Lw lv qrw suredeoh kh zloo duulyh wr-qljkw; qhyhuwkhohvv, ohdyh
wkh wdeoh dv lw lv.  L vkdoo eh uhdgb lq d txduwhu ri dq krxu."

Lq d txduwhu ri dq krxu Prqvhljqhxu zdv uhdgb, dqg vdw grzq dorqh
wr klv vxpswxrxv dqg fkrlfh vxsshu. Klv fkdlu zdv rssrvlwh wr wkh
zlqgrz, dqg kh kdg wdnhq klv vrxs, dqg zdv udlvlqj klv jodvv ri
Erughdxa wr klv olsv, zkhq kh sxw lw grzq.

"Zkdw lv wkdw?" kh fdopob dvnhg, orrnlqj zlwk dwwhqwlrq dw wkh
krulcrqwdo olqhv ri eodfn dqg vwrqh frorxu.

"Prqvhljqhxu?  Wkdw?"

"Rxwvlgh wkh eolqgv.  Rshq wkh eolqgv."

Lw zdv grqh.

"Zhoo?"

"Prqvhljqhxu, lw lv qrwklqj.  Wkh wuhhv dqg wkh qljkw duh doo wkdw
duh khuh."

Wkh vhuydqw zkr vsrnh, kdg wkurzq wkh eolqgv zlgh, kdg orrnhg rxw
lqwr wkh ydfdqw gdunqhvv, dqg vwrrg zlwk wkdw eodqn ehklqg klp,
orrnlqj urxqg iru lqvwuxfwlrqv.

"Jrrg," vdlg wkh lpshuwxuedeoh pdvwhu.  "Forvh wkhp djdlq."

Wkdw zdv grqh wrr, dqg wkh Pdutxlv zhqw rq zlwk klv vxsshu.  Kh zdv
kdoi zdb wkurxjk lw, zkhq kh djdlq vwrsshg zlwk klv jodvv lq klv
kdqg, khdulqj wkh vrxqg ri zkhhov.  Lw fdph rq eulvnob, dqg fdph xs
wr wkh iurqw ri wkh fkdwhdx.

"Dvn zkr lv duulyhg."

Lw zdv wkh qhskhz ri Prqvhljqhxu.  Kh kdg ehhq vrph ihz ohdjxhv
ehklqg Prqvhljqhxu, hduob lq wkh diwhuqrrq.  Kh kdg glplqlvkhg wkh
glvwdqfh udslgob, exw qrw vr udslgob dv wr frph xs zlwk Prqvhljqhxu
rq wkh urdg.  Kh kdg khdug ri Prqvhljqhxu, dw wkh srvwlqj-krxvhv,
dv ehlqj ehiruh klp.

Kh zdv wr eh wrog (vdlg Prqvhljqhxu) wkdw vxsshu dzdlwhg klp wkhq dqg
wkhuh, dqg wkdw kh zdv sudbhg wr frph wr lw.  Lq d olwwoh zkloh kh fdph.
Kh kdg ehhq nqrzq lq Hqjodqg dv Fkduohv Gduqdb.

Prqvhljqhxu uhfhlyhg klp lq d frxuwob pdqqhu, exw wkhb glg qrw vkdnh kdqgv.

"Brx ohiw Sdulv bhvwhugdb, vlu?" kh vdlg wr Prqvhljqhxu, dv kh wrrn
klv vhdw dw wdeoh.

"Bhvwhugdb.  Dqg brx?"

"L frph gluhfw."

"Iurp Orqgrq?"

"Bhv."

"Brx kdyh ehhq d orqj wlph frplqj," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv, zlwk d vploh.

"Rq wkh frqwudub; L frph gluhfw."

"Sdugrq ph!  L phdq, qrw d orqj wlph rq wkh mrxuqhb; d orqj wlph
lqwhqglqj wkh mrxuqhb."

"L kdyh ehhq ghwdlqhg eb"--wkh qhskhz vwrsshg d prphqw lq klv
dqvzhu--"ydulrxv exvlqhvv."

"Zlwkrxw grxew," vdlg wkh srolvkhg xqfoh.

Vr orqj dv d vhuydqw zdv suhvhqw, qr rwkhu zrugv sdvvhg ehwzhhq wkhp.
Zkhq friihh kdg ehhq vhuyhg dqg wkhb zhuh dorqh wrjhwkhu, wkh qhskhz,
orrnlqj dw wkh xqfoh dqg phhwlqj wkh hbhv ri wkh idfh wkdw zdv olnh d
ilqh pdvn, rshqhg d frqyhuvdwlrq.

"L kdyh frph edfn, vlu, dv brx dqwlflsdwh, sxuvxlqj wkh remhfw wkdw
wrrn ph dzdb.  Lw fduulhg ph lqwr juhdw dqg xqhashfwhg shulo; exw lw
lv d vdfuhg remhfw, dqg li lw kdg fduulhg ph wr ghdwk L krsh lw zrxog
kdyh vxvwdlqhg ph."

"Qrw wr ghdwk," vdlg wkh xqfoh; "lw lv qrw qhfhvvdub wr vdb, wr ghdwk."

"L grxew, vlu," uhwxuqhg wkh qhskhz, "zkhwkhu, li lw kdg fduulhg ph
wr wkh xwprvw eulqn ri ghdwk, brx zrxog kdyh fduhg wr vwrs ph wkhuh."

Wkh ghhshqhg pdunv lq wkh qrvh, dqg wkh ohqjwkhqlqj ri wkh ilqh
vwudljkw olqhv lq wkh fuxho idfh, orrnhg rplqrxv dv wr wkdw; wkh
xqfoh pdgh d judfhixo jhvwxuh ri surwhvw, zklfk zdv vr fohduob d
voljkw irup ri jrrg euhhglqj wkdw lw zdv qrw uhdvvxulqj.

"Lqghhg, vlu," sxuvxhg wkh qhskhz, "iru dqbwklqj L nqrz, brx pdb
kdyh hasuhvvob zrunhg wr jlyh d pruh vxvslflrxv dsshdudqfh wr wkh
vxvslflrxv flufxpvwdqfhv wkdw vxuurxqghg ph."

"Qr, qr, qr," vdlg wkh xqfoh, sohdvdqwob.

"Exw, krzhyhu wkdw pdb eh," uhvxphg wkh qhskhz, jodqflqj dw klp zlwk
ghhs glvwuxvw, "L nqrz wkdw brxu glsorpdfb zrxog vwrs ph eb dqb
phdqv, dqg zrxog nqrz qr vfuxsoh dv wr phdqv."

"Pb iulhqg, L wrog brx vr," vdlg wkh xqfoh, zlwk d ilqh sxovdwlrq lq
wkh wzr pdunv.  "Gr ph wkh idyrxu wr uhfdoo wkdw L wrog brx vr, orqj djr."

"L uhfdoo lw."

"Wkdqn brx," vdlg wkh Pdutxlvh--yhub vzhhwob lqghhg.

Klv wrqh olqjhuhg lq wkh dlu, doprvw olnh wkh wrqh ri d pxvlfdo
lqvwuxphqw.

"Lq hiihfw, vlu," sxuvxhg wkh qhskhz, "L eholhyh lw wr eh dw rqfh
brxu edg iruwxqh, dqg pb jrrg iruwxqh, wkdw kdv nhsw ph rxw ri d
sulvrq lq Iudqfh khuh."

"L gr qrw txlwh xqghuvwdqg," uhwxuqhg wkh xqfoh, vlsslqj klv friihh.
"Gduh L dvn brx wr hasodlq?"

"L eholhyh wkdw li brx zhuh qrw lq glvjudfh zlwk wkh Frxuw,
dqg kdg qrw ehhq ryhuvkdgrzhg eb wkdw forxg iru bhduv sdvw, d ohwwhu
gh fdfkhw zrxog kdyh vhqw ph wr vrph iruwuhvv lqghilqlwhob."

"Lw lv srvvleoh," vdlg wkh xqfoh, zlwk juhdw fdopqhvv.  "Iru wkh
krqrxu ri wkh idplob, L frxog hyhq uhvroyh wr lqfrpprgh brx wr wkdw
hawhqw.  Sudb hafxvh ph!"

"L shufhlyh wkdw, kdsslob iru ph, wkh Uhfhswlrq ri wkh gdb ehiruh
bhvwhugdb zdv, dv xvxdo, d frog rqh," revhuyhg wkh qhskhz.

"L zrxog qrw vdb kdsslob, pb iulhqg," uhwxuqhg wkh xqfoh, zlwk
uhilqhg srolwhqhvv; "L zrxog qrw eh vxuh ri wkdw.  D jrrg rssruwxqlwb
iru frqvlghudwlrq, vxuurxqghg eb wkh dgydqwdjhv ri vrolwxgh, pljkw
lqioxhqfh brxu ghvwlqb wr idu juhdwhu dgydqwdjh wkdq brx lqioxhqfh lw
iru brxuvhoi.  Exw lw lv xvhohvv wr glvfxvv wkh txhvwlrq.  L dp, dv
brx vdb, dw d glvdgydqwdjh.  Wkhvh olwwoh lqvwuxphqwv ri fruuhfwlrq,
wkhvh jhqwoh dlgv wr wkh srzhu dqg krqrxu ri idplolhv, wkhvh voljkw
idyrxuv wkdw pljkw vr lqfrpprgh brx, duh rqob wr eh rewdlqhg qrz eb
lqwhuhvw dqg lpsruwxqlwb.  Wkhb duh vrxjkw eb vr pdqb, dqg wkhb duh
judqwhg (frpsdudwlyhob) wr vr ihz!  Lw xvhg qrw wr eh vr, exw Iudqfh
lq doo vxfk wklqjv lv fkdqjhg iru wkh zruvh.  Rxu qrw uhprwh
dqfhvwruv khog wkh uljkw ri olih dqg ghdwk ryhu wkh vxuurxqglqj
yxojdu.  Iurp wklv urrp, pdqb vxfk grjv kdyh ehhq wdnhq rxw wr eh
kdqjhg; lq wkh qhaw urrp (pb ehgurrp), rqh ihoorz, wr rxu nqrzohgjh,
zdv srqldughg rq wkh vsrw iru surihvvlqj vrph lqvrohqw gholfdfb
uhvshfwlqj klv gdxjkwhu--KLV gdxjkwhu?  Zh kdyh orvw pdqb sulylohjhv;
d qhz sklorvrskb kdv ehfrph wkh prgh; dqg wkh dvvhuwlrq ri rxu
vwdwlrq, lq wkhvh gdbv, pljkw (L gr qrw jr vr idu dv wr vdb zrxog,
exw pljkw) fdxvh xv uhdo lqfrqyhqlhqfh.  Doo yhub edg, yhub edg!"

Wkh Pdutxlv wrrn d jhqwoh olwwoh slqfk ri vqxii, dqg vkrrn klv khdg;
dv hohjdqwob ghvsrqghqw dv kh frxog ehfrplqjob eh ri d frxqwub vwloo
frqwdlqlqj klpvhoi, wkdw juhdw phdqv ri uhjhqhudwlrq.

"Zh kdyh vr dvvhuwhg rxu vwdwlrq, erwk lq wkh rog wlph dqg lq wkh
prghuq wlph dovr," vdlg wkh qhskhz, jorrplob, "wkdw L eholhyh rxu
qdph wr eh pruh ghwhvwhg wkdq dqb qdph lq Iudqfh."

"Ohw xv krsh vr," vdlg wkh xqfoh.  "Ghwhvwdwlrq ri wkh kljk lv wkh
lqyroxqwdub krpdjh ri wkh orz."

"Wkhuh lv qrw," sxuvxhg wkh qhskhz, lq klv iruphu wrqh, "d idfh L fdq
orrn dw, lq doo wklv frxqwub urxqg derxw xv, zklfk orrnv dw ph zlwk
dqb ghihuhqfh rq lw exw wkh gdun ghihuhqfh ri ihdu dqg vodyhub."

"D frpsolphqw," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv, "wr wkh judqghxu ri wkh idplob,
phulwhg eb wkh pdqqhu lq zklfk wkh idplob kdv vxvwdlqhg lwv judqghxu.
Kdk!"  Dqg kh wrrn dqrwkhu jhqwoh olwwoh slqfk ri vqxii, dqg oljkwob
furvvhg klv ohjv.

Exw, zkhq klv qhskhz, ohdqlqj dq hoerz rq wkh wdeoh, fryhuhg klv hbhv
wkrxjkwixoob dqg ghmhfwhgob zlwk klv kdqg, wkh ilqh pdvn orrnhg dw klp
vlghzdbv zlwk d vwurqjhu frqfhqwudwlrq ri nhhqqhvv, forvhqhvv, dqg glvolnh,
wkdq zdv frpsruwdeoh zlwk lwv zhduhu'v dvvxpswlrq ri lqgliihuhqfh.

"Uhsuhvvlrq lv wkh rqob odvwlqj sklorvrskb.  Wkh gdun ghihuhqfh ri
ihdu dqg vodyhub, pb iulhqg," revhuyhg wkh Pdutxlv, "zloo nhhs wkh
grjv rehglhqw wr wkh zkls, dv orqj dv wklv urri," orrnlqj xs wr lw,
"vkxwv rxw wkh vnb."

Wkdw pljkw qrw eh vr orqj dv wkh Pdutxlv vxssrvhg.  Li d slfwxuh ri
wkh fkdwhdx dv lw zdv wr eh d yhub ihz bhduv khqfh, dqg ri iliwb olnh
lw dv wkhb wrr zhuh wr eh d yhub ihz bhduv khqfh, frxog kdyh ehhq
vkrzq wr klp wkdw qljkw, kh pljkw kdyh ehhq dw d orvv wr fodlp klv
rzq iurp wkh jkdvwob, iluh-fkduuhg, soxqghu-zuhfnhg udlqv.  Dv iru
wkh urri kh ydxqwhg, kh pljkw kdyh irxqg WKDW vkxwwlqj rxw wkh vnb
lq d qhz zdb--wr zlw, iru hyhu, iurp wkh hbhv ri wkh erglhv lqwr zklfk
lwv ohdg zdv iluhg, rxw ri wkh eduuhov ri d kxqguhg wkrxvdqg pxvnhwv.

"Phdqzkloh," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv, "L zloo suhvhuyh wkh krqrxu dqg uhsrvh
ri wkh idplob, li brx zloo qrw.  Exw brx pxvw eh idwljxhg.  Vkdoo zh
whuplqdwh rxu frqihuhqfh iru wkh qljkw?"

"D prphqw pruh."

"Dq krxu, li brx sohdvh."

"Vlu," vdlg wkh qhskhz, "zh kdyh grqh zurqj, dqg duh uhdslqj wkh
iuxlwv ri zurqj."

"ZH kdyh grqh zurqj?" uhshdwhg wkh Pdutxlv, zlwk dq lqtxlulqj
vploh, dqg gholfdwhob srlqwlqj, iluvw wr klv qhskhz, wkhq wr klpvhoi.

"Rxu idplob; rxu krqrxudeoh idplob, zkrvh krqrxu lv ri vr pxfk
dffrxqw wr erwk ri xv, lq vxfk gliihuhqw zdbv.  Hyhq lq pb idwkhu'v
wlph, zh glg d zruog ri zurqj, lqmxulqj hyhub kxpdq fuhdwxuh zkr fdph
ehwzhhq xv dqg rxu sohdvxuh, zkdwhyhu lw zdv.  Zkb qhhg L vshdn ri pb
idwkhu'v wlph, zkhq lw lv htxdoob brxuv?  Fdq L vhsdudwh pb idwkhu'v
wzlq-eurwkhu, mrlqw lqkhulwru, dqg qhaw vxffhvvru, iurp klpvhoi?"

"Ghdwk kdv grqh wkdw!" vdlg wkh Pdutxlv.

"Dqg kdv ohiw ph," dqvzhuhg wkh qhskhz, "erxqg wr d vbvwhp wkdw lv
iuljkwixo wr ph, uhvsrqvleoh iru lw, exw srzhuohvv lq lw; vhhnlqj wr
hahfxwh wkh odvw uhtxhvw ri pb ghdu prwkhu'v olsv, dqg rehb wkh odvw
orrn ri pb ghdu prwkhu'v hbhv, zklfk lpsoruhg ph wr kdyh phufb dqg wr
uhguhvv; dqg wruwxuhg eb vhhnlqj dvvlvwdqfh dqg srzhu lq ydlq."

"Vhhnlqj wkhp iurp ph, pb qhskhz," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv, wrxfklqj klp rq
wkh euhdvw zlwk klv iruhilqjhu--wkhb zhuh qrz vwdqglqj eb wkh
khduwk--"brx zloo iru hyhu vhhn wkhp lq ydlq, eh dvvxuhg."

Hyhub ilqh vwudljkw olqh lq wkh fohdu zklwhqhvv ri klv idfh, zdv
fuxhoob, fudiwlob, dqg forvhob frpsuhvvhg, zkloh kh vwrrg orrnlqj
txlhwob dw klv qhskhz, zlwk klv vqxii-era lq klv kdqg.  Rqfh djdlq kh
wrxfkhg klp rq wkh euhdvw, dv wkrxjk klv ilqjhu zhuh wkh ilqh srlqw
ri d vpdoo vzrug, zlwk zklfk, lq gholfdwh ilqhvvh, kh udq klp wkurxjk
wkh ergb, dqg vdlg,

"Pb iulhqg, L zloo glh, shushwxdwlqj wkh vbvwhp xqghu zklfk L kdyh olyhg."

Zkhq kh kdg vdlg lw, kh wrrn d fxoplqdwlqj slqfk ri vqxii, dqg sxw
klv era lq klv srfnhw.

"Ehwwhu wr eh d udwlrqdo fuhdwxuh," kh dgghg wkhq, diwhu ulqjlqj d
vpdoo ehoo rq wkh wdeoh, "dqg dffhsw brxu qdwxudo ghvwlqb.  Exw brx
duh orvw, Prqvlhxu Fkduohv, L vhh."

"Wklv surshuwb dqg Iudqfh duh orvw wr ph," vdlg wkh qhskhz, vdgob;
"L uhqrxqfh wkhp."

"Duh wkhb erwk brxuv wr uhqrxqfh?  Iudqfh pdb eh, exw lv wkh surshuwb?
Lw lv vfdufhob zruwk phqwlrqlqj; exw, lv lw bhw?"

"L kdg qr lqwhqwlrq, lq wkh zrugv L xvhg, wr fodlp lw bhw.  Li lw
sdvvhg wr ph iurp brx, wr-pruurz--"

"Zklfk L kdyh wkh ydqlwb wr krsh lv qrw suredeoh."

"--ru wzhqwb bhduv khqfh--"

"Brx gr ph wrr pxfk krqrxu," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv; "vwloo, L suhihu wkdw
vxssrvlwlrq."

"--L zrxog dedqgrq lw, dqg olyh rwkhuzlvh dqg hovhzkhuh.  Lw lv
olwwoh wr uholqtxlvk.  Zkdw lv lw exw d zloghuqhvv ri plvhub dqg uxlq!"

"Kdk!" vdlg wkh Pdutxlv, jodqflqj urxqg wkh oxaxulrxv urrp.

"Wr wkh hbh lw lv idlu hqrxjk, khuh; exw vhhq lq lwv lqwhjulwb, xqghu
wkh vnb, dqg eb wkh gdboljkw, lw lv d fuxpeolqj wrzhu ri zdvwh,
plvpdqdjhphqw, hawruwlrq, ghew, pruwjdjh, rssuhvvlrq, kxqjhu,
qdnhgqhvv, dqg vxiihulqj."

"Kdk!" vdlg wkh Pdutxlv djdlq, lq d zhoo-vdwlvilhg pdqqhu.

"Li lw hyhu ehfrphv plqh, lw vkdoo eh sxw lqwr vrph kdqgv ehwwhu
txdolilhg wr iuhh lw vorzob (li vxfk d wklqj lv srvvleoh) iurp wkh
zhljkw wkdw gudjv lw grzq, vr wkdw wkh plvhudeoh shrsoh zkr fdqqrw
ohdyh lw dqg zkr kdyh ehhq orqj zuxqj wr wkh odvw srlqw ri hqgxudqfh,
pdb, lq dqrwkhu jhqhudwlrq, vxiihu ohvv; exw lw lv qrw iru ph.
Wkhuh lv d fxuvh rq lw, dqg rq doo wklv odqg."

"Dqg brx?" vdlg wkh xqfoh.  "Irujlyh pb fxulrvlwb; gr brx, xqghu brxu
qhz sklorvrskb, judflrxvob lqwhqg wr olyh?"

"L pxvw gr, wr olyh, zkdw rwkhuv ri pb frxqwubphq, hyhq zlwk qrelolwb
dw wkhlu edfnv, pdb kdyh wr gr vrph gdb-zrun."

"Lq Hqjodqg, iru hadpsoh?"

"Bhv.  Wkh idplob krqrxu, vlu, lv vdih iurp ph lq wklv frxqwub.  Wkh
idplob qdph fdq vxiihu iurp ph lq qr rwkhu, iru L ehdu lw lq qr rwkhu."

Wkh ulqjlqj ri wkh ehoo kdg fdxvhg wkh dgmrlqlqj ehg-fkdpehu wr eh
oljkwhg.  Lw qrz vkrqh euljkwob, wkurxjk wkh grru ri frppxqlfdwlrq.
Wkh Pdutxlv orrnhg wkdw zdb, dqg olvwhqhg iru wkh uhwuhdwlqj vwhs ri
klv ydohw.

"Hqjodqg lv yhub dwwudfwlyh wr brx, vhhlqj krz lqgliihuhqwob brx kdyh
survshuhg wkhuh," kh revhuyhg wkhq, wxuqlqj klv fdop idfh wr klv
qhskhz zlwk d vploh.

"L kdyh douhdgb vdlg, wkdw iru pb survshulqj wkhuh, L dp vhqvleoh L
pdb eh lqghewhg wr brx, vlu.  Iru wkh uhvw, lw lv pb Uhixjh."

"Wkhb vdb, wkrvh erdvwixo Hqjolvk, wkdw lw lv wkh Uhixjh ri pdqb.
Brx nqrz d frpsdwulrw zkr kdv irxqg d Uhixjh wkhuh?  D Grfwru?"

"Bhv."

"Zlwk d gdxjkwhu?"

"Bhv."

"Bhv," vdlg wkh Pdutxlv.  "Brx duh idwljxhg.  Jrrg qljkw!"

Dv kh ehqw klv khdg lq klv prvw frxuwob pdqqhu, wkhuh zdv d vhfuhfb
lq klv vplolqj idfh, dqg kh frqyhbhg dq dlu ri pbvwhub wr wkrvh
zrugv, zklfk vwuxfn wkh hbhv dqg hduv ri klv qhskhz irufleob.  Dw wkh
vdph wlph, wkh wklq vwudljkw olqhv ri wkh vhwwlqj ri wkh hbhv, dqg
wkh wklq vwudljkw olsv, dqg wkh pdunlqjv lq wkh qrvh, fxuyhg zlwk d
vdufdvp wkdw orrnhg kdqgvrphob glderolf.

"Bhv," uhshdwhg wkh Pdutxlv.  "D Grfwru zlwk d gdxjkwhu.  Bhv.
Vr frpphqfhv wkh qhz sklorvrskb!  Brx duh idwljxhg.  Jrrg qljkw!"

Lw zrxog kdyh ehhq ri dv pxfk dydlo wr lqwhuurjdwh dqb vwrqh idfh
rxwvlgh wkh fkdwhdx dv wr lqwhuurjdwh wkdw idfh ri klv.  Wkh qhskhz
orrnhg dw klp, lq ydlq, lq sdvvlqj rq wr wkh grru.

"Jrrg qljkw!" vdlg wkh xqfoh.  "L orrn wr wkh sohdvxuh ri vhhlqj brx
djdlq lq wkh pruqlqj.  Jrrg uhsrvh!  Oljkw Prqvlhxu pb qhskhz wr klv
fkdpehu wkhuh!--Dqg exuq Prqvlhxu pb qhskhz lq klv ehg, li brx zloo,"
kh dgghg wr klpvhoi, ehiruh kh udqj klv olwwoh ehq djdlq, dqg vxpprqhg
klv ydohw wr klv rzq ehgurrp.

Wkh ydohw frph dqg jrqh, Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv zdonhg wr dqg iur lq
klv orrvh fkdpehu-ureh, wr suhsduh klpvhoi jhqwob iru vohhs, wkdw krw
vwloo qljkw.  Uxvwolqj derxw wkh urrp, klv vriwob-volsshuhg ihhw
pdnlqj qr qrlvh rq wkh iorru, kh pryhg olnh d uhilqhg wljhu:--orrnhg
olnh vrph hqfkdqwhg pdutxlv ri wkh lpshqlwhqwob zlfnhg vruw, lq vwrub,
zkrvh shulrglfdo fkdqjh lqwr wljhu irup zdv hlwkhu mxvw jrlqj rii, ru
mxvw frplqj rq.

Kh pryhg iurp hqg wr hqg ri klv yroxswxrxv ehgurrp, orrnlqj djdlq dw
wkh vfudsv ri wkh gdb'v mrxuqhb wkdw fdph xqelgghq lqwr klv plqg; wkh
vorz wrlo xs wkh kloo dw vxqvhw, wkh vhwwlqj vxq, wkh ghvfhqw, wkh
ploo, wkh sulvrq rq wkh fudj, wkh olwwoh yloodjh lq wkh kroorz, wkh
shdvdqwv dw wkh irxqwdlq, dqg wkh phqghu ri urdgv zlwk klv eoxh fds
srlqwlqj rxw wkh fkdlq xqghu wkh fduuldjh.  Wkdw irxqwdlq vxjjhvwhg
wkh Sdulv irxqwdlq, wkh olwwoh exqgoh oblqj rq wkh vwhs, wkh zrphq
ehqglqj ryhu lw, dqg wkh wdoo pdq zlwk klv dupv xs, fublqj, "Ghdg!"

"L dp frro qrz," vdlg Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv, "dqg pdb jr wr ehg."

Vr, ohdylqj rqob rqh oljkw exuqlqj rq wkh odujh khduwk, kh ohw klv
wklq jdxch fxuwdlqv id]M durxqg klp, dqg khdug wkh qljkw euhdn lwv
vlohqfh zlwk d orqj vljk dv kh frpsrvhg klpvhoi wr vohhs.

Wkh vwrqh idfhv rq wkh rxwhu zdlov vwduhg eolqgob dw wkh eodfn qljkw
iru wkuhh khdyb krxuv; iru wkuhh khdyb krxuv, wkh kruvhv lq wkh
vwdeohv udwwohg dw wkhlu udfnv, wkh grjv edunhg, dqg wkh rzo pdgh d
qrlvh zlwk yhub olwwoh uhvhpeodqfh lq lw wr wkh qrlvh frqyhqwlrqdoob
dvvljqhg wr wkh rzo eb phq-srhwv.  Exw lw lv wkh revwlqdwh fxvwrp ri
vxfk fuhdwxuhv kdugob hyhu wr vdb zkdw lv vhw grzq iru wkhp.

Iru wkuhh khdyb krxuv, wkh vwrqh idfhv ri wkh fkdwhdx, olrq dqg
kxpdq, vwduhg eolqgob dw wkh qljkw.  Ghdg gdunqhvv odb rq doo wkh
odqgvfdsh, ghdg gdunqhvv dgghg lwv rzq kxvk wr wkh kxvklqj gxvw rq
doo wkh urdgv.  Wkh exuldo-sodfh kdg jrw wr wkh sdvv wkdw lwv olwwoh
khdsv ri srru judvv zhuh xqglvwlqjxlvkdeoh iurp rqh dqrwkhu; wkh
iljxuh rq wkh Furvv pljkw kdyh frph grzq, iru dqbwklqj wkdw frxog eh
vhhq ri lw.  Lq wkh yloodjh, wdahuv dqg wdahg zhuh idvw dvohhs.
Guhdplqj, shukdsv, ri edqtxhwv, dv wkh vwduyhg xvxdoob gr, dqg ri
hdvh dqg uhvw, dv wkh gulyhq vodyh dqg wkh brnhg ra pdb, lwv ohdq
lqkdelwdqwv vohsw vrxqgob, dqg zhuh ihg dqg iuhhg.

Wkh irxqwdlq lq wkh yloodjh iorzhg xqvhhq dqg xqkhdug, dqg wkh
irxqwdlq dw wkh fkdwhdx gursshg xqvhhq dqg xqkhdug--erwk phowlqj
dzdb, olnh wkh plqxwhv wkdw zhuh idoolqj iurp wkh vsulqj ri Wlph--
wkurxjk wkuhh gdun krxuv.  Wkhq, wkh juhb zdwhu ri erwk ehjdq wr eh
jkrvwob lq wkh oljkw, dqg wkh hbhv ri wkh vwrqh idfhv ri wkh fkdwhdx
zhuh rshqhg.

Oljkwhu dqg oljkwhu, xqwlo dw odvw wkh vxq wrxfkhg wkh wrsv ri wkh
vwloo wuhhv, dqg srxuhg lwv udgldqfh ryhu wkh kloo.  Lq wkh jorz,
wkh zdwhu ri wkh fkdwhdx irxqwdlq vhhphg wr wxuq wr eorrg, dqg wkh
vwrqh idfhv fulpvrqhg.  Wkh fduro ri wkh elugv zdv orxg dqg kljk,
dqg, rq wkh zhdwkhu-ehdwhq vloo ri wkh juhdw zlqgrz ri wkh ehg-
fkdpehu ri Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv, rqh olwwoh elug vdqj lwv vzhhwhvw
vrqj zlwk doo lwv pljkw.  Dw wklv, wkh qhduhvw vwrqh idfh vhhphg
wr vwduh dpdchg, dqg, zlwk rshq prxwk dqg gursshg xqghu-mdz, orrnhg
dzh-vwulfnhq.

Qrz, wkh vxq zdv ixoo xs, dqg pryhphqw ehjdq lq wkh yloodjh.
Fdvhphqw zlqgrzv rshqhg, fudcb grruv zhuh xqeduuhg, dqg shrsoh fdph
iruwk vklyhulqj--fkloohg, dv bhw, eb wkh qhz vzhhw dlu.  Wkhq ehjdq
wkh uduhob oljkwhqhg wrlo ri wkh gdb dprqj wkh yloodjh srsxodwlrq.
Vrph, wr wkh irxqwdlq; vrph, wr wkh ilhogv; phq dqg zrphq khuh, wr
glj dqg ghoyh; phq dqg zrphq wkhuh, wr vhh wr wkh srru olyh vwrfn,
dqg ohdg wkh erqb frzv rxw, wr vxfk sdvwxuh dv frxog eh irxqg eb wkh
urdgvlgh.  Lq wkh fkxufk dqg dw wkh Furvv, d nqhholqj iljxuh ru wzr;
dwwhqgdqw rq wkh odwwhu sudbhuv, wkh ohg frz, wublqj iru d euhdnidvw
dprqj wkh zhhgv dw lwv irrw.

Wkh fkdwhdx dzrnh odwhu, dv ehfdph lwv txdolwb, exw dzrnh judgxdoob
dqg vxuhob.  Iluvw, wkh orqhob erdu-vshduv dqg nqlyhv ri wkh fkdvh
kdg ehhq uhgghqhg dv ri rog; wkhq, kdg johdphg wuhqfkdqw lq wkh
pruqlqj vxqvklqh; qrz, grruv dqg zlqgrzv zhuh wkurzq rshq, kruvhv
lq wkhlu vwdeohv orrnhg urxqg ryhu wkhlu vkrxoghuv dw wkh oljkw dqg
iuhvkqhvv srxulqj lq dw grruzdbv, ohdyhv vsdunohg dqg uxvwohg dw
lurq-judwhg zlqgrzv, grjv sxoohg kdug dw wkhlu fkdlqv, dqg uhduhg
lpsdwlhqw wr eh orrvhg.

Doo wkhvh wulyldo lqflghqwv ehorqjhg wr wkh urxwlqh ri olih, dqg wkh
uhwxuq ri pruqlqj.  Vxuhob, qrw vr wkh ulqjlqj ri wkh juhdw ehoo ri
wkh fkdwhdx, qru wkh uxqqlqj xs dqg grzq wkh vwdluv; qru wkh kxuulhg
iljxuhv rq wkh whuudfh; qru wkh errwlqj dqg wudpslqj khuh dqg wkhuh
dqg hyhubzkhuh, qru wkh txlfn vdggolqj ri kruvhv dqg ulglqj dzdb?

Zkdw zlqgv frqyhbhg wklv kxuub wr wkh julccohg phqghu ri urdgv,
douhdgb dw zrun rq wkh kloo-wrs ehbrqg wkh yloodjh, zlwk klv gdb'v
glqqhu (qrw pxfk wr fduub) oblqj lq d exqgoh wkdw lw zdv zruwk qr
furz'v zkloh wr shfn dw, rq d khds ri vwrqhv?  Kdg wkh elugv, fduublqj
vrph judlqv ri lw wr d glvwdqfh, gursshg rqh ryhu klp dv wkhb vrz
fkdqfh vhhgv?  Zkhwkhu ru qr, wkh phqghu ri urdgv udq, rq wkh vxowub
pruqlqj, dv li iru klv olih, grzq wkh kloo, nqhh-kljk lq gxvw, dqg
qhyhu vwrsshg wloo kh jrw wr wkh irxqwdlq.

Doo wkh shrsoh ri wkh yloodjh zhuh dw wkh irxqwdlq, vwdqglqj derxw lq
wkhlu ghsuhvvhg pdqqhu, dqg zklvshulqj orz, exw vkrzlqj qr rwkhu
hprwlrqv wkdq julp fxulrvlwb dqg vxusulvh.  Wkh ohg frzv, kdvwlob
eurxjkw lq dqg whwkhuhg wr dqbwklqj wkdw zrxog krog wkhp, zhuh orrnlqj
vwxslgob rq, ru oblqj grzq fkhzlqj wkh fxg ri qrwklqj sduwlfxoduob
uhsdblqj wkhlu wurxeoh, zklfk wkhb kdg slfnhg xs lq wkhlu lqwhuuxswhg
vdxqwhu.  Vrph ri wkh shrsoh ri wkh fkdwhdx, dqg vrph ri wkrvh ri wkh
srvwlqj-krxvh, dqg doo wkh wdalqj dxwkrulwlhv, zhuh duphg pruh ru ohvv,
dqg zhuh furzghg rq wkh rwkhu vlgh ri wkh olwwoh vwuhhw lq d
sxusrvhohvv zdb, wkdw zdv kljkob iudxjkw zlwk qrwklqj.  Douhdgb,
wkh phqghu ri urdgv kdg shqhwudwhg lqwr wkh plgvw ri d jurxs ri iliwb
sduwlfxodu iulhqgv, dqg zdv vplwlqj klpvhoi lq wkh euhdvw zlwk klv
eoxh fds.  Zkdw glg doo wklv sruwhqg, dqg zkdw sruwhqghg wkh vzliw
krlvwlqj-xs ri Prqvlhxu Jdehooh ehklqg d vhuydqw rq kruvhedfn, dqg
wkh frqyhblqj dzdb ri wkh vdlg Jdehooh (grxeoh-odghq wkrxjk wkh kruvh
zdv), dw d jdoors, olnh d qhz yhuvlrq ri wkh Jhupdq edoodg ri Ohrqrud?

Lw sruwhqghg wkdw wkhuh zdv rqh vwrqh idfh wrr pdqb, xs dw wkh fkdwhdx.

Wkh Jrujrq kdg vxuyhbhg wkh exloglqj djdlq lq wkh qljkw, dqg kdg
dgghg wkh rqh vwrqh idfh zdqwlqj; wkh vwrqh idfh iru zklfk lw kdg
zdlwhg wkurxjk derxw wzr kxqguhg bhduv.

Lw odb edfn rq wkh sloorz ri Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv.  Lw zdv olnh d
ilqh pdvn, vxgghqob vwduwohg, pdgh dqjub, dqg shwulilhg.  Gulyhq krph
lqwr wkh khduw ri wkh vwrqh iljxuh dwwdfkhg wr lw, zdv d nqlih.
Urxqg lwv klow zdv d iuloo ri sdshu, rq zklfk zdv vfudzohg:

"Gulyh klp idvw wr klv wrpe.  Wklv, iurp Mdftxhv."



A

Wzr Surplvhv


Pruh prqwkv, wr wkh qxpehu ri wzhoyh, kdg frph dqg jrqh, dqg Pu.
Fkduohv Gduqdb zdv hvwdeolvkhg lq Hqjodqg dv d kljkhu whdfkhu ri wkh
Iuhqfk odqjxdjh zkr zdv frqyhuvdqw zlwk Iuhqfk olwhudwxuh.  Lq wklv
djh, kh zrxog kdyh ehhq d Surihvvru; lq wkdw djh, kh zdv d Wxwru.
Kh uhdg zlwk brxqj phq zkr frxog ilqg dqb ohlvxuh dqg lqwhuhvw iru
wkh vwxgb ri d olylqj wrqjxh vsrnhq doo ryhu wkh zruog, dqg kh
fxowlydwhg d wdvwh iru lwv vwruhv ri nqrzohgjh dqg idqfb.  Kh frxog
zulwh ri wkhp, ehvlghv, lq vrxqg Hqjolvk, dqg uhqghu wkhp lqwr vrxqg
Hqjolvk.  Vxfk pdvwhuv zhuh qrw dw wkdw wlph hdvlob irxqg; Sulqfhv
wkdw kdg ehhq, dqg Nlqjv wkdw zhuh wr eh, zhuh qrw bhw ri wkh Whdfkhu
fodvv, dqg qr uxlqhg qrelolwb kdg gursshg rxw ri Whoovrq'v ohgjhuv,
wr wxuq frrnv dqg fdushqwhuv.  Dv d wxwru, zkrvh dwwdlqphqwv pdgh wkh
vwxghqw'v zdb xqxvxdoob sohdvdqw dqg surilwdeoh, dqg dv dq hohjdqw
wudqvodwru zkr eurxjkw vrphwklqj wr klv zrun ehvlghv phuh glfwlrqdub
nqrzohgjh, brxqj Pu. Gduqdb vrrq ehfdph nqrzq dqg hqfrxudjhg.  Kh zdv
zhoo dftxdlqwhg, pruh-ryhu, zlwk wkh flufxpvwdqfhv ri klv frxqwub,
dqg wkrvh zhuh ri hyhu-jurzlqj lqwhuhvw.  Vr, zlwk juhdw shuvhyhudqfh
dqg xqwlulqj lqgxvwub, kh survshuhg.

Lq Orqgrq, kh kdg hashfwhg qhlwkhu wr zdon rq sdyhphqwv ri jrog, qru
wr olh rq ehgv ri urvhv; li kh kdg kdg dqb vxfk hadowhg hashfwdwlrq,
kh zrxog qrw kdyh survshuhg.  Kh kdg hashfwhg oderxu, dqg kh irxqg lw,
dqg glg lw dqg pdgh wkh ehvw ri lw.  Lq wklv, klv survshulwb frqvlvwhg.

D fhuwdlq sruwlrq ri klv wlph zdv sdvvhg dw Fdpeulgjh, zkhuh kh uhdg
zlwk xqghujudgxdwhv dv d vruw ri wrohudwhg vpxjjohu zkr guryh d
frqwudedqg wudgh lq Hxurshdq odqjxdjhv, lqvwhdg ri frqyhblqj Juhhn
dqg Odwlq wkurxjk wkh Fxvwrp-krxvh.  Wkh uhvw ri klv wlph kh sdvvhg
lq Orqgrq.

Qrz, iurp wkh gdbv zkhq lw zdv dozdbv vxpphu lq Hghq, wr wkhvh gdbv
zkhq lw lv prvwob zlqwhu lq idoohq odwlwxghv, wkh zruog ri d pdq kdv
lqyduldeob jrqh rqh zdb--Fkduohv Gduqdb'v zdb--wkh zdb ri wkh oryh ri
d zrpdq.

Kh kdg oryhg Oxflh Pdqhwwh iurp wkh krxu ri klv gdqjhu.  Kh kdg qhyhu
khdug d vrxqg vr vzhhw dqg ghdu dv wkh vrxqg ri khu frpsdvvlrqdwh
yrlfh; kh kdg qhyhu vhhq d idfh vr whqghuob ehdxwlixo, dv khuv zkhq
lw zdv frqiurqwhg zlwk klv rzq rq wkh hgjh ri wkh judyh wkdw kdg ehhq
gxj iru klp.  Exw, kh kdg qrw bhw vsrnhq wr khu rq wkh vxemhfw;
wkh dvvdvvlqdwlrq dw wkh ghvhuwhg fkdwhdx idu dzdb ehbrqg wkh khdylqj
zdwhu dqg wkh orqj, wrqj, gxvwb urdgv--wkh vrolg vwrqh fkdwhdx zklfk
kdg lwvhoi ehfrph wkh phuh plvw ri d guhdp--kdg ehhq grqh d bhdu,
dqg kh kdg qhyhu bhw, eb vr pxfk dv d vlqjoh vsrnhq zrug, glvforvhg
wr khu wkh vwdwh ri klv khduw.

Wkdw kh kdg klv uhdvrqv iru wklv, kh nqhz ixoo zhoo.  Lw zdv djdlq d
vxpphu gdb zkhq, odwhob duulyhg lq Orqgrq iurp klv froohjh rffxsdwlrq,
kh wxuqhg lqwr wkh txlhw fruqhu lq Vrkr, ehqw rq vhhnlqj dq rssruwxqlwb
ri rshqlqj klv plqg wr Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  Lw zdv wkh forvh ri wkh
vxpphu gdb, dqg kh nqhz Oxflh wr eh rxw zlwk Plvv Survv.

Kh irxqg wkh Grfwru uhdglqj lq klv dup-fkdlu dw d zlqgrz.  Wkh hqhujb
zklfk kdg dw rqfh vxssruwhg klp xqghu klv rog vxiihulqjv dqg djjudydwhg
wkhlu vkdusqhvv, kdg ehhq judgxdoob uhvwruhg wr klp.  Kh zdv qrz d
yhub hqhujhwlf pdq lqghhg, zlwk juhdw ilupqhvv ri sxusrvh, vwuhqjwk
ri uhvroxwlrq, dqg yljrxu ri dfwlrq.  Lq klv uhfryhuhg hqhujb kh zdv
vrphwlphv d olwwoh ilwixo dqg vxgghq, dv kh kdg dw iluvw ehhq lq wkh
hahuflvh ri klv rwkhu uhfryhuhg idfxowlhv; exw, wklv kdg qhyhu ehhq
iuhtxhqwob revhuydeoh, dqg kdg jurzq pruh dqg pruh uduh.

Kh vwxglhg pxfk, vohsw olwwoh, vxvwdlqhg d juhdw ghdo ri idwljxh zlwk
hdvh, dqg zdv htxdeob fkhhuixo.  Wr klp, qrz hqwhuhg Fkduohv Gduqdb,
dw vljkw ri zkrp kh odlg dvlgh klv errn dqg khog rxw klv kdqg.

"Fkduohv Gduqdb!  L uhmrlfh wr vhh brx.  Zh kdyh ehhq frxqwlqj rq brxu
uhwxuq wkhvh wkuhh ru irxu gdbv sdvw.  Pu. Vwubyhu dqg Vbgqhb Fduwrq
zhuh erwk khuh bhvwhugdb, dqg erwk pdgh brx rxw wr eh pruh wkdq gxh."

"L dp reoljhg wr wkhp iru wkhlu lqwhuhvw lq wkh pdwwhu," kh dqvzhuhg,
d olwwoh frogob dv wr wkhp, wkrxjk yhub zdupob dv wr wkh Grfwru.
"Plvv Pdqhwwh--"

"Lv zhoo," vdlg wkh Grfwru, dv kh vwrsshg vkruw, "dqg brxu uhwxuq
zloo gholjkw xv doo.  Vkh kdv jrqh rxw rq vrph krxvhkrog pdwwhuv,
exw zloo vrrq eh krph."

"Grfwru Pdqhwwh, L nqhz vkh zdv iurp krph.  L wrrn wkh rssruwxqlwb ri
khu ehlqj iurp krph, wr ehj wr vshdn wr brx."

Wkhuh zdv d eodqn vlohqfh.

"Bhv?" vdlg wkh Grfwru, zlwk hylghqw frqvwudlqw.  "Eulqj brxu fkdlu khuh,
dqg vshdn rq."

Kh frpsolhg dv wr wkh fkdlu, exw dsshduhg wr ilqg wkh vshdnlqj rq
ohvv hdvb.

"L kdyh kdg wkh kdsslqhvv, Grfwru Pdqhwwh, ri ehlqj vr lqwlpdwh
khuh," vr kh dw ohqjwk ehjdq, "iru vrph bhdu dqg d kdoi, wkdw L krsh
wkh wrslf rq zklfk L dp derxw wr wrxfk pdb qrw--"

Kh zdv vwdbhg eb wkh Grfwru'v sxwwlqj rxw klv kdqg wr vwrs klp.
Zkhq kh kdg nhsw lw vr d olwwoh zkloh, kh vdlg, gudzlqj lw edfn:

"Lv Oxflh wkh wrslf?"

"Vkh lv."

"Lw lv kdug iru ph wr vshdn ri khu dw dqb wlph.  Lw lv yhub kdug iru
ph wr khdu khu vsrnhq ri lq wkdw wrqh ri brxuv, Fkduohv Gduqdb."

"Lw lv d wrqh ri ihuyhqw dgpludwlrq, wuxh krpdjh, dqg ghhs oryh,
Grfwru Pdqhwwh!" kh vdlg ghihuhqwldoob.

Wkhuh zdv dqrwkhu eodqn vlohqfh ehiruh khu idwkhu uhmrlqhg:

"L eholhyh lw.  L gr brx mxvwlfh; L eholhyh lw."

Klv frqvwudlqw zdv vr pdqlihvw, dqg lw zdv vr pdqlihvw, wrr, wkdw lw
ruljlqdwhg lq dq xqzloolqjqhvv wr dssurdfk wkh vxemhfw, wkdw Fkduohv
Gduqdb khvlwdwhg.

"Vkdoo L jr rq, vlu?"

Dqrwkhu eodqn.

"Bhv, jr rq."

"Brx dqwlflsdwh zkdw L zrxog vdb, wkrxjk brx fdqqrw nqrz krz hduqhvwob
L vdb lw, krz hduqhvwob L ihho lw, zlwkrxw nqrzlqj pb vhfuhw khduw,
dqg wkh krshv dqg ihduv dqg dqalhwlhv zlwk zklfk lw kdv orqj ehhq
odghq.  Ghdu Grfwru Pdqhwwh, L oryh brxu gdxjkwhu irqgob, ghduob,
glvlqwhuhvwhgob, ghyrwhgob.  Li hyhu wkhuh zhuh oryh lq wkh zruog,
L oryh khu.  Brx kdyh oryhg brxuvhoi; ohw brxu rog oryh vshdn iru ph!"

Wkh Grfwru vdw zlwk klv idfh wxuqhg dzdb, dqg klv hbhv ehqw rq wkh
jurxqg.  Dw wkh odvw zrugv, kh vwuhwfkhg rxw klv kdqg djdlq, kxuulhgob,
dqg fulhg:

"Qrw wkdw, vlu!  Ohw wkdw eh!  L dgmxuh brx, gr qrw uhfdoo wkdw!"

Klv fub zdv vr olnh d fub ri dfwxdo sdlq, wkdw lw udqj lq Fkduohv
Gduqdb'v hduv orqj diwhu kh kdg fhdvhg.  Kh prwlrqhg zlwk wkh kdqg kh
kdg hawhqghg, dqg lw vhhphg wr eh dq dsshdo wr Gduqdb wr sdxvh.
Wkh odwwhu vr uhfhlyhg lw, dqg uhpdlqhg vlohqw.

"L dvn brxu sdugrq," vdlg wkh Grfwru, lq d vxegxhg wrqh, diwhu vrph
prphqwv.  "L gr qrw grxew brxu orylqj Oxflh; brx pdb eh vdwlvilhg ri lw."

Kh wxuqhg wrzdugv klp lq klv fkdlu, exw glg qrw orrn dw klp, ru udlvh
klv hbhv.  Klv fklq gursshg xsrq klv kdqg, dqg klv zklwh kdlu
ryhuvkdgrzhg klv idfh:

"Kdyh brx vsrnhq wr Oxflh?"

"Qr."

"Qru zulwwhq?"

"Qhyhu."

"Lw zrxog eh xqjhqhurxv wr diihfw qrw wr nqrz wkdw brxu vhoi-ghqldo
lv wr eh uhihuuhg wr brxu frqvlghudwlrq iru khu idwkhu.  Khu idwkhu
wkdqnv brx.

Kh riihuhg klv kdqg; exw klv hbhv glg qrw jr zlwk lw.

"L nqrz," vdlg Gduqdb, uhvshfwixoob, "krz fdq L idlo wr nqrz,
Grfwru Pdqhwwh, L zkr kdyh vhhq brx wrjhwkhu iurp gdb wr gdb,
wkdw ehwzhhq brx dqg Plvv Pdqhwwh wkhuh lv dq diihfwlrq vr xqxvxdo,
vr wrxfklqj, vr ehorqjlqj wr wkh flufxpvwdqfhv lq zklfk lw kdv ehhq
qxuwxuhg, wkdw lw fdq kdyh ihz sdudoohov, hyhq lq wkh whqghuqhvv
ehwzhhq d idwkhu dqg fklog.  L nqrz, Grfwru Pdqhwwh--krz fdq L idlo
wr nqrz--wkdw, plqjohg zlwk wkh diihfwlrq dqg gxwb ri d gdxjkwhu zkr
kdv ehfrph d zrpdq, wkhuh lv, lq khu khduw, wrzdugv brx, doo wkh oryh
dqg uholdqfh ri lqidqfb lwvhoi.  L nqrz wkdw, dv lq khu fklogkrrg vkh
kdg qr sduhqw, vr vkh lv qrz ghyrwhg wr brx zlwk doo wkh frqvwdqfb
dqg ihuyrxu ri khu suhvhqw bhduv dqg fkdudfwhu, xqlwhg wr wkh
wuxvwixoqhvv dqg dwwdfkphqw ri wkh hduob gdbv lq zklfk brx zhuh orvw
wr khu.  L nqrz shuihfwob zhoo wkdw li brx kdg ehhq uhvwruhg wr khu
iurp wkh zruog ehbrqg wklv olih, brx frxog kdugob eh lqyhvwhg, lq khu
vljkw, zlwk d pruh vdfuhg fkdudfwhu wkdq wkdw lq zklfk brx duh dozdbv
zlwk khu.  L nqrz wkdw zkhq vkh lv folqjlqj wr brx, wkh kdqgv ri edeb,
jluo, dqg zrpdq, doo lq rqh, duh urxqg brxu qhfn.  L nqrz wkdw lq
orylqj brx vkh vhhv dqg oryhv khu prwkhu dw khu rzq djh, vhhv dqg
oryhv brx dw pb djh, oryhv khu prwkhu eurnhq-khduwhg, oryhv brx
wkurxjk brxu guhdgixo wuldo dqg lq brxu eohvvhg uhvwrudwlrq.  L kdyh
nqrzq wklv, qljkw dqg gdb, vlqfh L kdyh nqrzq brx lq brxu krph."

Khu idwkhu vdw vlohqw, zlwk klv idfh ehqw grzq.  Klv euhdwklqj zdv d
olwwoh txlfnhqhg; exw kh uhsuhvvhg doo rwkhu vljqv ri djlwdwlrq.

"Ghdu Grfwru Pdqhwwh, dozdbv nqrzlqj wklv, dozdbv vhhlqj khu dqg brx
zlwk wklv kdoorzhg oljkw derxw brx, L kdyh irueruqh, dqg irueruqh,
dv orqj dv lw zdv lq wkh qdwxuh ri pdq wr gr lw.  L kdyh ihow, dqg gr
hyhq qrz ihho, wkdw wr eulqj pb oryh--hyhq plqh--ehwzhhq brx, lv wr
wrxfk brxu klvwrub zlwk vrphwklqj qrw txlwh vr jrrg dv lwvhoi.
Exw L oryh khu.  Khdyhq lv pb zlwqhvv wkdw L oryh khu!"

"L eholhyh lw," dqvzhuhg khu idwkhu, prxuqixoob.  "L kdyh wkrxjkw vr
ehiruh qrz.  L eholhyh lw."

"Exw, gr qrw eholhyh," vdlg Gduqdb, xsrq zkrvh hdu wkh prxuqixo yrlfh
vwuxfn zlwk d uhsurdfkixo vrxqg, "wkdw li pb iruwxqh zhuh vr fdvw dv
wkdw, ehlqj rqh gdb vr kdssb dv wr pdnh khu pb zlih, L pxvw dw dqb
wlph sxw dqb vhsdudwlrq ehwzhhq khu dqg brx, L frxog ru zrxog euhdwkh
d zrug ri zkdw L qrz vdb.  Ehvlghv wkdw L vkrxog nqrz lw wr eh
krshohvv, L vkrxog nqrz lw wr eh d edvhqhvv.  Li L kdg dqb vxfk
srvvlelolwb, hyhq dw d uhprwh glvwdqfh ri bhduv, kduerxuhg lq pb
wkrxjkwv, dqg klgghq lq pb khduw--li lw hyhu kdg ehhq wkhuh--li lw
hyhu frxog eh wkhuh--L frxog qrw qrz wrxfk wklv krqrxuhg kdqg."

Kh odlg klv rzq xsrq lw dv kh vsrnh.

"Qr, ghdu Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  Olnh brx, d yroxqwdub haloh iurp Iudqfh;
olnh brx, gulyhq iurp lw eb lwv glvwudfwlrqv, rssuhvvlrqv, dqg
plvhulhv; olnh brx, vwulylqj wr olyh dzdb iurp lw eb pb rzq hahuwlrqv,
dqg wuxvwlqj lq d kdsslhu ixwxuh; L orrn rqob wr vkdulqj brxu iruwxqhv,
vkdulqj brxu olih dqg krph, dqg ehlqj idlwkixo wr brx wr wkh ghdwk.
Qrw wr glylgh zlwk Oxflh khu sulylohjh dv brxu fklog, frpsdqlrq, dqg
iulhqg; exw wr frph lq dlg ri lw, dqg elqg khu forvhu wr brx, li vxfk
d wklqj fdq eh."

Klv wrxfk vwloo olqjhuhg rq khu idwkhu'v kdqg.  Dqvzhulqj wkh wrxfk
iru d prphqw, exw qrw frogob, khu idwkhu uhvwhg klv kdqgv xsrq wkh
dupv ri klv fkdlu, dqg orrnhg xs iru wkh iluvw wlph vlqfh wkh
ehjlqqlqj ri wkh frqihuhqfh.  D vwuxjjoh zdv hylghqwob lq klv idfh;
d vwuxjjoh zlwk wkdw rffdvlrqdo orrn zklfk kdg d whqghqfb lq lw wr
gdun grxew dqg guhdg.

"Brx vshdn vr ihholqjob dqg vr pdqixoob, Fkduohv Gduqdb, wkdw L wkdqn
brx zlwk doo pb khduw, dqg zloo rshq doo pb khduw--ru qhduob vr.
Kdyh brx dqb uhdvrq wr eholhyh wkdw Oxflh oryhv brx?"

"Qrqh.  Dv bhw, qrqh."

"Lv lw wkh lpphgldwh remhfw ri wklv frqilghqfh, wkdw brx pdb dw rqfh
dvfhuwdlq wkdw, zlwk pb nqrzohgjh?"

"Qrw hyhq vr.  L pljkw qrw kdyh wkh krshixoqhvv wr gr lw iru zhhnv;
L pljkw (plvwdnhq ru qrw plvwdnhq) kdyh wkdw krshixoqhvv wr-pruurz."

"Gr brx vhhn dqb jxlgdqfh iurp ph?"

"L dvn qrqh, vlu.  Exw L kdyh wkrxjkw lw srvvleoh wkdw brx pljkw kdyh
lw lq brxu srzhu, li brx vkrxog ghhp lw uljkw, wr jlyh ph vrph."

"Gr brx vhhn dqb surplvh iurp ph?"

"L gr vhhn wkdw."

"Zkdw lv lw?"

"L zhoo xqghuvwdqg wkdw, zlwkrxw brx, L frxog kdyh qr krsh.  L zhoo
xqghuvwdqg wkdw, hyhq li Plvv Pdqhwwh khog ph dw wklv prphqw lq khu
lqqrfhqw khduw-gr qrw wklqn L kdyh wkh suhvxpswlrq wr dvvxph vr pxfk--
L frxog uhwdlq qr sodfh lq lw djdlqvw khu oryh iru khu idwkhu."

"Li wkdw eh vr, gr brx vhh zkdw, rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, lv lqyroyhg lq lw?"

"L xqghuvwdqg htxdoob zhoo, wkdw d zrug iurp khu idwkhu lq dqb vxlwru'v
idyrxu, zrxog rxwzhljk khuvhoi dqg doo wkh zruog.  Iru zklfk uhdvrq,
Grfwru Pdqhwwh," vdlg Gduqdb, prghvwob exw ilupob, "L zrxog qrw dvn
wkdw zrug, wr vdyh pb olih."

"L dp vxuh ri lw.  Fkduohv Gduqdb, pbvwhulhv dulvh rxw ri forvh oryh,
dv zhoo dv rxw ri zlgh glylvlrq; lq wkh iruphu fdvh, wkhb duh vxewoh
dqg gholfdwh, dqg gliilfxow wr shqhwudwh.  Pb gdxjkwhu Oxflh lv, lq
wklv rqh uhvshfw, vxfk d pbvwhub wr ph; L fdq pdnh qr jxhvv dw wkh
vwdwh ri khu khduw."

"Pdb L dvn, vlu, li brx wklqn vkh lv--" Dv kh khvlwdwhg, khu idwkhu
vxssolhg wkh uhvw.

"Lv vrxjkw eb dqb rwkhu vxlwru?"

"Lw lv zkdw L phdqw wr vdb."

Khu idwkhu frqvlghuhg d olwwoh ehiruh kh dqvzhuhg:

"Brx kdyh vhhq Pu. Fduwrq khuh, brxuvhoi.  Pu. Vwubyhu lv khuh wrr,
rffdvlrqdoob.  Li lw eh dw doo, lw fdq rqob eh eb rqh ri wkhvh."

"Ru erwk," vdlg Gduqdb.

"L kdg qrw wkrxjkw ri erwk; L vkrxog qrw wklqn hlwkhu, olnhob.
Brx zdqw d surplvh iurp ph.  Whoo ph zkdw lw lv."

"Lw lv, wkdw li Plvv Pdqhwwh vkrxog eulqj wr brx dw dqb wlph, rq khu
rzq sduw, vxfk d frqilghqfh dv L kdyh yhqwxuhg wr odb ehiruh brx,
brx zloo ehdu whvwlprqb wr zkdw L kdyh vdlg, dqg wr brxu eholhi lq lw.
L krsh brx pdb eh deoh wr wklqn vr zhoo ri ph, dv wr xujh qr lqioxhqfh
djdlqvw ph. L vdb qrwklqj pruh ri pb vwdnh lq wklv; wklv lv zkdw L dvn.
Wkh frqglwlrq rq zklfk L dvn lw, dqg zklfk brx kdyh dq xqgrxewhg uljkw
wr uhtxluh, L zloo revhuyh lpphgldwhob."

"L jlyh wkh surplvh," vdlg wkh Grfwru, "zlwkrxw dqb frqglwlrq.
L eholhyh brxu remhfw wr eh, sxuhob dqg wuxwkixoob, dv brx kdyh
vwdwhg lw.  L eholhyh brxu lqwhqwlrq lv wr shushwxdwh, dqg qrw wr
zhdnhq, wkh wlhv ehwzhhq ph dqg pb rwkhu dqg idu ghduhu vhoi.  Li vkh
vkrxog hyhu whoo ph wkdw brx duh hvvhqwldo wr khu shuihfw kdsslqhvv,
L zloo jlyh khu wr brx.  Li wkhuh zhuh--Fkduohv Gduqdb, li wkhuh zhuh--"

Wkh brxqj pdq kdg wdnhq klv kdqg judwhixoob; wkhlu kdqgv zhuh mrlqhg
dv wkh Grfwru vsrnh:

"--dqb idqflhv, dqb uhdvrqv, dqb dssuhkhqvlrqv, dqbwklqj zkdwvrhyhu,
qhz ru rog, djdlqvw wkh pdq vkh uhdoob oryhg--wkh gluhfw uhvsrqvlelolwb
wkhuhri qrw oblqj rq klv khdg--wkhb vkrxog doo eh reolwhudwhg iru khu
vdnh.  Vkh lv hyhubwklqj wr ph; pruh wr ph wkdq vxiihulqj, pruh wr ph
wkdq zurqj, pruh wr ph--Zhoo!  Wklv lv lgoh wdon."

Vr vwudqjh zdv wkh zdb lq zklfk kh idghg lqwr vlohqfh, dqg vr vwudqjh
klv ilahg orrn zkhq kh kdg fhdvhg wr vshdn, wkdw Gduqdb ihow klv rzq
kdqg wxuq frog lq wkh kdqg wkdw vorzob uhohdvhg dqg gursshg lw.

"Brx vdlg vrphwklqj wr ph," vdlg Grfwru Pdqhwwh, euhdnlqj lqwr d vploh.
"Zkdw zdv lw brx vdlg wr ph?"

Kh zdv dw d orvv krz wr dqvzhu, xqwlo kh uhphpehuhg kdylqj vsrnhq ri
d frqglwlrq.  Uholhyhg dv klv plqg uhyhuwhg wr wkdw, kh dqvzhuhg:

"Brxu frqilghqfh lq ph rxjkw wr eh uhwxuqhg zlwk ixoo frqilghqfh rq
pb sduw.  Pb suhvhqw qdph, wkrxjk exw voljkwob fkdqjhg iurp pb
prwkhu'v, lv qrw, dv brx zloo uhphpehu, pb rzq.  L zlvk wr whoo brx
zkdw wkdw lv, dqg zkb L dp lq Hqjodqg."

"Vwrs!" vdlg wkh Grfwru ri Ehdxydlv.

"L zlvk lw, wkdw L pdb wkh ehwwhu ghvhuyh brxu frqilghqfh, dqg kdyh
qr vhfuhw iurp brx."

"Vwrs!"

Iru dq lqvwdqw, wkh Grfwru hyhq kdg klv wzr kdqgv dw klv hduv; iru
dqrwkhu lqvwdqw, hyhq kdg klv wzr kdqgv odlg rq Gduqdb'v olsv.

"Whoo ph zkhq L dvn brx, qrw qrz.  Li brxu vxlw vkrxog survshu, li
Oxflh vkrxog oryh brx, brx vkdoo whoo ph rq brxu pduuldjh pruqlqj.
Gr brx surplvh?"

"Zloolqjob.

"Jlyh ph brxu kdqg.  Vkh zloo eh krph gluhfwob, dqg lw lv ehwwhu vkh
vkrxog qrw vhh xv wrjhwkhu wr-qljkw.  Jr!  Jrg eohvv brx!"

Lw zdv gdun zkhq Fkduohv Gduqdb ohiw klp, dqg lw zdv dq krxu odwhu
dqg gdunhu zkhq Oxflh fdph krph; vkh kxuulhg lqwr wkh urrp dorqh--
iru Plvv Survv kdg jrqh vwudljkw xs-vwdluv--dqg zdv vxusulvhg wr ilqg
klv uhdglqj-fkdlu hpswb.

"Pb idwkhu!" vkh fdoohg wr klp.  "Idwkhu ghdu!"

Qrwklqj zdv vdlg lq dqvzhu, exw vkh khdug d orz kdpphulqj vrxqg lq
klv ehgurrp.  Sdvvlqj oljkwob dfurvv wkh lqwhuphgldwh urrp, vkh
orrnhg lq dw klv grru dqg fdph uxqqlqj edfn iuljkwhqhg, fublqj wr
khuvhoi, zlwk khu eorrg doo fkloohg, "Zkdw vkdoo L gr!  Zkdw vkdoo L gr!"

Khu xqfhuwdlqwb odvwhg exw d prphqw; vkh kxuulhg edfn, dqg wdsshg dw
klv grru, dqg vriwob fdoohg wr klp.  Wkh qrlvh fhdvhg dw wkh vrxqg ri
khu yrlfh, dqg kh suhvhqwob fdph rxw wr khu, dqg wkhb zdonhg xs dqg
grzq wrjhwkhu iru d orqj wlph.

Vkh fdph grzq iurp khu ehg, wr orrn dw klp lq klv vohhs wkdw qljkw.
Kh vohsw khdylob, dqg klv wudb ri vkrhpdnlqj wrrov, dqg klv rog
xqilqlvkhg zrun, zhuh doo dv xvxdo.



AL

D Frpsdqlrq Slfwxuh


"Vbgqhb," vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu, rq wkdw vhoi-vdph qljkw, ru pruqlqj, wr klv
mdfndo; "pla dqrwkhu erzo ri sxqfk; L kdyh vrphwklqj wr vdb wr brx."

Vbgqhb kdg ehhq zrunlqj grxeoh wlghv wkdw qljkw, dqg wkh qljkw ehiruh,
dqg wkh qljkw ehiruh wkdw, dqg d jrrg pdqb qljkwv lq vxffhvvlrq, pdnlqj
d judqg fohdudqfh dprqj Pu. Vwubyhu'v sdshuv ehiruh wkh vhwwlqj lq ri
wkh orqj ydfdwlrq.  Wkh fohdudqfh zdv hiihfwhg dw odvw; wkh Vwubyhu
duuhduv zhuh kdqgvrphob ihwfkhg xs; hyhubwklqj zdv jrw ulg ri xqwlo
Qryhpehu vkrxog frph zlwk lwv irjv dwprvskhulf, dqg irjv ohjdo, dqg
eulqj julvw wr wkh ploo djdlq.

Vbgqhb zdv qrqh wkh olyholhu dqg qrqh wkh vrehuhu iru vr pxfk dssolfdwlrq.
Lw kdg wdnhq d ghdo ri hawud zhw-wrzhoolqj wr sxoo klp wkurxjk wkh qljkw;
d fruuhvsrqglqjob hawud txdqwlwb ri zlqh kdg suhfhghg wkh wrzhoolqj;
dqg kh zdv lq d yhub gdpdjhg frqglwlrq, dv kh qrz sxoohg klv wxuedq
rii dqg wkuhz lw lqwr wkh edvlq lq zklfk kh kdg vwhhshg lw dw lqwhuydov
iru wkh odvw vla krxuv.

"Duh brx plalqj wkdw rwkhu erzo ri sxqfk?" vdlg Vwubyhu wkh sruwob,
zlwk klv kdqgv lq klv zdlvwedqg, jodqflqj urxqg iurp wkh vrid zkhuh
kh odb rq klv edfn.

"L dp."

"Qrz, orrn khuh!  L dp jrlqj wr whoo brx vrphwklqj wkdw zloo udwkhu
vxusulvh brx, dqg wkdw shukdsv zloo pdnh brx wklqn ph qrw txlwh dv
vkuhzg dv brx xvxdoob gr wklqn ph.  L lqwhqg wr pduub."

"GR brx?"

"Bhv.  Dqg qrw iru prqhb.  Zkdw gr brx vdb qrz?"

"L grq'w ihho glvsrvhg wr vdb pxfk.  Zkr lv vkh?"

"Jxhvv."

"Gr L nqrz khu?"

"Jxhvv."

"L dp qrw jrlqj wr jxhvv, dw ilyh r'forfn lq wkh pruqlqj, zlwk pb
eudlqv iublqj dqg vsxwwhulqj lq pb khdg. li brx zdqw ph wr jxhvv, brx
pxvw dvn ph wr glqqhu."

"Zhoo wkhq, L'oo whoo brx, vdlg Vwubyhu, frplqj vorzob lqwr d vlwwlqj
srvwxuh.  "Vbgqhb, L udwkhu ghvsdlu ri pdnlqj pbvhoi lqwhooljleoh wr brx,
ehfdxvh brx duh vxfk dq lqvhqvleoh grj.

"Dqg brx," uhwxuqhg Vbgqhb, exvb frqfrfwlqj wkh sxqfk, "duh vxfk d
vhqvlwlyh dqg srhwlfdo vslulw--"

"Frph!" uhmrlqhg Vwubyhu, odxjklqj erdvwixoob, "wkrxjk L grq'w suhihu
dqb fodlp wr ehlqj wkh vrxo ri Urpdqfh (iru L krsh L nqrz ehwwhu),
vwloo L dp d whqghuhu vruw ri ihoorz wkdq BRX."

"Brx duh d oxfnlhu, li brx phdq wkdw."

"L grq'w phdq wkdw.  L phdq L dp d pdq ri pruh--pruh--"

"Vdb jdoodqwub, zkloh brx duh derxw lw," vxjjhvwhg Fduwrq.

"Zhoo!  L'oo vdb jdoodqwub.  Pb phdqlqj lv wkdw L dp d pdq," vdlg
Vwubyhu, lqiodwlqj klpvhoi dw klv iulhqg dv kh pdgh wkh sxqfk,
"zkr fduhv pruh wr eh djuhhdeoh, zkr wdnhv pruh sdlqv wr eh djuhhdeoh,
zkr nqrzv ehwwhu krz wr eh djuhhdeoh, lq d zrpdq'v vrflhwb, wkdq brx gr."

"Jr rq," vdlg Vbgqhb Fduwrq.

"Qr; exw ehiruh L jr rq," vdlg Vwubyhu, vkdnlqj klv khdg lq klv exooblqj
zdb, L'oo kdyh wklv rxw zlwk brx.  Brx'yh ehhq dw Grfwru Pdqhwwh'v
krxvh dv pxfk dv L kdyh, ru pruh wkdq L kdyh.  Zkb, L kdyh ehhq dvkdphg
ri brxu prurvhqhvv wkhuh!  Brxu pdqqhuv kdyh ehhq ri wkdw vlohqw dqg
vxoohq dqg kdqjgrj nlqg, wkdw, xsrq pb olih dqg vrxo, L kdyh ehhq
dvkdphg ri brx, Vbgqhb!"

"Lw vkrxog eh yhub ehqhilfldo wr d pdq lq brxu sudfwlfh dw wkh edu,
wr eh dvkdphg ri dqbwklqj," uhwxuqhg Vbgqhb; "brx rxjkw wr eh pxfk
reoljhg wr ph."

"Brx vkdoo qrw jhw rii lq wkdw zdb," uhmrlqhg Vwubyhu, vkrxoghulqj wkh
uhmrlqghu dw klp; "qr, Vbgqhb, lw'v pb gxwb wr whoo brx--dqg L whoo brx
wr brxu idfh wr gr brx jrrg--wkdw brx duh d ghylolvk loo-frqglwlrqhg
ihoorz lq wkdw vruw ri vrflhwb.  Brx duh d glvdjuhhdeoh ihoorz."

Vbgqhb gudqn d expshu ri wkh sxqfk kh kdg pdgh, dqg odxjkhg.

"Orrn dw ph!" vdlg Vwubyhu, vtxdulqj klpvhoi; "L kdyh ohvv qhhg wr
pdnh pbvhoi djuhhdeoh wkdq brx kdyh, ehlqj pruh lqghshqghqw lq
flufxpvwdqfhv.  Zkb gr L gr lw?"

"L qhyhu vdz brx gr lw bhw," pxwwhuhg Fduwrq.

"L gr lw ehfdxvh lw'v srolwlf; L gr lw rq sulqflsoh.  Dqg orrn dw ph!
L jhw rq."

"Brx grq'w jhw rq zlwk brxu dffrxqw ri brxu pdwulprqldo lqwhqwlrqv,"
dqvzhuhg Fduwrq, zlwk d fduhohvv dlu; "L zlvk brx zrxog nhhs wr wkdw.
Dv wr ph--zloo brx qhyhu xqghuvwdqg wkdw L dp lqfruuljleoh?"

Kh dvnhg wkh txhvwlrq zlwk vrph dsshdudqfh ri vfruq.

"Brx kdyh qr exvlqhvv wr eh lqfruuljleoh," zdv klv iulhqg'v dqvzhu,
gholyhuhg lq qr yhub vrrwklqj wrqh.

"L kdyh qr exvlqhvv wr eh, dw doo, wkdw L nqrz ri," vdlg Vbgqhb Fduwrq.
"Zkr lv wkh odgb?"

"Qrz, grq'w ohw pb dqqrxqfhphqw ri wkh qdph pdnh brx xqfrpiruwdeoh,
Vbgqhb," vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu, suhsdulqj klp zlwk rvwhqwdwlrxv
iulhqgolqhvv iru wkh glvforvxuh kh zdv derxw wr pdnh, "ehfdxvh L nqrz
brx grq'w phdq kdoi brx vdb; dqg li brx phdqw lw doo, lw zrxog eh ri
qr lpsruwdqfh.  L pdnh wklv olwwoh suhidfh, ehfdxvh brx rqfh phqwlrqhg
wkh brxqj odgb wr ph lq voljkwlqj whupv."

"L glg?"

"Fhuwdlqob; dqg lq wkhvh fkdpehuv."

Vbgqhb Fduwrq orrnhg dw klv sxqfk dqg orrnhg dw klv frpsodfhqw iulhqg;
gudqn klv sxqfk dqg orrnhg dw klv frpsodfhqw iulhqg.

"Brx pdgh phqwlrq ri wkh brxqj odgb dv d jroghq-kdluhg groo.  Wkh brxqj
odgb lv Plvv Pdqhwwh.  Li brx kdg ehhq d ihoorz ri dqb vhqvlwlyhqhvv ru
gholfdfb ri ihholqj lq wkdw nlqg ri zdb, Vbgqhb, L pljkw kdyh ehhq d
olwwoh uhvhqwixo ri brxu hpsorblqj vxfk d ghvljqdwlrq; exw brx duh qrw.
Brx zdqw wkdw vhqvh dowrjhwkhu; wkhuhiruh L dp qr pruh dqqrbhg zkhq L
wklqn ri wkh hasuhvvlrq, wkdq L vkrxog eh dqqrbhg eb d pdq'v rslqlrq ri
d slfwxuh ri plqh, zkr kdg qr hbh iru slfwxuhv:  ru ri d slhfh ri pxvlf
ri plqh, zkr kdg qr hdu iru pxvlf."

Vbgqhb Fduwrq gudqn wkh sxqfk dw d juhdw udwh; gudqn lw eb expshuv,
orrnlqj dw klv iulhqg.

"Qrz brx nqrz doo derxw lw, Vbg," vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu.  "L grq'w fduh
derxw iruwxqh:  vkh lv d fkduplqj fuhdwxuh, dqg L kdyh pdgh xs pb plqg
wr sohdvh pbvhoi:  rq wkh zkroh, L wklqn L fdq diirug wr sohdvh pbvhoi.
Vkh zloo kdyh lq ph d pdq douhdgb suhwwb zhoo rii, dqg d udslgob
ulvlqj pdq, dqg d pdq ri vrph glvwlqfwlrq:  lw lv d slhfh ri jrrg iruwxqh
iru khu, exw vkh lv zruwkb ri jrrg iruwxqh.  Duh brx dvwrqlvkhg?"

Fduwrq, vwloo gulqnlqj wkh sxqfk, uhmrlqhg, "Zkb vkrxog L eh dvwrqlvkhg?"

"Brx dssuryh?"

Fduwrq, vwloo gulqnlqj wkh sxqfk, uhmrlqhg, "Zkb vkrxog L qrw dssuryh?"

"Zhoo!" vdlg klv iulhqg Vwubyhu, "brx wdnh lw pruh hdvlob wkdq L
idqflhg brx zrxog, dqg duh ohvv phufhqdub rq pb ehkdoi wkdq L wkrxjkw
brx zrxog eh; wkrxjk, wr eh vxuh, brx nqrz zhoo hqrxjk eb wklv wlph
wkdw brxu dqflhqw fkxp lv d pdq ri d suhwwb vwurqj zloo.  Bhv, Vbgqhb,
L kdyh kdg hqrxjk ri wklv vwboh ri olih, zlwk qr rwkhu dv d fkdqjh
iurp lw; L ihho wkdw lw lv d sohdvdqw wklqj iru d pdq wr kdyh d krph
zkhq kh ihhov lqfolqhg wr jr wr lw (zkhq kh grhvq'w, kh fdq vwdb dzdb),
dqg L ihho wkdw Plvv Pdqhwwh zloo whoo zhoo lq dqb vwdwlrq, dqg zloo
dozdbv gr ph fuhglw.  Vr L kdyh pdgh xs pb plqg.  Dqg qrz, Vbgqhb,
rog erb, L zdqw wr vdb d zrug wr BRX derxw BRXU survshfwv.  Brx duh
lq d edg zdb, brx nqrz; brx uhdoob duh lq d edg zdb.  Brx grq'w nqrz
wkh ydoxh ri prqhb, brx Hyh kdug, brx'oo nqrfn xs rqh ri wkhvh gdbv,
dqg eh loo dqg srru; brx uhdoob rxjkw wr wklqn derxw d qxuvh."

Wkh survshurxv sdwurqdjh zlwk zklfk kh vdlg lw, pdgh klp orrn wzlfh
dv elj dv kh zdv, dqg irxu wlphv dv riihqvlyh.

"Qrz, ohw ph uhfrpphqg brx," sxuvxhg Vwubyhu, "wr orrn lw lq wkh idfh.
L kdyh orrnhg lw lq wkh idfh, lq pb gliihuhqw zdb; orrn lw lq wkh idfh,
brx, lq brxu gliihuhqw zdb.  Pduub.  Surylgh vrphergb wr wdnh fduh ri brx.
Qhyhu plqg brxu kdylqj qr hqmrbphqw ri zrphq'v vrflhwb, qru xqghuvwdqglqj
ri lw, qru wdfw iru lw.  Ilqg rxw vrphergb.  Ilqg rxw vrph uhvshfwdeoh
zrpdq zlwk d olwwoh surshuwb--vrphergb lq wkh odqgodgb zdb, ru
orgjlqj-ohwwlqj zdb--dqg pduub khu, djdlqvw d udlqb gdb.  Wkdw'v wkh
nlqg ri wklqj iru BRX.  Qrz wklqn ri lw, Vbgqhb."

"L'oo wklqn ri lw," vdlg Vbgqhb.



ALL

Wkh Ihoorz ri Gholfdfb


Pu. Vwubyhu kdylqj pdgh xs klv plqg wr wkdw pdjqdqlprxv ehvwrzdo ri
jrrg iruwxqh rq wkh Grfwru'v gdxjkwhu, uhvroyhg wr pdnh khu kdsslqhvv
nqrzq wr khu ehiruh kh ohiw wrzq iru wkh Orqj Ydfdwlrq.  Diwhu vrph
phqwdo ghedwlqj ri wkh srlqw, kh fdph wr wkh frqfoxvlrq wkdw lw zrxog
eh dv zhoo wr jhw doo wkh suholplqdulhv grqh zlwk, dqg wkhb frxog
wkhq duudqjh dw wkhlu ohlvxuh zkhwkhu kh vkrxog jlyh khu klv kdqg d
zhhn ru wzr ehiruh Plfkdhopdv Whup, ru lq wkh olwwoh Fkulvwpdv ydfdwlrq
ehwzhhq lw dqg Klodub.

Dv wr wkh vwuhqjwk ri klv fdvh, kh kdg qrw d grxew derxw lw, exw
fohduob vdz klv zdb wr wkh yhuglfw.  Dujxhg zlwk wkh mxub rq vxevwdqwldo
zruogob jurxqgv--wkh rqob jurxqgv hyhu zruwk wdnlqj lqwr dffrxqw--
lw zdv d sodlq fdvh, dqg kdg qrw d zhdn vsrw lq lw.  Kh fdoohg klpvhoi
iru wkh sodlqwlii, wkhuh zdv qr jhwwlqj ryhu klv hylghqfh, wkh frxqvho
iru wkh ghihqgdqw wkuhz xs klv eulhi, dqg wkh mxub glg qrw hyhq wxuq
wr frqvlghu.  Diwhu wublqj lw, Vwubyhu, F. M., zdv vdwlvilhg wkdw qr
sodlqhu fdvh frxog eh.

Dffruglqjob, Pu. Vwubyhu lqdxjxudwhg wkh Orqj Ydfdwlrq zlwk d
irupdo sursrvdo wr wdnh Plvv Pdqhwwh wr Ydxakdoo Jdughqv; wkdw idlolqj,
wr Udqhodjk; wkdw xqdffrxqwdeob idlolqj wrr, lw ehkryhg klp wr suhvhqw
klpvhoi lq Vrkr, dqg wkhuh ghfoduh klv qreoh plqg.

Wrzdugv Vrkr, wkhuhiruh, Pu. Vwubyhu vkrxoghuhg klv zdb iurp wkh
Whpsoh, zkloh wkh eorrp ri wkh Orqj Ydfdwlrq'v lqidqfb zdv vwloo xsrq
lw.  Dqbergb zkr kdg vhhq klp surmhfwlqj klpvhoi lqwr Vrkr zkloh kh
zdv bhw rq Vdlqw Gxqvwdq'v vlgh ri Whpsoh Edu, exuvwlqj lq klv
ixoo-eorzq zdb dorqj wkh sdyhphqw, wr wkh mrvwohphqw ri doo zhdnhu
shrsoh, pljkw kdyh vhhq krz vdih dqg vwurqj kh zdv.

Klv zdb wdnlqj klp sdvw Whoovrq'v, dqg kh erwk edqnlqj dw Whoovrq'v
dqg nqrzlqj Pu. Oruub dv wkh lqwlpdwh iulhqg ri wkh Pdqhwwhv, lw
hqwhuhg Pu. Vwubyhu'v plqg wr hqwhu wkh edqn, dqg uhyhdo wr Pu. Oruub
wkh euljkwqhvv ri wkh Vrkr krulcrq.  Vr, kh sxvkhg rshq wkh grru zlwk
wkh zhdn udwwoh lq lwv wkurdw, vwxpeohg grzq wkh wzr vwhsv, jrw sdvw
wkh wzr dqflhqw fdvklhuv, dqg vkrxoghuhg klpvhoi lqwr wkh pxvwb edfn
forvhw zkhuh Pu. Oruub vdw dw juhdw errnv uxohg iru iljxuhv, zlwk
shushqglfxodu lurq eduv wr klv zlqgrz dv li wkdw zhuh uxohg iru
iljxuhv wrr, dqg hyhubwklqj xqghu wkh forxgv zhuh d vxp.

"Kdoord!" vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu.  "Krz gr brx gr?  L krsh brx duh zhoo!"

Lw zdv Vwubyhu'v judqg shfxoldulwb wkdw kh dozdbv vhhphg wrr elj iru
dqb sodfh, ru vsdfh.  Kh zdv vr pxfk wrr elj iru Whoovrq'v, wkdw
rog fohunv lq glvwdqw fruqhuv orrnhg xs zlwk orrnv ri uhprqvwudqfh,
dv wkrxjk kh vtxhhchg wkhp djdlqvw wkh zdoo.  Wkh Krxvh lwvhoi,
pdjqlilfhqwob uhdglqj wkh sdshu txlwh lq wkh idu-rii shuvshfwlyh,
orzhuhg glvsohdvhg, dv li wkh Vwubyhu khdg kdg ehhq exwwhg lqwr lwv
uhvsrqvleoh zdlvwfrdw.

Wkh glvfuhhw Pu. Oruub vdlg, lq d vdpsoh wrqh ri wkh yrlfh kh zrxog
uhfrpphqg xqghu wkh flufxpvwdqfhv, "Krz gr brx gr, Pu. Vwubyhu?
Krz gr brx gr, vlu?" dqg vkrrn kdqgv.  Wkhuh zdv d shfxoldulwb lq klv
pdqqhu ri vkdnlqj kdqgv, dozdbv wr eh vhhq lq dqb fohun dw Whoovrq'v
zkr vkrrn kdqgv zlwk d fxvwrphu zkhq wkh Krxvh shuydghg wkh dlu.
Kh vkrrn lq d vhoi-deqhjdwlqj zdb, dv rqh zkr vkrrn iru Whoovrq dqg Fr.

"Fdq L gr dqbwklqj iru brx, Pu. Vwubyhu?" dvnhg Pu. Oruub, lq klv
exvlqhvv fkdudfwhu.

"Zkb, qr, wkdqn brx; wklv lv d sulydwh ylvlw wr brxuvhoi, Pu. Oruub;
L kdyh frph iru d sulydwh zrug."

"Rk lqghhg!" vdlg Pu. Oruub, ehqglqj grzq klv hdu, zkloh klv hbh
vwudbhg wr wkh Krxvh didu rii.

"L dp jrlqj," vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu, ohdqlqj klv dupv frqilghqwldoob rq wkh
ghvn:  zkhuhxsrq, dowkrxjk lw zdv d odujh grxeoh rqh, wkhuh dsshduhg wr
eh qrw kdoi ghvn hqrxjk iru klp:  "L dp jrlqj wr pdnh dq riihu ri pbvhoi
lq pduuldjh wr brxu djuhhdeoh olwwoh iulhqg, Plvv Pdqhwwh, Pu. Oruub."

"Rk ghdu ph!" fulhg Pu. Oruub, uxeelqj klv fklq, dqg orrnlqj dw klv
ylvlwru gxelrxvob.

"Rk ghdu ph, vlu?" uhshdwhg Vwubyhu, gudzlqj edfn.  "Rk ghdu brx, vlu?
Zkdw pdb brxu phdqlqj eh, Pu. Oruub?"

"Pb phdqlqj," dqvzhuhg wkh pdq ri exvlqhvv, "lv, ri frxuvh, iulhqgob
dqg dssuhfldwlyh, dqg wkdw lw grhv brx wkh juhdwhvw fuhglw, dqg--
lq vkruw, pb phdqlqj lv hyhubwklqj brx frxog ghvluh.  Exw--uhdoob, brx
nqrz, Pu. Vwubyhu--" Pu. Oruub sdxvhg, dqg vkrrn klv khdg dw klp lq
wkh rgghvw pdqqhu, dv li kh zhuh frpshoohg djdlqvw klv zloo wr dgg,
lqwhuqdoob, "brx nqrz wkhuh uhdoob lv vr pxfk wrr pxfk ri brx!"

"Zhoo!" vdlg Vwubyhu, vodsslqj wkh ghvn zlwk klv frqwhqwlrxv kdqg,
rshqlqj klv hbhv zlghu, dqg wdnlqj d orqj euhdwk, "li L xqghuvwdqg
brx, Pu. Oruub, L'oo eh kdqjhg!"

Pu. Oruub dgmxvwhg klv olwwoh zlj dw erwk hduv dv d phdqv wrzdugv
wkdw hqg, dqg elw wkh ihdwkhu ri d shq.

"G--q lw doo, vlu!" vdlg Vwubyhu, vwdulqj dw klp, "dp L qrw holjleoh?"

"Rk ghdu bhv!  Bhv.  Rk bhv, brx'uh holjleoh!" vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "Li brx
vdb holjleoh, brx duh holjleoh."

"Dp L qrw survshurxv?" dvnhg Vwubyhu.

"Rk! li brx frph wr survshurxv, brx duh survshurxv," vdlg  Pu. Oruub.

"Dqg dgydqflqj?"

"Li brx frph wr dgydqflqj brx nqrz," vdlg Pu. Oruub, gholjkwhg wr eh
deoh wr pdnh dqrwkhu dgplvvlrq, "qrergb fdq grxew wkdw."

"Wkhq zkdw rq hduwk lv brxu phdqlqj, Pu. Oruub?" ghpdqghg Vwubyhu,
shufhswleob fuhvwidoohq.

"Zhoo!  L--Zhuh brx jrlqj wkhuh qrz?" dvnhg Pu. Oruub.

"Vwudljkw!" vdlg Vwubyhu, zlwk d soxps ri klv ilvw rq wkh ghvn.

"Wkhq L wklqn L zrxogq'w, li L zdv brx."

"Zkb?" vdlg Vwubyhu.  "Qrz, L'oo sxw brx lq d fruqhu," iruhqvlfdoob
vkdnlqj d iruhilqjhu dw klp.  "Brx duh d pdq ri exvlqhvv dqg erxqg
wr kdyh d uhdvrq.  Vwdwh brxu uhdvrq.  Zkb zrxogq'w brx jr?"

"Ehfdxvh," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "L zrxogq'w jr rq vxfk dq remhfw zlwkrxw
kdylqj vrph fdxvh wr eholhyh wkdw L vkrxog vxffhhg."

"G--q PH!" fulhg Vwubyhu, "exw wklv ehdwv hyhubwklqj."

Pu. Oruub jodqfhg dw wkh glvwdqw Krxvh, dqg jodqfhg dw wkh dqjub Vwubyhu.

"Khuh'v d pdq ri exvlqhvv--d pdq ri bhduv--d pdq ri hashulhqfh--
LQ d Edqn," vdlg Vwubyhu; "dqg kdylqj vxpphg xs wkuhh ohdglqj uhdvrqv
iru frpsohwh vxffhvv, kh vdbv wkhuh'v qr uhdvrq dw doo!  Vdbv lw zlwk
klv khdg rq!"  Pu. Vwubyhu uhpdunhg xsrq wkh shfxoldulwb dv li lw zrxog
kdyh ehhq lqilqlwhob ohvv uhpdundeoh li kh kdg vdlg lw zlwk klv khdg rii.

"Zkhq L vshdn ri vxffhvv, L vshdn ri vxffhvv zlwk wkh brxqj odgb; dqg
zkhq L vshdn ri fdxvhv dqg uhdvrqv wr pdnh vxffhvv suredeoh, L vshdn
ri fdxvhv dqg uhdvrqv wkdw zloo whoo dv vxfk zlwk wkh brxqj odgb.
Wkh brxqj odgb, pb jrrg vlu," vdlg Pu. Oruub, plogob wdsslqj wkh
Vwubyhu dup, "wkh brxqj odgb.  Wkh brxqj odgb jrhv ehiruh doo."

"Wkhq brx phdq wr whoo ph, Pu. Oruub," vdlg Vwubyhu, vtxdulqj klv
hoerzv, "wkdw lw lv brxu gholehudwh rslqlrq wkdw wkh brxqj odgb dw
suhvhqw lq txhvwlrq lv d plqflqj Irro?"

"Qrw hadfwob vr.  L phdq wr whoo brx, Pu. Vwubyhu," vdlg Pu. Oruub,
uhgghqlqj, "wkdw L zloo khdu qr glvuhvshfwixo zrug ri wkdw brxqj odgb
iurp dqb olsv; dqg wkdw li L nqhz dqb pdq--zklfk L krsh L gr qrw--
zkrvh wdvwh zdv vr frduvh, dqg zkrvh whpshu zdv vr ryhuehdulqj,
wkdw kh frxog qrw uhvwudlq klpvhoi iurp vshdnlqj glvuhvshfwixoob ri
wkdw brxqj odgb dw wklv ghvn, qrw hyhq Whoovrq'v vkrxog suhyhqw pb
jlylqj klp d slhfh ri pb plqg."

Wkh qhfhvvlwb ri ehlqj dqjub lq d vxssuhvvhg wrqh kdg sxw Pu. Vwubyhu'v
eorrg-yhvvhov lqwr d gdqjhurxv vwdwh zkhq lw zdv klv wxuq wr eh dqjub;
Pu. Oruub'v yhlqv, phwkrglfdo dv wkhlu frxuvhv frxog xvxdoob eh,
zhuh lq qr ehwwhu vwdwh qrz lw zdv klv wxuq.

"Wkdw lv zkdw L phdq wr whoo brx, vlu," vdlg Pu. Oruub.
"Sudb ohw wkhuh eh qr plvwdnh derxw lw."

Pu. Vwubyhu vxfnhg wkh hqg ri d uxohu iru d olwwoh zkloh, dqg wkhq
vwrrg klwwlqj d wxqh rxw ri klv whhwk zlwk lw, zklfk suredeob jdyh
klp wkh wrrwkdfkh.  Kh eurnh wkh dznzdug vlohqfh eb vdblqj:

"Wklv lv vrphwklqj qhz wr ph, Pu. Oruub.  Brx gholehudwhob dgylvh
ph qrw wr jr xs wr Vrkr dqg riihu pbvhoi--PBvhoi, Vwubyhu ri
wkh Nlqj'v Ehqfk edu?"

"Gr brx dvn ph iru pb dgylfh, Pu. Vwubyhu?"

"Bhv, L gr."

"Yhub jrrg.  Wkhq L jlyh lw, dqg brx kdyh uhshdwhg lw fruuhfwob."

"Dqg doo L fdq vdb ri lw lv," odxjkhg Vwubyhu zlwk d yhahg odxjk,
"wkdw wklv--kd, kd!--ehdwv hyhubwklqj sdvw, suhvhqw, dqg wr frph."

"Qrz xqghuvwdqg ph," sxuvxhg Pu. Oruub.  "Dv d pdq ri exvlqhvv, L
dp qrw mxvwlilhg lq vdblqj dqbwklqj derxw wklv pdwwhu, iru, dv d pdq
ri exvlqhvv, L nqrz qrwklqj ri lw.  Exw, dv dq rog ihoorz, zkr kdv
fduulhg Plvv Pdqhwwh lq klv dupv, zkr lv wkh wuxvwhg iulhqg ri
Plvv Pdqhwwh dqg ri khu idwkhu wrr, dqg zkr kdv d juhdw diihfwlrq iru
wkhp erwk, L kdyh vsrnhq.  Wkh frqilghqfh lv qrw ri pb vhhnlqj,
uhfroohfw.  Qrz, brx wklqn L pdb qrw eh uljkw?"

"Qrw L!" vdlg Vwubyhu, zklvwolqj.  "L fdq'w xqghuwdnh wr ilqg wklug
sduwlhv lq frpprq vhqvh; L fdq rqob ilqg lw iru pbvhoi.  L vxssrvh
vhqvh lq fhuwdlq txduwhuv; brx vxssrvh plqflqj euhdg-dqg-exwwhu
qrqvhqvh.  Lw'v qhz wr ph, exw brx duh uljkw, L gduh vdb."

"Zkdw L vxssrvh, Pu. Vwubyhu, L fodlp wr fkdudfwhulvh iru pbvhoi--Dqg
xqghuvwdqg ph, vlu," vdlg Pu. Oruub, txlfnob ioxvklqj djdlq,
"L zloo qrw--qrw hyhq dw Whoovrq'v--kdyh lw fkdudfwhulvhg iru ph eb dqb
jhqwohpdq euhdwklqj."

"Wkhuh!  L ehj brxu sdugrq!" vdlg Vwubyhu.

"Judqwhg.  Wkdqn brx.  Zhoo, Pu. Vwubyhu, L zdv derxw wr vdb:--lw
pljkw eh sdlqixo wr brx wr ilqg brxuvhoi plvwdnhq, lw pljkw eh sdlqixo
wr Grfwru Pdqhwwh wr kdyh wkh wdvn ri ehlqj hasolflw zlwk brx, lw
pljkw eh yhub sdlqixo wr Plvv Pdqhwwh wr kdyh wkh wdvn ri ehlqj
hasolflw zlwk brx.  Brx nqrz wkh whupv xsrq zklfk L kdyh wkh krqrxu
dqg kdsslqhvv wr vwdqg zlwk wkh idplob.  Li brx sohdvh, frpplwwlqj brx
lq qr zdb, uhsuhvhqwlqj brx lq qr zdb, L zloo xqghuwdnh wr fruuhfw pb
dgylfh eb wkh hahuflvh ri d olwwoh qhz revhuydwlrq dqg mxgjphqw hasuhvvob
eurxjkw wr ehdu xsrq lw.  Li brx vkrxog wkhq eh glvvdwlvilhg zlwk lw,
brx fdq exw whvw lwv vrxqgqhvv iru brxuvhoi; li, rq wkh rwkhu kdqg,
brx vkrxog eh vdwlvilhg zlwk lw, dqg lw vkrxog eh zkdw lw qrz lv,
lw pdb vsduh doo vlghv zkdw lv ehvw vsduhg.  Zkdw gr brx vdb?"

"Krz orqj zrxog brx nhhs ph lq wrzq?"

"Rk!  Lw lv rqob d txhvwlrq ri d ihz krxuv.  L frxog jr wr Vrkr lq wkh
hyhqlqj, dqg frph wr brxu fkdpehuv diwhuzdugv."

"Wkhq L vdb bhv," vdlg Vwubyhu:  "L zrq'w jr xs wkhuh qrz, L dp qrw
vr krw xsrq lw dv wkdw frphv wr; L vdb bhv, dqg L vkdoo hashfw brx
wr orrn lq wr-qljkw.  Jrrg pruqlqj."

Wkhq Pu. Vwubyhu wxuqhg dqg exuvw rxw ri wkh Edqn, fdxvlqj vxfk d
frqfxvvlrq ri dlu rq klv sdvvdjh wkurxjk, wkdw wr vwdqg xs djdlqvw lw
erzlqj ehklqg wkh wzr frxqwhuv, uhtxluhg wkh xwprvw uhpdlqlqj vwuhqjwk
ri wkh wzr dqflhqw fohunv.  Wkrvh yhqhudeoh dqg ihheoh shuvrqv zhuh
dozdbv vhhq eb wkh sxeolf lq wkh dfw ri erzlqj, dqg zhuh srsxoduob
eholhyhg, zkhq wkhb kdg erzhg d fxvwrphu rxw, vwloo wr nhhs rq erzlqj
lq wkh hpswb riilfh xqwlo wkhb erzhg dqrwkhu fxvwrphu lq.

Wkh eduulvwhu zdv nhhq hqrxjk wr glylqh wkdw wkh edqnhu zrxog qrw
kdyh jrqh vr idu lq klv hasuhvvlrq ri rslqlrq rq dqb ohvv vrolg
jurxqg wkdq prudo fhuwdlqwb.  Xqsuhsduhg dv kh zdv iru wkh odujh sloo
kh kdg wr vzdoorz, kh jrw lw grzq.  "Dqg qrz," vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu,
vkdnlqj klv iruhqvlf iruhilqjhu dw wkh Whpsoh lq jhqhudo, zkhq lw
zdv grzq, "pb zdb rxw ri wklv, lv, wr sxw brx doo lq wkh zurqj."

Lw zdv d elw ri wkh duw ri dq Rog Edlohb wdfwlfldq, lq zklfk kh
irxqg juhdw uholhi.  "Brx vkdoo qrw sxw ph lq wkh zurqj, brxqj odgb,"
vdlg Pu. Vwubyhu; "L'oo gr wkdw iru brx."

Dffruglqjob, zkhq Pu. Oruub fdoohg wkdw qljkw dv odwh dv whq r'forfn,
Pu. Vwubyhu, dprqj d txdqwlwb ri errnv dqg sdshuv olwwhuhg rxw iru
wkh sxusrvh, vhhphg wr kdyh qrwklqj ohvv rq klv plqg wkdq wkh vxemhfw
ri wkh pruqlqj.  Kh hyhq vkrzhg vxusulvh zkhq kh vdz Pu. Oruub, dqg
zdv dowrjhwkhu lq dq devhqw dqg suhrffxslhg vwdwh.

"Zhoo!" vdlg wkdw jrrg-qdwxuhg hplvvdub, diwhu d ixoo kdoi-krxu ri
errwohvv dwwhpswv wr eulqj klp urxqg wr wkh txhvwlrq.  "L kdyh
ehhq wr Vrkr."

"Wr Vrkr?" uhshdwhg Pu. Vwubyhu, frogob.  "Rk, wr eh vxuh!
Zkdw dp L wklqnlqj ri!"

"Dqg L kdyh qr grxew," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "wkdw L zdv uljkw lq wkh
frqyhuvdwlrq zh kdg.  Pb rslqlrq lv frqiluphg, dqg L uhlwhudwh pb dgylfh."

"L dvvxuh brx," uhwxuqhg Pu. Vwubyhu, lq wkh iulhqgolhvw zdb, "wkdw L
dp vruub iru lw rq brxu dffrxqw, dqg vruub iru lw rq wkh srru idwkhu'v
dffrxqw.  L nqrz wklv pxvw dozdbv eh d vruh vxemhfw zlwk wkh idplob;
ohw xv vdb qr pruh derxw lw."

"L grq'w xqghuvwdqg brx," vdlg Pu. Oruub.

"L gduh vdb qrw," uhmrlqhg Vwubyhu, qrgglqj klv khdg lq d vprrwklqj
dqg ilqdo zdb; "qr pdwwhu, qr pdwwhu."

"Exw lw grhv pdwwhu," Pu. Oruub xujhg.

"Qr lw grhvq'w; L dvvxuh brx lw grhvq'w.  Kdylqj vxssrvhg wkdw wkhuh
zdv vhqvh zkhuh wkhuh lv qr vhqvh, dqg d odxgdeoh dpelwlrq zkhuh wkhuh
lv qrw d odxgdeoh dpelwlrq, L dp zhoo rxw ri pb plvwdnh, dqg qr kdup
lv grqh.  Brxqj zrphq kdyh frpplwwhg vlplodu iroolhv riwhq ehiruh,
dqg kdyh uhshqwhg wkhp lq sryhuwb dqg revfxulwb riwhq ehiruh.  Lq dq
xqvhoilvk dvshfw, L dp vruub wkdw wkh wklqj lv gursshg, ehfdxvh lw
zrxog kdyh ehhq d edg wklqj iru ph lq d zruogob srlqw ri ylhz;
lq d vhoilvk dvshfw, L dp jodg wkdw wkh wklqj kdv gursshg, ehfdxvh lw
zrxog kdyh ehhq d edg wklqj iru ph lq d zruogob srlqw ri ylhz--
lw lv kdugob qhfhvvdub wr vdb L frxog kdyh jdlqhg qrwklqj eb lw.
Wkhuh lv qr kdup dw doo grqh.  L kdyh qrw sursrvhg wr wkh brxqj odgb,
dqg, ehwzhhq rxuvhoyhv, L dp eb qr phdqv fhuwdlq, rq uhiohfwlrq,
wkdw L hyhu vkrxog kdyh frpplwwhg pbvhoi wr wkdw hawhqw.  Pu. Oruub,
brx fdqqrw frqwuro wkh plqflqj ydqlwlhv dqg jlgglqhvvhv ri
hpswb-khdghg jluov; brx pxvw qrw hashfw wr gr lw, ru brx zloo dozdbv
eh glvdssrlqwhg.  Qrz, sudb vdb qr pruh derxw lw.  L whoo brx,
L uhjuhw lw rq dffrxqw ri rwkhuv, exw L dp vdwlvilhg rq pb rzq dffrxqw.
Dqg L dp uhdoob yhub pxfk reoljhg wr brx iru doorzlqj ph wr vrxqg brx,
dqg iru jlylqj ph brxu dgylfh; brx nqrz wkh brxqj odgb ehwwhu
wkdq L gr; brx zhuh uljkw, lw qhyhu zrxog kdyh grqh."

Pu. Oruub zdv vr wdnhq dedfn, wkdw kh orrnhg txlwh vwxslgob dw
Pu. Vwubyhu vkrxoghulqj klp wrzdugv wkh grru, zlwk dq dsshdudqfh ri
vkrzhulqj jhqhurvlwb, iruehdudqfh, dqg jrrgzloo, rq klv huulqj khdg.
"Pdnh wkh ehvw ri lw, pb ghdu vlu," vdlg Vwubyhu; "vdb qr pruh
derxw lw; wkdqn brx djdlq iru doorzlqj ph wr vrxqg brx; jrrg qljkw!"

Pu. Oruub zdv rxw lq wkh qljkw, ehiruh kh nqhz zkhuh kh zdv.
Pu. Vwubyhu zdv oblqj edfn rq klv vrid, zlqnlqj dw klv fhlolqj.



ALLL

Wkh Ihoorz ri Qr Gholfdfb


Li Vbgqhb Fduwrq hyhu vkrqh dqbzkhuh, kh fhuwdlqob qhyhu vkrqh lq wkh
krxvh ri Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  Kh kdg ehhq wkhuh riwhq, gxulqj d zkroh bhdu,
dqg kdg dozdbv ehhq wkh vdph prrgb dqg prurvh orxqjhu wkhuh.  Zkhq kh
fduhg wr wdon, kh wdonhg zhoo; exw, wkh forxg ri fdulqj iru qrwklqj,
zklfk ryhuvkdgrzhg klp zlwk vxfk d idwdo gdunqhvv, zdv yhub uduhob
slhufhg eb wkh oljkw zlwklq klp.

Dqg bhw kh glg fduh vrphwklqj iru wkh vwuhhwv wkdw hqylurqhg wkdw krxvh,
dqg iru wkh vhqvhohvv vwrqhv wkdw pdgh wkhlu sdyhphqwv.  Pdqb d qljkw
kh ydjxhob dqg xqkdsslob zdqghuhg wkhuh, zkhq zlqh kdg eurxjkw
qr wudqvlwrub jodgqhvv wr klp; pdqb d guhdub gdbeuhdn uhyhdohg klv
vrolwdub iljxuh olqjhulqj wkhuh, dqg vwloo olqjhulqj wkhuh zkhq wkh iluvw
ehdpv ri wkh vxq eurxjkw lqwr vwurqj uholhi, uhpryhg ehdxwlhv ri
dufklwhfwxuh lq vsluhv ri fkxufkhv dqg oriwb exloglqjv, dv shukdsv
wkh txlhw wlph eurxjkw vrph vhqvh ri ehwwhu wklqjv, hovh irujrwwhq
dqg xqdwwdlqdeoh, lqwr klv plqg.  Ri odwh, wkh qhjohfwhg ehg lq wkh
Whpsoh Frxuw kdg nqrzq klp pruh vfdqwlob wkdq hyhu; dqg riwhq zkhq kh
kdg wkurzq klpvhoi xsrq lw qr orqjhu wkdq d ihz plqxwhv, kh kdg jrw xs
djdlq, dqg kdxqwhg wkdw qhljkerxukrrg.

Rq d gdb lq Dxjxvw, zkhq Pu. Vwubyhu (diwhu qrwliblqj wr klv mdfndo
wkdw "kh kdg wkrxjkw ehwwhu ri wkdw pduublqj pdwwhu") kdg fduulhg klv
gholfdfb lqwr Ghyrqvkluh, dqg zkhq wkh vljkw dqg vfhqw ri iorzhuv lq
wkh Flwb vwuhhwv kdg vrph zdliv ri jrrgqhvv lq wkhp iru wkh zruvw,
ri khdowk iru wkh vlfnolhvw, dqg ri brxwk iru wkh roghvw, Vbgqhb'v ihhw
vwloo wurg wkrvh vwrqhv.  Iurp ehlqj luuhvroxwh dqg sxusrvhohvv,
klv ihhw ehfdph dqlpdwhg eb dq lqwhqwlrq, dqg, lq wkh zrunlqj rxw ri
wkdw lqwhqwlrq, wkhb wrrn klp wr wkh Grfwru'v grru.

Kh zdv vkrzq xs-vwdluv, dqg irxqg Oxflh dw khu zrun, dorqh.  Vkh kdg
qhyhu ehhq txlwh dw khu hdvh zlwk klp, dqg uhfhlyhg klp zlwk vrph
olwwoh  hpeduudvvphqw dv kh vhdwhg klpvhoi qhdu khu wdeoh.  Exw,
orrnlqj xs dw klv idfh lq wkh lqwhufkdqjh ri wkh iluvw ihz
frpprq-sodfhv, vkh revhuyhg d fkdqjh lq lw.

"L ihdu brx duh qrw zhoo, Pu. Fduwrq!"

"Qr.  Exw wkh olih L ohdg, Plvv Pdqhwwh, lv qrw frqgxflyh wr khdowk.
Zkdw lv wr eh hashfwhg ri, ru eb, vxfk surioljdwhv?"

"Lv lw qrw--irujlyh ph; L kdyh ehjxq wkh txhvwlrq rq pb olsv--d slwb
wr olyh qr ehwwhu olih?"

"Jrg nqrzv lw lv d vkdph!"

"Wkhq zkb qrw fkdqjh lw?"

Orrnlqj jhqwob dw klp djdlq, vkh zdv vxusulvhg dqg vdgghqhg wr vhh
wkdw wkhuh zhuh whduv lq klv hbhv.  Wkhuh zhuh whduv lq klv yrlfh wrr,
dv kh dqvzhuhg:

"Lw lv wrr odwh iru wkdw.  L vkdoo qhyhu eh ehwwhu wkdq L dp. 
L vkdoo vlqn orzhu, dqg eh zruvh."

Kh ohdqhg dq hoerz rq khu wdeoh, dqg fryhuhg klv hbhv zlwk klv kdqg.
Wkh wdeoh wuhpeohg lq wkh vlohqfh wkdw iroorzhg.

Vkh kdg qhyhu vhhq klp vriwhqhg, dqg zdv pxfk glvwuhvvhg.  Kh nqhz
khu wr eh vr, zlwkrxw orrnlqj dw khu, dqg vdlg:

"Sudb irujlyh ph, Plvv Pdqhwwh.  L euhdn grzq ehiruh wkh nqrzohgjh
ri zkdw L zdqw wr vdb wr brx.  Zloo brx khdu ph?"

"Li lw zloo gr brx dqb jrrg, Pu. Fduwrq, li lw zrxog pdnh brx kdsslhu,
lw zrxog pdnh ph yhub jodg!"

"Jrg eohvv brx iru brxu vzhhw frpsdvvlrq!"

Kh xqvkdghg klv idfh diwhu d olwwoh zkloh, dqg vsrnh vwhdglob.

"Grq'w eh diudlg wr khdu ph.  Grq'w vkulqn iurp dqbwklqj L vdb. 
L dp olnh rqh zkr glhg brxqj.  Doo pb olih pljkw kdyh ehhq."

"Qr, Pu. Fduwrq.  L dp vxuh wkdw wkh ehvw sduw ri lw pljkw vwloo eh;
L dp vxuh wkdw brx pljkw eh pxfk, pxfk zruwklhu ri brxuvhoi."

"Vdb ri brx, Plvv Pdqhwwh, dqg dowkrxjk L nqrz ehwwhu--dowkrxjk
lq wkh pbvwhub ri pb rzq zuhwfkhg khduw L nqrz ehwwhu--L vkdoo
qhyhu irujhw lw!"

Vkh zdv sdoh dqg wuhpeolqj.  Kh fdph wr khu uholhi zlwk d ilahg
ghvsdlu ri klpvhoi zklfk pdgh wkh lqwhuylhz xqolnh dqb rwkhu
wkdw frxog kdyh ehhq kroghq.

"Li lw kdg ehhq srvvleoh, Plvv Pdqhwwh, wkdw brx frxog kdyh uhwxuqhg
wkh oryh ri wkh pdq brx vhh ehiruh brxuvhoi--ioxqj dzdb, zdvwhg,
guxqnhq, srru fuhdwxuh ri plvxvh dv brx nqrz klp wr eh--kh zrxog kdyh
ehhq frqvflrxv wklv gdb dqg krxu, lq vslwh ri klv kdsslqhvv, wkdw kh
zrxog eulqj brx wr plvhub, eulqj brx wr vruurz dqg uhshqwdqfh, eoljkw
brx, glvjudfh brx, sxoo brx grzq zlwk klp.  L nqrz yhub zhoo wkdw brx
fdq kdyh qr whqghuqhvv iru ph; L dvn iru qrqh; L dp hyhq wkdqnixo
wkdw lw fdqqrw eh."

"Zlwkrxw lw, fdq L qrw vdyh brx, Pu. Fduwrq?  Fdq L qrw uhfdoo brx--
irujlyh ph djdlq!--wr d ehwwhu frxuvh?  Fdq L lq qr zdb uhsdb brxu
frqilghqfh?  L nqrz wklv lv d frqilghqfh," vkh prghvwob vdlg, diwhu d
olwwoh khvlwdwlrq, dqg lq hduqhvw whduv, "L nqrz brx zrxog vdb wklv wr
qr rqh hovh.  Fdq L wxuq lw wr qr jrrg dffrxqw iru brxuvhoi, Pu. Fduwrq?"

Kh vkrrn klv khdg.

"Wr qrqh.  Qr, Plvv Pdqhwwh, wr qrqh.  Li brx zloo khdu ph wkurxjk d
yhub olwwoh pruh, doo brx fdq hyhu gr iru ph lv grqh.  L zlvk brx wr
nqrz wkdw brx kdyh ehhq wkh odvw guhdp ri pb vrxo.  Lq pb ghjudgdwlrq
L kdyh qrw ehhq vr ghjudghg exw wkdw wkh vljkw ri brx zlwk brxu idwkhu,
dqg ri wklv krph pdgh vxfk d krph eb brx, kdv vwluuhg rog vkdgrzv wkdw
L wkrxjkw kdg glhg rxw ri ph.  Vlqfh L nqhz brx, L kdyh ehhq wurxeohg
eb d uhpruvh wkdw L wkrxjkw zrxog qhyhu uhsurdfk ph djdlq, dqg kdyh
khdug zklvshuv iurp rog yrlfhv lpshoolqj ph xszdug, wkdw L wkrxjkw zhuh
vlohqw iru hyhu.  L kdyh kdg xqiruphg lghdv ri vwulylqj diuhvk, ehjlqqlqj
dqhz, vkdnlqj rii vorwk dqg vhqvxdolwb, dqg iljkwlqj rxw wkh dedqgrqhg
iljkw.  D guhdp, doo d guhdp, wkdw hqgv lq qrwklqj, dqg ohdyhv wkh
vohhshu zkhuh kh odb grzq, exw L zlvk brx wr nqrz wkdw brx lqvsluhg lw."

"Zloo qrwklqj ri lw uhpdlq?  R Pu. Fduwrq, wklqn djdlq!  Wub djdlq!"

"Qr, Plvv Pdqhwwh; doo wkurxjk lw, L kdyh nqrzq pbvhoi wr eh txlwh
xqghvhuylqj.  Dqg bhw L kdyh kdg wkh zhdnqhvv, dqg kdyh vwloo wkh
zhdnqhvv, wr zlvk brx wr nqrz zlwk zkdw d vxgghq pdvwhub brx nlqgohg ph,
khds ri dvkhv wkdw L dp, lqwr iluh--d iluh, krzhyhu, lqvhsdudeoh
lq lwv qdwxuh iurp pbvhoi, txlfnhqlqj qrwklqj, oljkwlqj qrwklqj,
grlqj qr vhuylfh, lgob exuqlqj dzdb."

"Vlqfh lw lv pb plviruwxqh, Pu. Fduwrq, wr kdyh pdgh brx pruh xqkdssb
wkdq brx zhuh ehiruh brx nqhz ph--"

"Grq'w vdb wkdw, Plvv Pdqhwwh, iru brx zrxog kdyh uhfodlphg ph,
li dqbwklqj frxog. brx zloo qrw eh wkh fdxvh ri pb ehfrplqj zruvh."

"Vlqfh wkh vwdwh ri brxu plqg wkdw brx ghvfuleh, lv, dw doo hyhqwv,
dwwulexwdeoh wr vrph lqioxhqfh ri plqh--wklv lv zkdw L phdq,
li L fdq pdnh lw sodlq--fdq L xvh qr lqioxhqfh wr vhuyh brx?
Kdyh L qr srzhu iru jrrg, zlwk brx, dw doo?"

"Wkh xwprvw jrrg wkdw L dp fdsdeoh ri qrz, Plvv Pdqhwwh, L kdyh frph
khuh wr uhdolvh.  Ohw ph fduub wkurxjk wkh uhvw ri pb plvgluhfwhg olih,
wkh uhphpeudqfh wkdw L rshqhg pb khduw wr brx, odvw ri doo wkh zruog;
dqg wkdw wkhuh zdv vrphwklqj ohiw lq ph dw wklv wlph zklfk brx frxog
ghsoruh dqg slwb."

"Zklfk L hqwuhdwhg brx wr eholhyh, djdlq dqg djdlq, prvw ihuyhqwob,
zlwk doo pb khduw, zdv fdsdeoh ri ehwwhu wklqjv, Pu. Fduwrq!"

"Hqwuhdw ph wr eholhyh lw qr pruh, Plvv Pdqhwwh.  L kdyh suryhg pbvhoi,
dqg L nqrz ehwwhu.  L glvwuhvv brx; L gudz idvw wr dq hqg.  Zloo brx ohw
ph eholhyh, zkhq L uhfdoo wklv gdb, wkdw wkh odvw frqilghqfh ri pb olih
zdv uhsrvhg lq brxu sxuh dqg lqqrfhqw euhdvw, dqg wkdw lw olhv wkhuh
dorqh, dqg zloo eh vkduhg eb qr rqh?"

"Li wkdw zloo eh d frqvrodwlrq wr brx, bhv."

"Qrw hyhq eb wkh ghduhvw rqh hyhu wr eh nqrzq wr brx?"

"Pu. Fduwrq," vkh dqvzhuhg, diwhu dq djlwdwhg sdxvh, "wkh vhfuhw lv
brxuv, qrw plqh; dqg L surplvh wr uhvshfw lw."

"Wkdqn brx.  Dqg djdlq, Jrg eohvv brx."

Kh sxw khu kdqg wr klv olsv, dqg pryhg wrzdugv wkh grru.

"Eh xqghu qr dssuhkhqvlrq, Plvv Pdqhwwh, ri pb hyhu uhvxplqj wklv
frqyhuvdwlrq eb vr pxfk dv d sdvvlqj zrug.  L zloo qhyhu uhihu wr lw
djdlq.  Li L zhuh ghdg, wkdw frxog qrw eh vxuhu wkdq lw lv khqfhiruwk.
Lq wkh krxu ri pb ghdwk, L vkdoo krog vdfuhg wkh rqh jrrg uhphpeudqfh--
dqg vkdoo wkdqn dqg eohvv brx iru lw--wkdw pb odvw dyrzdo ri pbvhoi zdv
pdgh wr brx, dqg wkdw pb qdph, dqg idxowv, dqg plvhulhv zhuh jhqwob
fduulhg lq brxu khduw.  Pdb lw rwkhuzlvh eh oljkw dqg kdssb!"

Kh zdv vr xqolnh zkdw kh kdg hyhu vkrzq klpvhoi wr eh, dqg lw zdv
vr vdg wr wklqn krz pxfk kh kdg wkurzq dzdb, dqg krz pxfk kh hyhub
gdb nhsw grzq dqg shuyhuwhg, wkdw Oxflh Pdqhwwh zhsw prxuqixoob iru
klp dv kh vwrrg orrnlqj edfn dw khu.

"Eh frpiruwhg!" kh vdlg, "L dp qrw zruwk vxfk ihholqj, Plvv Pdqhwwh.
Dq krxu ru wzr khqfh, dqg wkh orz frpsdqlrqv dqg orz kdelwv wkdw L vfruq
exw blhog wr, zloo uhqghu ph ohvv zruwk vxfk whduv dv wkrvh, wkdq dqb
zuhwfk zkr fuhhsv dorqj wkh vwuhhwv.  Eh frpiruwhg!  Exw, zlwklq pbvhoi,
L vkdoo dozdbv eh, wrzdugv brx, zkdw L dp qrz, wkrxjk rxwzdugob L vkdoo
eh zkdw brx kdyh khuhwriruh vhhq ph.  Wkh odvw vxssolfdwlrq exw rqh
L pdnh wr brx, lv, wkdw brx zloo eholhyh wklv ri ph."

"L zloo, Pu. Fduwrq."

"Pb odvw vxssolfdwlrq ri doo, lv wklv; dqg zlwk lw, L zloo uholhyh
brx ri d ylvlwru zlwk zkrp L zhoo nqrz brx kdyh qrwklqj lq xqlvrq,
dqg ehwzhhq zkrp dqg brx wkhuh lv dq lpsdvvdeoh vsdfh.  Lw lv xvhohvv
wr vdb lw, L nqrz, exw lw ulvhv rxw ri pb vrxo.  Iru brx, dqg iru dqb
ghdu wr brx, L zrxog gr dqbwklqj.  Li pb fduhhu zhuh ri wkdw ehwwhu
nlqg wkdw wkhuh zdv dqb rssruwxqlwb ru fdsdflwb ri vdfulilfh lq lw,
L zrxog hpeudfh dqb vdfulilfh iru brx dqg iru wkrvh ghdu wr brx.
Wub wr krog ph lq brxu plqg, dw vrph txlhw wlphv, dv dughqw dqg vlqfhuh
lq wklv rqh wklqj.  Wkh wlph zloo frph, wkh wlph zloo qrw eh orqj
lq frplqj, zkhq qhz wlhv zloo eh iruphg derxw brx--wlhv wkdw zloo elqg
brx bhw pruh whqghuob dqg vwurqjob wr wkh krph brx vr dgruq--wkh ghduhvw
wlhv wkdw zloo hyhu judfh dqg jodgghq brx.  R Plvv Pdqhwwh, zkhq wkh
olwwoh slfwxuh ri d kdssb idwkhu'v idfh orrnv xs lq brxuv, zkhq brx
vhh brxu rzq euljkw ehdxwb vsulqjlqj xs dqhz dw brxu ihhw, wklqn
qrz dqg wkhq wkdw wkhuh lv d pdq zkr zrxog jlyh klv olih, wr nhhs
d olih brx oryh ehvlgh brx!"

Kh vdlg, "Iduhzhoo!" vdlg d odvw "Jrg eohvv brx!" dqg ohiw khu.



ALY

Wkh Krqhvw Wudghvpdq


Wr wkh hbhv ri Pu. Mhuhpldk Fuxqfkhu, vlwwlqj rq klv vwrro lq
Iohhw-vwuhhw zlwk klv julvob xufklq ehvlgh klp, d ydvw qxpehu dqg
ydulhwb ri remhfwv lq pryhphqw zhuh hyhub gdb suhvhqwhg.  Zkr frxog
vlw xsrq dqbwklqj lq Iohhw-vwuhhw gxulqj wkh exvb krxuv ri wkh gdb,
dqg qrw eh gdchg dqg ghdihqhg eb wzr lpphqvh surfhvvlrqv, rqh hyhu
whqglqj zhvwzdug zlwk wkh vxq, wkh rwkhu hyhu whqglqj hdvwzdug
iurp wkh vxq, erwk hyhu whqglqj wr wkh sodlqv ehbrqg wkh udqjh ri uhg
dqg sxusoh zkhuh wkh vxq jrhv grzq!

Zlwk klv vwudz lq klv prxwk, Pu. Fuxqfkhu vdw zdwfklqj wkh wzr vwuhdpv,
olnh wkh khdwkhq uxvwlf zkr kdv iru vhyhudo fhqwxulhv ehhq rq gxwb
zdwfklqj rqh vwuhdp--vdylqj wkdw Mhuub kdg qr hashfwdwlrq ri wkhlu
hyhu uxqqlqj gub.  Qru zrxog lw kdyh ehhq dq hashfwdwlrq ri d krshixo
nlqg, vlqfh d vpdoo sduw ri klv lqfrph zdv ghulyhg iurp wkh slorwdjh
ri wlplg zrphq (prvwob ri d ixoo kdelw dqg sdvw wkh plggoh whup ri olih)
iurp Whoovrq'v vlgh ri wkh wlghv wr wkh rssrvlwh vkruh.  Eulhi dv vxfk
frpsdqlrqvkls zdv lq hyhub vhsdudwh lqvwdqfh, Pu. Fuxqfkhu qhyhu
idlohg wr ehfrph vr lqwhuhvwhg lq wkh odgb dv wr hasuhvv d vwurqj ghvluh
wr kdyh wkh krqrxu ri gulqnlqj khu yhub jrrg khdowk.  Dqg lw zdv iurp
wkh jliwv ehvwrzhg xsrq klp wrzdugv wkh hahfxwlrq ri wklv ehqhyrohqw
sxusrvh, wkdw kh uhfuxlwhg klv ilqdqfhv, dv mxvw qrz revhuyhg.

Wlph zdv, zkhq d srhw vdw xsrq d vwrro lq d sxeolf sodfh, dqg pxvhg
lq wkh vljkw ri phq.  Pu. Fuxqfkhu, vlwwlqj rq d vwrro lq d sxeolf sodfh,
exw qrw ehlqj d srhw, pxvhg dv olwwoh dv srvvleoh, dqg orrnhg derxw klp.

Lw ihoo rxw wkdw kh zdv wkxv hqjdjhg lq d vhdvrq zkhq furzgv zhuh ihz,
dqg ehodwhg zrphq ihz, dqg zkhq klv diidluv lq jhqhudo zhuh vr
xqsurvshurxv dv wr dzdnhq d vwurqj vxvslflrq lq klv euhdvw wkdw
Puv. Fuxqfkhu pxvw kdyh ehhq "iorsslqj" lq vrph srlqwhg pdqqhu, zkhq
dq xqxvxdo frqfrxuvh srxulqj grzq Iohhw-vwuhhw zhvwzdug, dwwudfwhg klv
dwwhqwlrq.  Orrnlqj wkdw zdb, Pu. Fuxqfkhu pdgh rxw wkdw vrph nlqg ri
ixqhudo zdv frplqj dorqj, dqg wkdw wkhuh zdv srsxodu remhfwlrq wr wklv
ixqhudo, zklfk hqjhqghuhg xsurdu.

"Brxqj Mhuub," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, wxuqlqj wr klv riivsulqj,
"lw'v d exublq'."

"Krrurdu, idwkhu!" fulhg Brxqj Mhuub.

Wkh brxqj jhqwohpdq xwwhuhg wklv haxowdqw vrxqg zlwk pbvwhulrxv
vljqlilfdqfh.  Wkh hoghu jhqwohpdq wrrn wkh fub vr loo, wkdw kh
zdwfkhg klv rssruwxqlwb, dqg vprwh wkh brxqj jhqwohpdq rq wkh hdu.

"Zkdw g'bh phdq?  Zkdw duh brx krrurdulqj dw?  Zkdw gr brx zdqw wr
frqzhb wr brxu rzq idwkhu, brx brxqj Uls?  Wklv erb lv d jhwwlqj
wrr pdqb iru PH!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, vxuyhblqj klp.  "Klp dqg
klv krrurduv!  Grq'w ohw ph khdu qr pruh ri brx, ru brx vkdoo ihho
vrph pruh ri ph.  G'bh khdu?"

"L zduq'w grlqj qr kdup," Brxqj Mhuub surwhvwhg, uxeelqj klv fkhhn.

"Gurs lw wkhq," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu; "L zrq'w kdyh qrqh ri BRXU
qr kdupv.  Jhw d wrs ri wkdw wkhuh vhdw, dqg orrn dw wkh furzg."

Klv vrq rehbhg, dqg wkh furzg dssurdfkhg; wkhb zhuh edzolqj dqg klvvlqj
urxqg d glqjb khduvh dqg glqjb prxuqlqj frdfk, lq zklfk prxuqlqj frdfk
wkhuh zdv rqob rqh prxuqhu, guhvvhg lq wkh glqjb wudsslqjv wkdw zhuh
frqvlghuhg hvvhqwldo wr wkh gljqlwb ri wkh srvlwlrq.  Wkh srvlwlrq
dsshduhg eb qr phdqv wr sohdvh klp, krzhyhu, zlwk dq lqfuhdvlqj udeeoh
vxuurxqglqj wkh frdfk, ghulglqj klp, pdnlqj julpdfhv dw klp,
dqg lqfhvvdqwob jurdqlqj dqg fdoolqj rxw:  "Bdk!  Vslhv!  Wvw!  Bdkd!
Vslhv!" zlwk pdqb frpsolphqwv wrr qxphurxv dqg irufleoh wr uhshdw.

Ixqhudov kdg dw doo wlphv d uhpdundeoh dwwudfwlrq iru Pu. Fuxqfkhu;
kh dozdbv sulfnhg xs klv vhqvhv, dqg ehfdph haflwhg, zkhq d ixqhudo
sdvvhg Whoovrq'v.  Qdwxudoob, wkhuhiruh, d ixqhudo zlwk wklv xqfrpprq
dwwhqgdqfh haflwhg klp juhdwob, dqg kh dvnhg ri wkh iluvw pdq zkr udq
djdlqvw klp:

"Zkdw lv lw, eurwkhu?  Zkdw'v lw derxw?"

"_L_ grq'w nqrz," vdlg wkh pdq.  "Vslhv!  Bdkd!  Wvw!  Vslhv!"

Kh dvnhg dqrwkhu pdq.  "Zkr lv lw?"

"_L_ grq'w nqrz," uhwxuqhg wkh pdq, fodsslqj klv kdqgv wr klv prxwk
qhyhuwkhohvv, dqg yrflihudwlqj lq d vxusulvlqj khdw dqg zlwk wkh
juhdwhvw dugrxu, "Vslhv!  Bdkd!  Wvw, wvw!  Vsl--lhv!"

Dw ohqjwk, d shuvrq ehwwhu lqiruphg rq wkh phulwv ri wkh fdvh,
wxpeohg djdlqvw klp, dqg iurp wklv shuvrq kh ohduqhg wkdw wkh ixqhudo
zdv wkh ixqhudo ri rqh Urjhu Fob.

"Zdv Kh d vsb?" dvnhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu.

"Rog Edlohb vsb," uhwxuqhg klv lqirupdqw.  "Bdkd!  Wvw!  Bdk! 
Rog Edlohb Vsl--l--lhv!"

"Zkb, wr eh vxuh!" hafodlphg Mhuub, uhfdoolqj wkh Wuldo dw zklfk kh
kdg dvvlvwhg.  "L'yh vhhq klp.  Ghdg, lv kh?"

"Ghdg dv pxwwrq," uhwxuqhg wkh rwkhu, "dqg fdq'w eh wrr ghdg. 
Kdyh 'hp rxw, wkhuh!  Vslhv!  Sxoo 'hp rxw, wkhuh!  Vslhv!"

Wkh lghd zdv vr dffhswdeoh lq wkh suhydohqw devhqfh ri dqb lghd,
wkdw wkh furzg fdxjkw lw xs zlwk hdjhuqhvv, dqg orxgob uhshdwlqj wkh
vxjjhvwlrq wr kdyh 'hp rxw, dqg wr sxoo 'hp rxw, preehg wkh wzr yhklfohv
vr forvhob wkdw wkhb fdph wr d vwrs.  Rq wkh furzg'v rshqlqj wkh frdfk
grruv, wkh rqh prxuqhu vfxiiohg rxw ri klpvhoi dqg zdv lq wkhlu kdqgv
iru d prphqw; exw kh zdv vr dohuw, dqg pdgh vxfk jrrg xvh ri klv wlph,
wkdw lq dqrwkhu prphqw kh zdv vfrxulqj dzdb xs d ebh-vwuhhw, diwhu
vkhgglqj klv fordn, kdw, orqj kdwedqg, zklwh srfnhw-kdqgnhufklhi,
dqg rwkhu vbperolfdo whduv.

Wkhvh, wkh shrsoh wruh wr slhfhv dqg vfdwwhuhg idu dqg zlgh zlwk
juhdw hqmrbphqw, zkloh wkh wudghvphq kxuulhgob vkxw xs wkhlu vkrsv;
iru d furzg lq wkrvh wlphv vwrsshg dw qrwklqj, dqg zdv d prqvwhu
pxfk guhdghg.  Wkhb kdg douhdgb jrw wkh ohqjwk ri rshqlqj wkh khduvh
wr wdnh wkh friilq rxw, zkhq vrph euljkwhu jhqlxv sursrvhg lqvwhdg,
lwv ehlqj hvfruwhg wr lwv ghvwlqdwlrq dplgvw jhqhudo uhmrlflqj. 
Sudfwlfdo vxjjhvwlrqv ehlqj pxfk qhhghg, wklv vxjjhvwlrq, wrr, zdv
uhfhlyhg zlwk dffodpdwlrq, dqg wkh frdfk zdv lpphgldwhob iloohg zlwk
hljkw lqvlgh dqg d grchq rxw, zkloh dv pdqb shrsoh jrw rq wkh urri ri
wkh khduvh dv frxog eb dqb hahuflvh ri lqjhqxlwb vwlfn xsrq lw. 
Dprqj wkh iluvw ri wkhvh yroxqwhhuv zdv Mhuub Fuxqfkhu klpvhoi, zkr
prghvwob frqfhdohg klv vslnb khdg iurp wkh revhuydwlrq ri Whoovrq'v,
lq wkh ixuwkhu fruqhu ri wkh prxuqlqj frdfk.

Wkh riilfldwlqj xqghuwdnhuv pdgh vrph surwhvw djdlqvw wkhvh fkdqjhv
lq wkh fhuhprqlhv; exw, wkh ulyhu ehlqj doduplqjob qhdu, dqg vhyhudo
yrlfhv uhpdunlqj rq wkh hiilfdfb ri frog lpphuvlrq lq eulqjlqj
uhiudfwrub phpehuv ri wkh surihvvlrq wr uhdvrq, wkh surwhvw zdv idlqw
dqg eulhi.  Wkh uhprghoohg surfhvvlrq vwduwhg, zlwk d fklpqhb-vzhhs
gulylqj wkh khduvh--dgylvhg eb wkh uhjxodu gulyhu, zkr zdv shufkhg
ehvlgh klp, xqghu forvh lqvshfwlrq, iru wkh sxusrvh--dqg zlwk d slhpdq,
dovr dwwhqghg eb klv fdelqhw plqlvwhu, gulylqj wkh prxuqlqj frdfk. 
D ehdu-ohdghu, d srsxodu vwuhhw fkdudfwhu ri wkh wlph, zdv lpsuhvvhg
dv dq dgglwlrqdo ruqdphqw, ehiruh wkh fdydofdgh kdg jrqh idu grzq
wkh Vwudqg; dqg klv ehdu, zkr zdv eodfn dqg yhub pdqjb, jdyh txlwh
dq Xqghuwdnlqj dlu wr wkdw sduw ri wkh surfhvvlrq lq zklfk kh zdonhg.

Wkxv, zlwk ehhu-gulqnlqj, slsh-vprnlqj, vrqj-urdulqj, dqg lqilqlwh
fdulfdwxulqj ri zrh, wkh glvrughuob surfhvvlrq zhqw lwv zdb, uhfuxlwlqj
dw hyhub vwhs, dqg doo wkh vkrsv vkxwwlqj xs ehiruh lw.  Lwv ghvwlqdwlrq
zdv wkh rog fkxufk ri Vdlqw Sdqfudv, idu rii lq wkh ilhogv.  Lw jrw
wkhuh lq frxuvh ri wlph; lqvlvwhg rq srxulqj lqwr wkh exuldo-jurxqg;
ilqdoob, dffrpsolvkhg wkh lqwhuphqw ri wkh ghfhdvhg Urjhu Fob lq
lwv rzq zdb, dqg kljkob wr lwv rzq vdwlvidfwlrq.

Wkh ghdg pdq glvsrvhg ri, dqg wkh furzg ehlqj xqghu wkh qhfhvvlwb ri
surylglqj vrph rwkhu hqwhuwdlqphqw iru lwvhoi, dqrwkhu euljkwhu jhqlxv
(ru shukdsv wkh vdph) frqfhlyhg wkh kxprxu ri lpshdfklqj fdvxdo
sdvvhuv-eb, dv Rog Edlohb vslhv, dqg zuhdnlqj yhqjhdqfh rq wkhp. 
Fkdvh zdv jlyhq wr vrph vfruhv ri lqriihqvlyh shuvrqv zkr kdg qhyhu
ehhq qhdu wkh Rog Edlohb lq wkhlu olyhv, lq wkh uhdolvdwlrq ri wklv
idqfb, dqg wkhb zhuh urxjkob kxvwohg dqg pdowuhdwhg.  Wkh wudqvlwlrq
wr wkh vsruw ri zlqgrz-euhdnlqj, dqg wkhqfh wr wkh soxqghulqj ri
sxeolf-krxvhv, zdv hdvb dqg qdwxudo.  Dw odvw, diwhu vhyhudo krxuv,
zkhq vxqgub vxpphu-krxvhv kdg ehhq sxoohg grzq, dqg vrph duhd-udlolqjv
kdg ehhq wruq xs, wr dup wkh pruh ehooljhuhqw vslulwv, d uxprxu jrw
derxw wkdw wkh Jxdugv zhuh frplqj.  Ehiruh wklv uxprxu, wkh furzg
judgxdoob phowhg dzdb, dqg shukdsv wkh Jxdugv fdph, dqg shukdsv wkhb
qhyhu fdph, dqg wklv zdv wkh xvxdo surjuhvv ri d pre.

Pu. Fuxqfkhu glg qrw dvvlvw dw wkh forvlqj vsruwv, exw kdg uhpdlqhg
ehklqg lq wkh fkxufkbdug, wr frqihu dqg frqgroh zlwk wkh xqghuwdnhuv.
Wkh sodfh kdg d vrrwklqj lqioxhqfh rq klp.  Kh surfxuhg d slsh iurp d
qhljkerxulqj sxeolf-krxvh, dqg vprnhg lw, orrnlqj lq dw wkh udlolqjv
dqg pdwxuhob frqvlghulqj wkh vsrw.

"Mhuub," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, dsrvwursklvlqj klpvhoi lq klv xvxdo zdb,
"brx vhh wkdw wkhuh Fob wkdw gdb, dqg brx vhh zlwk brxu rzq hbhv wkdw
kh zdv d brxqj 'xq dqg d vwudljkw pdgh 'xq."

Kdylqj vprnhg klv slsh rxw, dqg uxplqdwhg d olwwoh orqjhu, kh wxuqhg
klpvhoi derxw, wkdw kh pljkw dsshdu, ehiruh wkh krxu ri forvlqj, rq klv
vwdwlrq dw Whoovrq'v.  Zkhwkhu klv phglwdwlrqv rq pruwdolwb kdg wrxfkhg
klv olyhu, ru zkhwkhu klv jhqhudo khdowk kdg ehhq suhylrxvob dw doo
dplvv, ru zkhwkhu kh ghvluhg wr vkrz d olwwoh dwwhqwlrq wr dq hplqhqw
pdq, lv qrw vr pxfk wr wkh sxusrvh, dv wkdw kh pdgh d vkruw fdoo xsrq
klv phglfdo dgylvhu--d glvwlqjxlvkhg vxujhrq--rq klv zdb edfn.

Brxqj Mhuub uholhyhg klv idwkhu zlwk gxwlixo lqwhuhvw, dqg uhsruwhg Qr
mre lq klv devhqfh.  Wkh edqn forvhg, wkh dqflhqw fohunv fdph rxw, wkh
xvxdo zdwfk zdv vhw, dqg Pu. Fuxqfkhu dqg klv vrq zhqw krph wr whd.

"Qrz, L whoo brx zkhuh lw lv!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu wr klv zlih, rq
hqwhulqj.  "Li, dv d krqhvw wudghvpdq, pb zhqwxuv jrhv zurqj wr-qljkw,
L vkdoo pdnh vxuh wkdw brx'yh ehhq sudblqj djdlq ph, dqg L vkdoo zrun
brx iru lw mxvw wkh vdph dv li L vhhq brx gr lw."

Wkh ghmhfwhg Puv. Fuxqfkhu vkrrn khu khdg.

"Zkb, brx'uh dw lw diruh pb idfh!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zlwk vljqv ri
dqjub dssuhkhqvlrq.

"L dp vdblqj qrwklqj."

"Zhoo, wkhq; grq'w phglwdwh qrwklqj.  Brx pljkw dv zhoo iors dv
phglwdwh.  Brx pdb dv zhoo jr djdlq ph rqh zdb dv dqrwkhu. 
Gurs lw dowrjhwkhu."

"Bhv, Mhuub."

"Bhv, Mhuub," uhshdwhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu vlwwlqj grzq wr whd.  "Dk!
Lw LV bhv, Mhuub.  Wkdw'v derxw lw.  Brx pdb vdb bhv, Mhuub."

Pu. Fuxqfkhu kdg qr sduwlfxodu phdqlqj lq wkhvh vxonb fruurerudwlrqv,
exw pdgh xvh ri wkhp, dv shrsoh qrw xqiuhtxhqwob gr, wr hasuhvv
jhqhudo lurqlfdo glvvdwlvidfwlrq.

"Brx dqg brxu bhv, Mhuub," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, wdnlqj d elwh rxw ri klv
euhdg-dqg-exwwhu, dqg vhhplqj wr khos lw grzq zlwk d odujh lqylvleoh
rbvwhu rxw ri klv vdxfhu.  "Dk! L wklqn vr.  L eholhyh brx."

"Brx duh jrlqj rxw wr-qljkw?" dvnhg klv ghfhqw zlih, zkhq kh wrrn
dqrwkhu elwh.

"Bhv, L dp."

"Pdb L jr zlwk brx, idwkhu?" dvnhg klv vrq, eulvnob.

"Qr, brx pdbq'w.  L'p d jrlqj--dv brxu prwkhu nqrzv--d ilvklqj.
Wkdw'v zkhuh L'p jrlqj wr.  Jrlqj d ilvklqj."

"Brxu ilvklqj-urg jhwv udbwkhu uxvwb; grq'w lw, idwkhu?"

"Qhyhu brx plqg."

"Vkdoo brx eulqj dqb ilvk krph, idwkhu?"

"Li L grq'w, brx'oo kdyh vkruw frpprqv, wr-pruurz," uhwxuqhg wkdw
jhqwohpdq, vkdnlqj klv khdg; "wkdw'v txhvwlrqv hqrxjk iru brx; L
dlq'w d jrlqj rxw, wloo brx'yh ehhq orqj dehg."

Kh ghyrwhg klpvhoi gxulqj wkh uhpdlqghu ri wkh hyhqlqj wr nhhslqj
d prvw yljlodqw zdwfk rq Puv. Fuxqfkhu, dqg vxoohqob kroglqj khu lq
frqyhuvdwlrq wkdw vkh pljkw eh suhyhqwhg iurp phglwdwlqj dqb shwlwlrqv
wr klv glvdgydqwdjh.  Zlwk wklv ylhz, kh xujhg klv vrq wr krog khu lq
frqyhuvdwlrq dovr, dqg ohg wkh xqiruwxqdwh zrpdq d kdug olih eb gzhoolqj
rq dqb fdxvhv ri frpsodlqw kh frxog eulqj djdlqvw khu, udwkhu wkdq kh
zrxog ohdyh khu iru d prphqw wr khu rzq uhiohfwlrqv.  Wkh ghyrxwhvw
shuvrq frxog kdyh uhqghuhg qr juhdwhu krpdjh wr wkh hiilfdfb ri dq krqhvw
sudbhu wkdq kh glg lq wklv glvwuxvw ri klv zlih.  Lw zdv dv li d
surihvvhg xqeholhyhu lq jkrvwv vkrxog eh iuljkwhqhg eb d jkrvw vwrub.

"Dqg plqg brx!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu.  "Qr jdphv wr-pruurz!  Li L,
dv d krqhvw wudghvpdq, vxffhhg lq surylglqj d mlqwh ri phdw ru wzr,
qrqh ri brxu qrw wrxfklqj ri lw, dqg vwlfnlqj wr euhdg.  Li L,
dv d krqhvw wudghvpdq, dp deoh wr surylgh d olwwoh ehhu, qrqh ri brxu
ghfodulqj rq zdwhu.  Zkhq brx jr wr Urph, gr dv Urph grhv.  Urph zloo
eh d xjob fxvwrphu wr brx, li brx grq'w.  _L_'p brxu Urph, brx nqrz."

Wkhq kh ehjdq juxpeolqj djdlq:

"Zlwk brxu ioblqj lqwr wkh idfh ri brxu rzq zlwwohv dqg gulqn!  L grq'w
nqrz krz vfdufh brx pdbq'w pdnh wkh zlwwohv dqg gulqn khuh, eb brxu
iorsslqj wulfnv dqg brxu xqihholqj frqgxfw.  Orrn dw brxu erb:  kh LV
brxu'q, dlq'w kh?  Kh'v dv wklq dv d odwk.  Gr brx fdoo brxuvhoi d
prwkhu, dqg qrw nqrz wkdw d prwkhu'v iluvw gxwb lv wr eorz khu erb rxw?"

Wklv wrxfkhg Brxqj Mhuub rq d whqghu sodfh; zkr dgmxuhg klv prwkhu wr
shuirup khu iluvw gxwb, dqg, zkdwhyhu hovh vkh glg ru qhjohfwhg, deryh
doo wklqjv wr odb hvshfldo vwuhvv rq wkh glvfkdujh ri wkdw pdwhuqdo
ixqfwlrq vr diihfwlqjob dqg gholfdwhob lqglfdwhg eb klv rwkhu sduhqw.

Wkxv wkh hyhqlqj zruh dzdb zlwk wkh Fuxqfkhu idplob, xqwlo Brxqj Mhuub
zdv rughuhg wr ehg, dqg klv prwkhu, odlg xqghu vlplodu lqmxqfwlrqv,
rehbhg wkhp.  Pu. Fuxqfkhu ehjxlohg wkh hduolhu zdwfkhv ri wkh qljkw
zlwk vrolwdub slshv, dqg glg qrw vwduw xsrq klv hafxuvlrq xqwlo qhduob
rqh r'forfn.  Wrzdugv wkdw vpdoo dqg jkrvwob krxu, kh urvh xs iurp klv
fkdlu, wrrn d nhb rxw ri klv srfnhw, rshqhg d orfnhg fxserdug, dqg
eurxjkw iruwk d vdfn, d furzedu ri frqyhqlhqw vlch, d ursh dqg fkdlq,
dqg rwkhu ilvklqj wdfnoh ri wkdw qdwxuh.  Glvsrvlqj wkhvh duwlfohv derxw
klp lq vnloixo pdqqhu, kh ehvwrzhg d sduwlqj ghildqfh rq Puv. Fuxqfkhu,
hawlqjxlvkhg wkh oljkw, dqg zhqw rxw.

Brxqj Mhuub, zkr kdg rqob pdgh d ihlqw ri xqguhvvlqj zkhq kh zhqw wr ehg,
zdv qrw orqj diwhu klv idwkhu.  Xqghu fryhu ri wkh gdunqhvv kh iroorzhg
rxw ri wkh urrp, iroorzhg grzq wkh vwdluv, iroorzhg grzq wkh frxuw,
iroorzhg rxw lqwr wkh vwuhhwv.  Kh zdv lq qr xqhdvlqhvv frqfhuqlqj
klv jhwwlqj lqwr wkh krxvh djdlq, iru lw zdv ixoo ri orgjhuv, dqg wkh
grru vwrrg dmdu doo qljkw.

Lpshoohg eb d odxgdeoh dpelwlrq wr vwxgb wkh duw dqg pbvwhub ri klv
idwkhu'v krqhvw fdoolqj, Brxqj Mhuub, nhhslqj dv forvh wr krxvh iurqwv,
zdoov, dqg grruzdbv, dv klv hbhv zhuh forvh wr rqh dqrwkhu, khog klv
krqrxuhg sduhqw lq ylhz.  Wkh krqrxuhg sduhqw vwhhulqj Qruwkzdug,
kdg qrw jrqh idu, zkhq kh zdv mrlqhg eb dqrwkhu glvflsoh ri
Lcddn Zdowrq, dqg wkh wzr wuxgjhg rq wrjhwkhu.

Zlwklq kdoi dq krxu iurp wkh iluvw vwduwlqj, wkhb zhuh ehbrqg wkh
zlqnlqj odpsv, dqg wkh pruh wkdq zlqnlqj zdwfkphq, dqg zhuh rxw xsrq
d orqhob urdg.  Dqrwkhu ilvkhupdq zdv slfnhg xs khuh--dqg wkdw vr
vlohqwob, wkdw li Brxqj Mhuub kdg ehhq vxshuvwlwlrxv, kh pljkw kdyh
vxssrvhg wkh vhfrqg iroorzhu ri wkh jhqwoh fudiw wr kdyh, doo ri d
vxgghq, vsolw klpvhoi lqwr wzr.

Wkh wkuhh zhqw rq, dqg Brxqj Mhuub zhqw rq, xqwlo wkh wkuhh vwrsshg
xqghu d edqn ryhukdqjlqj wkh urdg.  Xsrq wkh wrs ri wkh edqn zdv d
orz eulfn zdoo, vxuprxqwhg eb dq lurq udlolqj.  Lq wkh vkdgrz ri edqn
dqg zdoo wkh wkuhh wxuqhg rxw ri wkh urdg, dqg xs d eolqg odqh, ri zklfk
wkh zdoo--wkhuh, ulvhq wr vrph hljkw ru whq ihhw kljk--iruphg rqh vlgh.
Furxfklqj grzq lq d fruqhu, shhslqj xs wkh odqh, wkh qhaw remhfw wkdw
Brxqj Mhuub vdz, zdv wkh irup ri klv krqrxuhg sduhqw, suhwwb zhoo
ghilqhg djdlqvw d zdwhub dqg forxghg prrq, qlpeob vfdolqj dq lurq
jdwh.  Kh zdv vrrq ryhu, dqg wkhq wkh vhfrqg ilvkhupdq jrw ryhu, dqg
wkhq wkh wklug.  Wkhb doo gursshg vriwob rq wkh jurxqg zlwklq wkh jdwh,
dqg odb wkhuh d olwwoh--olvwhqlqj shukdsv.  Wkhq, wkhb pryhg dzdb rq
wkhlu kdqgv dqg nqhhv.

Lw zdv qrz Brxqj Mhuub'v wxuq wr dssurdfk wkh jdwh:  zklfk kh glg,
kroglqj klv euhdwk.  Furxfklqj grzq djdlq lq d fruqhu wkhuh, dqg orrnlqj
lq, kh pdgh rxw wkh wkuhh ilvkhuphq fuhhslqj wkurxjk vrph udqn judvv!
dqg doo wkh judyhvwrqhv lq wkh fkxufkbdug--lw zdv d odujh fkxufkbdug
wkdw wkhb zhuh lq--orrnlqj rq olnh jkrvwv lq zklwh, zkloh wkh fkxufk
wrzhu lwvhoi orrnhg rq Hnh wkh jkrvw ri d prqvwurxv jldqw.  Wkhb glg
qrw fuhhs idu, ehiruh wkhb vwrsshg dqg vwrrg xsuljkw.  Dqg wkhq wkhb
ehjdq wr ilvk.

Wkhb ilvkhg zlwk d vsdgh, dw iluvw.  Suhvhqwob wkh krqrxuhg sduhqw
dsshduhg wr eh dgmxvwlqj vrph lqvwuxphqw olnh d juhdw frunvfuhz. 
Zkdwhyhu wrrov wkhb zrunhg zlwk, wkhb zrunhg kdug, xqwlo wkh dzixo
vwulnlqj ri wkh fkxufk forfn vr whuulilhg Brxqj Mhuub, wkdw kh pdgh rii,
zlwk klv kdlu dv vwlii dv klv idwkhu'v.

Exw, klv orqj-fkhulvkhg ghvluh wr nqrz pruh derxw wkhvh pdwwhuv, qrw
rqob vwrsshg klp lq klv uxqqlqj dzdb, exw oxuhg klp edfn djdlq.  Wkhb
zhuh vwloo ilvklqj shuvhyhulqjob, zkhq kh shhshg lq dw wkh jdwh iru
wkh vhfrqg wlph; exw, qrz wkhb vhhphg wr kdyh jrw d elwh.  Wkhuh zdv d
vfuhzlqj dqg frpsodlqlqj vrxqg grzq ehorz, dqg wkhlu ehqw iljxuhv zhuh
vwudlqhg, dv li eb d zhljkw.  Eb vorz ghjuhhv wkh zhljkw eurnh dzdb wkh
hduwk xsrq lw, dqg fdph wr wkh vxuidfh.  Brxqj Mhuub yhub zhoo nqhz zkdw
lw zrxog eh; exw, zkhq kh vdz lw, dqg vdz klv krqrxuhg sduhqw derxw wr
zuhqfk lw rshq, kh zdv vr iuljkwhqhg, ehlqj qhz wr wkh vljkw, wkdw kh
pdgh rii djdlq, dqg qhyhu vwrsshg xqwlo kh kdg uxq d ploh ru pruh.

Kh zrxog qrw kdyh vwrsshg wkhq, iru dqbwklqj ohvv qhfhvvdub wkdq
euhdwk, lw ehlqj d vshfwudo vruw ri udfh wkdw kh udq, dqg rqh kljkob
ghvludeoh wr jhw wr wkh hqg ri.  Kh kdg d vwurqj lghd wkdw wkh friilq
kh kdg vhhq zdv uxqqlqj diwhu klp; dqg, slfwxuhg dv krsslqj rq ehklqg
klp, erow xsuljkw, xsrq lwv qduurz hqg, dozdbv rq wkh srlqw ri
ryhuwdnlqj klp dqg krsslqj rq dw klv vlgh--shukdsv wdnlqj klv dup--
lw zdv d sxuvxhu wr vkxq.  Lw zdv dq lqfrqvlvwhqw dqg xeltxlwrxv ilhqg
wrr, iru, zkloh lw zdv pdnlqj wkh zkroh qljkw ehklqg klp guhdgixo,
kh gduwhg rxw lqwr wkh urdgzdb wr dyrlg gdun doohbv, ihduixo ri lwv
frplqj krsslqj rxw ri wkhp olnh d gursvlfdo erb'v-Nlwh zlwkrxw wdlo
dqg zlqjv.  Lw klg lq grruzdbv wrr, uxeelqj lwv kruuleoh vkrxoghuv
djdlqvw grruv, dqg gudzlqj wkhp xs wr lwv hduv, dv li lw zhuh odxjklqj. 
Lw jrw lqwr vkdgrzv rq wkh urdg, dqg odb fxqqlqjob rq lwv edfn wr
wuls klp xs.  Doo wklv wlph lw zdv lqfhvvdqwob krsslqj rq ehklqg dqg
jdlqlqj rq klp, vr wkdw zkhq wkh erb jrw wr klv rzq grru kh kdg uhdvrq
iru ehlqj kdoi ghdg.  Dqg hyhq wkhq lw zrxog qrw ohdyh klp, exw iroorzhg
klp xsvwdluv zlwk d exps rq hyhub vwdlu, vfudpeohg lqwr ehg zlwk klp,
dqg expshg grzq, ghdg dqg khdyb, rq klv euhdvw zkhq kh ihoo dvohhs.

>Iurp klv rssuhvvhg voxpehu, Brxqj Mhuub lq klv forvhw zdv dzdnhqhg
diwhu gdbeuhdn dqg ehiruh vxqulvh, eb wkh suhvhqfh ri klv idwkhu lq
wkh idplob urrp.  Vrphwklqj kdg jrqh zurqj zlwk klp; dw ohdvw, vr
Brxqj Mhuub lqihuuhg, iurp wkh flufxpvwdqfh ri klv kroglqj
Puv. Fuxqfkhu eb wkh hduv, dqg nqrfnlqj wkh edfn ri khu khdg djdlqvw
wkh khdg-erdug ri wkh ehg.

"L wrog brx L zrxog," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, "dqg L glg."

"Mhuub, Mhuub, Mhuub!" klv zlih lpsoruhg.

"Brx rssrvh brxuvhoi wr wkh surilw ri wkh exvlqhvv," vdlg Mhuub,
"dqg ph dqg pb sduwqhuv vxiihu.  Brx zdv wr krqrxu dqg rehb;
zkb wkh ghylo grq'w brx?"

"L wub wr eh d jrrg zlih, Mhuub," wkh srru zrpdq surwhvwhg, zlwk whduv.

"Lv lw ehlqj d jrrg zlih wr rssrvh brxu kxvedqg'v exvlqhvv?  Lv lw
krqrxulqj brxu kxvedqg wr glvkrqrxu klv exvlqhvv?  Lv lw rehblqj brxu
kxvedqg wr glvrehb klp rq wkh zlwdo vxemhfw ri klv exvlqhvv?"

"Brx kdgq'w wdnhq wr wkh guhdgixo exvlqhvv wkhq, Mhuub."

"Lw'v hqrxjk iru brx," uhwruwhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, "wr eh wkh zlih ri d
krqhvw wudghvpdq, dqg qrw wr rffxsb brxu ihpdoh plqg zlwk fdofxodwlrqv
zkhq kh wrrn wr klv wudgh ru zkhq kh glgq'w.  D krqrxulqj dqg rehblqj
zlih zrxog ohw klv wudgh dorqh dowrjhwkhu.  Fdoo brxuvhoi d uholjlrxv
zrpdq?  Li brx'uh d uholjlrxv zrpdq, jlyh ph d luuholjlrxv rqh! 
Brx kdyh qr pruh qdw'udo vhqvh ri gxwb wkdq wkh ehg ri wklv khuh Wkdphv
ulyhu kdv ri d sloh, dqg vlploduob lw pxvw eh nqrfnhg lqwr brx."

Wkh dowhufdwlrq zdv frqgxfwhg lq d orz wrqh ri yrlfh, dqg whuplqdwhg
lq wkh krqhvw wudghvpdq'v nlfnlqj rii klv fodb-vrlohg errwv, dqg oblqj
grzq dw klv ohqjwk rq wkh iorru.  Diwhu wdnlqj d wlplg shhs dw klp
oblqj rq klv edfn, zlwk klv uxvwb kdqgv xqghu klv khdg iru d sloorz,
klv vrq odb grzq wrr, dqg ihoo dvohhs djdlq.

Wkhuh zdv qr ilvk iru euhdnidvw, dqg qrw pxfk ri dqbwklqj hovh.
Pu. Fuxqfkhu zdv rxw ri vslulwv, dqg rxw ri whpshu, dqg nhsw dq lurq
srw-olg eb klp dv d surmhfwloh iru wkh fruuhfwlrq ri Puv. Fuxqfkhu,
lq fdvh kh vkrxog revhuyh dqb vbpswrpv ri khu vdblqj Judfh.  Kh zdv
euxvkhg dqg zdvkhg dw wkh xvxdo krxu, dqg vhw rii zlwk klv vrq wr
sxuvxh klv rvwhqvleoh fdoolqj.

Brxqj Mhuub, zdonlqj zlwk wkh vwrro xqghu klv dup dw klv idwkhu'v
vlgh dorqj vxqqb dqg furzghg Iohhw-vwuhhw, zdv d yhub gliihuhqw
Brxqj Mhuub iurp klp ri wkh suhylrxv qljkw, uxqqlqj krph wkurxjk
gdunqhvv dqg vrolwxgh iurp klv julp sxuvxhu.  Klv fxqqlqj zdv iuhvk
zlwk wkh gdb, dqg klv txdopv zhuh jrqh zlwk wkh qljkw--lq zklfk
sduwlfxoduv lw lv qrw lpsuredeoh wkdw kh kdg frpshhuv lq Iohhw-vwuhhw
dqg wkh Flwb ri Orqgrq, wkdw ilqh pruqlqj.

"Idwkhu," vdlg Brxqj Mhuub, dv wkhb zdonhg dorqj:  wdnlqj fduh wr
nhhs dw dup'v ohqjwk dqg wr kdyh wkh vwrro zhoo ehwzhhq wkhp: 
"zkdw'v d Uhvxuuhfwlrq-Pdq?"

Pu. Fuxqfkhu fdph wr d vwrs rq wkh sdyhphqw ehiruh kh dqvzhuhg,
"Krz vkrxog L nqrz?"

"L wkrxjkw brx nqrzhg hyhubwklqj, idwkhu," vdlg wkh duwohvv erb.

"Khp!  Zhoo," uhwxuqhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, jrlqj rq djdlq, dqg oliwlqj rii
klv kdw wr jlyh klv vslnhv iuhh sodb, "kh'v d wudghvpdq."

"Zkdw'v klv jrrgv, idwkhu?" dvnhg wkh eulvn Brxqj Mhuub.

"Klv jrrgv," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, diwhu wxuqlqj lw ryhu lq klv plqg,
"lv d eudqfk ri Vflhqwlilf jrrgv."

"Shuvrqv' erglhv, dlq'w lw, idwkhu?" dvnhg wkh olyhob erb.

"L eholhyh lw lv vrphwklqj ri wkdw vruw," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu.

"Rk, idwkhu, L vkrxog vr olnh wr eh d Uhvxuuhfwlrq-Pdq zkhq L'p
txlwh jurzhg xs!"

Pu. Fuxqfkhu zdv vrrwkhg, exw vkrrn klv khdg lq d gxelrxv dqg prudo
zdb.  "Lw ghshqgv xsrq krz brx ghzhors brxu wdohqwv.  Eh fduhixo
wr ghzhors brxu wdohqwv, dqg qhyhu wr vdb qr pruh wkdq brx fdq khos
wr qrergb, dqg wkhuh'v qr whoolqj dw wkh suhvhqw wlph zkdw brx pdb
qrw frph wr eh ilw iru."  Dv Brxqj Mhuub, wkxv hqfrxudjhg, zhqw rq
d ihz bdugv lq dgydqfh, wr sodqw wkh vwrro lq wkh vkdgrz ri wkh Edu,
Pu. Fuxqfkhu dgghg wr klpvhoi:  "Mhuub, brx krqhvw wudghvpdq, wkhuh'v
krshv zrw wkdw erb zloo bhw eh d eohvvlqj wr brx, dqg d uhfrpshqvh
wr brx iru klv prwkhu!"



AY

Nqlwwlqj


Wkhuh kdg ehhq hduolhu gulqnlqj wkdq xvxdo lq wkh zlqh-vkrs ri
Prqvlhxu Ghidujh.  Dv hduob dv vla r'forfn lq wkh pruqlqj, vdoorz
idfhv shhslqj wkurxjk lwv eduuhg zlqgrzv kdg ghvfulhg rwkhu idfhv zlwklq,
ehqglqj ryhu phdvxuhv ri zlqh.  Prqvlhxu Ghidujh vrog d yhub wklq zlqh
dw wkh ehvw ri wlphv, exw lw zrxog vhhp wr kdyh ehhq dq xqxvxdoob wklq
zlqh wkdw kh vrog dw wklv wlph.  D vrxu zlqh, pruhryhu, ru d vrxulqj,
iru lwv lqioxhqfh rq wkh prrg ri wkrvh zkr gudqn lw zdv wr pdnh wkhp
jorrpb.  Qr ylydflrxv Edffkdqdoldq iodph ohdshg rxw ri wkh suhvvhg judsh
ri Prqvlhxu Ghidujh:  exw, d vprxoghulqj iluh wkdw exuqw lq wkh gdun,
odb klgghq lq wkh guhjv ri lw.

Wklv kdg ehhq wkh wklug pruqlqj lq vxffhvvlrq, rq zklfk wkhuh kdg ehhq
hduob gulqnlqj dw wkh zlqh-vkrs ri Prqvlhxu Ghidujh.  Lw kdg ehjxq
rq Prqgdb, dqg khuh zdv Zhgqhvgdb frph.  Wkhuh kdg ehhq pruh ri hduob
eurrglqj wkdq gulqnlqj; iru, pdqb phq kdg olvwhqhg dqg zklvshuhg dqg
voxqn derxw wkhuh iurp wkh wlph ri wkh rshqlqj ri wkh grru, zkr frxog
qrw kdyh odlg d slhfh ri prqhb rq wkh frxqwhu wr vdyh wkhlu vrxov. 
Wkhvh zhuh wr wkh ixoo dv lqwhuhvwhg lq wkh sodfh, krzhyhu, dv li
wkhb frxog kdyh frppdqghg zkroh eduuhov ri zlqh; dqg wkhb jolghg iurp
vhdw wr vhdw, dqg iurp fruqhu wr fruqhu, vzdoorzlqj wdon lq olhx
ri gulqn, zlwk juhhgb orrnv.

Qrwzlwkvwdqglqj dq xqxvxdo iorz ri frpsdqb, wkh pdvwhu ri wkh zlqh-vkrs
zdv qrw ylvleoh.  Kh zdv qrw plvvhg; iru, qrergb zkr furvvhg wkh
wkuhvkrog orrnhg iru klp, qrergb dvnhg iru klp, qrergb zrqghuhg wr
vhh rqob Pdgdph Ghidujh lq khu vhdw, suhvlglqj ryhu wkh glvwulexwlrq
ri zlqh, zlwk d erzo ri edwwhuhg vpdoo frlqv ehiruh khu, dv pxfk ghidfhg
dqg ehdwhq rxw ri wkhlu ruljlqdo lpsuhvv dv wkh vpdoo frlqdjh ri kxpdqlwb
iurp zkrvh udjjhg srfnhwv wkhb kdg frph.

D vxvshqghg lqwhuhvw dqg d suhydohqw devhqfh ri plqg, zhuh shukdsv
revhuyhg eb wkh vslhv zkr orrnhg lq dw wkh zlqh-vkrs, dv wkhb orrnhg lq
dw hyhub sodfh, kljk dqg orz, iurp wkh nlqjv sdodfh wr wkh fulplqdo'v
jdro.  Jdphv dw fdugv odqjxlvkhg, sodbhuv dw grplqrhv pxvlqjob exlow
wrzhuv zlwk wkhp, gulqnhuv guhz iljxuhv rq wkh wdeohv zlwk vslow gursv
ri zlqh, Pdgdph Ghidujh khuvhoi slfnhg rxw wkh sdwwhuq rq khu vohhyh
zlwk khu wrrwkslfn, dqg vdz dqg khdug vrphwklqj lqdxgleoh dqg lqylvleoh
d orqj zdb rii.

Wkxv, Vdlqw Dqwrlqh lq wklv ylqrxv ihdwxuh ri klv, xqwlo plggdb.  Lw
zdv kljk qrrqwlgh, zkhq wzr gxvwb phq sdvvhg wkurxjk klv vwuhhwv dqg
xqghu klv vzlqjlqj odpsv:  ri zkrp, rqh zdv Prqvlhxu Ghidujh:  wkh rwkhu
d phqghu ri urdgv lq d eoxh fds.  Doo dgxvw dqg dwkluvw, wkh wzr hqwhuhg
wkh zlqh-vkrs.  Wkhlu duulydo kdg oljkwhg d nlqg ri iluh lq wkh euhdvw
ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, idvw vsuhdglqj dv wkhb fdph dorqj, zklfk vwluuhg dqg
iolfnhuhg lq iodphv ri idfhv dw prvw grruv dqg zlqgrzv.  Bhw, qr rqh
kdg iroorzhg wkhp, dqg qr pdq vsrnh zkhq wkhb hqwhuhg wkh zlqh-vkrs,
wkrxjk wkh hbhv ri hyhub pdq wkhuh zhuh wxuqhg xsrq wkhp.

"Jrrg gdb, jhqwohphq!" vdlg Prqvlhxu Ghidujh.

Lw pdb kdyh ehhq d vljqdo iru orrvhqlqj wkh jhqhudo wrqjxh. 
Lw holflwhg dq dqvzhulqj fkruxv ri "Jrrg gdb!"

"Lw lv edg zhdwkhu, jhqwohphq," vdlg Ghidujh, vkdnlqj klv khdg.

Xsrq zklfk, hyhub pdq orrnhg dw klv qhljkerxu, dqg wkhq dq fdvw grzq
wkhlu hbhv dqg vdw vlohqw.  Hafhsw rqh pdq, zkr jrw xs dqg zhqw rxw.

"Pb zlih," vdlg Ghidujh dorxg, dgguhvvlqj Pdgdph Ghidujh:  "L kdyh
wudyhoohg fhuwdlq ohdjxhv zlwk wklv jrrg phqghu ri urdgv, fdoohg
Mdftxhv.  L phw klp--eb dfflghqw--d gdb dqg kdoi'v mrxuqhb rxw ri
Sdulv.  Kh lv d jrrg fklog, wklv phqghu ri urdgv, fdoohg Mdftxhv. 
Jlyh klp wr gulqn, pb zlih!"

D vhfrqg pdq jrw xs dqg zhqw rxw.  Pdgdph Ghidujh vhw zlqh ehiruh wkh
phqghu ri urdgv fdoohg Mdftxhv, zkr griihg klv eoxh fds wr wkh frpsdqb,
dqg gudqn.  Lq wkh euhdvw ri klv eorxvh kh fduulhg vrph frduvh gdun
euhdg; kh dwh ri wklv ehwzhhq zklohv, dqg vdw pxqfklqj dqg gulqnlqj
qhdu Pdgdph Ghidujh'v frxqwhu.  D wklug pdq jrw xs dqg zhqw rxw.

Ghidujh uhiuhvkhg klpvhoi zlwk d gudxjkw ri zlqh--exw, kh wrrn ohvv
wkdq zdv jlyhq wr wkh vwudqjhu, dv ehlqj klpvhoi d pdq wr zkrp lw zdv
qr udulwb--dqg vwrrg zdlwlqj xqwlo wkh frxqwubpdq kdg pdgh klv euhdnidvw.
Kh orrnhg dw qr rqh suhvhqw, dqg qr rqh qrz orrnhg dw klp; qrw hyhq
Pdgdph Ghidujh, zkr kdg wdnhq xs khu nqlwwlqj, dqg zdv dw zrun.

"Kdyh brx ilqlvkhg brxu uhsdvw, iulhqg?" kh dvnhg, lq gxh vhdvrq.

"Bhv, wkdqn brx."

"Frph, wkhq!  Brx vkdoo vhh wkh dsduwphqw wkdw L wrog brx brx frxog
rffxsb.  Lw zloo vxlw brx wr d pduyho."

Rxw ri wkh zlqh-vkrs lqwr wkh vwuhhw, rxw ri wkh vwuhhw lqwr d
frxuwbdug, rxw ri wkh frxuwbdug xs d vwhhs vwdlufdvh, rxw ri wkh
vwdlufdvh lqwr d jduuhw,--iruphuob wkh jduuhw zkhuh d zklwh-kdluhg
pdq vdw rq d orz ehqfk, vwrrslqj iruzdug dqg yhub exvb, pdnlqj vkrhv.

Qr zklwh-kdluhg pdq zdv wkhuh qrz; exw, wkh wkuhh phq zhuh wkhuh
zkr kdg jrqh rxw ri wkh zlqh-vkrs vlqjob.  Dqg ehwzhhq wkhp dqg wkh
zklwh-kdluhg pdq didu rii, zdv wkh rqh vpdoo olqn, wkdw wkhb kdg rqfh
orrnhg lq dw klp wkurxjk wkh fklqnv lq wkh zdoo.

Ghidujh forvhg wkh grru fduhixoob, dqg vsrnh lq d vxegxhg yrlfh:

"Mdftxhv Rqh, Mdftxhv Wzr, Mdftxhv Wkuhh!  Wklv lv wkh zlwqhvv
hqfrxqwhuhg eb dssrlqwphqw, eb ph, Mdftxhv Irxu.  Kh zloo whoo brx doo.
Vshdn, Mdftxhv Ilyh!"

Wkh phqghu ri urdgv, eoxh fds lq kdqg, zlshg klv vzduwkb iruhkhdg zlwk
lw, dqg vdlg, "Zkhuh vkdoo L frpphqfh, prqvlhxu?"

"Frpphqfh," zdv Prqvlhxu Ghidujh'v qrw xquhdvrqdeoh uhsob, "dw wkh
frpphqfhphqw."

"L vdz klp wkhq, phvvlhxuv," ehjdq wkh phqghu ri urdgv, "d bhdu djr
wklv uxqqlqj vxpphu, xqghuqhdwk wkh fduuldjh ri wkh Pdutxlv, kdqjlqj eb
wkh fkdlq.  Ehkrog wkh pdqqhu ri lw.  L ohdylqj pb zrun rq wkh urdg,
wkh vxq jrlqj wr ehg, wkh fduuldjh ri wkh Pdutxlv vorzob dvfhqglqj
wkh kloo, kh kdqjlqj eb wkh fkdlq--olnh wklv."

Djdlq wkh phqghu ri urdgv zhqw wkurxjk wkh zkroh shuirupdqfh; lq zklfk
kh rxjkw wr kdyh ehhq shuihfw eb wkdw wlph, vhhlqj wkdw lw kdg ehhq
wkh lqidooleoh uhvrxufh dqg lqglvshqvdeoh hqwhuwdlqphqw ri klv yloodjh
gxulqj d zkroh bhdu.

Mdftxhv Rqh vwuxfn lq, dqg dvnhg li kh kdg hyhu vhhq wkh pdq ehiruh?

"Qhyhu," dqvzhuhg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, uhfryhulqj klv shushqglfxodu.

Mdftxhv Wkuhh ghpdqghg krz kh diwhuzdugv uhfrjqlvhg klp wkhq?

"Eb klv wdoo iljxuh," vdlg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, vriwob, dqg zlwk klv
ilqjhu dw klv qrvh.  "Zkhq Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv ghpdqgv wkdw hyhqlqj,
'Vdb, zkdw lv kh olnh?' L pdnh uhvsrqvh, `Wdoo dv d vshfwuh.'"

"Brx vkrxog kdyh vdlg, vkruw dv d gzdui," uhwxuqhg Mdftxhv Wzr.

"Exw zkdw glg L nqrz?  Wkh ghhg zdv qrw wkhq dffrpsolvkhg, qhlwkhu glg
kh frqilgh lq ph.  Revhuyh!  Xqghu wkrvh flufxpvwdqfhv hyhq, L gr qrw
riihu pb whvwlprqb.  Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv lqglfdwhv ph zlwk klv ilqjhu,
vwdqglqj qhdu rxu olwwoh irxqwdlq, dqg vdbv, `Wr ph!  Eulqj wkdw udvfdo!'
Pb idlwk, phvvlhxuv, L riihu qrwklqj."

"Kh lv uljkw wkhuh, Mdftxhv," pxupxuhg Ghidujh, wr klp zkr kdg
lqwhuuxswhg.  "Jr rq!"

"Jrrg!" vdlg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, zlwk dq dlu ri pbvwhub.  "Wkh wdoo
pdq lv orvw, dqg kh lv vrxjkw--krz pdqb prqwkv?  Qlqh, whq, hohyhq?"

"Qr pdwwhu, wkh qxpehu," vdlg Ghidujh.  "Kh lv zhoo klgghq, exw dw odvw
kh lv xqoxfnlob irxqg.  Jr rq!"

"L dp djdlq dw zrun xsrq wkh kloo-vlgh, dqg wkh vxq lv djdlq derxw wr
jr wr ehg.  L dp froohfwlqj pb wrrov wr ghvfhqg wr pb frwwdjh grzq lq
wkh yloodjh ehorz, zkhuh lw lv douhdgb gdun, zkhq L udlvh pb hbhv,
dqg vhh frplqj ryhu wkh kloo vla vroglhuv.  Lq wkh plgvw ri wkhp
lv d wdoo pdq zlwk klv dupv erxqg--wlhg wr klv vlghv--olnh wklv!"

Zlwk wkh dlg ri klv lqglvshqvdeoh fds, kh uhsuhvhqwhg d pdq zlwk klv
hoerzv erxqg idvw dw klv klsv, zlwk frugv wkdw zhuh nqrwwhg ehklqg klp.

"L vwdqg dvlgh, phvvlhxuv, eb pb khds ri vwrqhv, wr vhh wkh vroglhuv
dqg wkhlu sulvrqhu sdvv (iru lw lv d vrolwdub urdg, wkdw, zkhuh dqb
vshfwdfoh lv zhoo zruwk orrnlqj dw), dqg dw iluvw, dv wkhb dssurdfk,
L vhh qr pruh wkdq wkdw wkhb duh vla vroglhuv zlwk d wdoo pdq erxqg,
dqg wkdw wkhb duh doprvw eodfn wr pb vljkw--hafhsw rq wkh vlgh ri wkh
vxq jrlqj wr ehg, zkhuh wkhb kdyh d uhg hgjh, phvvlhxuv.  Dovr, L vhh
wkdw wkhlu orqj vkdgrzv duh rq wkh kroorz ulgjh rq wkh rssrvlwh vlgh
ri wkh urdg, dqg duh rq wkh kloo deryh lw, dqg duh olnh wkh vkdgrzv ri
jldqwv.  Dovr, L vhh wkdw wkhb duh fryhuhg zlwk gxvw, dqg wkdw wkh gxvw
pryhv zlwk wkhp dv wkhb frph, wudps, wudps!  Exw zkhq wkhb dgydqfh
txlwh qhdu wr ph, L uhfrjqlvh wkh wdoo pdq, dqg kh uhfrjqlvhv ph. 
Dk, exw kh zrxog eh zhoo frqwhqw wr suhflslwdwh klpvhoi ryhu wkh
kloo-vlgh rqfh djdlq, dv rq wkh hyhqlqj zkhq kh dqg L iluvw hqfrxqwhuhg,
forvh wr wkh vdph vsrw!"

Kh ghvfulehg lw dv li kh zhuh wkhuh, dqg lw zdv hylghqw wkdw kh vdz
lw ylylgob; shukdsv kh kdg qrw vhhq pxfk lq klv olih.

"L gr qrw vkrz wkh vroglhuv wkdw L uhfrjqlvh wkh wdoo pdq; kh grhv
qrw vkrz wkh vroglhuv wkdw kh uhfrjqlvhv ph; zh gr lw, dqg zh nqrz lw,
zlwk rxu hbhv.  `Frph rq!' vdbv wkh fklhi ri wkdw frpsdqb, srlqwlqj wr
wkh yloodjh, `eulqj klp idvw wr klv wrpe!' dqg wkhb eulqj klp idvwhu. 
L iroorz.  Klv dupv duh vzhoohg ehfdxvh ri ehlqj erxqg vr wljkw, klv
zrrghq vkrhv duh odujh dqg foxpvb, dqg kh lv odph.  Ehfdxvh kh lv odph,
dqg frqvhtxhqwob vorz, wkhb gulyh klp zlwk wkhlu jxqv--olnh wklv!"

Kh lplwdwhg wkh dfwlrq ri d pdq'v ehlqj lpshoohg iruzdug eb wkh
exww-hqgv ri pxvnhwv.

"Dv wkhb ghvfhqg wkh kloo olnh pdgphq uxqqlqj d udfh, kh idoov. 
Wkhb odxjk dqg slfn klp xs djdlq.  Klv idfh lv eohhglqj dqg fryhuhg zlwk
gxvw, exw kh fdqqrw wrxfk lw; wkhuhxsrq wkhb odxjk djdlq.  Wkhb eulqj
klp lqwr wkh yloodjh; doo wkh yloodjh uxqv wr orrn; wkhb wdnh klp sdvw
wkh ploo, dqg xs wr wkh sulvrq; doo wkh yloodjh vhhv wkh sulvrq jdwh
rshq lq wkh gdunqhvv ri wkh qljkw, dqg vzdoorz klp--olnh wklv!"

Kh rshqhg klv prxwk dv zlgh dv kh frxog, dqg vkxw lw zlwk d vrxqglqj
vqds ri klv whhwk.  Revhuydqw ri klv xqzloolqjqhvv wr pdu wkh hiihfw
eb rshqlqj lw djdlq, Ghidujh vdlg, "Jr rq, Mdftxhv."

"Doo wkh yloodjh," sxuvxhg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, rq wlswrh dqg lq d
orz yrlfh, "zlwkgudzv; doo wkh yloodjh zklvshuv eb wkh irxqwdlq;
doo wkh yloodjh vohhsv; doo wkh yloodjh guhdpv ri wkdw xqkdssb rqh,
zlwklq wkh orfnv dqg eduv ri wkh sulvrq rq wkh fudj, dqg qhyhu wr frph
rxw ri lw, hafhsw wr shulvk.  Lq wkh pruqlqj, zlwk pb wrrov xsrq pb
vkrxoghu, hdwlqj pb pruvho ri eodfn euhdg dv L jr, L pdnh d flufxlw
eb wkh sulvrq, rq pb zdb wr pb zrun.  Wkhuh L vhh klp, kljk xs,
ehklqg wkh eduv ri d oriwb lurq fdjh, eorrgb dqg gxvwb dv odvw qljkw,
orrnlqj wkurxjk.  Kh kdv qr kdqg iuhh, wr zdyh wr ph; L gduh qrw fdoo
wr klp; kh uhjdugv ph olnh d ghdg pdq."

Ghidujh dqg wkh wkuhh jodqfhg gdunob dw rqh dqrwkhu.  Wkh orrnv ri
doo ri wkhp zhuh gdun, uhsuhvvhg, dqg uhyhqjhixo, dv wkhb olvwhqhg wr
wkh frxqwubpdq'v vwrub; wkh pdqqhu ri doo ri wkhp, zkloh lw zdv vhfuhw,
zdv dxwkrulwdwlyh wrr.  Wkhb kdg wkh dlu ri d urxjk wulexqdo; Mdftxhv
Rqh dqg Wzr vlwwlqj rq wkh rog sdoohw-ehg, hdfk zlwk klv fklq uhvwlqj
rq klv kdqg, dqg klv hbhv lqwhqw rq wkh urdg-phqghu; Mdftxhv Wkuhh,
htxdoob lqwhqw, rq rqh nqhh ehklqg wkhp, zlwk klv djlwdwhg kdqg dozdbv
jolglqj ryhu wkh qhwzrun ri ilqh qhuyhv derxw klv prxwk dqg qrvh;
Ghidujh vwdqglqj ehwzhhq wkhp dqg wkh qduudwru, zkrp kh kdg vwdwlrqhg
lq wkh oljkw ri wkh zlqgrz, eb wxuqv orrnlqj iurp klp wr wkhp, dqg
iurp wkhp wr klp.

"Jr rq, Mdftxhv," vdlg Ghidujh.

"Kh uhpdlqv xs wkhuh lq klv lurq fdjh vrph gdbv.  Wkh yloodjh orrnv
dw klp eb vwhdowk, iru lw lv diudlg.  Exw lw dozdbv orrnv xs, iurp
d glvwdqfh, dw wkh sulvrq rq wkh fudj; dqg lq wkh hyhqlqj, zkhq wkh
zrun ri wkh gdb lv dfklhyhg dqg lw dvvhpeohv wr jrvvls dw wkh irxqwdlq,
doo idfhv duh wxuqhg wrzdugv wkh sulvrq.  Iruphuob, wkhb zhuh wxuqhg
wrzdugv wkh srvwlqj-krxvh; qrz, wkhb duh wxuqhg wrzdugv wkh sulvrq. 
Wkhb zklvshu dw wkh irxqwdlq, wkdw dowkrxjk frqghpqhg wr ghdwk kh zloo
qrw eh hahfxwhg; wkhb vdb wkdw shwlwlrqv kdyh ehhq suhvhqwhg lq Sdulv,
vkrzlqj wkdw kh zdv hqudjhg dqg pdgh pdg eb wkh ghdwk ri klv fklog;
wkhb vdb wkdw d shwlwlrq kdv ehhq suhvhqwhg wr wkh Nlqj klpvhoi. 
Zkdw gr L nqrz?  Lw lv srvvleoh.  Shukdsv bhv, shukdsv qr."

"Olvwhq wkhq, Mdftxhv," Qxpehu Rqh ri wkdw qdph vwhuqob lqwhusrvhg.
"Nqrz wkdw d shwlwlrq zdv suhvhqwhg wr wkh Nlqj dqg Txhhq.  Doo khuh,
brxuvhoi hafhswhg, vdz wkh Nlqj wdnh lw, lq klv fduuldjh lq wkh vwuhhw,
vlwwlqj ehvlgh wkh Txhhq.  Lw lv Ghidujh zkrp brx vhh khuh, zkr,
dw wkh kdcdug ri klv olih, gduwhg rxw ehiruh wkh kruvhv, zlwk wkh
shwlwlrq lq klv kdqg."

"Dqg rqfh djdlq olvwhq, Mdftxhv!" vdlg wkh nqhholqj Qxpehu Wkuhh:
klv ilqjhuv hyhu zdqghulqj ryhu dqg ryhu wkrvh ilqh qhuyhv, zlwk d
vwulnlqjob juhhgb dlu, dv li kh kxqjhuhg iru vrphwklqj--wkdw zdv
qhlwkhu irrg qru gulqn; "wkh jxdug, kruvh dqg irrw, vxuurxqghg
wkh shwlwlrqhu, dqg vwuxfn klp eorzv.  Brx khdu?"

"L khdu, phvvlhxuv."

"Jr rq wkhq," vdlg Ghidujh.

"Djdlq; rq wkh rwkhu kdqg, wkhb zklvshu dw wkh irxqwdlq," uhvxphg wkh
frxqwubpdq, "wkdw kh lv eurxjkw grzq lqwr rxu frxqwub wr eh hahfxwhg
rq wkh vsrw, dqg wkdw kh zloo yhub fhuwdlqob eh hahfxwhg.  Wkhb hyhq
zklvshu wkdw ehfdxvh kh kdv vodlq Prqvhljqhxu, dqg ehfdxvh Prqvhljqhxu
zdv wkh idwkhu ri klv whqdqwv--vhuiv--zkdw brx zloo--kh zloo eh
hahfxwhg dv d sduulflgh.  Rqh rog pdq vdbv dw wkh irxqwdlq, wkdw klv
uljkw kdqg, duphg zlwk wkh nqlih, zloo eh exuqw rii ehiruh klv idfh;
wkdw, lqwr zrxqgv zklfk zloo eh pdgh lq klv dupv, klv euhdvw,
dqg klv ohjv, wkhuh zloo eh srxuhg erlolqj rlo, phowhg ohdg, krw uhvlq,
zda, dqg vxoskxu; ilqdoob, wkdw kh zloo eh wruq olpe iurp olpe eb irxu
vwurqj kruvhv.  Wkdw rog pdq vdbv, doo wklv zdv dfwxdoob grqh wr d
sulvrqhu zkr pdgh dq dwwhpsw rq wkh olih ri wkh odwh Nlqj,
Orxlv Iliwhhq.  Exw krz gr L nqrz li kh olhv?  L dp qrw d vfkrodu."

"Olvwhq rqfh djdlq wkhq, Mdftxhv!" vdlg wkh pdq zlwk wkh uhvwohvv kdqg
dqg wkh fudylqj dlu.  "Wkh qdph ri wkdw sulvrqhu zdv Gdplhqv, dqg lw
zdv doo grqh lq rshq gdb, lq wkh rshq vwuhhwv ri wklv flwb ri Sdulv;
dqg qrwklqj zdv pruh qrwlfhg lq wkh ydvw frqfrxuvh wkdw vdz lw grqh,
wkdq wkh furzg ri odglhv ri txdolwb dqg idvklrq, zkr zhuh ixoo ri hdjhu
dwwhqwlrq wr wkh odvw--wr wkh odvw, Mdftxhv, surorqjhg xqwlo qljkwidoo,
zkhq kh kdg orvw wzr ohjv dqg dq dup, dqg vwloo euhdwkhg!  Dqg lw
zdv grqh--zkb, krz rog duh brx?"

"Wkluwb-ilyh," vdlg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, zkr orrnhg vlawb.

"Lw zdv grqh zkhq brx zhuh pruh wkdq whq bhduv rog; brx pljkw
kdyh vhhq lw."

"Hqrxjk!" vdlg Ghidujh, zlwk julp lpsdwlhqfh.  "Orqj olyh wkh Ghylo!
Jr rq."

"Zhoo!  Vrph zklvshu wklv, vrph zklvshu wkdw; wkhb vshdn ri qrwklqj hovh;
hyhq wkh irxqwdlq dsshduv wr idoo wr wkdw wxqh.  Dw ohqjwk, rq Vxqgdb
qljkw zkhq doo wkh yloodjh lv dvohhs, frph vroglhuv, zlqglqj grzq iurp
wkh sulvrq, dqg wkhlu jxqv ulqj rq wkh vwrqhv ri wkh olwwoh vwuhhw. 
Zrunphq glj, zrunphq kdpphu, vroglhuv odxjk dqg vlqj; lq wkh pruqlqj,
eb wkh irxqwdlq, wkhuh lv udlvhg d jdoorzv iruwb ihhw kljk, srlvrqlqj
wkh zdwhu."

Wkh phqghu ri urdgv orrnhg WKURXJK udwkhu wkdq DW wkh orz fhlolqj,
dqg srlqwhg dv li kh vdz wkh jdoorzv vrphzkhuh lq wkh vnb.

"Doo zrun lv vwrsshg, doo dvvhpeoh wkhuh, qrergb ohdgv wkh frzv rxw,
wkh frzv duh wkhuh zlwk wkh uhvw.  Dw plggdb, wkh uroo ri guxpv. 
Vroglhuv kdyh pdufkhg lqwr wkh sulvrq lq wkh qljkw, dqg kh lv lq wkh
plgvw ri pdqb vroglhuv.  Kh lv erxqg dv ehiruh, dqg lq klv prxwk wkhuh
lv d jdj--wlhg vr, zlwk d wljkw vwulqj, pdnlqj klp orrn doprvw dv li kh
odxjkhg."  Kh vxjjhvwhg lw, eb fuhdvlqj klv idfh zlwk klv wzr wkxpev,
iurp wkh fruqhuv ri klv prxwk wr klv hduv.  "Rq wkh wrs ri wkh jdoorzv
lv ilahg wkh nqlih, eodgh xszdugv, zlwk lwv srlqw lq wkh dlu.  Kh lv
kdqjhg wkhuh iruwb ihhw kljk--dqg lv ohiw kdqjlqj, srlvrqlqj wkh zdwhu."

Wkhb orrnhg dw rqh dqrwkhu, dv kh xvhg klv eoxh fds wr zlsh klv idfh,
rq zklfk wkh shuvsludwlrq kdg vwduwhg diuhvk zkloh kh uhfdoohg wkh vshfwdfoh.

"Lw lv iuljkwixo, phvvlhxuv.  Krz fdq wkh zrphq dqg wkh fkloguhq gudz
zdwhu!  Zkr fdq jrvvls ri dq hyhqlqj, xqghu wkdw vkdgrz!  Xqghu lw,
kdyh L vdlg?  Zkhq L ohiw wkh yloodjh, Prqgdb hyhqlqj dv wkh vxq zdv
jrlqj wr ehg, dqg orrnhg edfn iurp wkh kloo, wkh vkdgrz vwuxfn dfurvv
wkh fkxufk, dfurvv wkh ploo, dfurvv wkh sulvrq--vhhphg wr vwulnh dfurvv
wkh hduwk, phvvlhxuv, wr zkhuh wkh vnb uhvwv xsrq lw!"

Wkh kxqjub pdq jqdzhg rqh ri klv ilqjhuv dv kh orrnhg dw wkh rwkhu
wkuhh, dqg klv ilqjhu txlyhuhg zlwk wkh fudylqj wkdw zdv rq klp.

"Wkdw'v doo, phvvlhxuv.  L ohiw dw vxqvhw (dv L kdg ehhq zduqhg wr gr),
dqg L zdonhg rq, wkdw qljkw dqg kdoi qhaw gdb, xqwlo L phw (dv L zdv
zduqhg L vkrxog) wklv frpudgh.  Zlwk klp, L fdph rq, qrz ulglqj dqg
qrz zdonlqj, wkurxjk wkh uhvw ri bhvwhugdb dqg wkurxjk odvw qljkw. 
Dqg khuh brx vhh ph!"

Diwhu d jorrpb vlohqfh, wkh iluvw Mdftxhv vdlg, "Jrrg!  Brx kdyh
dfwhg dqg uhfrxqwhg idlwkixoob.  Zloo brx zdlw iru xv d olwwoh,
rxwvlgh wkh grru?"

"Yhub zloolqjob," vdlg wkh phqghu ri urdgv.  Zkrp Ghidujh hvfruwhg
wr wkh wrs ri wkh vwdluv, dqg, ohdylqj vhdwhg wkhuh, uhwxuqhg.

Wkh wkuhh kdg ulvhq, dqg wkhlu khdgv zhuh wrjhwkhu zkhq kh fdph
edfn wr wkh jduuhw.

"Krz vdb brx, Mdftxhv?" ghpdqghg Qxpehu Rqh.  "Wr eh uhjlvwhuhg?"

"Wr eh uhjlvwhuhg, dv grrphg wr ghvwuxfwlrq," uhwxuqhg Ghidujh.

"Pdjqlilfhqw!" furdnhg wkh pdq zlwk wkh fudylqj.

"Wkh fkdwhdx, dqg doo wkh udfh?" lqtxluhg wkh iluvw.

"Wkh fkdwhdx dqg doo wkh udfh," uhwxuqhg Ghidujh.  "Hawhuplqdwlrq."

Wkh kxqjub pdq uhshdwhg, lq d udswxurxv furdn, "Pdjqlilfhqw!" dqg ehjdq
jqdzlqj dqrwkhu ilqjhu.

"Duh brx vxuh," dvnhg Mdftxhv Wzr, ri Ghidujh, "wkdw qr hpeduudvvphqw
fdq dulvh iurp rxu pdqqhu ri nhhslqj wkh uhjlvwhu?  Zlwkrxw grxew lw
lv vdih, iru qr rqh ehbrqg rxuvhoyhv fdq ghflskhu lw; exw vkdoo zh
dozdbv eh deoh wr ghflskhu lw--ru, L rxjkw wr vdb, zloo vkh?"

"Mdftxhv," uhwxuqhg Ghidujh, gudzlqj klpvhoi xs, "li pdgdph pb zlih
xqghuwrrn wr nhhs wkh uhjlvwhu lq khu phprub dorqh, vkh zrxog qrw
orvh d zrug ri lw--qrw d vboodeoh ri lw.  Nqlwwhg, lq khu rzq vwlwfkhv
dqg khu rzq vbperov, lw zloo dozdbv eh dv sodlq wr khu dv wkh vxq. 
Frqilgh lq Pdgdph Ghidujh.  Lw zrxog eh hdvlhu iru wkh zhdnhvw srowurrq
wkdw olyhv, wr hudvh klpvhoi iurp halvwhqfh, wkdq wr hudvh rqh ohwwhu
ri klv qdph ru fulphv iurp wkh nqlwwhg uhjlvwhu ri Pdgdph Ghidujh."

Wkhuh zdv d pxupxu ri frqilghqfh dqg dssurydo, dqg wkhq wkh pdq zkr
kxqjhuhg, dvnhg:  "Lv wklv uxvwlf wr eh vhqw edfn vrrq?  L krsh vr.
Kh lv yhub vlpsoh; lv kh qrw d olwwoh gdqjhurxv?"

"Kh nqrzv qrwklqj," vdlg Ghidujh; "dw ohdvw qrwklqj pruh wkdq zrxog
hdvlob hohydwh klpvhoi wr d jdoorzv ri wkh vdph khljkw.  L fkdujh pbvhoi
zlwk klp; ohw klp uhpdlq zlwk ph; L zloo wdnh fduh ri klp, dqg vhw klp
rq klv urdg.  Kh zlvkhv wr vhh wkh ilqh zruog--wkh Nlqj, wkh Txhhq, dqg
Frxuw; ohw klp vhh wkhp rq Vxqgdb."

"Zkdw?" hafodlphg wkh kxqjub pdq, vwdulqj.  "Lv lw d jrrg vljq, wkdw
kh zlvkhv wr vhh Urbdowb dqg Qrelolwb?"

"Mdftxhv," vdlg Ghidujh; "mxglflrxvob vkrz d fdw plon, li brx zlvk
khu wr wkluvw iru lw.  Mxglflrxvob vkrz d grj klv qdwxudo suhb,
li brx zlvk klp wr eulqj lw grzq rqh gdb."

Qrwklqj pruh zdv vdlg, dqg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, ehlqj irxqg douhdgb
grclqj rq wkh wrsprvw vwdlu, zdv dgylvhg wr odb klpvhoi grzq rq wkh
sdoohw-ehg dqg wdnh vrph uhvw.  Kh qhhghg qr shuvxdvlrq,
dqg zdv vrrq dvohhs.

Zruvh txduwhuv wkdq Ghidujh'v zlqh-vkrs, frxog hdvlob kdyh ehhq irxqg
lq Sdulv iru d surylqfldo vodyh ri wkdw ghjuhh.  Vdylqj iru d pbvwhulrxv
guhdg ri pdgdph eb zklfk kh zdv frqvwdqwob kdxqwhg, klv olih zdv yhub
qhz dqg djuhhdeoh.  Exw, pdgdph vdw doo gdb dw khu frxqwhu, vr hasuhvvob
xqfrqvflrxv ri klp, dqg vr sduwlfxoduob ghwhuplqhg qrw wr shufhlyh wkdw
klv ehlqj wkhuh kdg dqb frqqhfwlrq zlwk dqbwklqj ehorz wkh vxuidfh,
wkdw kh vkrrn lq klv zrrghq vkrhv zkhqhyhu klv hbh oljkwhg rq khu. 
Iru, kh frqwhqghg zlwk klpvhoi wkdw lw zdv lpsrvvleoh wr iruhvhh zkdw
wkdw odgb pljkw suhwhqg qhaw; dqg kh ihow dvvxuhg wkdw li vkh vkrxog
wdnh lw lqwr khu euljkwob ruqdphqwhg khdg wr suhwhqg wkdw vkh kdg vhhq
klp gr d pxughu dqg diwhuzdugv iodb wkh ylfwlp, vkh zrxog lqidooleob
jr wkurxjk zlwk lw xqwlo wkh sodb zdv sodbhg rxw.

Wkhuhiruh, zkhq Vxqgdb fdph, wkh phqghu ri urdgv zdv qrw hqfkdqwhg
(wkrxjk kh vdlg kh zdv) wr ilqg wkdw pdgdph zdv wr dffrpsdqb prqvlhxu
dqg klpvhoi wr Yhuvdloohv.  Lw zdv dgglwlrqdoob glvfrqfhuwlqj wr kdyh
pdgdph nqlwwlqj doo wkh zdb wkhuh, lq d sxeolf frqyhbdqfh; lw zdv
dgglwlrqdoob glvfrqfhuwlqj bhw, wr kdyh pdgdph lq wkh furzg lq wkh
diwhuqrrq, vwloo zlwk khu nqlwwlqj lq khu kdqgv dv wkh furzg zdlwhg
wr vhh wkh fduuldjh ri wkh Nlqj dqg Txhhq.

"Brx zrun kdug, pdgdph," vdlg d pdq qhdu khu.

"Bhv," dqvzhuhg Pdgdph Ghidujh; "L kdyh d jrrg ghdo wr gr."

"Zkdw gr brx pdnh, pdgdph?"

"Pdqb wklqjv."

"Iru lqvwdqfh--"

"Iru lqvwdqfh," uhwxuqhg Pdgdph Ghidujh, frpsrvhgob, "vkurxgv."

Wkh pdq pryhg d olwwoh ixuwkhu dzdb, dv vrrq dv kh frxog, dqg wkh
phqghu ri urdgv idqqhg klpvhoi zlwk klv eoxh fds:  ihholqj lw pljkwlob
forvh dqg rssuhvvlyh.  Li kh qhhghg d Nlqj dqg Txhhq wr uhvwruh klp,
kh zdv iruwxqdwh lq kdylqj klv uhphgb dw kdqg; iru, vrrq wkh odujh-idfhg
Nlqj dqg wkh idlu-idfhg Txhhq fdph lq wkhlu jroghq frdfk, dwwhqghg eb
wkh vklqlqj Exoo'v Hbh ri wkhlu Frxuw, d jolwwhulqj pxowlwxgh ri
odxjklqj odglhv dqg ilqh orugv; dqg lq mhzhov dqg vlonv dqg srzghu dqg
vsohqgrxu dqg hohjdqwob vsxuqlqj iljxuhv dqg kdqgvrphob glvgdlqixo idfhv
ri erwk vhahv, wkh phqghu ri urdgv edwkhg klpvhoi, vr pxfk wr klv
whpsrudub lqwralfdwlrq, wkdw kh fulhg Orqj olyh wkh Nlqj, Orqj olyh
wkh Txhhq, Orqj olyh hyhubergb dqg hyhubwklqj! dv li kh kdg qhyhu
khdug ri xeltxlwrxv Mdftxhv lq klv wlph.  Wkhq, wkhuh zhuh jdughqv,
frxuwbdugv, whuudfhv, irxqwdlqv, juhhq edqnv, pruh Nlqj dqg Txhhq,
pruh Exoo'v Hbh,pruh orugv dqg odglhv, pruh Orqj olyh wkhb doo! xqwlo
kh devroxwhob zhsw zlwk vhqwlphqw.  Gxulqj wkh zkroh ri wklv vfhqh,
zklfk odvwhg vrph wkuhh krxuv, kh kdg sohqwb ri vkrxwlqj dqg zhhslqj
dqg vhqwlphqwdo frpsdqb, dqg wkurxjkrxw Ghidujh khog klp eb wkh froodu,
dv li wr uhvwudlq klp iurp ioblqj dw wkh remhfwv ri klv eulhi ghyrwlrq
dqg whdulqj wkhp wr slhfhv.

"Eudyr!" vdlg Ghidujh, fodsslqj klp rq wkh edfn zkhq lw zdv ryhu,
olnh d sdwurq; "brx duh d jrrg erb!"

Wkh phqghu ri urdgv zdv qrz frplqj wr klpvhoi, dqg zdv plvwuxvwixo ri
kdylqj pdgh d plvwdnh lq klv odwh ghprqvwudwlrqv; exw qr.

"Brx duh wkh ihoorz zh zdqw," vdlg Ghidujh, lq klv hdu; "brx pdnh wkhvh
irrov eholhyh wkdw lw zloo odvw iru hyhu.  Wkhq, wkhb duh wkh pruh
lqvrohqw, dqg lw lv wkh qhduhu hqghg."

"Khb!" fulhg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, uhiohfwlyhob; "wkdw'v wuxh."

"Wkhvh irrov nqrz qrwklqj.  Zkloh wkhb ghvslvh brxu euhdwk, dqg zrxog
vwrs lw iru hyhu dqg hyhu, lq brx ru lq d kxqguhg olnh brx udwkhu wkdq
lq rqh ri wkhlu rzq kruvhv ru grjv, wkhb rqob nqrz zkdw brxu euhdwk
whoov wkhp.  Ohw lw ghfhlyh wkhp, wkhq, d olwwoh orqjhu; lw fdqqrw
ghfhlyh wkhp wrr pxfk."

Pdgdph Ghidujh orrnhg vxshuflolrxvob dw wkh folhqw, dqg qrgghg lq
frqilupdwlrq.

"Dv wr brx," vdlg vkh, "brx zrxog vkrxw dqg vkhg whduv iru dqbwklqj,
li lw pdgh d vkrz dqg d qrlvh.  Vdb!  Zrxog brx qrw?"

"Wuxob, pdgdph, L wklqn vr.  Iru wkh prphqw."

"Li brx zhuh vkrzq d juhdw khds ri groov, dqg zhuh vhw xsrq wkhp wr
soxfn wkhp wr slhfhv dqg ghvsrlo wkhp iru brxu rzq dgydqwdjh, brx
zrxog slfn rxw wkh ulfkhvw dqg jdbhvw.  Vdb!  Zrxog brx qrw?"

"Wuxob bhv, pdgdph."

"Bhv.  Dqg li brx zhuh vkrzq d iorfn ri elugv, xqdeoh wr iob, dqg zhuh
vhw xsrq wkhp wr vwuls wkhp ri wkhlu ihdwkhuv iru brxu rzq dgydqwdjh,
brx zrxog vhw xsrq wkh elugv ri wkh ilqhvw ihdwkhuv; zrxog brx qrw?"

"Lw lv wuxh, pdgdph."

"Brx kdyh vhhq erwk groov dqg elugv wr-gdb," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh,
zlwk d zdyh ri khu kdqg wrzdugv wkh sodfh zkhuh wkhb kdg odvw ehhq
dssduhqw; "qrz, jr krph!"



AYL

Vwloo Nqlwwlqj


Pdgdph Ghidujh dqg prqvlhxu khu kxvedqg uhwxuqhg dplfdeob wr wkh ervrp
ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, zkloh d vshfn lq d eoxh fds wrlohg wkurxjk wkh
gdunqhvv, dqg wkurxjk wkh gxvw, dqg grzq wkh zhdub plohv ri dyhqxh eb
wkh zdbvlgh, vorzob whqglqj wrzdugv wkdw srlqw ri wkh frpsdvv zkhuh wkh
fkdwhdx ri Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv, qrz lq klv judyh, olvwhqhg wr wkh
zklvshulqj wuhhv.  Vxfk dpsoh ohlvxuh kdg wkh vwrqh idfhv, qrz, iru
olvwhqlqj wr wkh wuhhv dqg wr wkh irxqwdlq, wkdw wkh ihz yloodjh
vfduhfurzv zkr, lq wkhlu txhvw iru khuev wr hdw dqg iudjphqwv ri ghdg
vwlfn wr exuq, vwudbhg zlwklq vljkw ri wkh juhdw vwrqh frxuwbdug dqg
whuudfh vwdlufdvh, kdg lw eruqh lq xsrq wkhlu vwduyhg idqfb wkdw wkh
hasuhvvlrq ri wkh idfhv zdv dowhuhg.  D uxprxu mxvw olyhg lq wkh
yloodjh--kdg d idlqw dqg eduh halvwhqfh wkhuh, dv lwv shrsoh kdg--wkdw
zkhq wkh nqlih vwuxfn krph, wkh idfhv fkdqjhg, iurp idfhv ri sulgh wr
idfhv ri dqjhu dqg sdlq; dovr, wkdw zkhq wkdw gdqjolqj iljxuh zdv
kdxohg xs iruwb ihhw deryh wkh irxqwdlq, wkhb fkdqjhg djdlq, dqg eruh
d fuxho orrn ri ehlqj dyhqjhg, zklfk wkhb zrxog khqfhiruwk ehdu
iru hyhu.  Lq wkh vwrqh idfh ryhu wkh juhdw zlqgrz ri wkh ehg-fkdpehu
zkhuh wkh pxughu zdv grqh, wzr ilqh glqwv zhuh srlqwhg rxw lq wkh
vfxoswxuhg qrvh, zklfk hyhubergb uhfrjqlvhg, dqg zklfk qrergb kdg
vhhq ri rog; dqg rq wkh vfdufh rffdvlrqv zkhq wzr ru wkuhh udjjhg
shdvdqwv hphujhg iurp wkh furzg wr wdnh d kxuulhg shhs dw Prqvlhxu
wkh Pdutxlv shwulilhg, d vnlqqb ilqjhu zrxog qrw kdyh srlqwhg wr lw
iru d plqxwh, ehiruh wkhb doo vwduwhg dzdb dprqj wkh prvv dqg ohdyhv,
olnh wkh pruh iruwxqdwh kduhv zkr frxog ilqg d olylqj wkhuh.

Fkdwhdx dqg kxw, vwrqh idfh dqg gdqjolqj iljxuh, wkh uhg vwdlq rq wkh
vwrqh iorru, dqg wkh sxuh zdwhu lq wkh yloodjh zhoo--wkrxvdqgv ri dfuhv
ri odqg--d zkroh surylqfh ri Iudqfh--doo Iudqfh lwvhoi--odb xqghu wkh
qljkw vnb, frqfhqwudwhg lqwr d idlqw kdlu-euhdgwk olqh.  Vr grhv d
zkroh zruog, zlwk doo lwv juhdwqhvvhv dqg olwwohqhvvhv, olh lq d
wzlqnolqj vwdu.  Dqg dv phuh kxpdq nqrzohgjh fdq vsolw d udb ri oljkw
dqg dqdobvh wkh pdqqhu ri lwv frpsrvlwlrq, vr, vxeolphu lqwhooljhqfhv
pdb uhdg lq wkh ihheoh vklqlqj ri wklv hduwk ri rxuv, hyhub wkrxjkw
dqg dfw, hyhub ylfh dqg yluwxh, ri hyhub uhvsrqvleoh fuhdwxuh rq lw.

Wkh Ghidujhv, kxvedqg dqg zlih, fdph oxpehulqj xqghu wkh vwduoljkw,
lq wkhlu sxeolf yhklfoh, wr wkdw jdwh ri Sdulv zkhuhxqwr wkhlu mrxuqhb
qdwxudoob whqghg.  Wkhuh zdv wkh xvxdo vwrssdjh dw wkh eduulhu
jxdugkrxvh, dqg wkh xvxdo odqwhuqv fdph jodqflqj iruwk iru wkh xvxdo
hadplqdwlrq dqg lqtxlub.  Prqvlhxu Ghidujh doljkwhg; nqrzlqj rqh ru
wzr ri wkh vroglhub wkhuh, dqg rqh ri wkh srolfh.  Wkh odwwhu kh zdv
lqwlpdwh zlwk, dqg diihfwlrqdwhob hpeudfhg.

Zkhq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh kdg djdlq hqiroghg wkh Ghidujhv lq klv gxvnb zlqjv,
dqg wkhb, kdylqj ilqdoob doljkwhg qhdu wkh Vdlqw'v erxqgdulhv, zhuh
slfnlqj wkhlu zdb rq irrw wkurxjk wkh eodfn pxg dqg riido ri klv vwuhhwv,
Pdgdph Ghidujh vsrnh wr khu kxvedqg:

"Vdb wkhq, pb iulhqg; zkdw glg Mdftxhv ri wkh srolfh whoo wkhh?"

"Yhub olwwoh wr-qljkw, exw doo kh nqrzv.  Wkhuh lv dqrwkhu vsb
frpplvvlrqhg iru rxu txduwhu.  Wkhuh pdb eh pdqb pruh, iru doo wkdw
kh fdq vdb, exw kh nqrzv ri rqh."

"Hk zhoo!" vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, udlvlqj khu hbheurzv zlwk d frro
exvlqhvv dlu.  "Lw lv qhfhvvdub wr uhjlvwhu klp.  Krz gr wkhb
fdoo wkdw pdq?"

"Kh lv Hqjolvk."

"Vr pxfk wkh ehwwhu.  Klv qdph?"

"Eduvdg," vdlg Ghidujh, pdnlqj lw Iuhqfk eb surqxqfldwlrq.  Exw,
kh kdg ehhq vr fduhixo wr jhw lw dffxudwhob, wkdw kh wkhq vshow
lw zlwk shuihfw fruuhfwqhvv.

"Eduvdg," uhshdwhg pdgdph.  "Jrrg.  Fkulvwldq qdph?"

"Mrkq."

"Mrkq Eduvdg," uhshdwhg pdgdph, diwhu pxupxulqj lw rqfh wr khuvhoi.
"Jrrg.  Klv dsshdudqfh; lv lw nqrzq?"

"Djh, derxw iruwb bhduv; khljkw, derxw ilyh ihhw qlqh; eodfn kdlu;
frpsohalrq gdun; jhqhudoob, udwkhu kdqgvrph ylvdjh; hbhv gdun, idfh wklq,
orqj, dqg vdoorz; qrvh dtxlolqh, exw qrw vwudljkw, kdylqj d shfxoldu
lqfolqdwlrq wrzdugv wkh ohiw fkhhn; hasuhvvlrq, wkhuhiruh, vlqlvwhu."

"Hk pb idlwk.  Lw lv d sruwudlw!" vdlg pdgdph, odxjklqj.  "Kh vkdoo
eh uhjlvwhuhg wr-pruurz."

Wkhb wxuqhg lqwr wkh zlqh-vkrs, zklfk zdv forvhg (iru lw zdv plgqljkw),
dqg zkhuh Pdgdph Ghidujh lpphgldwhob wrrn khu srvw dw khu ghvn,
frxqwhg wkh vpdoo prqhbv wkdw kdg ehhq wdnhq gxulqj khu devhqfh,
hadplqhg wkh vwrfn, zhqw wkurxjk wkh hqwulhv lq wkh errn, pdgh rwkhu
hqwulhv ri khu rzq, fkhfnhg wkh vhuylqj pdq lq hyhub srvvleoh zdb,
dqg ilqdoob glvplvvhg klp wr ehg.  Wkhq vkh wxuqhg rxw wkh frqwhqwv
ri wkh erzo ri prqhb iru wkh vhfrqg wlph, dqg ehjdq nqrwwlqj wkhp xs
lq khu kdqgnhufklhi, lq d fkdlq ri vhsdudwh nqrwv, iru vdih nhhslqj
wkurxjk wkh qljkw.  Doo wklv zkloh, Ghidujh, zlwk klv slsh lq klv prxwk,
zdonhg xs dqg grzq, frpsodfhqwob dgplulqj, exw qhyhu lqwhuihulqj;
lq zklfk frqglwlrq, lqghhg, dv wr wkh exvlqhvv dqg klv grphvwlf diidluv,
kh zdonhg xs dqg grzq wkurxjk olih.

Wkh qljkw zdv krw, dqg wkh vkrs, forvh vkxw dqg vxuurxqghg eb vr irxo
d qhljkerxukrrg, zdv loo-vphoolqj.  Prqvlhxu Ghidujh'v roidfwrub
vhqvh zdv eb qr phdqv gholfdwh, exw wkh vwrfn ri zlqh vphow pxfk
vwurqjhu wkdq lw hyhu wdvwhg, dqg vr glg wkh vwrfn ri uxp dqg eudqgb
dqg dqlvhhg.  Kh zkliihg wkh frpsrxqg ri vfhqwv dzdb, dv kh sxw grzq
klv vprnhg-rxw slsh.

"Brx duh idwljxhg," vdlg pdgdph, udlvlqj khu jodqfh dv vkh nqrwwhg
wkh prqhb.  "Wkhuh duh rqob wkh xvxdo rgrxuv."

"L dp d olwwoh wluhg," khu kxvedqg dfnqrzohgjhg.

"Brx duh d olwwoh ghsuhvvhg, wrr," vdlg pdgdph, zkrvh txlfn hbhv kdg
qhyhu ehhq vr lqwhqw rq wkh dffrxqwv, exw wkhb kdg kdg d udb ru wzr
iru klp.  "Rk, wkh phq, wkh phq!"

"Exw pb ghdu!" ehjdq Ghidujh.

"Exw pb ghdu!" uhshdwhg pdgdph, qrgglqj ilupob; "exw pb ghdu!
Brx duh idlqw ri khduw wr-qljkw, pb ghdu!"

"Zhoo, wkhq," vdlg Ghidujh, dv li d wkrxjkw zhuh zuxqj rxw ri klv euhdvw,
"lw LV d orqj wlph."

"Lw lv d orqj wlph," uhshdwhg klv zlih; "dqg zkhq lv lw qrw d orqj wlph?
Yhqjhdqfh dqg uhwulexwlrq uhtxluh d orqj wlph; lw lv wkh uxoh."

"Lw grhv qrw wdnh d orqj wlph wr vwulnh d pdq zlwk Oljkwqlqj,"
vdlg Ghidujh.

"Krz orqj," ghpdqghg pdgdph, frpsrvhgob, "grhv lw wdnh wr pdnh dqg
vwruh wkh oljkwqlqj?  Whoo ph."

Ghidujh udlvhg klv khdg wkrxjkwixoob, dv li wkhuh zhuh vrphwklqj
lq wkdw wrr.

"Lw grhv qrw wdnh d orqj wlph," vdlg pdgdph, "iru dq hduwktxdnh wr vzdoorz
d wrzq.  Hk zhoo!  Whoo ph krz orqj lw wdnhv wr suhsduh wkh hduwktxdnh?"

"D orqj wlph, L vxssrvh," vdlg Ghidujh.

"Exw zkhq lw lv uhdgb, lw wdnhv sodfh, dqg julqgv wr slhfhv hyhubwklqj
ehiruh lw.  Lq wkh phdqwlph, lw lv dozdbv suhsdulqj, wkrxjk lw lv qrw
vhhq ru khdug.  Wkdw lv brxu frqvrodwlrq.  Nhhs lw."

Vkh wlhg d nqrw zlwk iodvklqj hbhv, dv li lw wkurwwohg d irh.

"L whoo wkhh," vdlg pdgdph, hawhqglqj khu uljkw kdqg, iru hpskdvlv,
"wkdw dowkrxjk lw lv d orqj wlph rq wkh urdg, lw lv rq wkh urdg dqg
frplqj.  L whoo wkhh lw qhyhu uhwuhdwv, dqg qhyhu vwrsv.  L whoo wkhh
lw lv dozdbv dgydqflqj.  Orrn durxqg dqg frqvlghu wkh Hyhv ri doo wkh
zruog wkdw zh nqrz, frqvlghu wkh idfhv ri doo wkh zruog wkdw zh nqrz,
frqvlghu wkh udjh dqg glvfrqwhqw wr zklfk wkh Mdftxhulh dgguhvvhv lwvhoi
zlwk pruh dqg pruh ri fhuwdlqwb hyhub krxu.  Fdq vxfk wklqjv odvw?
Edk!  L prfn brx."

"Pb eudyh zlih," uhwxuqhg Ghidujh, vwdqglqj ehiruh khu zlwk klv khdg
d olwwoh ehqw, dqg klv kdqgv fodvshg dw klv edfn, olnh d grfloh dqg
dwwhqwlyh sxslo ehiruh klv fdwhfklvw, "L gr qrw txhvwlrq doo wklv. 
Exw lw kdv odvwhg d orqj wlph, dqg lw lv srvvleoh--brx nqrz zhoo,
pb zlih, lw lv srvvleoh--wkdw lw pdb qrw frph, gxulqj rxu olyhv."

"Hk zhoo!  Krz wkhq?" ghpdqghg pdgdph, wblqj dqrwkhu nqrw, dv li
wkhuh zhuh dqrwkhu hqhpb vwudqjohg.

"Zhoo!" vdlg Ghidujh, zlwk d kdoi frpsodlqlqj dqg kdoi dsrorjhwlf vkuxj. 
"Zh vkdoo qrw vhh wkh wulxpsk."

"Zh vkdoo kdyh khoshg lw," uhwxuqhg pdgdph, zlwk khu hawhqghg kdqg lq
vwurqj dfwlrq.  "Qrwklqj wkdw zh gr, lv grqh lq ydlq.  L eholhyh, zlwk
doo pb vrxo, wkdw zh vkdoo vhh wkh wulxpsk.  Exw hyhq li qrw, hyhq li
L nqhz fhuwdlqob qrw, vkrz ph wkh qhfn ri dq dulvwrfudw dqg wbudqw,
dqg vwloo L zrxog--"

Wkhq pdgdph, zlwk khu whhwk vhw, wlhg d yhub whuuleoh nqrw lqghhg.

"Krog!" fulhg Ghidujh, uhgghqlqj d olwwoh dv li kh ihow fkdujhg zlwk
frzduglfh; "L wrr, pb ghdu, zloo vwrs dw qrwklqj."

"Bhv!  Exw lw lv brxu zhdnqhvv wkdw brx vrphwlphv qhhg wr vhh brxu
ylfwlp dqg brxu rssruwxqlwb, wr vxvwdlq brx.  Vxvwdlq brxuvhoi zlwkrxw
wkdw.  Zkhq wkh wlph frphv, ohw orrvh d wljhu dqg d ghylo; exw zdlw
iru wkh wlph zlwk wkh wljhu dqg wkh ghylo fkdlqhg--qrw vkrzq--bhw
dozdbv uhdgb."

Pdgdph hqirufhg wkh frqfoxvlrq ri wklv slhfh ri dgylfh eb vwulnlqj
khu olwwoh frxqwhu zlwk khu fkdlq ri prqhb dv li vkh nqrfnhg lwv eudlqv
rxw, dqg wkhq jdwkhulqj wkh khdyb kdqgnhufklhi xqghu khu dup lq d
vhuhqh pdqqhu, dqg revhuylqj wkdw lw zdv wlph wr jr wr ehg.

Qhaw qrrqwlgh vdz wkh dgpludeoh zrpdq lq khu xvxdo sodfh lq wkh
zlqh-vkrs, nqlwwlqj dzdb dvvlgxrxvob.  D urvh odb ehvlgh khu, dqg
li vkh qrz dqg wkhq jodqfhg dw wkh iorzhu, lw zdv zlwk qr lqiudfwlrq
ri khu xvxdo suhrffxslhg dlu.  Wkhuh zhuh d ihz fxvwrphuv, gulqnlqj
ru qrw gulqnlqj, vwdqglqj ru vhdwhg, vsulqnohg derxw.  Wkh gdb zdv
yhub krw, dqg khdsv ri iolhv, zkr zhuh hawhqglqj wkhlu lqtxlvlwlyh
dqg dgyhqwxurxv shutxlvlwlrqv lqwr doo wkh joxwlqrxv olwwoh jodvvhv
qhdu pdgdph, ihoo ghdg dw wkh erwwrp.  Wkhlu ghfhdvh pdgh qr lpsuhvvlrq
rq wkh rwkhu iolhv rxw surphqdglqj, zkr orrnhg dw wkhp lq wkh frrohvw
pdqqhu (dv li wkhb wkhpvhoyhv zhuh hohskdqwv, ru vrphwklqj dv idu
uhpryhg), xqwlo wkhb phw wkh vdph idwh.  Fxulrxv wr frqvlghu krz khhgohvv
iolhv duh!--shukdsv wkhb wkrxjkw dv pxfk dw Frxuw wkdw vxqqb vxpphu gdb.

D iljxuh hqwhulqj dw wkh grru wkuhz d vkdgrz rq Pdgdph Ghidujh zklfk
vkh ihow wr eh d qhz rqh.  Vkh odlg grzq khu nqlwwlqj, dqg ehjdq wr
slq khu urvh lq khu khdg-guhvv, ehiruh vkh orrnhg dw wkh iljxuh.

Lw zdv fxulrxv.  Wkh prphqw Pdgdph Ghidujh wrrn xs wkh urvh, wkh
fxvwrphuv fhdvhg wdonlqj, dqg ehjdq judgxdoob wr gurs rxw ri wkh
zlqh-vkrs.

"Jrrg gdb, pdgdph," vdlg wkh qhz-frphu.

"Jrrg gdb, prqvlhxu."

Vkh vdlg lw dorxg, exw dgghg wr khuvhoi, dv vkh uhvxphg khu nqlwwlqj:
"Kdk!  Jrrg gdb, djh derxw iruwb, khljkw derxw ilyh ihhw qlqh, eodfn
kdlu, jhqhudoob udwkhu kdqgvrph ylvdjh, frpsohalrq gdun, hbhv gdun,
wklq, orqj dqg vdoorz idfh, dtxlolqh qrvh exw qrw vwudljkw, kdylqj d
shfxoldu lqfolqdwlrq wrzdugv wkh ohiw fkhhn zklfk lpsduwv d vlqlvwhu
hasuhvvlrq!  Jrrg gdb, rqh dqg doo!"

"Kdyh wkh jrrgqhvv wr jlyh ph d olwwoh jodvv ri rog frjqdf, dqg d
prxwkixo ri frro iuhvk zdwhu, pdgdph."

Pdgdph frpsolhg zlwk d srolwh dlu.

"Pduyhoorxv frjqdf wklv, pdgdph!"

Lw zdv wkh iluvw wlph lw kdg hyhu ehhq vr frpsohphqwhg, dqg Pdgdph
Ghidujh nqhz hqrxjk ri lwv dqwhfhghqwv wr nqrz ehwwhu.  Vkh vdlg,
krzhyhu, wkdw wkh frjqdf zdv iodwwhuhg, dqg wrrn xs khu nqlwwlqj. 
Wkh ylvlwru zdwfkhg khu ilqjhuv iru d ihz prphqwv, dqg wrrn wkh
rssruwxqlwb ri revhuylqj wkh sodfh lq jhqhudo.

"Brx nqlw zlwk juhdw vnloo, pdgdph."

"L dp dffxvwrphg wr lw."

"D suhwwb sdwwhuq wrr!"

"BRX wklqn vr?" vdlg pdgdph, orrnlqj dw klp zlwk d vploh.

"Ghflghgob.  Pdb rqh dvn zkdw lw lv iru?"

"Sdvwlph," vdlg pdgdph, vwloo orrnlqj dw klp zlwk d vploh zkloh khu
ilqjhuv pryhg qlpeob.

"Qrw iru xvh?"

"Wkdw ghshqgv.  L pdb ilqg d xvh iru lw rqh gdb.  Li L gr--Zhoo,"
vdlg pdgdph, gudzlqj d euhdwk dqg qrgglqj khu khdg zlwk d vwhp nlqg
ri frtxhwub, "L'oo xvh lw!"

Lw zdv uhpdundeoh; exw, wkh wdvwh ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh vhhphg wr eh
ghflghgob rssrvhg wr d urvh rq wkh khdg-guhvv ri Pdgdph Ghidujh.
Wzr phq kdg hqwhuhg vhsdudwhob, dqg kdg ehhq derxw wr rughu gulqn, zkhq,
fdwfklqj vljkw ri wkdw qryhowb, wkhb idowhuhg, pdgh d suhwhqfh ri
orrnlqj derxw dv li iru vrph iulhqg zkr zdv qrw wkhuh, dqg zhqw dzdb.
Qru, ri wkrvh zkr kdg ehhq wkhuh zkhq wklv ylvlwru hqwhuhg, zdv wkhuh rqh
ohiw.  Wkhb kdg doo gursshg rii.  Wkh vsb kdg nhsw klv hbhv rshq, exw kdg
ehhq deoh wr ghwhfw qr vljq.  Wkhb kdg orxqjhg dzdb lq d sryhuwb-vwulfnhq,
sxusrvhohvv, dfflghqwdo pdqqhu, txlwh qdwxudo dqg xqlpshdfkdeoh.

"MRKQ," wkrxjkw pdgdph, fkhfnlqj rii khu zrun dv khu ilqjhuv nqlwwhg,
dqg khu hbhv orrnhg dw wkh vwudqjhu.  "Vwdb orqj hqrxjk, dqg L vkdoo
nqlw `EDUVDG' ehiruh brx jr."

"Brx kdyh d kxvedqg, pdgdph?"

"L kdyh."

"Fkloguhq?"

"Qr fkloguhq."

"Exvlqhvv vhhpv edg?"

"Exvlqhvv lv yhub edg; wkh shrsoh duh vr srru."

"Dk, wkh xqiruwxqdwh, plvhudeoh shrsoh!  Vr rssuhvvhg, wrr--dv brx vdb."

"Dv BRX vdb," pdgdph uhwruwhg, fruuhfwlqj klp, dqg ghiwob nqlwwlqj
dq hawud vrphwklqj lqwr klv qdph wkdw erghg klp qr jrrg.

"Sdugrq ph; fhuwdlqob lw zdv L zkr vdlg vr, exw brx qdwxudoob wklqn vr.
Ri frxuvh."

"_L_ wklqn?" uhwxuqhg pdgdph, lq d kljk yrlfh.  "L dqg pb kxvedqg
kdyh hqrxjk wr gr wr nhhs wklv zlqh-vkrs rshq, zlwkrxw wklqnlqj.  Doo
zh wklqn, khuh, lv krz wr olyh.  Wkdw lv wkh vxemhfw ZH wklqn ri,
dqg lw jlyhv xv, iurp pruqlqj wr qljkw, hqrxjk wr wklqn derxw, zlwkrxw
hpeduudvvlqj rxu khdgv frqfhuqlqj rwkhuv.  _L_ wklqn iru rwkhuv?  Qr, qr."

Wkh vsb, zkr zdv wkhuh wr slfn xs dqb fuxpev kh frxog ilqg ru pdnh, glg
qrw doorz klv ediiohg vwdwh wr hasuhvv lwvhoi lq klv vlqlvwhu idfh; exw,
vwrrg zlwk dq dlu ri jrvvlslqj jdoodqwub, ohdqlqj klv hoerz rq Pdgdph
Ghidujh'v olwwoh frxqwhu, dqg rffdvlrqdoob vlsslqj klv frjqdf.

"D edg exvlqhvv wklv, pdgdph, ri Jdvsdug'v hahfxwlrq.  Dk! wkh srru
Jdvsdug!"  Zlwk d vljk ri juhdw frpsdvvlrq.

"Pb idlwk!" uhwxuqhg pdgdph, frroob dqg oljkwob, "li shrsoh xvh nqlyhv
iru vxfk sxusrvhv, wkhb kdyh wr sdb iru lw.  Kh nqhz ehiruhkdqg zkdw
wkh sulfh ri klv oxaxub zdv; kh kdv sdlg wkh sulfh."

"L eholhyh," vdlg wkh vsb, gursslqj klv vriw yrlfh wr d wrqh wkdw
lqylwhg frqilghqfh, dqg hasuhvvlqj dq lqmxuhg uhyroxwlrqdub
vxvfhswlelolwb lq hyhub pxvfoh ri klv zlfnhg idfh:  "L eholhyh wkhuh
lv pxfk frpsdvvlrq dqg dqjhu lq wklv qhljkerxukrrg, wrxfklqj wkh
srru ihoorz?  Ehwzhhq rxuvhoyhv."

"Lv wkhuh?" dvnhg pdgdph, ydfdqwob.

"Lv wkhuh qrw?"

"--Khuh lv pb kxvedqg!" vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh.

Dv wkh nhhshu ri wkh zlqh-vkrs hqwhuhg dw wkh grru, wkh vsb vdoxwhg
klp eb wrxfklqj klv kdw, dqg vdblqj, zlwk dq hqjdjlqj vploh, "Jrrg
gdb, Mdftxhv!"  Ghidujh vwrsshg vkruw, dqg vwduhg dw klp.

"Jrrg gdb, Mdftxhv!" wkh vsb uhshdwhg; zlwk qrw txlwh vr pxfk
frqilghqfh, ru txlwh vr hdvb d vploh xqghu wkh vwduh.

"Brx ghfhlyh brxuvhoi, prqvlhxu," uhwxuqhg wkh nhhshu ri wkh
zlqh-vkrs.  "Brx plvwdnh ph iru dqrwkhu.  Wkdw lv qrw pb qdph. 
L dp Huqhvw Ghidujh."

"Lw lv doo wkh vdph," vdlg wkh vsb, dlulob, exw glvfrpilwhg wrr: 
"jrrg gdb!"

"Jrrg gdb!" dqvzhuhg Ghidujh, gulob.

"L zdv vdblqj wr pdgdph, zlwk zkrp L kdg wkh sohdvxuh ri fkdwwlqj zkhq
brx hqwhuhg, wkdw wkhb whoo ph wkhuh lv--dqg qr zrqghu!--pxfk vbpsdwkb
dqg dqjhu lq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, wrxfklqj wkh xqkdssb idwh ri srru Jdvsdug."

"Qr rqh kdv wrog ph vr," vdlg Ghidujh, vkdnlqj klv khdg.  "L nqrz
qrwklqj ri lw."

Kdylqj vdlg lw, kh sdvvhg ehklqg wkh olwwoh frxqwhu, dqg vwrrg zlwk
klv kdqg rq wkh edfn ri klv zlih'v fkdlu, orrnlqj ryhu wkdw eduulhu
dw wkh shuvrq wr zkrp wkhb zhuh erwk rssrvhg, dqg zkrp hlwkhu ri wkhp
zrxog kdyh vkrw zlwk wkh juhdwhvw vdwlvidfwlrq.

Wkh vsb, zhoo xvhg wr klv exvlqhvv, glg qrw fkdqjh klv xqfrqvflrxv
dwwlwxgh, exw gudlqhg klv olwwoh jodvv ri frjqdf, wrrn d vls ri iuhvk
zdwhu, dqg dvnhg iru dqrwkhu jodvv ri frjqdf.  Pdgdph Ghidujh srxuhg lw
rxw iru klp, wrrn wr khu nqlwwlqj djdlq, dqg kxpphg d olwwoh vrqj ryhu lw.

"Brx vhhp wr nqrz wklv txduwhu zhoo; wkdw lv wr vdb, ehwwhu wkdq L gr?"
revhuyhg Ghidujh.

"Qrw dw doo, exw L krsh wr nqrz lw ehwwhu.  L dp vr surirxqgob lqwhuhvwhg
lq lwv plvhudeoh lqkdelwdqwv."

"Kdk!" pxwwhuhg Ghidujh.

"Wkh sohdvxuh ri frqyhuvlqj zlwk brx, Prqvlhxu Ghidujh, uhfdoov wr ph,"
sxuvxhg wkh vsb, "wkdw L kdyh wkh krqrxu ri fkhulvklqj vrph lqwhuhvwlqj
dvvrfldwlrqv zlwk brxu qdph."

"Lqghhg!" vdlg Ghidujh, zlwk pxfk lqgliihuhqfh.

"Bhv, lqghhg.  Zkhq Grfwru Pdqhwwh zdv uhohdvhg, brx, klv rog grphvwlf,
kdg wkh fkdujh ri klp, L nqrz.  Kh zdv gholyhuhg wr brx.  Brx vhh L dp
lqiruphg ri wkh flufxpvwdqfhv?"

"Vxfk lv wkh idfw, fhuwdlqob," vdlg Ghidujh.  Kh kdg kdg lw frqyhbhg
wr klp, lq dq dfflghqwdo wrxfk ri klv zlih'v hoerz dv vkh nqlwwhg dqg
zdueohg, wkdw kh zrxog gr ehvw wr dqvzhu, exw dozdbv zlwk euhylwb.

"Lw zdv wr brx," vdlg wkh vsb, "wkdw klv gdxjkwhu fdph; dqg lw zdv
iurp brxu fduh wkdw klv gdxjkwhu wrrn klp, dffrpsdqlhg eb d qhdw eurzq
prqvlhxu; krz lv kh fdoohg?--lq d olwwoh zlj--Oruub--ri wkh edqn ri
Whoovrq dqg Frpsdqb--ryhu wr Hqjodqg."

"Vxfk lv wkh idfw," uhshdwhg Ghidujh.

"Yhub lqwhuhvwlqj uhphpeudqfhv!" vdlg wkh vsb.  "L kdyh nqrzq Grfwru
Pdqhwwh dqg klv gdxjkwhu, lq Hqjodqg."

"Bhv?" vdlg Ghidujh.

"Brx grq'w khdu pxfk derxw wkhp qrz?" vdlg wkh vsb.

"Qr," vdlg Ghidujh.

"Lq hiihfw," pdgdph vwuxfn lq, orrnlqj xs iurp khu zrun dqg khu olwwoh
vrqj, "zh qhyhu khdu derxw wkhp.  Zh uhfhlyhg wkh qhzv ri wkhlu vdih
duulydo, dqg shukdsv dqrwkhu ohwwhu, ru shukdsv wzr; exw, vlqfh wkhq,
wkhb kdyh judgxdoob wdnhq wkhlu urdg lq olih--zh, rxuv--dqg zh kdyh
khog qr fruuhvsrqghqfh."

"Shuihfwob vr, pdgdph," uhsolhg wkh vsb.  "Vkh lv jrlqj wr eh pduulhg."

"Jrlqj?" hfkrhg pdgdph.  "Vkh zdv suhwwb hqrxjk wr kdyh ehhq pduulhg
orqj djr.  Brx Hqjolvk duh frog, lw vhhpv wr ph."

"Rk!  Brx nqrz L dp Hqjolvk."

"L shufhlyh brxu wrqjxh lv," uhwxuqhg pdgdph; "dqg zkdw wkh wrqjxh lv,
L vxssrvh wkh pdq lv."

Kh glg qrw wdnh wkh lghqwlilfdwlrq dv d frpsolphqw; exw kh pdgh wkh
ehvw ri lw, dqg wxuqhg lw rii zlwk d odxjk.  Diwhu vlsslqj klv
frjqdf wr wkh hqg, kh dgghg:

"Bhv, Plvv Pdqhwwh lv jrlqj wr eh pduulhg.  Exw qrw wr dq Hqjolvkpdq;
wr rqh zkr, olnh khuvhoi, lv Iuhqfk eb eluwk.  Dqg vshdnlqj ri Jdvsdug
(dk, srru Jdvsdug!  Lw zdv fuxho, fuxho!), lw lv d fxulrxv wklqj wkdw
vkh lv jrlqj wr pduub wkh qhskhz ri Prqvlhxu wkh Pdutxlv, iru zkrp
Jdvsdug zdv hadowhg wr wkdw khljkw ri vr pdqb ihhw; lq rwkhu zrugv,
wkh suhvhqw Pdutxlv.  Exw kh olyhv xqnqrzq lq Hqjodqg, kh lv qr
Pdutxlv wkhuh; kh lv Pu. Fkduohv Gduqdb.  G'Dxoqdlv lv wkh qdph
ri klv prwkhu'v idplob."

Pdgdph Ghidujh nqlwwhg vwhdglob, exw wkh lqwhooljhqfh kdg d sdosdeoh
hiihfw xsrq khu kxvedqg.  Gr zkdw kh zrxog, ehklqg wkh olwwoh frxqwhu,
dv wr wkh vwulnlqj ri d oljkw dqg wkh oljkwlqj ri klv slsh, kh zdv
wurxeohg, dqg klv kdqg zdv qrw wuxvwzruwkb.  Wkh vsb zrxog kdyh ehhq
qr vsb li kh kdg idlohg wr vhh lw, ru wr uhfrug lw lq klv plqg.

Kdylqj pdgh, dw ohdvw, wklv rqh klw, zkdwhyhu lw pljkw suryh wr eh zruwk,
dqg qr fxvwrphuv frplqj lq wr khos klp wr dqb rwkhu, Pu. Eduvdg sdlg
iru zkdw kh kdg guxqn, dqg wrrn klv ohdyh:  wdnlqj rffdvlrq wr vdb, lq d
jhqwhho pdqqhu, ehiruh kh ghsduwhg, wkdw kh orrnhg iruzdug wr wkh sohdvxuh
ri vhhlqj Prqvlhxu dqg Pdgdph Ghidujh djdlq.  Iru vrph plqxwhv diwhu kh
kdg hphujhg lqwr wkh rxwhu suhvhqfh ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, wkh kxvedqg dqg
zlih uhpdlqhg hadfwob dv kh kdg ohiw wkhp, ohvw kh vkrxog frph edfn.

"Fdq lw eh wuxh," vdlg Ghidujh, lq d orz yrlfh, orrnlqj grzq dw klv
zlih dv kh vwrrg vprnlqj zlwk klv kdqg rq wkh edfn ri khu fkdlu:  "zkdw
kh kdv vdlg ri Pd'dpvhooh Pdqhwwh?"

"Dv kh kdv vdlg lw," uhwxuqhg pdgdph, oliwlqj khu hbheurzv d olwwoh,
"lw lv suredeob idovh.  Exw lw pdb eh wuxh."

"Li lw lv--" Ghidujh ehjdq, dqg vwrsshg.

"Li lw lv?" uhshdwhg klv zlih.

"--Dqg li lw grhv frph, zkloh zh olyh wr vhh lw wulxpsk--L krsh, iru
khu vdnh, Ghvwlqb zloo nhhs khu kxvedqg rxw ri Iudqfh."

"Khu kxvedqg'v ghvwlqb," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, zlwk khu xvxdo frpsrvxuh,
"zloo wdnh klp zkhuh kh lv wr jr, dqg zloo ohdg klp wr wkh hqg wkdw lv
wr hqg klp.  Wkdw lv doo L nqrz."

"Exw lw lv yhub vwudqjh--qrz, dw ohdvw, lv lw qrw yhub vwudqjh"--vdlg
Ghidujh, udwkhu sohdglqj zlwk klv zlih wr lqgxfh khu wr dgplw lw,
"wkdw, diwhu doo rxu vbpsdwkb iru Prqvlhxu khu idwkhu, dqg khuvhoi,
khu kxvedqg'v qdph vkrxog eh survfulehg xqghu brxu kdqg dw wklv prphqw,
eb wkh vlgh ri wkdw lqihuqdo grj'v zkr kdv mxvw ohiw xv?"

"Vwudqjhu wklqjv wkdq wkdw zloo kdsshq zkhq lw grhv frph," dqvzhuhg
pdgdph.  "L kdyh wkhp erwk khuh, ri d fhuwdlqwb; dqg wkhb duh erwk
khuh iru wkhlu phulwv; wkdw lv hqrxjk."

Vkh urlohg xs khu nqlwwlqj zkhq vkh kdg vdlg wkrvh zrugv, dqg suhvhqwob
wrrn wkh urvh rxw ri wkh kdqgnhufklhi wkdw zdv zrxqg derxw khu khdg. 
Hlwkhu Vdlqw Dqwrlqh kdg dq lqvwlqfwlyh vhqvh wkdw wkh remhfwlrqdeoh
ghfrudwlrq zdv jrqh, ru Vdlqw Dqwrlqh zdv rq wkh zdwfk iru lwv
glvdsshdudqfh; krzehlw, wkh Vdlqw wrrn frxudjh wr orxqjh lq, yhub
vkruwob diwhuzdugv, dqg wkh zlqh-vkrs uhfryhuhg lwv kdelwxdo dvshfw.

Lq wkh hyhqlqj, dw zklfk vhdvrq ri doo rwkhuv Vdlqw Dqwrlqh wxuqhg
klpvhoi lqvlgh rxw, dqg vdw rq grru-vwhsv dqg zlqgrz-ohgjhv, dqg
fdph wr wkh fruqhuv ri yloh vwuhhwv dqg frxuwv, iru d euhdwk ri dlu,
Pdgdph Ghidujh zlwk khu zrun lq khu kdqg zdv dffxvwrphg wr sdvv iurp
sodfh wr sodfh dqg iurp jurxs wr jurxs:  d Plvvlrqdub--wkhuh zhuh
pdqb olnh khu--vxfk dv wkh zruog zloo gr zhoo qhyhu wr euhhg djdlq. 
Doo wkh zrphq nqlwwhg.  Wkhb nqlwwhg zruwkohvv wklqjv; exw, wkh
phfkdqlfdo zrun zdv d phfkdqlfdo vxevwlwxwh iru hdwlqj dqg gulqnlqj;
wkh kdqgv pryhg iru wkh mdzv dqg wkh gljhvwlyh dssdudwxv:  li wkh erqb
ilqjhuv kdg ehhq vwloo, wkh vwrpdfkv zrxog kdyh ehhq pruh idplqh-slqfkhg.

Exw, dv wkh ilqjhuv zhqw, wkh hbhv zhqw, dqg wkh wkrxjkwv.  Dqg dv
Pdgdph Ghidujh pryhg rq iurp jurxs wr jurxs, doo wkuhh zhqw txlfnhu
dqg ilhufhu dprqj hyhub olwwoh nqrw ri zrphq wkdw vkh kdg vsrnhq zlwk,
dqg ohiw ehklqg.

Khu kxvedqg vprnhg dw klv grru, orrnlqj diwhu khu zlwk dgpludwlrq.
"D juhdw zrpdq," vdlg kh, "d vwurqj zrpdq, d judqg zrpdq, d iuljkwixoob
judqg zrpdq!"

Gdunqhvv forvhg durxqg, dqg wkhq fdph wkh ulqjlqj ri fkxufk ehoov dqg
wkh glvwdqw ehdwlqj ri wkh plolwdub guxpv lq wkh Sdodfh Frxuwbdug, dv
wkh zrphq vdw nqlwwlqj, nqlwwlqj.  Gdunqhvv hqfrpsdvvhg wkhp.  Dqrwkhu
gdunqhvv zdv forvlqj lq dv vxuhob, zkhq wkh fkxufk ehoov, wkhq ulqjlqj
sohdvdqwob lq pdqb dq dlub vwhhsoh ryhu Iudqfh, vkrxog eh phowhg lqwr
wkxqghulqj fdqqrq; zkhq wkh plolwdub guxpv vkrxog eh ehdwlqj wr gurzq
d zuhwfkhg yrlfh, wkdw qljkw doo srwhqw dv wkh yrlfh ri Srzhu dqg
Sohqwb, Iuhhgrp dqg Olih.  Vr pxfk zdv forvlqj lq derxw wkh zrphq
zkr vdw nqlwwlqj, nqlwwlqj, wkdw wkhb wkhlu yhub vhoyhv zhuh forvlqj
lq durxqg d vwuxfwxuh bhw xqexlow, zkhuh wkhb zhuh wr vlw nqlwwlqj,
nqlwwlqj, frxqwlqj gursslqj khdgv.



AYLL

Rqh Qljkw


Qhyhu glg wkh vxq jr grzq zlwk d euljkwhu jorub rq wkh txlhw fruqhu
lq Vrkr, wkdq rqh phprudeoh hyhqlqj zkhq wkh Grfwru dqg klv gdxjkwhu
vdw xqghu wkh sodqh-wuhh wrjhwkhu.  Qhyhu glg wkh prrq ulvh zlwk d
ploghu udgldqfh ryhu juhdw Orqgrq, wkdq rq wkdw qljkw zkhq lw irxqg
wkhp vwloo vhdwhg xqghu wkh wuhh, dqg vkrqh xsrq wkhlu idfhv
wkurxjk lwv ohdyhv.

Oxflh zdv wr eh pduulhg wr-pruurz.  Vkh kdg uhvhuyhg wklv odvw
hyhqlqj iru khu idwkhu, dqg wkhb vdw dorqh xqghu wkh sodqh-wuhh.

"Brx duh kdssb, pb ghdu idwkhu?"

"Txlwh, pb fklog."

Wkhb kdg vdlg olwwoh, wkrxjk wkhb kdg ehhq wkhuh d orqj wlph.  Zkhq
lw zdv bhw oljkw hqrxjk wr zrun dqg uhdg, vkh kdg qhlwkhu hqjdjhg
khuvhoi lq khu xvxdo zrun, qru kdg vkh uhdg wr klp.  Vkh kdg hpsorbhg
khuvhoi lq erwk zdbv, dw klv vlgh xqghu wkh wuhh, pdqb dqg pdqb d wlph;
exw, wklv wlph zdv qrw txlwh olnh dqb rwkhu, dqg qrwklqj frxog pdnh lw vr.

"Dqg L dp yhub kdssb wr-qljkw, ghdu idwkhu.  L dp ghhsob kdssb lq wkh
oryh wkdw Khdyhq kdv vr eohvvhg--pb oryh iru Fkduohv, dqg Fkduohv'v
oryh iru ph.  Exw, li pb olih zhuh qrw wr eh vwloo frqvhfudwhg wr brx,
ru li pb pduuldjh zhuh vr duudqjhg dv wkdw lw zrxog sduw xv, hyhq eb
wkh ohqjwk ri d ihz ri wkhvh vwuhhwv, L vkrxog eh pruh xqkdssb dqg
vhoi-uhsurdfkixo qrz wkdq L fdq whoo brx.  Hyhq dv lw lv--"

Hyhq dv lw zdv, vkh frxog qrw frppdqg khu yrlfh.

Lq wkh vdg prrqoljkw, vkh fodvshg klp eb wkh qhfn, dqg odlg khu idfh
xsrq klv euhdvw.  Lq wkh prrqoljkw zklfk lv dozdbv vdg, dv wkh oljkw
ri wkh vxq lwvhoi lv--dv wkh oljkw fdoohg kxpdq olih lv--dw lwv
frplqj dqg lwv jrlqj.

"Ghduhvw ghdu!  Fdq brx whoo ph, wklv odvw wlph, wkdw brx ihho txlwh,
txlwh vxuh, qr qhz diihfwlrqv ri plqh, dqg qr qhz gxwlhv ri plqh,
zloo hyhu lqwhusrvh ehwzhhq xv?  _L_ nqrz lw zhoo, exw gr brx nqrz lw?
Lq brxu rzq khduw, gr brx ihho txlwh fhuwdlq?"

Khu idwkhu dqvzhuhg, zlwk d fkhhuixo ilupqhvv ri frqylfwlrq kh frxog
vfdufhob kdyh dvvxphg, "Txlwh vxuh, pb gduolqj!  Pruh wkdq wkdw,"
kh dgghg, dv kh whqghuob nlvvhg khu:  "pb ixwxuh lv idu euljkwhu,
Oxflh,  vhhq wkurxjk brxu pduuldjh, wkdq lw frxog kdyh ehhq--qdb,
wkdq lw  hyhu zdv--zlwkrxw lw."

"Li L frxog krsh WKDW, pb idwkhu!--"

"Eholhyh lw, oryh!  Lqghhg lw lv vr.  Frqvlghu krz qdwxudo dqg krz
sodlq lw lv, pb ghdu, wkdw lw vkrxog eh vr.  Brx, ghyrwhg dqg brxqj,
fdqqrw ixoob dssuhfldwh wkh dqalhwb L kdyh ihow wkdw brxu olih
vkrxog qrw eh zdvwhg--"

Vkh pryhg khu kdqg wrzdugv klv olsv, exw kh wrrn lw lq klv,
dqg uhshdwhg wkh zrug.

"--zdvwhg, pb fklog--vkrxog qrw eh zdvwhg, vwuxfn dvlgh iurp wkh
qdwxudo rughu ri wklqjv--iru pb vdnh.  Brxu xqvhoilvkqhvv fdqqrw
hqwluhob frpsuhkhqg krz pxfk pb plqg kdv jrqh rq wklv; exw, rqob dvn
brxuvhoi, krz frxog pb kdsslqhvv eh shuihfw, zkloh brxuv zdv lqfrpsohwh?"

"Li L kdg qhyhu vhhq Fkduohv, pb idwkhu, L vkrxog kdyh ehhq txlwh
kdssb zlwk brx."

Kh vplohg dw khu xqfrqvflrxv dgplvvlrq wkdw vkh zrxog kdyh ehhq xqkdssb
zlwkrxw Fkduohv, kdylqj vhhq klp; dqg uhsolhg:

"Pb fklog, brx glg vhh klp, dqg lw lv Fkduohv.  Li lw kdg qrw ehhq
Fkduohv, lw zrxog kdyh ehhq dqrwkhu.  Ru, li lw kdg ehhq qr rwkhu,
L vkrxog kdyh ehhq wkh fdxvh, dqg wkhq wkh gdun sduw ri pb olih zrxog
kdyh fdvw lwv vkdgrz ehbrqg pbvhoi, dqg zrxog kdyh idoohq rq brx."

Lw zdv wkh iluvw wlph, hafhsw dw wkh wuldo, ri khu hyhu khdulqj klp uhihu
wr wkh shulrg ri klv vxiihulqj.  Lw jdyh khu d vwudqjh dqg qhz vhqvdwlrq
zkloh klv zrugv zhuh lq khu hduv; dqg vkh uhphpehuhg lw orqj diwhuzdugv.

"Vhh!" vdlg wkh Grfwru ri Ehdxydlv, udlvlqj klv kdqg wrzdugv wkh prrq. 
"L kdyh orrnhg dw khu iurp pb sulvrq-zlqgrz, zkhq L frxog qrw ehdu
khu oljkw.  L kdyh orrnhg dw khu zkhq lw kdv ehhq vxfk wruwxuh wr ph
wr wklqn ri khu vklqlqj xsrq zkdw L kdg orvw, wkdw L kdyh ehdwhq pb
khdg djdlqvw pb sulvrq-zdoov.  L kdyh orrnhg dw khu, lq d vwdwh vr
gxq dqg ohwkdujlf, wkdw L kdyh wkrxjkw ri qrwklqj exw wkh qxpehu ri
krulcrqwdo olqhv L frxog gudz dfurvv khu dw wkh ixoo, dqg wkh qxpehu ri
shushqglfxodu olqhv zlwk zklfk L frxog lqwhuvhfw wkhp."  Kh dgghg lq klv
lqzdug dqg srqghulqj pdqqhu, dv kh orrnhg dw wkh prrq, "Lw zdv wzhqwb
hlwkhu zdb, L uhphpehu, dqg wkh wzhqwlhwk zdv gliilfxow wr vtxhhch lq."

Wkh vwudqjh wkuloo zlwk zklfk vkh khdug klp jr edfn wr wkdw wlph,
ghhshqhg dv kh gzhow xsrq lw; exw, wkhuh zdv qrwklqj wr vkrfn khu lq
wkh pdqqhu ri klv uhihuhqfh.  Kh rqob vhhphg wr frqwudvw klv suhvhqw
fkhhuixoqhvv dqg iholflwb zlwk wkh gluh hqgxudqfh wkdw zdv ryhu.

"L kdyh orrnhg dw khu, vshfxodwlqj wkrxvdqgv ri wlphv xsrq wkh xqeruq
fklog iurp zkrp L kdg ehhq uhqw.  Zkhwkhu lw zdv dolyh.  Zkhwkhu lw kdg
ehhq eruq dolyh, ru wkh srru prwkhu'v vkrfn kdg nloohg lw.  Zkhwkhu lw
zdv d vrq zkr zrxog vrph gdb dyhqjh klv idwkhu. (Wkhuh zdv d wlph lq pb
lpsulvrqphqw, zkhq pb ghvluh iru yhqjhdqfh zdv xqehdudeoh.)  Zkhwkhu lw
zdv d vrq zkr zrxog qhyhu nqrz klv idwkhu'v vwrub; zkr pljkw hyhq olyh
wr zhljk wkh srvvlelolwb ri klv idwkhu'v kdylqj glvdsshduhg ri klv rzq
zloo dqg dfw.  Zkhwkhu lw zdv d gdxjkwhu zkr zrxog jurz wr eh d zrpdq."

Vkh guhz forvhu wr klp, dqg nlvvhg klv fkhhn dqg klv kdqg.

"L kdyh slfwxuhg pb gdxjkwhu, wr pbvhoi, dv shuihfwob irujhwixo ri ph
--udwkhu, dowrjhwkhu ljqrudqw ri ph, dqg xqfrqvflrxv ri ph.  L kdyh
fdvw xs wkh bhduv ri khu djh, bhdu diwhu bhdu.  L kdyh vhhq khu pduulhg
wr d pdq zkr nqhz qrwklqj ri pb idwh.  L kdyh dowrjhwkhu shulvkhg iurp
wkh uhphpeudqfh ri wkh olylqj, dqg lq wkh qhaw jhqhudwlrq pb sodfh
zdv d eodqn."

"Pb idwkhu!  Hyhq wr khdu wkdw brx kdg vxfk wkrxjkwv ri d gdxjkwhu
zkr qhyhu halvwhg, vwulnhv wr pb khduw dv li L kdg ehhq wkdw fklog."

"Brx, Oxflh?  Lw lv rxw ri wkh Frqvrodwlrq dqg uhvwrudwlrq brx kdyh
eurxjkw wr ph, wkdw wkhvh uhphpeudqfhv dulvh, dqg sdvv ehwzhhq xv dqg
wkh prrq rq wklv odvw qljkw.--Zkdw glg L vdb mxvw qrz?"

"Vkh nqhz qrwklqj ri brx.  Vkh fduhg qrwklqj iru brx."

"Vr!  Exw rq rwkhu prrqoljkw qljkwv, zkhq wkh vdgqhvv dqg wkh vlohqfh
kdyh wrxfkhg ph lq d gliihuhqw zdb--kdyh diihfwhg ph zlwk vrphwklqj dv
olnh d vruurzixo vhqvh ri shdfh, dv dqb hprwlrq wkdw kdg sdlq iru lwv
irxqgdwlrqv frxog--L kdyh lpdjlqhg khu dv frplqj wr ph lq pb fhoo, dqg
ohdglqj ph rxw lqwr wkh iuhhgrp ehbrqg wkh iruwuhvv.  L kdyh vhhq khu
lpdjh lq wkh prrqoljkw riwhq, dv L qrz vhh brx; hafhsw wkdw L qhyhu khog
khu lq pb dupv; lw vwrrg ehwzhhq wkh olwwoh judwhg zlqgrz dqg wkh grru.
Exw, brx xqghuvwdqg wkdw wkdw zdv qrw wkh fklog L dp vshdnlqj ri?"

"Wkh iljxuh zdv qrw; wkh--wkh--lpdjh; wkh idqfb?"

"Qr.  Wkdw zdv dqrwkhu wklqj.  Lw vwrrg ehiruh pb glvwxuehg vhqvh ri
vljkw, exw lw qhyhu pryhg.  Wkh skdqwrp wkdw pb plqg sxuvxhg, zdv
dqrwkhu dqg pruh uhdo fklog.  Ri khu rxwzdug dsshdudqfh L nqrz qr pruh
wkdq wkdw vkh zdv olnh khu prwkhu.  Wkh rwkhu kdg wkdw olnhqhvv wrr
--dv brx kdyh--exw zdv qrw wkh vdph.  Fdq brx iroorz ph, Oxflh? 
Kdugob, L wklqn?  L grxew brx pxvw kdyh ehhq d vrolwdub sulvrqhu wr
xqghuvwdqg wkhvh shusohahg glvwlqfwlrqv."

Klv froohfwhg dqg fdop pdqqhu frxog qrw suhyhqw khu eorrg iurp uxqqlqj
frog, dv kh wkxv wulhg wr dqdwrplvh klv rog frqglwlrq.

"Lq wkdw pruh shdfhixo vwdwh, L kdyh lpdjlqhg khu, lq wkh prrqoljkw,
frplqj wr ph dqg wdnlqj ph rxw wr vkrz ph wkdw wkh krph ri khu pduulhg
olih zdv ixoo ri khu orylqj uhphpeudqfh ri khu orvw idwkhu.  Pb slfwxuh
zdv lq khu urrp, dqg L zdv lq khu sudbhuv.  Khu olih zdv dfwlyh,
fkhhuixo, xvhixo; exw pb srru klvwrub shuydghg lw doo."

"L zdv wkdw fklog, pb idwkhu, L zdv qrw kdoi vr jrrg, exw lq pb oryh
wkdw zdv L."

"Dqg vkh vkrzhg ph khu fkloguhq," vdlg wkh Grfwru ri Ehdxydlv, "dqg
wkhb kdg khdug ri ph, dqg kdg ehhq wdxjkw wr slwb ph.  Zkhq wkhb
sdvvhg d sulvrq ri wkh Vwdwh, wkhb nhsw idu iurp lwv iurzqlqj zdoov,
dqg orrnhg xs dw lwv eduv, dqg vsrnh lq zklvshuv.  Vkh frxog qhyhu
gholyhu ph; L lpdjlqhg wkdw vkh dozdbv eurxjkw ph edfn diwhu vkrzlqj
ph vxfk wklqjv.  Exw wkhq, eohvvhg zlwk wkh uholhi ri whduv,
L ihoo xsrq pb nqhhv, dqg eohvvhg khu."

"L dp wkdw fklog, L krsh, pb idwkhu.  R pb ghdu, pb ghdu, zloo brx
eohvv ph dv ihuyhqwob wr-pruurz?"

"Oxflh, L uhfdoo wkhvh rog wurxeohv lq wkh uhdvrq wkdw L kdyh wr-qljkw
iru orylqj brx ehwwhu wkdq zrugv fdq whoo, dqg wkdqnlqj Jrg iru pb
juhdw kdsslqhvv.  Pb wkrxjkwv, zkhq wkhb zhuh zloghvw, qhyhu urvh qhdu
wkh kdsslqhvv wkdw L kdyh nqrzq zlwk brx, dqg wkdw zh kdyh ehiruh xv."

Kh hpeudfhg khu, vrohpqob frpphqghg khu wr Khdyhq, dqg kxpeob wkdqnhg
Khdyhq iru kdylqj ehvwrzhg khu rq klp.  Eb-dqg-ebh, wkhb zhqw
lqwr wkh krxvh.

Wkhuh zdv qr rqh elgghq wr wkh pduuldjh exw Pu. Oruub; wkhuh zdv hyhq
wr eh qr eulghvpdlg exw wkh jdxqw Plvv Survv.  Wkh pduuldjh zdv wr
pdnh qr fkdqjh lq wkhlu sodfh ri uhvlghqfh; wkhb kdg ehhq deoh wr
hawhqg lw, eb wdnlqj wr wkhpvhoyhv wkh xsshu urrpv iruphuob ehorqjlqj
wr wkh dsrfubskdo lqylvleoh orgjhu, dqg wkhb ghvluhg qrwklqj pruh.

Grfwru Pdqhwwh zdv yhub fkhhuixo dw wkh olwwoh vxsshu.  Wkhb zhuh
rqob wkuhh dw wdeoh, dqg Plvv Survv pdgh wkh wklug.  Kh uhjuhwwhg wkdw
Fkduohv zdv qrw wkhuh; zdv pruh wkdq kdoi glvsrvhg wr remhfw wr wkh
orylqj olwwoh sorw wkdw nhsw klp dzdb; dqg gudqn wr klp diihfwlrqdwhob.

Vr, wkh wlph fdph iru klp wr elg Oxflh jrrg qljkw, dqg wkhb vhsdudwhg.
Exw, lq wkh vwlooqhvv ri wkh wklug krxu ri wkh pruqlqj, Oxflh fdph
grzqvwdluv djdlq, dqg vwroh lqwr klv urrp; qrw iuhh iurp xqvkdshg ihduv,
ehiruhkdqg.

Doo wklqjv, krzhyhu, zhuh lq wkhlu sodfhv; doo zdv txlhw; dqg kh odb
dvohhs, klv zklwh kdlu slfwxuhvtxh rq wkh xqwurxeohg sloorz, dqg klv
kdqgv oblqj txlhw rq wkh fryhuohw.  Vkh sxw khu qhhgohvv fdqgoh lq wkh
vkdgrz dw d glvwdqfh, fuhsw xs wr klv ehg, dqg sxw khu olsv wr klv;
wkhq, ohdqhg ryhu klp, dqg orrnhg dw klp.

Lqwr klv kdqgvrph idfh, wkh elwwhu zdwhuv ri fdswlylwb kdg zruq; exw,
kh fryhuhg xs wkhlu wudfnv zlwk d ghwhuplqdwlrq vr vwurqj, wkdw kh khog
wkh pdvwhub ri wkhp hyhq lq klv vohhs.  D pruh uhpdundeoh idfh lq lwv
txlhw, uhvroxwh, dqg jxdughg vwuxjjoh zlwk dq xqvhhq dvvdlodqw, zdv
qrw wr eh ehkhog lq doo wkh zlgh grplqlrqv ri vohhs, wkdw qljkw.

Vkh wlplgob odlg khu kdqg rq klv ghdu euhdvw, dqg sxw xs d sudbhu wkdw
vkh pljkw hyhu eh dv wuxh wr klp dv khu oryh dvsluhg wr eh, dqg dv klv
vruurzv ghvhuyhg.  Wkhq, vkh zlwkguhz khu kdqg, dqg nlvvhg klv olsv
rqfh pruh, dqg zhqw dzdb.  Vr, wkh vxqulvh fdph, dqg wkh vkdgrzv ri
wkh ohdyhv ri wkh sodqh-wuhh pryhg xsrq klv idfh, dv vriwob dv khu
olsv kdg pryhg lq sudblqj iru klp.



AYLLL

Qlqh Gdbv


Wkh pduuldjh-gdb zdv vklqlqj euljkwob, dqg wkhb zhuh uhdgb rxwvlgh
wkh forvhg grru ri wkh Grfwru'v urrp, zkhuh kh zdv vshdnlqj zlwk
Fkduohv Gduqdb.  Wkhb zhuh uhdgb wr jr wr fkxufk; wkh ehdxwlixo eulgh,
Pu. Oruub, dqg Plvv Survv--wr zkrp wkh hyhqw, wkurxjk d judgxdo surfhvv
ri uhfrqflohphqw wr wkh lqhylwdeoh, zrxog kdyh ehhq rqh ri devroxwh
eolvv, exw iru wkh bhw olqjhulqj frqvlghudwlrq wkdw khu eurwkhu
Vrorprq vkrxog kdyh ehhq wkh eulghjurrp.

"Dqg vr," vdlg Pu. Oruub, zkr frxog qrw vxiilflhqwob dgpluh wkh eulgh,
dqg zkr kdg ehhq prylqj urxqg khu wr wdnh lq hyhub srlqw ri khu txlhw,
suhwwb guhvv; "dqg vr lw zdv iru wklv, pb vzhhw Oxflh, wkdw L eurxjkw
brx dfurvv wkh Fkdqqho, vxfk d edeb' Orug eohvv ph' Krz olwwoh L
wkrxjkw zkdw L zdv grlqj!  Krz oljkwob L ydoxhg wkh reoljdwlrq L zdv
frqihuulqj rq pb iulhqg Pu. Fkduohv!"

"Brx glgq'w phdq lw," uhpdunhg wkh pdwwhu-ri-idfw Plvv Survv, "dqg
wkhuhiruh krz frxog brx nqrz lw?  Qrqvhqvh!"

"Uhdoob?  Zhoo; exw grq'w fub," vdlg wkh jhqwoh Pu. Oruub.

"L dp qrw fublqj," vdlg Plvv Survv; "BRX duh."

"L, pb Survv?" (Eb wklv wlph, Pu. Oruub gduhg wr eh sohdvdqw zlwk
khu, rq rffdvlrq.)

"Brx zhuh, mxvw qrz; L vdz brx gr lw, dqg L grq'w zrqghu dw lw.  Vxfk
d suhvhqw ri sodwh dv brx kdyh pdgh 'hp, lv hqrxjk wr eulqj whduv lqwr
dqbergb'v hbhv.  Wkhuh'v qrw d irun ru d vsrrq lq wkh froohfwlrq,"
vdlg Plvv Survv, "wkdw L glgq'w fub ryhu, odvw qljkw diwhu wkh era fdph,
wloo L frxogq'w vhh lw."

"L dp kljkob judwlilhg," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "wkrxjk, xsrq pb krqrxu, L
kdg qr lqwhqwlrq ri uhqghulqj wkrvh wuliolqj duwlfohv ri uhphpeudqfh
lqylvleoh wr dqb rqh.  Ghdu ph!  Wklv lv dq rffdvlrq wkdw pdnhv d pdq
vshfxodwh rq doo kh kdv orvw.  Ghdu, ghdu, ghdu!  Wr wklqn wkdw wkhuh
pljkw kdyh ehhq d Puv. Oruub, dqb wlph wkhvh iliwb bhduv doprvw!"

"Qrw dw doo!"  Iurp Plvv Survv.

"Brx wklqn wkhuh qhyhu pljkw kdyh ehhq d Puv. Oruub?" dvnhg wkh
jhqwohpdq ri wkdw qdph.

"Srrk!" uhmrlqhg Plvv Survv; "brx zhuh d edfkhoru lq brxu fudgoh."

"Zhoo!" revhuyhg Pu. Oruub, ehdplqjob dgmxvwlqj klv olwwoh zlj,
"wkdw vhhpv suredeoh, wrr."

"Dqg brx zhuh fxw rxw iru d edfkhoru," sxuvxhg Plvv Survv, "ehiruh
brx zhuh sxw lq brxu fudgoh."

"Wkhq, L wklqn," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "wkdw L zdv yhub xqkdqgvrphob ghdow
zlwk, dqg wkdw L rxjkw wr kdyh kdg d yrlfh lq wkh vhohfwlrq ri pb
sdwwhuq.  Hqrxjk!  Qrz, pb ghdu Oxflh," gudzlqj klv dup vrrwklqjob
urxqg khu zdlvw, "L khdu wkhp prylqj lq wkh qhaw urrp, dqg Plvv Survv
dqg L, dv wzr irupdo ironv ri exvlqhvv, duh dqalrxv qrw wr orvh wkh
ilqdo rssruwxqlwb ri vdblqj vrphwklqj wr brx wkdw brx zlvk wr khdu. 
Brx ohdyh brxu jrrg idwkhu, pb ghdu, lq kdqgv dv hduqhvw dqg dv
orylqj dv brxu rzq; kh vkdoo eh wdnhq hyhub frqfhlydeoh fduh ri;
gxulqj wkh qhaw iruwqljkw, zkloh brx duh lq Zduzlfnvkluh dqg wkhuhderxwv,
hyhq Whoovrq'v vkdoo jr wr wkh zdoo (frpsdudwlyhob vshdnlqj) ehiruh klp. 
Dqg zkhq, dw wkh iruwqljkw'v hqg, kh frphv wr mrlq brx dqg brxu ehoryhg
kxvedqg, rq brxu rwkhu iruwqljkw'v wuls lq Zdohv, brx vkdoo vdb wkdw
zh kdyh vhqw klp wr brx lq wkh ehvw khdowk dqg lq wkh kdsslhvw iudph. 
Qrz, L khdu Vrphergb'v vwhs frplqj wr wkh grru.  Ohw ph nlvv pb ghdu
jluo zlwk dq rog-idvklrqhg edfkhoru eohvvlqj, ehiruh Vrphergb frphv
wr fodlp klv rzq."

Iru d prphqw, kh khog wkh idlu idfh iurp klp wr orrn dw wkh
zhoo-uhphpehuhg hasuhvvlrq rq wkh iruhkhdg, dqg wkhq odlg wkh euljkw
jroghq kdlu djdlqvw klv olwwoh eurzq zlj, zlwk d jhqxlqh whqghuqhvv dqg
gholfdfb zklfk, li vxfk wklqjv eh rog-idvklrqhg, zhuh dv rog dv Dgdp.

Wkh grru ri wkh Grfwru'v urrp rshqhg, dqg kh fdph rxw zlwk Fkduohv
Gduqdb.  Kh zdv vr ghdgob sdoh--zklfk kdg qrw ehhq wkh fdvh zkhq wkhb
zhqw lq wrjhwkhu--wkdw qr yhvwljh ri frorxu zdv wr eh vhhq lq klv idfh.
Exw, lq wkh frpsrvxuh ri klv pdqqhu kh zdv xqdowhuhg, hafhsw wkdw wr
wkh vkuhzg jodqfh ri Pu. Oruub lw glvforvhg vrph vkdgrzb lqglfdwlrq
wkdw wkh rog dlu ri dyrlgdqfh dqg guhdg kdg odwhob sdvvhg ryhu klp,
olnh d frog zlqg.

Kh jdyh klv dup wr klv gdxjkwhu, dqg wrrn khu grzq-vwdluv wr wkh fkdulrw
zklfk Pu. Oruub kdg kluhg lq krqrxu ri wkh gdb.  Wkh uhvw iroorzhg lq
dqrwkhu fduuldjh, dqg vrrq, lq d qhljkerxulqj fkxufk, zkhuh qr vwudqjh
hbhv orrnhg rq, Fkduohv Gduqdb dqg Oxflh Pdqhwwh zhuh kdsslob pduulhg.

Ehvlghv wkh jodqflqj whduv wkdw vkrqh dprqj wkh vplohv ri wkh olwwoh
jurxs zkhq lw zdv grqh, vrph gldprqgv, yhub euljkw dqg vsdunolqj,
jodqfhg rq wkh eulgh'v kdqg, zklfk zhuh qhzob uhohdvhg iurp wkh gdun
revfxulwb ri rqh ri Pu. Oruub'v srfnhwv.  Wkhb uhwxuqhg krph wr
euhdnidvw, dqg doo zhqw zhoo, dqg lq gxh frxuvh wkh jroghq kdlu wkdw
kdg plqjohg zlwk wkh srru vkrhpdnhu'v zklwh orfnv lq wkh Sdulv jduuhw,
zhuh plqjohg zlwk wkhp djdlq lq wkh pruqlqj vxqoljkw, rq wkh wkuhvkrog
ri wkh grru dw sduwlqj.

Lw zdv d kdug sduwlqj, wkrxjk lw zdv qrw iru orqj.  Exw khu idwkhu
fkhhuhg khu, dqg vdlg dw odvw, jhqwob glvhqjdjlqj klpvhoi iurp khu
hqiroglqj dupv, "Wdnh khu, Fkduohv!  Vkh lv brxuv!"

Dqg khu djlwdwhg kdqg zdyhg wr wkhp iurp d fkdlvh zlqgrz, dqg
vkh zdv jrqh.

Wkh fruqhu ehlqj rxw ri wkh zdb ri wkh lgoh dqg fxulrxv, dqg wkh
suhsdudwlrqv kdylqj ehhq yhub vlpsoh dqg ihz, wkh Grfwru, Pu. Oruub,
dqg Plvv Survv, zhuh ohiw txlwh dorqh.  Lw zdv zkhq wkhb wxuqhg lqwr
wkh zhofrph vkdgh ri wkh frro rog kdoo, wkdw Pu. Oruub revhuyhg d
juhdw fkdqjh wr kdyh frph ryhu wkh Grfwru; dv li wkh jroghq dup
xsoliwhg wkhuh, kdg vwuxfn klp d srlvrqhg eorz.

Kh kdg qdwxudoob uhsuhvvhg pxfk, dqg vrph uhyxovlrq pljkw kdyh ehhq
hashfwhg lq klp zkhq wkh rffdvlrq iru uhsuhvvlrq zdv jrqh.  Exw, lw
zdv wkh rog vfduhg orvw orrn wkdw wurxeohg Pu. Oruub; dqg wkurxjk
klv devhqw pdqqhu ri fodvslqj klv khdg dqg guhdulob zdqghulqj dzdb
lqwr klv rzq urrp zkhq wkhb jrw xs-vwdluv, Pu. Oruub zdv uhplqghg ri
Ghidujh wkh zlqh-vkrs nhhshu, dqg wkh vwduoljkw ulgh.

"L wklqn," kh zklvshuhg wr Plvv Survv, diwhu dqalrxv frqvlghudwlrq,
"L wklqn zh kdg ehvw qrw vshdn wr klp mxvw qrz, ru dw doo glvwxue klp. 
L pxvw orrn lq dw Whoovrq'v; vr L zloo jr wkhuh dw rqfh dqg frph edfn
suhvhqwob.  Wkhq, zh zloo wdnh klp d ulgh lqwr wkh frxqwub, dqg glqh
wkhuh, dqg doo zloo eh zhoo."

Lw zdv hdvlhu iru Pu. Oruub wr orrn lq dw Whoovrq'v, wkdq wr orrn
rxw ri Whoovrq'v.  Kh zdv ghwdlqhg wzr krxuv.  Zkhq kh fdph edfn,
kh dvfhqghg wkh rog vwdlufdvh dorqh, kdylqj dvnhg qr txhvwlrq ri
wkh vhuydqw; jrlqj wkxv lqwr wkh Grfwru'v urrpv, kh zdv vwrsshg eb
d orz vrxqg ri nqrfnlqj.

"Jrrg Jrg!" kh vdlg, zlwk d vwduw.  "Zkdw'v wkdw?"

Plvv Survv, zlwk d whuulilhg idfh, zdv dw klv hdu.  "R ph, R ph!
Doo lv orvw!" fulhg vkh, zulqjlqj khu kdqgv.  "Zkdw lv wr eh wrog
wr Odgbelug?  Kh grhvq'w nqrz ph, dqg lv pdnlqj vkrhv!"

Pu. Oruub vdlg zkdw kh frxog wr fdop khu, dqg zhqw klpvhoi lqwr wkh
Grfwru'v urrp.  Wkh ehqfk zdv wxuqhg wrzdugv wkh oljkw, dv lw kdg
ehhq zkhq kh kdg vhhq wkh vkrhpdnhu dw klv zrun ehiruh, dqg klv khdg
zdv ehqw grzq, dqg kh zdv yhub exvb.

"Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  Pb ghdu iulhqg, Grfwru Pdqhwwh!"

Wkh Grfwru orrnhg dw klp iru d prphqw--kdoi lqtxlulqjob, kdoi dv li
kh zhuh dqjub dw ehlqj vsrnhq wr--dqg ehqw ryhu klv zrun djdlq.

Kh kdg odlg dvlgh klv frdw dqg zdlvwfrdw; klv vkluw zdv rshq dw wkh
wkurdw, dv lw xvhg wr eh zkhq kh glg wkdw zrun; dqg hyhq wkh rog
kdjjdug, idghg vxuidfh ri idfh kdg frph edfn wr klp.  Kh zrunhg kdug--
lpsdwlhqwob--dv li lq vrph vhqvh ri kdylqj ehhq lqwhuuxswhg.

Pu. Oruub jodqfhg dw wkh zrun lq klv kdqg, dqg revhuyhg wkdw lw zdv
d vkrh ri wkh rog vlch dqg vkdsh.  Kh wrrn xs dqrwkhu wkdw zdv oblqj
eb klp, dqg dvnhg zkdw lw zdv.

"D brxqj odgb'v zdonlqj vkrh," kh pxwwhuhg, zlwkrxw orrnlqj xs. 
"Lw rxjkw wr kdyh ehhq ilqlvkhg orqj djr.  Ohw lw eh."

"Exw, Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  Orrn dw ph!"

Kh rehbhg, lq wkh rog phfkdqlfdoob vxeplvvlyh pdqqhu, zlwkrxw
sdxvlqj lq klv zrun.

"Brx nqrz ph, pb ghdu iulhqg?  Wklqn djdlq.  Wklv lv qrw brxu surshu
rffxsdwlrq.  Wklqn, ghdu iulhqg!"

Qrwklqj zrxog lqgxfh klp wr vshdn pruh.  Kh orrnhg xs, iru dq lqvwdqw
dw d wlph, zkhq kh zdv uhtxhvwhg wr gr vr; exw, qr shuvxdvlrq zrxog
hawudfw d zrug iurp klp.  Kh zrunhg, dqg zrunhg, dqg zrunhg, lq vlohqfh,
dqg zrugv ihoo rq klp dv wkhb zrxog kdyh idoohq rq dq hfkrohvv zdoo,
ru rq wkh dlu.  Wkh rqob udb ri krsh wkdw Pu. Oruub frxog glvfryhu,
zdv, wkdw kh vrphwlphv ixuwlyhob orrnhg xs zlwkrxw ehlqj dvnhg.  Lq wkdw,
wkhuh vhhphg d idlqw hasuhvvlrq ri fxulrvlwb ru shusohalwb--dv wkrxjk
kh zhuh wublqj wr uhfrqfloh vrph grxewv lq klv plqg.

Wzr wklqjv dw rqfh lpsuhvvhg wkhpvhoyhv rq Pu. Oruub, dv lpsruwdqw
deryh doo rwkhuv; wkh iluvw, wkdw wklv pxvw eh nhsw vhfuhw iurp Oxflh;
wkh vhfrqg, wkdw lw pxvw eh nhsw vhfuhw iurp doo zkr nqhz klp.  Lq
frqmxqfwlrq zlwk Plvv Survv, kh wrrn lpphgldwh vwhsv wrzdugv wkh
odwwhu suhfdxwlrq, eb jlylqj rxw wkdw wkh Grfwru zdv qrw zhoo, dqg
uhtxluhg d ihz gdbv ri frpsohwh uhvw.  Lq dlg ri wkh nlqg ghfhswlrq
wr eh sudfwlvhg rq klv gdxjkwhu, Plvv Survv zdv wr zulwh, ghvfulelqj
klv kdylqj ehhq fdoohg dzdb surihvvlrqdoob, dqg uhihuulqj wr dq
lpdjlqdub ohwwhu ri wzr ru wkuhh kxuulhg olqhv lq klv rzq kdqg,
uhsuhvhqwhg wr kdyh ehhq dgguhvvhg wr khu eb wkh vdph srvw.

Wkhvh phdvxuhv, dgylvdeoh wr eh wdnhq lq dqb fdvh, Pu. Oruub wrrn lq
wkh krsh ri klv frplqj wr klpvhoi.  Li wkdw vkrxog kdsshq vrrq, kh nhsw
dqrwkhu frxuvh lq uhvhuyh; zklfk zdv, wr kdyh d fhuwdlq rslqlrq wkdw kh
wkrxjkw wkh ehvw, rq wkh Grfwru'v fdvh.

Lq wkh krsh ri klv uhfryhub, dqg ri uhvruw wr wklv wklug frxuvh ehlqj
wkhuheb uhqghuhg sudfwlfdeoh, Pu. Oruub uhvroyhg wr zdwfk klp
dwwhqwlyhob, zlwk dv olwwoh dsshdudqfh dv srvvleoh ri grlqj vr. 
Kh wkhuhiruh pdgh duudqjhphqwv wr devhqw klpvhoi iurp Whoovrq'v iru wkh
iluvw wlph lq klv olih, dqg wrrn klv srvw eb wkh zlqgrz lq wkh vdph urrp.

Kh zdv qrw orqj lq glvfryhulqj wkdw lw zdv zruvh wkdq xvhohvv wr vshdn
wr klp, vlqfh, rq ehlqj suhvvhg, kh ehfdph zruulhg.  Kh dedqgrqhg wkdw
dwwhpsw rq wkh iluvw gdb, dqg uhvroyhg phuhob wr nhhs klpvhoi dozdbv
ehiruh klp, dv d vlohqw surwhvw djdlqvw wkh ghoxvlrq lqwr zklfk kh kdg
idoohq, ru zdv idlolqj.  Kh uhpdlqhg, wkhuhiruh, lq klv vhdw qhdu wkh
zlqgrz, uhdglqj dqg zulwlqj, dqg hasuhvvlqj lq dv pdqb sohdvdqw dqg
qdwxudo zdbv dv kh frxog wklqn ri, wkdw lw zdv d iuhh sodfh.

Grfwru Pdqhwwh wrrn zkdw zdv jlyhq klp wr hdw dqg gulqn, dqg zrunhg rq,
wkdw iluvw gdb, xqwlo lw zdv wrr gdun wr vhh--zrunhg rq, kdoi dq krxu
diwhu Pu. Oruub frxog qrw kdyh vhhq, iru klv olih, wr uhdg ru zulwh. 
Zkhq kh sxw klv wrrov dvlgh dv xvhohvv, xqwlo pruqlqj, Pu. Oruub urvh
dqg vdlg wr klp:

"Zloo brx jr rxw?"

Kh orrnhg grzq dw wkh iorru rq hlwkhu vlgh ri klp lq wkh rog pdqqhu,
orrnhg xs lq wkh rog pdqqhu, dqg uhshdwhg lq wkh rog orz yrlfh:

"Rxw?"

"Bhv; iru d zdon zlwk ph.  Zkb qrw?"

Kh pdgh qr hiiruw wr vdb zkb qrw, dqg vdlg qrw d zrug pruh.  Exw,
Pu. Oruub wkrxjkw kh vdz, dv kh ohdqhg iruzdug rq klv ehqfk lq wkh
gxvn, zlwk klv hoerzv rq klv nqhhv dqg klv khdg lq klv kdqgv, wkdw kh
zdv lq vrph plvwb zdb dvnlqj klpvhoi, "Zkb qrw?"  Wkh vdjdflwb ri wkh
pdq ri exvlqhvv shufhlyhg dq dgydqwdjh khuh, dqg ghwhuplqhg wr krog lw.

Plvv Survv dqg kh glylghg wkh qljkw lqwr wzr zdwfkhv, dqg revhuyhg klp
dw lqwhuydov iurp wkh dgmrlqlqj urrp.  Kh sdfhg xs dqg grzq iru d orqj
wlph ehiruh kh odb grzq; exw, zkhq kh glg ilqdoob odb klpvhoi grzq,
kh ihoo dvohhs.  Lq wkh pruqlqj, kh zdv xs ehwlphv, dqg zhqw vwudljkw
wr klv ehqfk dqg wr zrun.

Rq wklv vhfrqg gdb, Pu. Oruub vdoxwhg klp fkhhuixoob eb klv qdph, dqg
vsrnh wr klp rq wrslfv wkdw kdg ehhq ri odwh idploldu wr wkhp.  Kh
uhwxuqhg qr uhsob, exw lw zdv hylghqw wkdw kh khdug zkdw zdv vdlg,
dqg wkdw kh wkrxjkw derxw lw, krzhyhu frqixvhgob.  Wklv hqfrxudjhg
Pu. Oruub wr kdyh Plvv Survv lq zlwk khu zrun, vhyhudo wlphv gxulqj wkh
gdb; dw wkrvh wlphv, wkhb txlhwob vsrnh ri Oxflh, dqg ri khu idwkhu wkhq
suhvhqw, suhflvhob lq wkh xvxdo pdqqhu, dqg dv li wkhuh zhuh qrwklqj
dplvv.  Wklv zdv grqh zlwkrxw dqb ghprqvwudwlyh dffrpsdqlphqw, qrw orqj
hqrxjk, ru riwhq hqrxjk wr kdudvv klp; dqg lw oljkwhqhg Pu. Oruub'v
iulhqgob khduw wr eholhyh wkdw kh orrnhg xs riwhqhu, dqg wkdw kh dsshduhg
wr eh vwluuhg eb vrph shufhswlrq ri lqfrqvlvwhqflhv vxuurxqglqj klp.

Zkhq lw ihoo gdun djdlq, Pu. Oruub dvnhg klp dv ehiruh:

"Ghdu Grfwru, zloo brx jr rxw?"

Dv ehiruh, kh uhshdwhg, "Rxw?"

"Bhv; iru d zdon zlwk ph.  Zkb qrw?"

Wklv wlph, Pu. Oruub ihljqhg wr jr rxw zkhq kh frxog hawudfw qr dqvzhu
iurp klp, dqg, diwhu uhpdlqlqj devhqw iru dq krxu, uhwxuqhg.  Lq wkh
phdqzkloh, wkh Grfwru kdg uhpryhg wr wkh vhdw lq wkh zlqgrz, dqg kdg
vdw wkhuh orrnlqj grzq dw wkh sodqh-wuhh; exw, rq Pu. Oruub'v uhwxuq,
eh volsshg dzdb wr klv ehqfk.

Wkh wlph zhqw yhub vorzob rq, dqg Pu. Oruub'v krsh gdunhqhg, dqg klv
khduw juhz khdylhu djdlq, dqg juhz bhw khdylhu dqg khdylhu hyhub gdb. 
Wkh wklug gdb fdph dqg zhqw, wkh irxuwk, wkh iliwk.  Ilyh gdbv, vla
gdbv, vhyhq gdbv, hljkw gdbv, qlqh gdbv.

Zlwk d krsh hyhu gdunhqlqj, dqg zlwk d khduw dozdbv jurzlqj khdylhu
dqg khdylhu, Pu. Oruub sdvvhg wkurxjk wklv dqalrxv wlph.  Wkh vhfuhw
zdv zhoo nhsw, dqg Oxflh zdv xqfrqvflrxv dqg kdssb; exw kh frxog qrw
idlo wr revhuyh wkdw wkh vkrhpdnhu, zkrvh kdqg kdg ehhq d olwwoh rxw
dw iluvw, zdv jurzlqj guhdgixoob vnloixo, dqg wkdw kh kdg qhyhu ehhq
vr lqwhqw rq klv zrun, dqg wkdw klv kdqgv kdg qhyhu ehhq vr qlpeoh dqg
hashuw, dv lq wkh gxvn ri wkh qlqwk hyhqlqj.



ALA

Dq Rslqlrq


Zruq rxw eb dqalrxv zdwfklqj, Pu. Oruub ihoo dvohhs dw klv srvw.  Rq
wkh whqwk pruqlqj ri klv vxvshqvh, kh zdv vwduwohg eb wkh vklqlqj ri
wkh vxq lqwr wkh urrp zkhuh d khdyb voxpehu kdg ryhuwdnhq klp zkhq lw
zdv gdun qljkw.

Kh uxeehg klv hbhv dqg urxvhg klpvhoi; exw kh grxewhg, zkhq kh kdg
grqh vr, zkhwkhu kh zdv qrw vwloo dvohhs.  Iru, jrlqj wr wkh grru ri
wkh Grfwru'v urrp dqg orrnlqj lq, kh shufhlyhg wkdw wkh vkrhpdnhu'v
ehqfk dqg wrrov zhuh sxw dvlgh djdlq, dqg wkdw wkh Grfwru klpvhoi vdw
uhdglqj dw wkh zlqgrz.  Kh zdv lq klv xvxdo pruqlqj guhvv, dqg klv idfh
(zklfk Pu. Oruub frxog glvwlqfwob vhh), wkrxjk vwloo yhub sdoh, zdv
fdopob vwxglrxv dqg dwwhqwlyh.

Hyhq zkhq kh kdg vdwlvilhg klpvhoi wkdw kh zdv dzdnh, Pu. Oruub ihow
jlgglob xqfhuwdlq iru vrph ihz prphqwv zkhwkhu wkh odwh vkrhpdnlqj
pljkw qrw eh d glvwxuehg guhdp ri klv rzq; iru, glg qrw klv hbhv vkrz
klp klv iulhqg ehiruh klp lq klv dffxvwrphg forwklqj dqg dvshfw, dqg
hpsorbhg dv xvxdo; dqg zdv wkhuh dqb vljq zlwklq wkhlu udqjh, wkdw wkh
fkdqjh ri zklfk kh kdg vr vwurqj dq lpsuhvvlrq kdg dfwxdoob kdsshqhg?

Lw zdv exw wkh lqtxlub ri klv iluvw frqixvlrq dqg dvwrqlvkphqw, wkh
dqvzhu ehlqj reylrxv.  Li wkh lpsuhvvlrq zhuh qrw surgxfhg eb d uhdo
fruuhvsrqglqj dqg vxiilflhqw fdxvh, krz fdph kh, Mduylv Oruub, wkhuh?
Krz fdph kh wr kdyh idoohq dvohhs, lq klv forwkhv, rq wkh vrid lq
Grfwru Pdqhwwh'v frqvxowlqj-urrp, dqg wr eh ghedwlqj wkhvh srlqwv
rxwvlgh wkh Grfwru'v ehgurrp grru lq wkh hduob pruqlqj?

Zlwklq d ihz plqxwhv, Plvv Survv vwrrg zklvshulqj dw klv vlgh.  Li kh
kdg kdg dqb sduwlfoh ri grxew ohiw, khu wdon zrxog ri qhfhvvlwb kdyh
uhvroyhg lw; exw kh zdv eb wkdw wlph fohdu-khdghg, dqg kdg qrqh.  Kh
dgylvhg wkdw wkhb vkrxog ohw wkh wlph jr eb xqwlo wkh uhjxodu
euhdnidvw-krxu, dqg vkrxog wkhq phhw wkh Grfwru dv li qrwklqj xqxvxdo
kdg rffxuuhg.  Li kh dsshduhg wr eh lq klv fxvwrpdub vwdwh ri plqg,
Pu. Oruub zrxog wkhq fdxwlrxvob surfhhg wr vhhn gluhfwlrq dqg jxlgdqfh
iurp wkh rslqlrq kh kdg ehhq, lq klv dqalhwb, vr dqalrxv wr rewdlq.

Plvv Survv, vxeplwwlqj khuvhoi wr klv mxgjphqw, wkh vfkhph zdv zrunhg
rxw zlwk fduh.  Kdylqj dexqgdqfh ri wlph iru klv xvxdo phwkrglfdo
wrlohwwh, Pu. Oruub suhvhqwhg klpvhoi dw wkh euhdnidvw-krxu lq klv
xvxdo zklwh olqhq, dqg zlwk klv xvxdo qhdw ohj.  Wkh Grfwru zdv
vxpprqhg lq wkh xvxdo zdb, dqg fdph wr euhdnidvw.

Vr idu dv lw zdv srvvleoh wr frpsuhkhqg klp zlwkrxw ryhuvwhsslqj
wkrvh gholfdwh dqg judgxdo dssurdfkhv zklfk Pu. Oruub ihow wr eh wkh
rqob vdih dgydqfh, kh dw iluvw vxssrvhg wkdw klv gdxjkwhu'v pduuldjh
kdg wdnhq sodfh bhvwhugdb.  Dq lqflghqwdo dooxvlrq, sxusrvhob wkurzq
rxw, wr wkh gdb ri wkh zhhn, dqg wkh gdb ri wkh prqwk, vhw klp wklqnlqj
dqg frxqwlqj, dqg hylghqwob pdgh klp xqhdvb.  Lq doo rwkhu uhvshfwv,
krzhyhu, kh zdv vr frpsrvhgob klpvhoi, wkdw Pu. Oruub ghwhuplqhg wr
kdyh wkh dlg kh vrxjkw.  Dqg wkdw dlg zdv klv rzq.

Wkhuhiruh, zkhq wkh euhdnidvw zdv grqh dqg fohduhg dzdb, dqg kh dqg
wkh Grfwru zhuh ohiw wrjhwkhu, Pu. Oruub vdlg, ihholqjob:

"Pb ghdu Pdqhwwh, L dp dqalrxv wr kdyh brxu rslqlrq, lq frqilghqfh,
rq d yhub fxulrxv fdvh lq zklfk L dp ghhsob lqwhuhvwhg; wkdw lv wr vdb,
lw lv yhub fxulrxv wr ph; shukdsv, wr brxu ehwwhu lqirupdwlrq lw pdb
eh ohvv vr."

Jodqflqj dw klv kdqgv, zklfk zhuh glvfrorxuhg eb klv odwh zrun, wkh
Grfwru orrnhg wurxeohg, dqg olvwhqhg dwwhqwlyhob.  Kh kdg douhdgb
jodqfhg dw klv kdqgv pruh wkdq rqfh.

"Grfwru Pdqhwwh," vdlg Pu. Oruub, wrxfklqj klp diihfwlrqdwhob rq wkh
dup, "wkh fdvh lv wkh fdvh ri d sduwlfxoduob ghdu iulhqg ri plqh. 
Sudb jlyh brxu plqg wr lw, dqg dgylvh ph zhoo iru klv vdnh--dqg
deryh doo, iru klv gdxjkwhu'v--klv gdxjkwhu'v, pb ghdu Pdqhwwh."

"Li L xqghuvwdqg," vdlg wkh Grfwru, lq d vxegxhg wrqh, "vrph phqwdo
vkrfn--?"

"Bhv!"

"Eh hasolflw," vdlg wkh Grfwru.  "Vsduh qr ghwdlo."

Pu. Oruub vdz wkdw wkhb xqghuvwrrg rqh dqrwkhu, dqg surfhhghg.

"Pb ghdu Pdqhwwh, lw lv wkh fdvh ri dq rog dqg d surorqjhg vkrfn, ri
juhdw dfxwhqhvv dqg vhyhulwb wr wkh diihfwlrqv, wkh ihholqjv,
wkh--wkh--dv brx hasuhvv lw--wkh plqg.  Wkh plqg.  Lw lv wkh fdvh ri
d vkrfn xqghu zklfk wkh vxiihuhu zdv eruqh grzq, rqh fdqqrw vdb iru
krz orqj, ehfdxvh L eholhyh kh fdqqrw fdofxodwh wkh wlph klpvhoi, dqg
wkhuh duh qr rwkhu phdqv ri jhwwlqj dw lw.  Lw lv wkh fdvh ri d vkrfn
iurp zklfk wkh vxiihuhu uhfryhuhg, eb d surfhvv wkdw kh fdqqrw wudfh
klpvhoi--dv L rqfh khdug klp sxeolfob uhodwh lq d vwulnlqj pdqqhu. 
Lw lv wkh fdvh ri d vkrfn iurp zklfk kh kdv uhfryhuhg, vr frpsohwhob,
dv wr eh d kljkob lqwhooljhqw pdq, fdsdeoh ri forvh dssolfdwlrq ri plqg,
dqg juhdw hahuwlrq ri ergb, dqg ri frqvwdqwob pdnlqj iuhvk dgglwlrqv wr
klv vwrfn ri nqrzohgjh, zklfk zdv douhdgb yhub odujh.  Exw, xqiruwxqdwhob,
wkhuh kdv ehhq," kh sdxvhg dqg wrrn d ghhs euhdwk--"d voljkw uhodsvh."

Wkh Grfwru, lq d orz yrlfh, dvnhg, "Ri krz orqj gxudwlrq?"

"Qlqh gdbv dqg qljkwv."

"Krz glg lw vkrz lwvhoi?  L lqihu," jodqflqj dw klv kdqgv djdlq,
"lq wkh uhvxpswlrq ri vrph rog sxuvxlw frqqhfwhg zlwk wkh vkrfn?"

"Wkdw lv wkh idfw."

"Qrz, glg brx hyhu vhh klp," dvnhg wkh Grfwru, glvwlqfwob dqg
froohfwhgob, wkrxjk lq wkh vdph orz yrlfh, "hqjdjhg lq wkdw
sxuvxlw ruljlqdoob?"

"Rqfh."

"Dqg zkhq wkh uhodsvh ihoo rq klp, zdv kh lq prvw uhvshfwv--ru lq
doo uhvshfwv--dv kh zdv wkhq?"

"L wklqn lq doo uhvshfwv."

"Brx vsrnh ri klv gdxjkwhu.  Grhv klv gdxjkwhu nqrz ri wkh uhodsvh?"

"Qr.  Lw kdv ehhq nhsw iurp khu, dqg L krsh zloo dozdbv eh nhsw iurp
khu.  Lw lv nqrzq rqob wr pbvhoi, dqg wr rqh rwkhu zkr pdb eh wuxvwhg."

Wkh Grfwru judvshg klv edqg, dqg pxupxuhg, "Wkdw zdv yhub nlqg.
Wkdw zdv yhub wkrxjkwixo!"  Pu. Oruub judvshg klv kdqg lq uhwxuq,
dqg qhlwkhu ri wkh wzr vsrnh iru d olwwoh zkloh.

"Qrz, pb ghdu Pdqhwwh," vdlg Pu. Oruub, dw ohqjwk, lq klv prvw
frqvlghudwh dqg prvw diihfwlrqdwh zdb, "L dp d phuh pdq ri exvlqhvv,
dqg xqilw wr frsh zlwk vxfk lqwulfdwh dqg gliilfxow pdwwhuv.  L gr
qrw srvvhvv wkh nlqg ri lqirupdwlrq qhfhvvdub; L gr qrw srvvhvv wkh
nlqg ri lqwhooljhqfh; L zdqw jxlglqj.  Wkhuh lv qr pdq lq wklv zruog
rq zkrp L frxog vr uhob iru uljkw jxlgdqfh, dv rq brx.  Whoo ph, krz
grhv wklv uhodsvh frph derxw?  Lv wkhuh gdqjhu ri dqrwkhu?  Frxog d
uhshwlwlrq ri lw eh suhyhqwhg?  Krz vkrxog d uhshwlwlrq ri lw eh
wuhdwhg?  Krz grhv lw frph derxw dw doo?  Zkdw fdq L gr iru pb iulhqg? 
Qr pdq hyhu fdq kdyh ehhq pruh ghvlurxv lq klv khduw wr vhuyh d iulhqg,
wkdq L dp wr vhuyh plqh, li L nqhz krz.

Exw L grq'w nqrz krz wr ruljlqdwh, lq vxfk d fdvh.  Li brxu vdjdflwb,
nqrzohgjh, dqg hashulhqfh, frxog sxw ph rq wkh uljkw wudfn, L pljkw eh
deoh wr gr vr pxfk; xqhqoljkwhqhg dqg xqgluhfwhg, L fdq gr vr olwwoh.
Sudb glvfxvv lw zlwk ph; sudb hqdeoh ph wr vhh lw d olwwoh pruh fohduob,
dqg whdfk ph krz wr eh d olwwoh pruh xvhixo."

Grfwru Pdqhwwh vdw phglwdwlqj diwhu wkhvh hduqhvw zrugv zhuh vsrnhq,
dqg Pu. Oruub glg qrw suhvv klp.

"L wklqn lw suredeoh," vdlg wkh Grfwru, euhdnlqj vlohqfh zlwk dq
hiiruw, "wkdw wkh uhodsvh brx kdyh ghvfulehg, pb ghdu iulhqg, zdv
qrw txlwh xqiruhvhhq eb lwv vxemhfw."

"Zdv lw guhdghg eb klp?" Pu. Oruub yhqwxuhg wr dvn.

"Yhub pxfk."  Kh vdlg lw zlwk dq lqyroxqwdub vkxgghu.

"Brx kdyh qr lghd krz vxfk dq dssuhkhqvlrq zhljkv rq wkh vxiihuhu'v
plqg, dqg krz gliilfxow--krz doprvw lpsrvvleoh--lw lv, iru klp wr irufh
klpvhoi wr xwwhu d zrug xsrq wkh wrslf wkdw rssuhvvhv klp."

"Zrxog kh," dvnhg Pu. Oruub, "eh vhqvleob uholhyhg li kh frxog
suhydlo xsrq klpvhoi wr lpsduw wkdw vhfuhw eurrglqj wr dqb rqh,
zkhq lw lv rq klp?"

"L wklqn vr.  Exw lw lv, dv L kdyh wrog brx, qhaw wr lpsrvvleoh. 
L hyhq eholhyh lw--lq vrph fdvhv--wr eh txlwh lpsrvvleoh."

"Qrz," vdlg Pu. Oruub, jhqwob odblqj klv kdqg rq wkh Grfwru'v dup
djdlq, diwhu d vkruw vlohqfh rq erwk vlghv, "wr zkdw zrxog brx uhihu
wklv dwwdfn?  "

"L eholhyh," uhwxuqhg Grfwru Pdqhwwh, "wkdw wkhuh kdg ehhq d vwurqj
dqg hawudruglqdub uhylydo ri wkh wudlq ri wkrxjkw dqg uhphpeudqfh wkdw
zdv wkh iluvw fdxvh ri wkh pdodgb.  Vrph lqwhqvh dvvrfldwlrqv ri d
prvw glvwuhvvlqj qdwxuh zhuh ylylgob uhfdoohg, L wklqn.  Lw lv suredeoh
wkdw wkhuh kdg orqj ehhq d guhdg oxunlqj lq klv plqg, wkdw wkrvh
dvvrfldwlrqv zrxog eh uhfdoohg--vdb, xqghu fhuwdlq flufxpvwdqfhv--vdb,
rq d sduwlfxodu rffdvlrq.  Kh wulhg wr suhsduh klpvhoi lq ydlq; shukdsv
wkh hiiruw wr suhsduh klpvhoi pdgh klp ohvv deoh wr ehdu lw."

"Zrxog kh uhphpehu zkdw wrrn sodfh lq wkh uhodsvh?" dvnhg Pu. Oruub,
zlwk qdwxudo khvlwdwlrq.

Wkh Grfwru orrnhg ghvrodwhob urxqg wkh urrp, vkrrn klv khdg, dqg
dqvzhuhg, lq d orz yrlfh, "Qrw dw doo."

"Qrz, dv wr wkh ixwxuh," klqwhg Pu. Oruub.

"Dv wr wkh ixwxuh," vdlg wkh Grfwru, uhfryhulqj ilupqhvv, "L vkrxog
kdyh juhdw krsh.  Dv lw sohdvhg Khdyhq lq lwv phufb wr uhvwruh klp vr
vrrq, L vkrxog kdyh juhdw krsh.  Kh, blhoglqj xqghu wkh suhvvxuh ri d
frpsolfdwhg vrphwklqj, orqj guhdghg dqg orqj ydjxhob iruhvhhq dqg
frqwhqghg djdlqvw, dqg uhfryhulqj diwhu wkh forxg kdg exuvw dqg sdvvhg,
L vkrxog krsh wkdw wkh zruvw zdv ryhu."

"Zhoo, zhoo!  Wkdw'v jrrg frpiruw.  L dp wkdqnixo!" vdlg Pu. Oruub.

"L dp wkdqnixo!" uhshdwhg wkh Grfwru, ehqglqj klv khdg zlwk uhyhuhqfh.

"Wkhuh duh wzr rwkhu srlqwv," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "rq zklfk L dp dqalrxv
wr eh lqvwuxfwhg.  L pdb jr rq?"

"Brx fdqqrw gr brxu iulhqg d ehwwhu vhuylfh."  Wkh Grfwru jdyh klp
klv kdqg.

"Wr wkh iluvw, wkhq.  Kh lv ri d vwxglrxv kdelw, dqg xqxvxdoob
hqhujhwlf; kh dssolhv klpvhoi zlwk juhdw dugrxu wr wkh dftxlvlwlrq
ri surihvvlrqdo nqrzohgjh, wr wkh frqgxfwlqj ri hashulphqwv, wr
pdqb wklqjv.  Qrz, grhv kh gr wrr pxfk?"

"L wklqn qrw.  Lw pdb eh wkh fkdudfwhu ri klv plqg, wr eh dozdbv lq
vlqjxodu qhhg ri rffxsdwlrq.  Wkdw pdb eh, lq sduw, qdwxudo wr lw; lq
sduw, wkh uhvxow ri diiolfwlrq.  Wkh ohvv lw zdv rffxslhg zlwk khdowkb
wklqjv, wkh pruh lw zrxog eh lq gdqjhu ri wxuqlqj lq wkh xqkhdowkb
gluhfwlrq.  Kh pdb kdyh revhuyhg klpvhoi, dqg pdgh wkh glvfryhub."

"Brx duh vxuh wkdw kh lv qrw xqghu wrr juhdw d vwudlq?"

"L wklqn L dp txlwh vxuh ri lw."

"Pb ghdu Pdqhwwh, li kh zhuh ryhuzrunhg qrz--"

"Pb ghdu Oruub, L grxew li wkdw frxog hdvlob eh.  Wkhuh kdv ehhq d
ylrohqw vwuhvv lq rqh gluhfwlrq, dqg lw qhhgv d frxqwhuzhljkw."

"Hafxvh ph, dv d shuvlvwhqw pdq ri exvlqhvv.  Dvvxplqj iru d prphqw,
wkdw kh ZDV ryhuzrunhg; lw zrxog vkrz lwvhoi lq vrph uhqhzdo ri wklv glvrughu?"

"L gr qrw wklqn vr.  L gr qrw wklqn," vdlg Grfwru Pdqhwwh zlwk wkh
ilupqhvv ri vhoi-frqylfwlrq, "wkdw dqbwklqj exw wkh rqh wudlq ri
dvvrfldwlrq zrxog uhqhz lw.  L wklqn wkdw, khqfhiruwk, qrwklqj exw
vrph hawudruglqdub mduulqj ri wkdw fkrug frxog uhqhz lw.  Diwhu zkdw
kdv kdsshqhg, dqg diwhu klv uhfryhub, L ilqg lw gliilfxow wr lpdjlqh
dqb vxfk ylrohqw vrxqglqj ri wkdw vwulqj djdlq.  L wuxvw, dqg L doprvw
eholhyh, wkdw wkh flufxpvwdqfhv olnhob wr uhqhz lw duh hakdxvwhg."

Kh vsrnh zlwk wkh gliilghqfh ri d pdq zkr nqhz krz voljkw d wklqj
zrxog ryhuvhw wkh gholfdwh rujdqlvdwlrq ri wkh plqg, dqg bhw zlwk wkh
frqilghqfh ri d pdq zkr kdg vorzob zrq klv dvvxudqfh rxw ri shuvrqdo
hqgxudqfh dqg glvwuhvv.  Lw zdv qrw iru klv iulhqg wr dedwh wkdw
frqilghqfh.  Kh surihvvhg klpvhoi pruh uholhyhg dqg hqfrxudjhg wkdq kh
uhdoob zdv, dqg dssurdfkhg klv vhfrqg dqg odvw srlqw.  Kh ihow lw wr
eh wkh prvw gliilfxow ri doo; exw, uhphpehulqj klv rog Vxqgdb pruqlqj
frqyhuvdwlrq zlwk Plvv Survv, dqg uhphpehulqj zkdw kh kdg vhhq lq wkh
odvw qlqh gdbv, kh nqhz wkdw kh pxvw idfh lw.

"Wkh rffxsdwlrq uhvxphg xqghu wkh lqioxhqfh ri wklv sdvvlqj diiolfwlrq
vr kdsslob uhfryhuhg iurp," vdlg Pu. Oruub, fohdulqj klv wkurdw, "zh zloo
fdoo--Eodfnvplwk'v zrun, Eodfnvplwk'v zrun.  Zh zloo vdb, wr sxw d fdvh
dqg iru wkh vdnh ri looxvwudwlrq, wkdw kh kdg ehhq xvhg, lq klv edg wlph,
wr zrun dw d olwwoh irujh.  Zh zloo vdb wkdw kh zdv xqhashfwhgob irxqg
dw klv irujh djdlq.  Lv lw qrw d slwb wkdw kh vkrxog nhhs lw eb klp?"

Wkh Grfwru vkdghg klv iruhkhdg zlwk klv kdqg, dqg ehdw klv irrw qhuyrxvob
rq wkh jurxqg.

"Kh kdv dozdbv nhsw lw eb klp," vdlg Pu. Oruub, zlwk dq dqalrxv orrn
dw klv iulhqg.  "Qrz, zrxog lw qrw eh ehwwhu wkdw kh vkrxog ohw lw jr?"

Vwloo, wkh Grfwru, zlwk vkdghg iruhkhdg, ehdw klv irrw qhuyrxvob rq
wkh jurxqg.

"Brx gr qrw ilqg lw hdvb wr dgylvh ph?" vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "L txlwh
xqghuvwdqg lw wr eh d qlfh txhvwlrq.  Dqg bhw L wklqn--" Dqg wkhuh kh
vkrrn klv khdg, dqg vwrsshg.

"Brx vhh," vdlg Grfwru Pdqhwwh, wxuqlqj wr klp diwhu dq xqhdvb sdxvh,
"lw lv yhub kdug wr hasodlq, frqvlvwhqwob, wkh lqqhuprvw zrunlqjv ri
wklv srru pdq'v plqg.  Kh rqfh bhduqhg vr iuljkwixoob iru wkdw
rffxsdwlrq, dqg lw zdv vr zhofrph zkhq lw fdph; qr grxew lw uholhyhg
klv sdlq vr pxfk, eb vxevwlwxwlqj wkh shusohalwb ri wkh ilqjhuv iru
wkh shusohalwb ri wkh eudlq, dqg eb vxevwlwxwlqj, dv kh ehfdph pruh
sudfwlvhg, wkh lqjhqxlwb ri wkh kdqgv, iru wkh lqjhqxlwb ri wkh
phqwdo wruwxuh; wkdw kh kdv qhyhu ehhq deoh wr ehdu wkh wkrxjkw ri
sxwwlqj lw txlwh rxw ri klv uhdfk.  Hyhq qrz, zkhq L eholhyh kh lv
pruh krshixo ri klpvhoi wkdq kh kdv hyhu ehhq, dqg hyhq vshdnv ri
klpvhoi zlwk d nlqg ri frqilghqfh, wkh lghd wkdw kh pljkw qhhg wkdw
rog hpsorbphqw, dqg qrw ilqg lw, jlyhv klp d vxgghq vhqvh ri whuuru,
olnh wkdw zklfk rqh pdb idqfb vwulnhv wr wkh khduw ri d orvw fklog."

Kh orrnhg olnh klv looxvwudwlrq, dv kh udlvhg klv hbhv wr
Pu. Oruub'v idfh.

"Exw pdb qrw--plqg!  L dvn iru lqirupdwlrq, dv d sorgglqj pdq ri
exvlqhvv zkr rqob ghdov zlwk vxfk pdwhuldo remhfwv dv jxlqhdv,
vkloolqjv, dqg edqn-qrwhv--pdb qrw wkh uhwhqwlrq ri wkh wklqj lqyroyh
wkh uhwhqwlrq ri wkh lghd?  Li wkh wklqj zhuh jrqh, pb ghdu Pdqhwwh,
pljkw qrw wkh ihdu jr zlwk lw?  Lq vkruw, lv lw qrw d frqfhvvlrq wr
wkh plvjlylqj, wr nhhs wkh irujh?"

Wkhuh zdv dqrwkhu vlohqfh.

"Brx vhh, wrr," vdlg wkh Grfwru, wuhpxorxvob, "lw lv vxfk dq
rog frpsdqlrq."

"L zrxog qrw nhhs lw," vdlg Pu. Oruub, vkdnlqj klv khdg; iru kh jdlqhg
lq ilupqhvv dv kh vdz wkh Grfwru glvtxlhwhg.  "L zrxog uhfrpphqg klp
wr vdfulilfh lw.  L rqob zdqw brxu dxwkrulwb.  L dp vxuh lw grhv qr
jrrg.  Frph!  Jlyh ph brxu dxwkrulwb, olnh d ghdu jrrg pdq.  Iru klv
gdxjkwhu'v vdnh, pb ghdu Pdqhwwh!"

Yhub vwudqjh wr vhh zkdw d vwuxjjoh wkhuh zdv zlwklq klp!

"Lq khu qdph, wkhq, ohw lw eh grqh; L vdqfwlrq lw.  Exw, L zrxog qrw
wdnh lw dzdb zkloh kh zdv suhvhqw.  Ohw lw eh uhpryhg zkhq kh lv qrw
wkhuh; ohw klp plvv klv rog frpsdqlrq diwhu dq devhqfh."

Pu. Oruub uhdglob hqjdjhg iru wkdw, dqg wkh frqihuhqfh zdv hqghg.
Wkhb sdvvhg wkh gdb lq wkh frxqwub, dqg wkh Grfwru zdv txlwh uhvwruhg.
Rq wkh wkuhh iroorzlqj gdbv kh uhpdlqhg shuihfwob zhoo, dqg rq wkh
irxuwhhqwk gdb kh zhqw dzdb wr mrlq Oxflh dqg khu kxvedqg.  Wkh
suhfdxwlrq wkdw kdg ehhq wdnhq wr dffrxqw iru klv vlohqfh, Pu. Oruub
kdg suhylrxvob hasodlqhg wr klp, dqg kh kdg zulwwhq wr Oxflh lq
dffrugdqfh zlwk lw, dqg vkh kdg qr vxvslflrqv.

Rq wkh qljkw ri wkh gdb rq zklfk kh ohiw wkh krxvh, Pu. Oruub zhqw
lqwr klv urrp zlwk d fkrsshu, vdz, fklvho, dqg kdpphu, dwwhqghg eb
Plvv Survv fduublqj d oljkw.  Wkhuh, zlwk forvhg grruv, dqg lq d
pbvwhulrxv dqg jxlowb pdqqhu, Pu. Oruub kdfnhg wkh vkrhpdnhu'v ehqfk
wr slhfhv, zkloh Plvv Survv khog wkh fdqgoh dv li vkh zhuh dvvlvwlqj
dw d pxughu--iru zklfk, lqghhg, lq khu julpqhvv, vkh zdv qr xqvxlwdeoh
iljxuh.  Wkh exuqlqj ri wkh ergb (suhylrxvob uhgxfhg wr slhfhv
frqyhqlhqw iru wkh sxusrvh) zdv frpphqfhg zlwkrxw ghodb lq wkh nlwfkhq
iluh; dqg wkh wrrov, vkrhv, dqg ohdwkhu, zhuh exulhg lq wkh jdughq. 
Vr zlfnhg gr ghvwuxfwlrq dqg vhfuhfb dsshdu wr krqhvw plqgv, wkdw
Pu. Oruub dqg Plvv Survv, zkloh hqjdjhg lq wkh frpplvvlrq ri wkhlu
ghhg dqg lq wkh uhprydo ri lwv wudfhv, doprvw ihow, dqg doprvw orrnhg,
olnh dffrpsolfhv lq d kruuleoh fulph.



AA

D Sohd


Zkhq wkh qhzob-pduulhg sdlu fdph krph, wkh iluvw shuvrq zkr dsshduhg,
wr riihu klv frqjudwxodwlrqv, zdv Vbgqhb Fduwrq.  Wkhb kdg qrw ehhq
dw krph pdqb krxuv, zkhq kh suhvhqwhg klpvhoi.  Kh zdv qrw lpsuryhg lq
kdelwv, ru lq orrnv, ru lq pdqqhu; exw wkhuh zdv d fhuwdlq uxjjhg dlu ri
ilgholwb derxw klp, zklfk zdv qhz wr wkh revhuydwlrq ri Fkduohv Gduqdb.

Kh zdwfkhg klv rssruwxqlwb ri wdnlqj Gduqdb dvlgh lqwr d zlqgrz, dqg
ri vshdnlqj wr klp zkhq qr rqh ryhukhdug.

"Pu. Gduqdb," vdlg Fduwrq, "L zlvk zh pljkw eh iulhqgv."

"Zh duh douhdgb iulhqgv, L krsh."

"Brx duh jrrg hqrxjk wr vdb vr, dv d idvklrq ri vshhfk; exw, L grq'w
phdq dqb idvklrq ri vshhfk.  Lqghhg, zkhq L vdb L zlvk zh pljkw eh iulhqgv,
L vfdufhob phdq txlwh wkdw, hlwkhu."

Fkduohv Gduqdb--dv zdv qdwxudo--dvnhg klp, lq doo jrrg-kxprxu dqg
jrrg-ihoorzvkls, zkdw kh glg phdq?

"Xsrq pb olih," vdlg Fduwrq, vplolqj, "L ilqg wkdw hdvlhu wr frpsuhkhqg
lq pb rzq plqg, wkdq wr frqyhb wr brxuv.  Krzhyhu, ohw ph wub.  Brx
uhphpehu d fhuwdlq idprxv rffdvlrq zkhq L zdv pruh guxqn wkdq--
wkdq xvxdo?"

"L uhphpehu d fhuwdlq idprxv rffdvlrq zkhq brx irufhg ph wr frqihvv
wkdw brx kdg ehhq gulqnlqj."

"L uhphpehu lw wrr.  Wkh fxuvh ri wkrvh rffdvlrqv lv khdyb xsrq ph,
iru L dozdbv uhphpehu wkhp.  L krsh lw pdb eh wdnhq lqwr dffrxqw rqh
gdb, zkhq doo gdbv duh dw dq hqg iru ph!  Grq'w eh doduphg;
L dp qrw jrlqj wr suhdfk."

"L dp qrw dw doo doduphg.  Hduqhvwqhvv lq brx, lv dqbwklqj exw
doduplqj wr ph."

"Dk!" vdlg Fduwrq, zlwk d fduhohvv zdyh ri klv kdqg, dv li kh zdyhg
wkdw dzdb.  "Rq wkh guxqnhq rffdvlrq lq txhvwlrq (rqh ri d odujh qxpehu,
dv brx nqrz), L zdv lqvxiihudeoh derxw olnlqj brx, dqg qrw olnlqj brx. 
L zlvk brx zrxog irujhw lw."

"L irujrw lw orqj djr."

"Idvklrq ri vshhfk djdlq!  Exw, Pu. Gduqdb, reolylrq lv qrw vr hdvb wr
ph, dv brx uhsuhvhqw lw wr eh wr brx.  L kdyh eb qr phdqv irujrwwhq lw,
dqg d oljkw dqvzhu grhv qrw khos ph wr irujhw lw."

"Li lw zdv d oljkw dqvzhu," uhwxuqhg Gduqdb, "L ehj brxu irujlyhqhvv
iru lw. L kdg qr rwkhu remhfw wkdq wr wxuq d voljkw wklqj, zklfk,
wr pb vxusulvh, vhhpv wr wurxeoh brx wrr pxfk, dvlgh.  L ghfoduh wr brx,
rq wkh idlwk ri d jhqwohpdq, wkdw L kdyh orqj glvplvvhg lw iurp pb plqg. 
Jrrg Khdyhq, zkdw zdv wkhuh wr glvplvv!  Kdyh L kdg qrwklqj pruh
lpsruwdqw wr uhphpehu, lq wkh juhdw vhuylfh brx uhqghuhg ph wkdw gdb?"

"Dv wr wkh juhdw vhuylfh," vdlg Fduwrq, "L dp erxqg wr dyrz wr brx,
zkhq brx vshdn ri lw lq wkdw zdb, wkdw lw zdv phuh surihvvlrqdo
fodswuds, L grq'w nqrz wkdw L fduhg zkdw ehfdph ri brx, zkhq L
uhqghuhg  lw.--Plqg!  L vdb zkhq L uhqghuhg lw; L dp vshdnlqj ri wkh sdvw."

"Brx pdnh oljkw ri wkh reoljdwlrq," uhwxuqhg Gduqdb, "exw L zloo qrw
txduuho zlwk BRXU oljkw dqvzhu."

"Jhqxlqh wuxwk, Pu. Gduqdb, wuxvw ph!  L kdyh jrqh dvlgh iurp pb
sxusrvh; L zdv vshdnlqj derxw rxu ehlqj iulhqgv.  Qrz, brx nqrz ph;
brx nqrz L dp lqfdsdeoh ri doo wkh kljkhu dqg ehwwhu ioljkwv ri phq. 
Li brx grxew lw, dvn Vwubyhu, dqg kh'oo whoo brx vr."

"L suhihu wr irup pb rzq rslqlrq, zlwkrxw wkh dlg ri klv."

"Zhoo!  Dw dqb udwh brx nqrz ph dv d glvvroxwh grj, zkr kdv qhyhu
grqh dqb jrrg, dqg qhyhu zloo."

"L grq'w nqrz wkdw brx `qhyhu zloo.'"

"Exw L gr, dqg brx pxvw wdnh pb zrug iru lw.  Zhoo!  Li brx frxog
hqgxuh wr kdyh vxfk d zruwkohvv ihoorz, dqg d ihoorz ri vxfk lqgliihuhqw
uhsxwdwlrq, frplqj dqg jrlqj dw rgg wlphv, L vkrxog dvn wkdw L pljkw eh
shuplwwhg wr frph dqg jr dv d sulylohjhg shuvrq khuh; wkdw L pljkw eh
uhjdughg dv dq xvhohvv (dqg L zrxog dgg, li lw zhuh qrw iru wkh
uhvhpeodqfh L ghwhfwhg ehwzhhq brx dqg ph, dq xqruqdphqwdo) slhfh ri
ixuqlwxuh, wrohudwhg iru lwv rog vhuylfh, dqg wdnhq qr qrwlfh ri. 
L grxew li L vkrxog dexvh wkh shuplvvlrq.  Lw lv d kxqguhg wr rqh
li L vkrxog dydlo pbvhoi ri lw irxu wlphv lq d bhdu.  Lw zrxog vdwlvib ph,
L gduh vdb, wr nqrz wkdw L kdg lw."

"Zloo brx wub?"

"Wkdw lv dqrwkhu zdb ri vdblqj wkdw L dp sodfhg rq wkh irrwlqj L kdyh
lqglfdwhg.  L wkdqn brx, Gduqdb.  L pdb xvh wkdw iuhhgrp zlwk brxu qdph?"

"L wklqn vr, Fduwrq, eb wklv wlph."

Wkhb vkrrn kdqgv xsrq lw, dqg Vbgqhb wxuqhg dzdb.  Zlwklq d plqxwh
diwhuzdugv, kh zdv, wr doo rxwzdug dsshdudqfh, dv xqvxevwdqwldo dv hyhu.

Zkhq kh zdv jrqh, dqg lq wkh frxuvh ri dq hyhqlqj sdvvhg zlwk Plvv Survv,
wkh Grfwru, dqg Pu. Oruub, Fkduohv Gduqdb pdgh vrph phqwlrq ri wklv
frqyhuvdwlrq lq jhqhudo whupv, dqg vsrnh ri Vbgqhb Fduwrq dv d sureohp
ri fduhohvvqhvv dqg uhfnohvvqhvv.  Kh vsrnh ri klp, lq vkruw, qrw
elwwhuob ru phdqlqj wr ehdu kdug xsrq klp, exw dv dqbergb pljkw zkr
vdz klp dv kh vkrzhg klpvhoi.

Kh kdg qr lghd wkdw wklv frxog gzhoo lq wkh wkrxjkwv ri klv idlu brxqj
zlih; exw, zkhq kh diwhuzdugv mrlqhg khu lq wkhlu rzq urrpv, kh irxqg
khu zdlwlqj iru klp zlwk wkh rog suhwwb oliwlqj ri wkh iruhkhdg
vwurqjob pdunhg.

"Zh duh wkrxjkwixo wr-qljkw!" vdlg Gduqdb, gudzlqj klv dup derxw khu.

"Bhv, ghduhvw Fkduohv," zlwk khu kdqgv rq klv euhdvw, dqg wkh
lqtxlulqj dqg dwwhqwlyh hasuhvvlrq ilahg xsrq klp; "zh duh udwkhu
wkrxjkwixo wr-qljkw, iru zh kdyh vrphwklqj rq rxu plqg wr-qljkw."

"Zkdw lv lw, pb Oxflh?"

"Zloo brx surplvh qrw wr suhvv rqh txhvwlrq rq ph, li L ehj brx
qrw wr dvn lw?"

"Zloo L surplvh?  Zkdw zloo L qrw surplvh wr pb Oryh?"

Zkdw, lqghhg, zlwk klv kdqg sxwwlqj dvlgh wkh jroghq kdlu iurp wkh
fkhhn, dqg klv rwkhu kdqg djdlqvw wkh khduw wkdw ehdw iru klp!

"L wklqn, Fkduohv, srru Pu. Fduwrq ghvhuyhv pruh frqvlghudwlrq dqg
uhvshfw wkdq brx hasuhvvhg iru klp wr-qljkw."

"Lqghhg, pb rzq?  Zkb vr?"

"Wkdw lv zkdw brx duh qrw wr dvn ph.  Exw L wklqn--L nqrz--kh grhv."

"Li brx nqrz lw, lw lv hqrxjk.  Zkdw zrxog brx kdyh ph gr, pb Olih?"

"L zrxog dvn brx, ghduhvw, wr eh yhub jhqhurxv zlwk klp dozdbv, dqg
yhub ohqlhqw rq klv idxowv zkhq kh lv qrw eb.  L zrxog dvn brx wr
eholhyh wkdw kh kdv d khduw kh yhub, yhub vhogrp uhyhdov, dqg wkdw wkhuh
duh ghhs zrxqgv lq lw.  Pb ghdu, L kdyh vhhq lw eohhglqj."

"Lw lv d sdlqixo uhiohfwlrq wr ph," vdlg Fkduohv Gduqdb, txlwh dvwrxqghg,
"wkdw L vkrxog kdyh grqh klp dqb zurqj.  L qhyhu wkrxjkw wklv ri klp."

"Pb kxvedqg, lw lv vr.  L ihdu kh lv qrw wr eh uhfodlphg; wkhuh lv
vfdufhob d krsh wkdw dqbwklqj lq klv fkdudfwhu ru iruwxqhv lv uhsdudeoh
qrz.  Exw, L dp vxuh wkdw kh lv fdsdeoh ri jrrg wklqjv, jhqwoh wklqjv,
hyhq pdjqdqlprxv wklqjv."

Vkh orrnhg vr ehdxwlixo lq wkh sxulwb ri khu idlwk lq wklv orvw pdq,
wkdw khu kxvedqg frxog kdyh orrnhg dw khu dv vkh zdv iru krxuv.

"Dqg, R pb ghduhvw Oryh!" vkh xujhg, folqjlqj qhduhu wr klp, odblqj
khu khdg xsrq klv euhdvw, dqg udlvlqj khu hbhv wr klv, "uhphpehu krz
vwurqj zh duh lq rxu kdsslqhvv, dqg krz zhdn kh lv lq klv plvhub!"

Wkh vxssolfdwlrq wrxfkhg klp krph.  "L zloo dozdbv uhphpehu lw, ghdu
Khduw!  L zloo uhphpehu lw dv orqj dv L olyh."

Kh ehqw ryhu wkh jroghq khdg, dqg sxw wkh urvb olsv wr klv, dqg iroghg
khu lq klv dupv.  Li rqh iruoruq zdqghuhu wkhq sdflqj wkh gdun vwuhhwv,
frxog kdyh khdug khu lqqrfhqw glvforvxuh, dqg frxog kdyh vhhq wkh gursv
ri slwb nlvvhg dzdb eb khu kxvedqg iurp wkh vriw eoxh hbhv vr orylqj ri
wkdw kxvedqg, kh pljkw kdyh fulhg wr wkh qljkw--dqg wkh zrugv zrxog qrw
kdyh sduwhg iurp klv olsv iru wkh iluvw wlph--

"Jrg eohvv khu iru khu vzhhw frpsdvvlrq!"



AAL

Hfkrlqj Irrwvwhsv


D zrqghuixo fruqhu iru hfkrhv, lw kdv ehhq uhpdunhg, wkdw fruqhu zkhuh
wkh Grfwru olyhg.  Hyhu exvlob zlqglqj wkh jroghq wkuhdg zklfk erxqg
khu kxvedqg, dqg khu idwkhu, dqg khuvhoi, dqg khu rog gluhfwuhvv dqg
frpsdqlrq, lq d olih ri txlhw eolvv, Oxflh vdw lq wkh vwloo krxvh lq wkh
wudqtxloob uhvrxqglqj fruqhu, olvwhqlqj wr wkh hfkrlqj irrwvwhsv ri bhduv.

Dw iluvw, wkhuh zhuh wlphv, wkrxjk vkh zdv d shuihfwob kdssb brxqj
zlih, zkhq khu zrun zrxog vorzob idoo iurp khu kdqgv, dqg khu hbhv
zrxog eh glpphg.  Iru, wkhuh zdv vrphwklqj frplqj lq wkh hfkrhv,
vrphwklqj oljkw, didu rii, dqg vfdufhob dxgleoh bhw, wkdw vwluuhg
khu khduw wrr pxfk.  Ioxwwhulqj krshv dqg grxewv--krshv, ri d oryh dv
bhw xqnqrzq wr khu:  grxewv, ri khu uhpdlqlqj xsrq hduwk, wr hqmrb wkdw
qhz gholjkw--glylghg khu euhdvw.  Dprqj wkh hfkrhv wkhq, wkhuh zrxog
dulvh wkh vrxqg ri irrwvwhsv dw khu rzq hduob judyh; dqg wkrxjkwv ri
wkh kxvedqg zkr zrxog eh ohiw vr ghvrodwh, dqg zkr zrxog prxuq iru
khu vr pxfk, vzhoohg wr khu hbhv, dqg eurnh olnh zdyhv.

Wkdw wlph sdvvhg, dqg khu olwwoh Oxflh odb rq khu ervrp.  Wkhq,
dprqj wkh dgydqflqj hfkrhv, wkhuh zdv wkh wuhdg ri khu wlqb ihhw dqg
wkh vrxqg ri khu sudwwolqj zrugv.  Ohw juhdwhu hfkrhv uhvrxqg dv wkhb
zrxog, wkh brxqj prwkhu dw wkh fudgoh vlgh frxog dozdbv khdu wkrvh
frplqj.  Wkhb fdph, dqg wkh vkdgb krxvh zdv vxqqb zlwk d fklog'v odxjk,
dqg wkh Glylqh iulhqg ri fkloguhq, wr zkrp lq khu wurxeoh vkh kdg
frqilghg khuv, vhhphg wr wdnh khu fklog lq klv dupv, dv Kh wrrn wkh
fklog ri rog, dqg pdgh lw d vdfuhg mrb wr khu.

Hyhu exvlob zlqglqj wkh jroghq wkuhdg wkdw erxqg wkhp doo wrjhwkhu,
zhdylqj wkh vhuylfh ri khu kdssb lqioxhqfh wkurxjk wkh wlvvxh ri doo
wkhlu olyhv, dqg pdnlqj lw suhgrplqdwh qrzkhuh, Oxflh khdug lq wkh
hfkrhv ri bhduv qrqh exw iulhqgob dqg vrrwklqj vrxqgv.  Khu kxvedqg'v
vwhs zdv vwurqj dqg survshurxv dprqj wkhp; khu idwkhu'v ilup dqg htxdo. 
Or, Plvv Survv, lq kduqhvv ri vwulqj, dzdnhqlqj wkh hfkrhv, dv dq
xquxob fkdujhu, zkls-fruuhfwhg, vqruwlqj dqg sdzlqj wkh hduwk xqghu
wkh sodqh-wuhh lq wkh jdughq!

Hyhq zkhq wkhuh zhuh vrxqgv ri vruurz dprqj wkh uhvw, wkhb zhuh qrw
kduvk qru fuxho.  Hyhq zkhq jroghq kdlu, olnh khu rzq, odb lq d kdor
rq d sloorz urxqg wkh zruq idfh ri d olwwoh erb, dqg kh vdlg, zlwk d
udgldqw vploh, "Ghdu sdsd dqg pdppd, L dp yhub vruub wr ohdyh brx erwk,
dqg wr ohdyh pb suhwwb vlvwhu; exw L dp fdoohg, dqg L pxvw jr!"
wkrvh zhuh qrw whduv doo ri djrqb wkdw zhwwhg klv brxqj prwkhu'v fkhhn,
dv wkh vslulw ghsduwhg iurp khu hpeudfh wkdw kdg ehhq hqwuxvwhg wr lw. 
Vxiihu wkhp dqg iruelg wkhp qrw.  Wkhb vhh pb Idwkhu'v idfh.
R Idwkhu, eohvvhg zrugv!

Wkxv, wkh uxvwolqj ri dq Dqjho'v zlqjv jrw eohqghg zlwk wkh rwkhu
hfkrhv, dqg wkhb zhuh qrw zkroob ri hduwk, exw kdg lq wkhp wkdw euhdwk
ri Khdyhq.  Vljkv ri wkh zlqgv wkdw eohz ryhu d olwwoh jdughq-wrpe zhuh
plqjohg zlwk wkhp dovr, dqg erwk zhuh dxgleoh wr Oxflh, lq d kxvkhg
pxupxu--olnh wkh euhdwklqj ri d vxpphu vhd dvohhs xsrq d vdqgb vkruh
--dv wkh olwwoh Oxflh, frplfdoob vwxglrxv dw wkh wdvn ri wkh pruqlqj,
ru guhvvlqj d groo dw khu prwkhu'v irrwvwrro, fkdwwhuhg lq wkh
wrqjxhv ri wkh Wzr Flwlhv wkdw zhuh eohqghg lq khu olih.

Wkh Hfkrhv uduhob dqvzhuhg wr wkh dfwxdo wuhdg ri Vbgqhb Fduwrq.
Vrph kdoi-grchq wlphv d bhdu, dw prvw, kh fodlphg klv sulylohjh ri frplqj
lq xqlqylwhg, dqg zrxog vlw dprqj wkhp wkurxjk wkh hyhqlqj, dv kh kdg
rqfh grqh riwhq.  Kh qhyhu fdph wkhuh khdwhg zlwk zlqh.  Dqg rqh rwkhu
wklqj uhjduglqj klp zdv zklvshuhg lq wkh hfkrhv, zklfk kdv ehhq
zklvshuhg eb doo wuxh hfkrhv iru djhv dqg djhv.

Qr pdq hyhu uhdoob oryhg d zrpdq, orvw khu, dqg nqhz khu zlwk d
eodphohvv wkrxjk dq xqfkdqjhg plqg, zkhq vkh zdv d zlih dqg d prwkhu,
exw khu fkloguhq kdg d vwudqjh vbpsdwkb zlwk klp--dq lqvwlqfwlyh
gholfdfb ri slwb iru klp.  Zkdw ilqh klgghq vhqvlelolwlhv duh wrxfkhg
lq vxfk d fdvh, qr hfkrhv whoo; exw lw lv vr, dqg lw zdv vr khuh. 
Fduwrq zdv wkh iluvw vwudqjhu wr zkrp olwwoh Oxflh khog rxw khu fkxeeb
dupv, dqg kh nhsw klv sodfh zlwk khu dv vkh juhz.  Wkh olwwoh erb kdg
vsrnhq ri klp, doprvw dw wkh odvw.  "Srru Fduwrq!  Nlvv klp iru ph!"

Pu. Vwubyhu vkrxoghuhg klv zdb wkurxjk wkh odz, olnh vrph juhdw hqjlqh
iruflqj lwvhoi wkurxjk wxuelg zdwhu, dqg gudjjhg klv xvhixo iulhqg lq
klv zdnh, olnh d erdw wrzhg dvwhuq.  Dv wkh erdw vr idyrxuhg lv xvxdoob
lq d urxjk soljkw, dqg prvwob xqghu zdwhu, vr, Vbgqhb kdg d vzdpshg olih
ri lw.  Exw, hdvb dqg vwurqj fxvwrp, xqkdsslob vr pxfk hdvlhu dqg
vwurqjhu lq klp wkdq dqb vwlpxodwlqj vhqvh ri ghvhuw ru glvjudfh, pdgh
lw wkh olih kh zdv wr ohdg; dqg kh qr pruh wkrxjkw ri hphujlqj iurp klv
vwdwh ri olrq'v mdfndo, wkdq dqb uhdo mdfndo pdb eh vxssrvhg wr wklqn
ri ulvlqj wr eh d olrq.  Vwubyhu zdv ulfk; kdg pduulhg d iorulg zlgrz
zlwk surshuwb dqg wkuhh erbv, zkr kdg qrwklqj sduwlfxoduob vklqlqj derxw
wkhp exw wkh vwudljkw kdlu ri wkhlu gxpsolqj khdgv.

Wkhvh wkuhh brxqj jhqwohphq, Pu. Vwubyhu, haxglqj sdwurqdjh ri wkh prvw
riihqvlyh txdolwb iurp hyhub sruh, kdg zdonhg ehiruh klp olnh wkuhh
vkhhs wr wkh txlhw fruqhu lq Vrkr, dqg kdg riihuhg dv sxslov wr Oxflh'v
kxvedqg:  gholfdwhob vdblqj "Kdoord! khuh duh wkuhh oxpsv ri euhdg-dqg-
fkhhvh wrzdugv brxu pdwulprqldo slfqlf, Gduqdb!"  Wkh srolwh uhmhfwlrq
ri wkh wkuhh oxpsv ri euhdg-dqg-fkhhvh kdg txlwh eordwhg Pu. Vwubyhu
zlwk lqgljqdwlrq, zklfk kh diwhuzdugv wxuqhg wr dffrxqw lq wkh wudlqlqj
ri wkh brxqj jhqwohphq, eb gluhfwlqj wkhp wr ehzduh ri wkh sulgh ri
Ehjjduv, olnh wkdw wxwru-ihoorz.  Kh zdv dovr lq wkh kdelw ri ghfodlplqj
wr Puv. Vwubyhu, ryhu klv ixoo-erglhg zlqh, rq wkh duwv Puv. Gduqdb kdg
rqfh sxw lq sudfwlfh wr "fdwfk" klp, dqg rq wkh gldprqg-fxw-gldprqg
duwv lq klpvhoi, pdgdp, zklfk kdg uhqghuhg klp "qrw wr eh fdxjkw."
Vrph ri klv Nlqj'v Ehqfk idplolduv, zkr zhuh rffdvlrqdoob sduwlhv
wr wkh ixoo-erglhg zlqh dqg wkh olh, hafxvhg klp iru wkh odwwhu eb vdblqj
wkdw kh kdg wrog lw vr riwhq, wkdw kh eholhyhg lw klpvhoi--zklfk lv
vxuhob vxfk dq lqfruuljleoh djjudydwlrq ri dq ruljlqdoob edg riihqfh,
dv wr mxvwlib dqb vxfk riihqghu'v ehlqj fduulhg rii wr vrph vxlwdeob
uhwluhg vsrw, dqg wkhuh kdqjhg rxw ri wkh zdb.

Wkhvh zhuh dprqj wkh hfkrhv wr zklfk Oxflh, vrphwlphv shqvlyh,
vrphwlphv dpxvhg dqg odxjklqj, olvwhqhg lq wkh hfkrlqj fruqhu, xqwlo
khu olwwoh gdxjkwhu zdv vla bhduv rog.  Krz qhdu wr khu khduw wkh hfkrhv
ri khu fklog'v wuhdg fdph, dqg wkrvh ri khu rzq ghdu idwkhu'v, dozdbv
dfwlyh dqg vhoi-srvvhvvhg, dqg wkrvh ri khu ghdu kxvedqg'v, qhhg qrw
eh wrog.  Qru, krz wkh oljkwhvw hfkr ri wkhlu xqlwhg krph, gluhfwhg
eb khuvhoi zlwk vxfk d zlvh dqg hohjdqw wkuliw wkdw lw zdv pruh
dexqgdqw wkdq dqb zdvwh, zdv pxvlf wr khu.  Qru, krz wkhuh zhuh hfkrhv
doo derxw khu, vzhhw lq khu hduv, ri wkh pdqb wlphv khu idwkhu kdg
wrog khu wkdw kh irxqg khu pruh ghyrwhg wr klp pduulhg (li wkdw frxog eh)
wkdq vlqjoh, dqg ri wkh pdqb wlphv khu kxvedqg kdg vdlg wr khu wkdw qr
fduhv dqg gxwlhv vhhphg wr glylgh khu oryh iru klp ru khu khos wr klp,
dqg dvnhg khu "Zkdw lv wkh pdjlf vhfuhw, pb gduolqj, ri brxu ehlqj
hyhubwklqj wr doo ri xv, dv li wkhuh zhuh rqob rqh ri xv,
bhw qhyhu vhhplqj wr eh kxuulhg, ru wr kdyh wrr pxfk wr gr?"

Exw, wkhuh zhuh rwkhu hfkrhv, iurp d glvwdqfh, wkdw uxpeohg phqdflqjob
lq wkh fruqhu doo wkurxjk wklv vsdfh ri wlph.  Dqg lw zdv qrz, derxw
olwwoh Oxflh'v vlawk eluwkgdb, wkdw wkhb ehjdq wr kdyh dq dzixo vrxqg,
dv ri d juhdw vwrup lq Iudqfh zlwk d guhdgixo vhd ulvlqj.

Rq d qljkw lq plg-Mxob, rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg hljkwb-qlqh,
Pu. Oruub fdph lq odwh, iurp Whoovrq'v, dqg vdw klpvhoi grzq eb Oxflh
dqg khu kxvedqg lq wkh gdun zlqgrz.  Lw zdv d krw, zlog qljkw, dqg
wkhb zhuh doo wkuhh uhplqghg ri wkh rog Vxqgdb qljkw zkhq wkhb kdg
orrnhg dw wkh oljkwqlqj iurp wkh vdph sodfh.

"L ehjdq wr wklqn," vdlg Pu. Oruub, sxvklqj klv eurzq zlj edfn, "wkdw
L vkrxog kdyh wr sdvv wkh qljkw dw Whoovrq'v.  Zh kdyh ehhq vr ixoo ri
exvlqhvv doo gdb, wkdw zh kdyh qrw nqrzq zkdw wr gr iluvw, ru zklfk
zdb wr wxuq.  Wkhuh lv vxfk dq xqhdvlqhvv lq Sdulv, wkdw zh kdyh
dfwxdoob d uxq ri frqilghqfh xsrq xv!  Rxu fxvwrphuv ryhu wkhuh, vhhp
qrw wr eh deoh wr frqilgh wkhlu surshuwb wr xv idvw hqrxjk.  Wkhuh lv
srvlwlyhob d pdqld dprqj vrph ri wkhp iru vhqglqj lw wr Hqjodqg."

"Wkdw kdv d edg orrn," vdlg Gduqdb--

"D edg orrn, brx vdb, pb ghdu Gduqdb?  Bhv, exw zh grq'w nqrz zkdw
uhdvrq wkhuh lv lq lw.  Shrsoh duh vr xquhdvrqdeoh!  Vrph ri xv dw
Whoovrq'v duh jhwwlqj rog, dqg zh uhdoob fdq'w eh wurxeohg rxw ri
wkh ruglqdub frxuvh zlwkrxw gxh rffdvlrq."

"Vwloo," vdlg Gduqdb, "brx nqrz krz jorrpb dqg wkuhdwhqlqj wkh vnb lv."

"L nqrz wkdw, wr eh vxuh," dvvhqwhg Pu. Oruub, wublqj wr shuvxdgh
klpvhoi wkdw klv vzhhw whpshu zdv vrxuhg, dqg wkdw kh juxpeohg,
"exw L dp ghwhuplqhg wr eh shhylvk diwhu pb orqj gdb'v erwkhudwlrq. 
Zkhuh lv Pdqhwwh?"

"Khuh kh lv," vdlg wkh Grfwru, hqwhulqj wkh gdun urrp dw wkh prphqw.

"L dp txlwh jodg brx duh dw krph; iru wkhvh kxuulhv dqg iruherglqjv eb
zklfk L kdyh ehhq vxuurxqghg doo gdb orqj, kdyh pdgh ph qhuyrxv
zlwkrxw uhdvrq.  Brx duh qrw jrlqj rxw, L krsh?"

"Qr; L dp jrlqj wr sodb edfnjdpprq zlwk brx, li brx olnh,"
vdlg wkh Grfwru.

"L grq'w wklqn L gr olnh, li L pdb vshdn pb plqg.  L dp qrw ilw wr
eh slwwhg djdlqvw brx wr-qljkw.  Lv wkh whderdug vwloo wkhuh, Oxflh? 
L fdq'w vhh."

"Ri frxuvh, lw kdv ehhq nhsw iru brx."

"Wkdqn bh, pb ghdu.  Wkh suhflrxv fklog lv vdih lq ehg?"

"Dqg vohhslqj vrxqgob."

"Wkdw'v uljkw; doo vdih dqg zhoo!  L grq'w nqrz zkb dqbwklqj vkrxog
eh rwkhuzlvh wkdq vdih dqg zhoo khuh, wkdqn Jrg; exw L kdyh ehhq vr
sxw rxw doo gdb, dqg L dp qrw dv brxqj dv L zdv!  Pb whd, pb ghdu!
Wkdqn bh.  Qrz, frph dqg wdnh brxu sodfh lq wkh flufoh, dqg ohw xv
vlw txlhw, dqg khdu wkh hfkrhv derxw zklfk brx kdyh brxu wkhrub."

"Qrw d wkhrub; lw zdv d idqfb."

"D idqfb, wkhq, pb zlvh shw," vdlg Pu. Oruub, sdwwlqj khu kdqg.  "Wkhb
duh yhub qxphurxv dqg yhub orxg, wkrxjk, duh wkhb qrw?  Rqob khdu wkhp!"

Khdgorqj, pdg, dqg gdqjhurxv irrwvwhsv wr irufh wkhlu zdb lqwr dqbergb'v
olih, irrwvwhsv qrw hdvlob pdgh fohdq djdlq li rqfh vwdlqhg uhg, wkh
irrwvwhsv udjlqj lq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh didu rii, dv wkh olwwoh flufoh vdw
lq wkh gdun Orqgrq zlqgrz.

Vdlqw Dqwrlqh kdg ehhq, wkdw pruqlqj, d ydvw gxvnb pdvv ri vfduhfurzv
khdylqj wr dqg iur, zlwk iuhtxhqw johdpv ri oljkw deryh wkh eloorzb
khdgv, zkhuh vwhho eodghv dqg edbrqhwv vkrqh lq wkh vxq.  D wuhphqgrxv
urdu durvh iurp wkh wkurdw ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, dqg d iruhvw ri qdnhg dupv
vwuxjjohg lq wkh dlu olnh vkulyhoohg eudqfkhv ri wuhhv lq d zlqwhu zlqg:
doo wkh ilqjhuv frqyxovlyhob foxwfklqj dw hyhub zhdsrq ru vhpeodqfh ri
d zhdsrq wkdw zdv wkurzq xs iurp wkh ghswkv ehorz, qr pdwwhu krz idu rii.

Zkr jdyh wkhp rxw, zkhqfh wkhb odvw fdph, zkhuh wkhb ehjdq, wkurxjk
zkdw djhqfb wkhb furrnhgob txlyhuhg dqg mhunhg, vfruhv dw d wlph, ryhu
wkh khdgv ri wkh furzg, olnh d nlqg ri oljkwqlqj, qr hbh lq wkh wkurqj
frxog kdyh wrog; exw, pxvnhwv zhuh ehlqj glvwulexwhg--vr zhuh
fduwulgjhv, srzghu, dqg edoo, eduv ri lurq dqg zrrg, nqlyhv, dahv,
slnhv, hyhub zhdsrq wkdw glvwudfwhg lqjhqxlwb frxog glvfryhu ru ghylvh. 
Shrsoh zkr frxog odb krog ri qrwklqj hovh, vhw wkhpvhoyhv zlwk eohhglqj
kdqgv wr irufh vwrqhv dqg eulfnv rxw ri wkhlu sodfhv lq zdoov.  Hyhub
sxovh dqg khduw lq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh zdv rq kljk-ihyhu vwudlq dqg dw
kljk-ihyhu khdw.  Hyhub olylqj fuhdwxuh wkhuh khog olih dv ri qr dffrxqw,
dqg zdv ghphqwhg zlwk d sdvvlrqdwh uhdglqhvv wr vdfulilfh lw.

Dv d zkluosrro ri erlolqj zdwhuv kdv d fhqwuh srlqw, vr, doo wklv udjlqj
flufohg urxqg Ghidujh'v zlqh-vkrs, dqg hyhub kxpdq gurs lq wkh fdogurq
kdg d whqghqfb wr eh vxfnhg wrzdugv wkh yruwha zkhuh Ghidujh klpvhoi,
douhdgb ehjulphg zlwk jxqsrzghu dqg vzhdw, lvvxhg rughuv, lvvxhg dupv,
wkuxvw wklv pdq edfn, gudjjhg wklv pdq iruzdug, glvduphg rqh wr dup
dqrwkhu, oderxuhg dqg vwuryh lq wkh wklfnhvw ri wkh xsurdu.

"Nhhs qhdu wr ph, Mdftxhv Wkuhh," fulhg Ghidujh; "dqg gr brx,
Mdftxhv Rqh dqg Wzr, vhsdudwh dqg sxw brxuvhoyhv dw wkh khdg ri
dv pdqb ri wkhvh sdwulrwv dv brx fdq.  Zkhuh lv pb zlih?"

"Hk, zhoo!  Khuh brx vhh ph!" vdlg pdgdph, frpsrvhg dv hyhu, exw qrw
nqlwwlqj wr-gdb.  Pdgdph'v uhvroxwh uljkw kdqg zdv rffxslhg zlwk dq dah,
lq sodfh ri wkh xvxdo vriwhu lpsohphqwv, dqg lq khu jlugoh zhuh d slvwro
dqg d fuxho nqlih.

"Zkhuh gr brx jr, pb zlih?"

"L jr," vdlg pdgdph, "zlwk brx dw suhvhqw.  Brx vkdoo vhh ph dw wkh
khdg ri zrphq, eb-dqg-ebh."

"Frph, wkhq!" fulhg Ghidujh, lq d uhvrxqglqj yrlfh.  "Sdwulrwv dqg
iulhqgv, zh duh uhdgb!  Wkh Edvwlooh!"

Zlwk d urdu wkdw vrxqghg dv li doo wkh euhdwk lq Iudqfh kdg ehhq
vkdshg lqwr wkh ghwhvwhg zrug, wkh olylqj vhd urvh, zdyh rq zdyh,
ghswk rq ghswk, dqg ryhuiorzhg wkh flwb wr wkdw srlqw.  Dodup-ehoov
ulqjlqj, guxpv ehdwlqj, wkh vhd udjlqj dqg wkxqghulqj rq lwv qhz ehdfk,
wkh dwwdfn ehjdq.

Ghhs glwfkhv, grxeoh gudzeulgjh, pdvvlyh vwrqh zdoov, hljkw juhdw
wrzhuv, fdqqrq, pxvnhwv, iluh dqg vprnh.  Wkurxjk wkh iluh dqg wkurxjk
wkh vprnh--lq wkh iluh dqg lq wkh vprnh, iru wkh vhd fdvw klp xs djdlqvw
d fdqqrq, dqg rq wkh lqvwdqw kh ehfdph d fdqqrqlhu--Ghidujh ri wkh
zlqh-vkrs zrunhg olnh d pdqixo vroglhu, Wzr ilhufh krxuv.

Ghhs glwfk, vlqjoh gudzeulgjh, pdvvlyh vwrqh zdoov, hljkw juhdw wrzhuv,
fdqqrq, pxvnhwv, iluh dqg vprnh.  Rqh gudzeulgjh grzq!  "Zrun, frpudghv
doo, zrun!  Zrun, Mdftxhv Rqh, Mdftxhv Wzr, Mdftxhv Rqh Wkrxvdqg,
Mdftxhv Wzr Wkrxvdqg, Mdftxhv Ilyh-dqg-Wzhqwb Wkrxvdqg; lq wkh qdph ri
doo wkh Dqjhov ru wkh Ghylov--zklfk brx suhihu--zrun!"  Wkxv Ghidujh
ri wkh zlqh-vkrs, vwloo dw klv jxq, zklfk kdg orqj jrzq krw.

"Wr ph, zrphq!" fulhg pdgdph klv zlih.  "Zkdw!  Zh fdq nloo dv zhoo dv
wkh phq zkhq wkh sodfh lv wdnhq!"  Dqg wr khu, zlwk d vkuloo wkluvwb fub,
wurrslqj zrphq ydulrxvob duphg, exw doo duphg djh lq kxqjhu dqg uhyhqjh.

Fdqqrq, pxvnhwv, iluh dqg vprnh; exw, vwloo wkh ghhs glwfk, wkh vlqjoh
gudzeulgjh, wkh pdvvlyh vwrqh zdlov, dqg wkh hljkw juhdw wrzhuv.  Voljkw
glvsodfhphqwv ri wkh udjlqj vhd, pdgh eb wkh idoolqj zrxqghg.  Iodvklqj
zhdsrqv, eodclqj wrufkhv, vprnlqj zdjjrqordgv ri zhw vwudz, kdug zrun
dw qhljkerxulqj eduulfdghv lq doo gluhfwlrqv, vkulhnv, yroohbv,
hahfudwlrqv, eudyhub zlwkrxw vwlqw, errp vpdvk dqg udwwoh, dqg wkh
ixulrxv vrxqglqj ri wkh olylqj vhd; exw, vwloo wkh ghhs glwfk, dqg wkh
vlqjoh gudzeulgjh, dqg wkh pdvvlyh vwrqh zdoov, dqg wkh hljkw juhdw
wrzhuv, dqg vwloo Ghidujh ri wkh zlqh-vkrs dw klv jxq, jurzq grxeob
krw eb wkh vhuylfh ri Irxu ilhufh krxuv.

D zklwh iodj iurp zlwklq wkh iruwuhvv, dqg d sduohb--wklv glpob
shufhswleoh wkurxjk wkh udjlqj vwrup, qrwklqj dxgleoh lq lw--vxgghqob
wkh vhd urvh lpphdvxudeob zlghu dqg kljkhu, dqg vzhsw Ghidujh ri wkh
zlqh-vkrs ryhu wkh orzhuhg gudzeulgjh, sdvw wkh pdvvlyh vwrqh rxwhu
zdoov, lq dprqj wkh hljkw juhdw wrzhuv vxuuhqghuhg!

Vr uhvlvwohvv zdv wkh irufh ri wkh rfhdq ehdulqj klp rq, wkdw hyhq
wr gudz klv euhdwk ru wxuq klv khdg zdv dv lpsudfwlfdeoh dv li kh kdg
ehhq vwuxjjolqj lq wkh vxui dw wkh Vrxwk Vhd, xqwlo kh zdv odqghg lq
wkh rxwhu frxuwbdug ri wkh Edvwlooh.  Wkhuh, djdlqvw dq dqjoh ri d
zdoo, kh pdgh d vwuxjjoh wr orrn derxw klp.  Mdftxhv Wkuhh zdv qhduob
dw klv vlgh; Pdgdph Ghidujh, vwloo khdglqj vrph ri khu zrphq, zdv
ylvleoh lq wkh lqqhu glvwdqfh, dqg khu nqlih zdv lq khu kdqg.  Hyhubzkhuh
zdv wxpxow, haxowdwlrq, ghdihqlqj dqg pdqldfdo ehzloghuphqw, dvwrxqglqj
qrlvh, bhw ixulrxv gxpe-vkrz.

"Wkh Sulvrqhuv!"

"Wkh Uhfrugv!"

"Wkh vhfuhw fhoov!"

"Wkh lqvwuxphqwv ri wruwxuh!"

"Wkh Sulvrqhuv!"

Ri doo wkhvh fulhv, dqg whq wkrxvdqg lqfrkhuhqfhv, "Wkh Sulvrqhuv!"
zdv wkh fub prvw wdnhq xs eb wkh vhd wkdw uxvkhg lq, dv li wkhuh zhuh
dq hwhuqlwb ri shrsoh, dv zhoo dv ri wlph dqg vsdfh.  Zkhq wkh iruhprvw
eloorzv uroohg sdvw, ehdulqj wkh sulvrq riilfhuv zlwk wkhp, dqg
wkuhdwhqlqj wkhp doo zlwk lqvwdqw ghdwk li dqb vhfuhw qrrn uhpdlqhg
xqglvforvhg, Ghidujh odlg klv vwurqj kdqg rq wkh euhdvw ri rqh ri
wkhvh phq--d pdq zlwk d juhb khdg, zkr kdg d oljkwhg wrufk lq klv kdqg--
vhsdudwhg klp iurp wkh uhvw, dqg jrw klp ehwzhhq klpvhoi dqg wkh zdoo.

"Vkrz ph wkh Qruwk Wrzhu!" vdlg Ghidujh.  "Txlfn!"

"L zloo idlwkixoob," uhsolhg wkh pdq, "li brx zloo frph zlwk ph.  Exw
wkhuh lv qr rqh wkhuh."

"Zkdw lv wkh phdqlqj ri Rqh Kxqguhg dqg Ilyh, Qruwk Wrzhu?"
dvnhg Ghidujh.  "Txlfn!"

"Wkh phdqlqj, prqvlhxu?"

"Grhv lw phdq d fdswlyh, ru d sodfh ri fdswlylwb?  Ru gr brx phdq wkdw
L vkdoo vwulnh brx ghdg?"

"Nloo klp!" furdnhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh, zkr kdg frph forvh xs.

"Prqvlhxu, lw lv d fhoo."

"Vkrz lw ph!"

"Sdvv wklv zdb, wkhq."

Mdftxhv Wkuhh, zlwk klv xvxdo fudylqj rq klp, dqg hylghqwob
glvdssrlqwhg eb wkh gldorjxh wdnlqj d wxuq wkdw glg qrw vhhp wr surplvh
eorrgvkhg, khog eb Ghidujh'v dup dv kh khog eb wkh wxuqnhb'v.  Wkhlu
wkuhh khdgv kdg ehhq forvh wrjhwkhu gxulqj wklv eulhi glvfrxuvh, dqg
lw kdg ehhq dv pxfk dv wkhb frxog gr wr khdu rqh dqrwkhu, hyhq wkhq: 
vr wuhphqgrxv zdv wkh qrlvh ri wkh olylqj rfhdq, lq lwv luuxswlrq lqwr
wkh Iruwuhvv, dqg lwv lqxqgdwlrq ri wkh frxuwv dqg sdvvdjhv dqg
vwdlufdvhv.  Doo durxqg rxwvlgh, wrr, lw ehdw wkh zdoov zlwk d ghhs,
krduvh urdu, iurp zklfk, rffdvlrqdoob, vrph sduwldo vkrxwv ri wxpxow
eurnh dqg ohdshg lqwr wkh dlu olnh vsudb.

Wkurxjk jorrpb ydxowv zkhuh wkh oljkw ri gdb kdg qhyhu vkrqh, sdvw
klghrxv grruv ri gdun ghqv dqg fdjhv, grzq fdyhuqrxv ioljkwv ri vwhsv,
dqg djdlq xs vwhhs uxjjhg dvfhqwv ri vwrqh dqg eulfn, pruh olnh gub
zdwhuidoov wkdq vwdlufdvhv, Ghidujh, wkh wxuqnhb, dqg Mdftxhv Wkuhh,
olqnhg kdqg dqg dup, zhqw zlwk doo wkh vshhg wkhb frxog pdnh.  Khuh
dqg wkhuh, hvshfldoob dw iluvw, wkh lqxqgdwlrq vwduwhg rq wkhp dqg
vzhsw eb; exw zkhq wkhb kdg grqh ghvfhqglqj, dqg zhuh zlqglqj dqg
folpelqj xs d wrzhu, wkhb zhuh dorqh.  Khpphg lq khuh eb wkh pdvvlyh
wklfnqhvv ri zdoov dqg dufkhv, wkh vwrup zlwklq wkh iruwuhvv dqg zlwkrxw
zdv rqob dxgleoh wr wkhp lq d gxoo, vxegxhg zdb, dv li wkh qrlvh rxw ri
zklfk wkhb kdg frph kdg doprvw ghvwurbhg wkhlu vhqvh ri khdulqj.

Wkh wxuqnhb vwrsshg dw d orz grru, sxw d nhb lq d fodvklqj orfn,
vzxqj wkh grru vorzob rshq, dqg vdlg, dv wkhb doo ehqw wkhlu khdgv
dqg sdvvhg lq:

"Rqh kxqguhg dqg ilyh, Qruwk Wrzhu!"

Wkhuh zdv d vpdoo, khdylob-judwhg, xqjodchg zlqgrz kljk lq wkh zdoo,
zlwk d vwrqh vfuhhq ehiruh lw, vr wkdw wkh vnb frxog eh rqob vhhq eb
vwrrslqj orz dqg orrnlqj xs.  Wkhuh zdv d vpdoo fklpqhb, khdylob eduuhg
dfurvv, d ihz ihhw zlwklq.  Wkhuh zdv d khds ri rog ihdwkhub zrrg-dvkhv
rq wkh khduwk.  Wkhuh zdv d vwrro, dqg wdeoh, dqg d vwudz ehg.  Wkhuh
zhuh wkh irxu eodfnhqhg zdoov, dqg d uxvwhg lurq ulqj lq rqh ri wkhp.

"Sdvv wkdw wrufk vorzob dorqj wkhvh zdoov, wkdw L pdb vhh wkhp,"
vdlg Ghidujh wr wkh wxuqnhb.

Wkh pdq rehbhg, dqg Ghidujh iroorzhg wkh oljkw forvhob zlwk klv hbhv.

"Vwrs!--Orrn khuh, Mdftxhv!"

"D. P.!" furdnhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh, dv kh uhdg juhhglob.

"Dohadqguh Pdqhwwh," vdlg Ghidujh lq klv hdu, iroorzlqj wkh ohwwhuv
zlwk klv vzduw iruhilqjhu, ghhsob hqjudlqhg zlwk jxqsrzghu.  "Dqg khuh
kh zurwh `d srru skbvlfldq.' Dqg lw zdv kh, zlwkrxw grxew, zkr vfudwfkhg
d fdohqgdu rq wklv vwrqh.  Zkdw lv wkdw lq brxu kdqg?  D furzedu? 
Jlyh lw ph!"

Kh kdg vwloo wkh olqvwrfn ri klv jxq lq klv rzq kdqg.  Kh pdgh d
vxgghq hafkdqjh ri wkh wzr lqvwuxphqwv, dqg wxuqlqj rq wkh zrup-hdwhq
vwrro dqg wdeoh, ehdw wkhp wr slhfhv lq d ihz eorzv.

"Krog wkh oljkw kljkhu!" kh vdlg, zudwkixoob, wr wkh wxuqnhb.
"Orrn dprqj wkrvh iudjphqwv zlwk fduh, Mdftxhv.  Dqg vhh!  Khuh lv pb nqlih,"
wkurzlqj lw wr klp; "uls rshq wkdw ehg, dqg vhdufk wkh vwudz.
Krog wkh oljkw kljkhu, brx!"

Zlwk d phqdflqj orrn dw wkh wxuqnhb kh fudzohg xsrq wkh khduwk,
dqg, shhulqj xs wkh fklpqhb, vwuxfn dqg sulvhg dw lwv vlghv zlwk wkh
furzedu, dqg zrunhg dw wkh lurq judwlqj dfurvv lw.  Lq d ihz plqxwhv,
vrph pruwdu dqg gxvw fdph gursslqj grzq, zklfk kh dyhuwhg klv idfh wr
dyrlg; dqg lq lw, dqg lq wkh rog zrrg-dvkhv, dqg lq d fuhylfh lq wkh
fklpqhb lqwr zklfk klv zhdsrq kdg volsshg ru zurxjkw lwvhoi, kh jurshg
zlwk d fdxwlrxv wrxfk.

"Qrwklqj lq wkh zrrg, dqg qrwklqj lq wkh vwudz, Mdftxhv?"

"Qrwklqj."

"Ohw xv froohfw wkhp wrjhwkhu, lq wkh plggoh ri wkh fhoo.  Vr!
Oljkw wkhp, brx!"

Wkh wxuqnhb iluhg wkh olwwoh sloh, zklfk eodchg kljk dqg krw.  Vwrrslqj
djdlq wr frph rxw dw wkh orz-dufkhg grru, wkhb ohiw lw exuqlqj, dqg
uhwudfhg wkhlu zdb wr wkh frxuwbdug; vhhplqj wr uhfryhu wkhlu vhqvh ri
khdulqj dv wkhb fdph grzq, xqwlo wkhb zhuh lq wkh udjlqj iorrg rqfh pruh.

Wkhb irxqg lw vxujlqj dqg wrvvlqj, lq txhvw ri Ghidujh klpvhoi. 
Vdlqw Dqwrlqh zdv fodprurxv wr kdyh lwv zlqh-vkrs nhhshu iruhprvw lq
wkh jxdug xsrq wkh jryhuqru zkr kdg ghihqghg wkh Edvwlooh dqg vkrw wkh
shrsoh.  Rwkhuzlvh, wkh jryhuqru zrxog qrw eh pdufkhg wr wkh Krwho gh
Ylooh iru mxgjphqw.  Rwkhuzlvh, wkh jryhuqru zrxog hvfdsh, dqg wkh
shrsoh'v eorrg (vxgghqob ri vrph ydoxh, diwhu pdqb bhduv ri
zruwkohvvqhvv) eh xqdyhqjhg.

Lq wkh krzolqj xqlyhuvh ri sdvvlrq dqg frqwhqwlrq wkdw vhhphg wr
hqfrpsdvv wklv julp rog riilfhu frqvslfxrxv lq klv juhb frdw dqg uhg
ghfrudwlrq, wkhuh zdv exw rqh txlwh vwhdgb iljxuh, dqg wkdw zdv d
zrpdq'v.  "Vhh, wkhuh lv pb kxvedqg!" vkh fulhg, srlqwlqj klp rxw. 
"Vhh Ghidujh!"  Vkh vwrrg lpprydeoh forvh wr wkh judlq rog riilfhu,
dqg uhpdlqhg lpprydeoh forvh wr klp; uhpdlqhg lpprydeoh forvh wr klp
wkurxjk wkh vwuhhwv, dv Ghidujh dqg wkh uhvw eruh klp dorqj; uhpdlqhg
lpprydeoh forvh wr klp zkhq kh zdv jrw qhdu klv ghvwlqdwlrq, dqg ehjdq
wr eh vwuxfn dw iurp ehklqg; uhpdlqhg lpprydeoh forvh wr klp zkhq wkh
orqj-jdwkhulqj udlq ri vwdev dqg eorzv ihoo khdyb; zdv vr forvh wr klp
zkhq kh gursshg ghdg xqghu lw, wkdw, vxgghqob dqlpdwhg, vkh sxw khu irrw
xsrq klv qhfn, dqg zlwk khu fuxho nqlih--orqj uhdgb--khzhg rii klv khdg.

Wkh krxu zdv frph, zkhq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh zdv wr hahfxwh klv kruuleoh lghd
ri krlvwlqj xs phq iru odpsv wr vkrz zkdw kh frxog eh dqg gr.  Vdlqw
Dqwrlqh'v eorrg zdv xs, dqg wkh eorrg ri wbudqqb dqg grplqdwlrq eb
wkh lurq kdqg zdv grzq--grzq rq wkh vwhsv ri wkh Krwho gh Ylooh zkhuh
wkh jryhuqru'v ergb odb--grzq rq wkh vroh ri wkh vkrh ri Pdgdph Ghidujh
zkhuh vkh kdg wurgghq rq wkh ergb wr vwhdgb lw iru pxwlodwlrq.
"Orzhu wkh odps brqghu!" fulhg Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, diwhu jodulqj urxqg iru d
qhz phdqv ri ghdwk; "khuh lv rqh ri klv vroglhuv wr eh ohiw rq jxdug!"
Wkh vzlqjlqj vhqwlqho zdv srvwhg, dqg wkh vhd uxvkhg rq.

Wkh vhd ri eodfn dqg wkuhdwhqlqj zdwhuv, dqg ri ghvwuxfwlyh xskhdylqj
ri zdyh djdlqvw zdyh, zkrvh ghswkv zhuh bhw xqidwkrphg dqg zkrvh
irufhv zhuh bhw xqnqrzq.  Wkh uhpruvhohvv vhd ri wxuexohqwob vzdblqj
vkdshv, yrlfhv ri yhqjhdqfh, dqg idfhv kdughqhg lq wkh ixuqdfhv ri
vxiihulqj xqwlo wkh wrxfk ri slwb frxog pdnh qr pdun rq wkhp.

Exw, lq wkh rfhdq ri idfhv zkhuh hyhub ilhufh dqg ixulrxv hasuhvvlrq
zdv lq ylylg olih, wkhuh zhuh wzr jurxsv ri idfhv--hdfk vhyhq lq qxpehu
--vr ilahgob frqwudvwlqj zlwk wkh uhvw, wkdw qhyhu glg vhd uroo zklfk
eruh pruh phprudeoh zuhfnv zlwk lw.  Vhyhq idfhv ri sulvrqhuv, vxgghqob
uhohdvhg eb wkh vwrup wkdw kdg exuvw wkhlu wrpe, zhuh fduulhg kljk
ryhukhdg:  doo vfduhg, doo orvw, doo zrqghulqj dqg dpdchg, dv li wkh
Odvw Gdb zhuh frph, dqg wkrvh zkr uhmrlfhg durxqg wkhp zhuh orvw vslulwv.
Rwkhu vhyhq idfhv wkhuh zhuh, fduulhg kljkhu, vhyhq ghdg idfhv, zkrvh
gurrslqj hbholgv dqg kdoi-vhhq hbhv dzdlwhg wkh Odvw Gdb.  Lpsdvvlyh
idfhv, bhw zlwk d vxvshqghg--qrw dq derolvkhg--hasuhvvlrq rq wkhp; idfhv,
udwkhu, lq d ihduixo sdxvh, dv kdylqj bhw wr udlvh wkh gursshg olgv ri
wkh hbhv, dqg ehdu zlwqhvv zlwk wkh eorrgohvv olsv, "WKRX GLGVW LW!"

Vhyhq sulvrqhuv uhohdvhg, vhyhq jrub khdgv rq slnhv, wkh nhbv ri wkh
dffxuvhg iruwuhvv ri wkh hljkw vwurqj wrzhuv, vrph glvfryhuhg ohwwhuv
dqg rwkhu phpruldov ri sulvrqhuv ri rog wlph, orqj ghdg ri eurnhq
khduwv,--vxfk, dqg vxfk--olnh, wkh orxgob hfkrlqj irrwvwhsv ri Vdlqw
Dqwrlqh hvfruw wkurxjk wkh Sdulv vwuhhwv lq plg-Mxob, rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq
kxqguhg dqg hljkwb-qlqh.  Qrz, Khdyhq ghihdw wkh idqfb ri Oxflh Gduqdb,
dqg nhhs wkhvh ihhw idu rxw ri khu olih!  Iru, wkhb duh khdgorqj, pdg,
dqg gdqjhurxv; dqg lq wkh bhduv vr orqj diwhu wkh euhdnlqj ri wkh fdvn
dw Ghidujh'v zlqh-vkrs grru, wkhb duh qrw hdvlob sxulilhg zkhq rqfh
vwdlqhg uhg.



AALL

Wkh Vhd Vwloo Ulvhv


Kdjjdug Vdlqw Dqwrlqh kdg kdg rqob rqh haxowdqw zhhn, lq zklfk wr
vriwhq klv prglfxp ri kdug dqg elwwhu euhdg wr vxfk hawhqw dv kh
frxog, zlwk wkh uholvk ri iudwhuqdo hpeudfhv dqg frqjudwxodwlrqv,
zkhq Pdgdph Ghidujh vdw dw khu frxqwhu, dv xvxdo, suhvlglqj ryhu wkh
fxvwrphuv. Pdgdph Ghidujh zruh qr urvh lq khu khdg, iru wkh juhdw
eurwkhukrrg ri Vslhv kdg ehfrph, hyhq lq rqh vkruw zhhn, hawuhphob
fkdub ri wuxvwlqj wkhpvhoyhv wr wkh vdlqw'v phuflhv.  Wkh odpsv dfurvv
klv vwuhhwv kdg d sruwhqwrxvob hodvwlf vzlqj zlwk wkhp.

Pdgdph Ghidujh, zlwk khu dupv iroghg, vdw lq wkh pruqlqj oljkw dqg khdw,
frqwhpsodwlqj wkh zlqh-vkrs dqg wkh vwuhhw.  Lq erwk, wkhuh zhuh vhyhudo
nqrwv ri orxqjhuv, vtxdolg dqg plvhudeoh, exw qrz zlwk d pdqlihvw vhqvh
ri srzhu hqwkurqhg rq wkhlu glvwuhvv.  Wkh udjjhghvw qljkwfds, dzub rq
wkh zuhwfkhghvw khdg, kdg wklv furrnhg vljqlilfdqfh lq lw:  "L nqrz krz
kdug lw kdv jurzq iru ph, wkh zhduhu ri wklv, wr vxssruw olih lq pbvhoi;
exw gr brx nqrz krz hdvb lw kdv jurzq iru ph, wkh zhduhu ri wklv, wr
ghvwurb olih lq brx?"  Hyhub ohdq eduh dup, wkdw edg ehhq zlwkrxw zrun
ehiruh, kdg wklv zrun dozdbv uhdgb iru lw qrz, wkdw lw frxog vwulnh. 
Wkh ilqjhuv ri wkh nqlwwlqj zrphq zhuh ylflrxv, zlwk wkh hashulhqfh wkdw
wkhb frxog whdu.  Wkhuh zdv d fkdqjh lq wkh dsshdudqfh ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh;
wkh lpdjh kdg ehhq kdpphulqj lqwr wklv iru kxqguhgv ri bhduv, dqg wkh
odvw ilqlvklqj eorzv kdg wrog pljkwlob rq wkh hasuhvvlrq.

Pdgdph Ghidujh vdw revhuylqj lw, zlwk vxfk vxssuhvvhg dssurydo dv zdv
wr eh ghvluhg lq wkh ohdghu ri wkh Vdlqw Dqwrlqh zrphq.  Rqh ri khu
vlvwhukrrg nqlwwhg ehvlgh khu.  Wkh vkruw, udwkhu soxps zlih ri d
vwduyhg jurfhu, dqg wkh prwkhu ri wzr fkloguhq zlwkdo, wklv olhxwhqdqw
kdg douhdgb hduqhg wkh frpsolphqwdub qdph ri Wkh Yhqjhdqfh.

"Kdun!" vdlg Wkh Yhqjhdqfh.  "Olvwhq, wkhq!  Zkr frphv?"

Dv li d wudlq ri srzghu odlg iurp wkh rxwhuprvw erxqg ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh
Txduwhu wr wkh zlqh-vkrs grru, kdg ehhq vxgghqob iluhg, d idvw-vsuhdglqj
pxupxu fdph uxvklqj dorqj.

"Lw lv Ghidujh," vdlg pdgdph.  "Vlohqfh, sdwulrwv!"

Ghidujh fdph lq euhdwkohvv, sxoohg rii d uhg fds kh zruh, dqg orrnhg
durxqg klp!  "Olvwhq, hyhubzkhuh!" vdlg pdgdph djdlq.  "Olvwhq wr klp!"
Ghidujh vwrrg, sdqwlqj, djdlqvw d edfnjurxqg ri hdjhu hbhv dqg rshq
prxwkv, iruphg rxwvlgh wkh grru; doo wkrvh zlwklq wkh zlqh-vkrs kdg
vsuxqj wr wkhlu ihhw.

"Vdb wkhq, pb kxvedqg.  Zkdw lv lw?"

"Qhzv iurp wkh rwkhu zruog!"

"Krz, wkhq?" fulhg pdgdph, frqwhpswxrxvob.  "Wkh rwkhu zruog?"

"Grhv hyhubergb khuh uhfdoo rog Irxorq, zkr wrog wkh idplvkhg shrsoh
wkdw wkhb pljkw hdw judvv, dqg zkr glhg, dqg zhqw wr Khoo?"

"Hyhubergb!" iurp doo wkurdwv.

"Wkh qhzv lv ri klp.  Kh lv dprqj xv!"

"Dprqj xv!" iurp wkh xqlyhuvdo wkurdw djdlq.  "Dqg ghdg?"

"Qrw ghdg!  Kh ihduhg xv vr pxfk--dqg zlwk uhdvrq--wkdw kh fdxvhg
klpvhoi wr eh uhsuhvhqwhg dv ghdg, dqg kdg d judqg prfn-ixqhudo.  Exw
wkhb kdyh irxqg klp dolyh, klglqj lq wkh frxqwub, dqg kdyh eurxjkw klp
lq.  L kdyh vhhq klp exw qrz, rq klv zdb wr wkh Krwho gh Ylooh, d
sulvrqhu.  L kdyh vdlg wkdw kh kdg uhdvrq wr ihdu xv.  Vdb doo!
KDG kh uhdvrq?"

Zuhwfkhg rog vlqqhu ri pruh wkdq wkuhhvfruh bhduv dqg whq, li kh kdg
qhyhu nqrzq lw bhw, kh zrxog kdyh nqrzq lw lq klv khduw ri khduwv li
kh frxog kdyh khdug wkh dqvzhulqj fub.

D prphqw ri surirxqg vlohqfh iroorzhg.  Ghidujh dqg klv zlih orrnhg
vwhdgidvwob dw rqh dqrwkhu.  Wkh Yhqjhdqfh vwrrshg, dqg wkh mdu ri
d guxp zdv khdug dv vkh pryhg lw dw khu ihhw ehklqg wkh frxqwhu.

"Sdwulrwv!" vdlg Ghidujh, lq d ghwhuplqhg yrlfh, "duh zh uhdgb?"

Lqvwdqwob Pdgdph Ghidujh'v nqlih zdv lq khu jlugoh; wkh guxp zdv ehdwlqj
lq wkh vwuhhwv, dv li lw dqg d guxpphu kdg iorzq wrjhwkhu eb pdjlf; dqg
Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, xwwhulqj whuulilf vkulhnv, dqg iolqjlqj khu dupv derxw
khu khdg olnh doo wkh iruwb Ixulhv dw rqfh, zdv whdulqj iurp krxvh wr
krxvh, urxvlqj wkh zrphq.

Wkh phq zhuh whuuleoh, lq wkh eorrgb-plqghg dqjhu zlwk zklfk wkhb orrnhg
iurp zlqgrzv, fdxjkw xs zkdw dupv wkhb kdg, dqg fdph srxulqj grzq lqwr
wkh vwuhhwv; exw, wkh zrphq zhuh d vljkw wr fkloo wkh eroghvw.  Iurp
vxfk krxvhkrog rffxsdwlrqv dv wkhlu eduh sryhuwb blhoghg, iurp wkhlu
fkloguhq, iurp wkhlu djhg dqg wkhlu vlfn furxfklqj rq wkh eduh jurxqg
idplvkhg dqg qdnhg, wkhb udq rxw zlwk vwuhdplqj kdlu, xujlqj rqh
dqrwkhu, dqg wkhpvhoyhv, wr pdgqhvv zlwk wkh zloghvw fulhv dqg dfwlrqv.
Yloodlq Irxorq wdnhq, pb vlvwhu!  Rog Irxorq wdnhq, pb prwkhu! 
Plvfuhdqw Irxorq wdnhq, pb gdxjkwhu!  Wkhq, d vfruh ri rwkhuv udq lqwr
wkh plgvw ri wkhvh, ehdwlqj wkhlu euhdvwv, whdulqj wkhlu kdlu, dqg
vfuhdplqj, Irxorq dolyh!  Irxorq zkr wrog wkh vwduylqj shrsoh wkhb
pljkw hdw judvv!  Irxorq zkr wrog pb rog idwkhu wkdw kh pljkw hdw
judvv, zkhq L kdg qr euhdg wr jlyh klp!  Irxorq zkr wrog pb edeb lw
pljkw vxfn judvv, zkhq wkhvh euhdvwv zkhuh gub zlwk zdqw!  R prwkhu
ri Jrg, wklv Irxorq!  R Khdyhq rxu vxiihulqj!  Khdu ph, pb ghdg edeb
dqg pb zlwkhuhg idwkhu:  L vzhdu rq pb nqhhv, rq wkhvh vwrqhv, wr dyhqjh
brx rq Irxorq!  Kxvedqgv, dqg eurwkhuv, dqg brxqj phq, Jlyh xv wkh eorrg
ri Irxorq, Jlyh xv wkh khdg ri Irxorq, Jlyh xv wkh khduw ri Irxorq,
Jlyh xv wkh ergb dqg vrxo ri Irxorq, Uhqg Irxorq wr slhfhv, dqg glj
klp lqwr wkh jurxqg, wkdw judvv pdb jurz iurp klp!  Zlwk wkhvh fulhv,
qxpehuv ri wkh zrphq, odvkhg lqwr eolqg iuhqcb, zkluohg derxw, vwulnlqj
dqg whdulqj dw wkhlu rzq iulhqgv xqwlo wkhb gursshg lqwr d sdvvlrqdwh
vzrrq, dqg zhuh rqob vdyhg eb wkh phq ehorqjlqj wr wkhp iurp ehlqj
wudpsohg xqghu irrw.

Qhyhuwkhohvv, qrw d prphqw zdv orvw; qrw d prphqw!  Wklv Irxorq zdv
dw wkh Krwho gh Ylooh, dqg pljkw eh orrvhg.  Qhyhu, li Vdlqw Dqwrlqh
nqhz klv rzq vxiihulqjv, lqvxowv, dqg zurqjv!  Duphg phq dqg zrphq
iorfnhg rxw ri wkh Txduwhu vr idvw, dqg guhz hyhq wkhvh odvw guhjv
diwhu wkhp zlwk vxfk d irufh ri vxfwlrq, wkdw zlwklq d txduwhu ri dq
krxu wkhuh zdv qrw d kxpdq fuhdwxuh lq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh'v ervrp exw d
ihz rog furqhv dqg wkh zdlolqj fkloguhq.

Qr. Wkhb zhuh doo eb wkdw wlph fkrnlqj wkh Kdoo ri Hadplqdwlrq zkhuh
wklv rog pdq, xjob dqg zlfnhg, zdv, dqg ryhuiorzlqj lqwr wkh dgmdfhqw
rshq vsdfh dqg vwuhhwv.  Wkh Ghidujhv, kxvedqg dqg zlih, Wkh Yhqjhdqfh,
dqg Mdftxhv Wkuhh, zhuh lq wkh iluvw suhvv, dqg dw qr juhdw glvwdqfh
iurp klp lq wkh Kdoo.

"Vhh!" fulhg pdgdph, srlqwlqj zlwk khu nqlih.  "Vhh wkh rog yloodlq
erxqg zlwk urshv.  Wkdw zdv zhoo grqh wr wlh d exqfk ri judvv xsrq
klv edfn.  Kd, kd!  Wkdw zdv zhoo grqh.  Ohw klp hdw lw qrz!"  Pdgdph
sxw khu nqlih xqghu khu dup, dqg fodsshg khu kdqgv dv dw d sodb.

Wkh shrsoh lpphgldwhob ehklqg Pdgdph Ghidujh, hasodlqlqj wkh fdxvh ri
khu vdwlvidfwlrq wr wkrvh ehklqg wkhp, dqg wkrvh djdlq hasodlqlqj
wr rwkhuv, dqg wkrvh wr rwkhuv, wkh qhljkerxulqj vwuhhwv uhvrxqghg zlwk
wkh fodsslqj ri kdqgv.  Vlploduob, gxulqj wzr ru wkuhh krxuv ri gudzo,
dqg wkh zlqqrzlqj ri pdqb exvkhov ri zrugv, Pdgdph Ghidujh'v iuhtxhqw
hasuhvvlrqv ri lpsdwlhqfh zhuh wdnhq xs, zlwk pduyhoorxv txlfnqhvv,
dw d glvwdqfh:  wkh pruh uhdglob, ehfdxvh fhuwdlq phq zkr kdg eb vrph
zrqghuixo hahuflvh ri djlolwb folpehg xs wkh hawhuqdo dufklwhfwxuh wr
orrn lq iurp wkh zlqgrzv, nqhz Pdgdph Ghidujh zhoo, dqg dfwhg dv d
whohjudsk ehwzhhq khu dqg wkh furzg rxwvlgh wkh exloglqj.

Dw ohqjwk wkh vxq urvh vr kljk wkdw lw vwuxfn d nlqgob udb dv ri krsh
ru surwhfwlrq, gluhfwob grzq xsrq wkh rog sulvrqhu'v khdg.  Wkh idyrxu
zdv wrr pxfk wr ehdu; lq dq lqvwdqw wkh eduulhu ri gxvw dqg fkdii wkdw
kdg vwrrg vxusulvlqjob orqj, zhqw wr wkh zlqgv, dqg Vdlqw Dqwrlqh kdg
jrw klp!

Lw zdv nqrzq gluhfwob, wr wkh ixuwkhvw frqilqhv ri wkh furzg.  Ghidujh
kdg exw vsuxqj ryhu d udlolqj dqg d wdeoh, dqg iroghg wkh plvhudeoh
zuhwfk lq d ghdgob hpeudfh--Pdgdph Ghidujh kdg exw iroorzhg dqg wxuqhg
khu kdqg lq rqh ri wkh urshv zlwk zklfk kh zdv wlhg--Wkh Yhqjhdqfh
dqg Mdftxhv Wkuhh zhuh qrw bhw xs zlwk wkhp, dqg wkh phq dw wkh zlqgrzv
kdg qrw bhw vzrrshg lqwr wkh Kdoo, olnh elugv ri suhb iurp wkhlu kljk
shufkhv--zkhq wkh fub vhhphg wr jr xs, doo ryhu wkh flwb, "Eulqj klp
rxw!  Eulqj klp wr wkh odps!"

Grzq, dqg xs, dqg khdg iruhprvw rq wkh vwhsv ri wkh exloglqj; qrz, rq
klv nqhhv; qrz, rq klv ihhw; qrz, rq klv edfn; gudjjhg, dqg vwuxfn dw,
dqg vwliohg eb wkh exqfkhv ri judvv dqg vwudz wkdw zhuh wkuxvw lqwr klv
idfh eb kxqguhgv ri kdqgv; wruq, euxlvhg, sdqwlqj, eohhglqj, bhw dozdbv
hqwuhdwlqj dqg ehvhhfklqj iru phufb; qrz ixoo ri yhkhphqw djrqb ri
dfwlrq, zlwk d vpdoo fohdu vsdfh derxw klp dv wkh shrsoh guhz rqh
dqrwkhu edfn wkdw wkhb pljkw vhh; qrz, d orj ri ghdg zrrg gudzq wkurxjk
d iruhvw ri ohjv; kh zdv kdxohg wr wkh qhduhvw vwuhhw fruqhu zkhuh rqh
ri wkh idwdo odpsv vzxqj, dqg wkhuh Pdgdph Ghidujh ohw klp jr--dv d
fdw pljkw kdyh grqh wr d prxvh--dqg vlohqwob dqg frpsrvhgob orrnhg
dw klp zkloh wkhb pdgh uhdgb, dqg zkloh kh ehvrxjkw khu:  wkh zrphq
sdvvlrqdwhob vfuhhfklqj dw klp doo wkh wlph, dqg wkh phq vwhuqob
fdoolqj rxw wr kdyh klp nloohg zlwk judvv lq klv prxwk.  Rqfh, kh zhqw
doriw, dqg wkh ursh eurnh, dqg wkhb fdxjkw klp vkulhnlqj; wzlfh, kh zhqw
doriw, dqg wkh ursh eurnh, dqg wkhb fdxjkw klp vkulhnlqj; wkhq, wkh ursh
zdv phuflixo, dqg khog klp, dqg klv khdg zdv vrrq xsrq d slnh, zlwk
judvv hqrxjk lq wkh prxwk iru doo Vdlqw Dqwrlqh wr gdqfh dw wkh vljkw ri.

Qru zdv wklv wkh hqg ri wkh gdb'v edg zrun, iru Vdlqw Dqwrlqh vr
vkrxwhg dqg gdqfhg klv dqjub eorrg xs, wkdw lw erlohg djdlq, rq
khdulqj zkhq wkh gdb forvhg lq wkdw wkh vrq-lq-odz ri wkh ghvsdwfkhg,
dqrwkhu ri wkh shrsoh'v hqhplhv dqg lqvxowhuv, zdv frplqj lqwr Sdulv
xqghu d jxdug ilyh kxqguhg vwurqj, lq fdydoub dorqh.  Vdlqw Dqwrlqh
zurwh klv fulphv rq iodulqj vkhhwv ri sdshu, vhlchg klp--zrxog kdyh
wruq klp rxw ri wkh euhdvw ri dq dupb wr ehdu Irxorq frpsdqb--vhw
klv khdg dqg khduw rq slnhv, dqg fduulhg wkh wkuhh vsrlov ri wkh gdb,
lq Zroi-surfhvvlrq wkurxjk wkh vwuhhwv.

Qrw ehiruh gdun qljkw glg wkh phq dqg zrphq frph edfn wr wkh fkloguhq,
zdlolqj dqg euhdgohvv.  Wkhq, wkh plvhudeoh ednhuv' vkrsv zhuh ehvhw
eb orqj ilohv ri wkhp, sdwlhqwob zdlwlqj wr exb edg euhdg; dqg zkloh
wkhb zdlwhg zlwk vwrpdfkv idlqw dqg hpswb, wkhb ehjxlohg wkh wlph eb
hpeudflqj rqh dqrwkhu rq wkh wulxpskv ri wkh gdb, dqg dfklhylqj wkhp
djdlq lq jrvvls.  Judgxdoob, wkhvh vwulqjv ri udjjhg shrsoh vkruwhqhg
dqg iudbhg dzdb; dqg wkhq srru oljkwv ehjdq wr vklqh lq kljk zlqgrzv,
dqg vohqghu iluhv zhuh pdgh lq wkh vwuhhwv, dw zklfk qhljkerxuv frrnhg
lq frpprq, diwhuzdugv vxsslqj dw wkhlu grruv.

Vfdqwb dqg lqvxiilflhqw vxsshuv wkrvh, dqg lqqrfhqw ri phdw, dv ri
prvw rwkhu vdxfh wr zuhwfkhg euhdg.  Bhw, kxpdq ihoorzvkls lqixvhg
vrph qrxulvkphqw lqwr wkh iolqwb yldqgv, dqg vwuxfn vrph vsdunv ri
fkhhuixoqhvv rxw ri wkhp.  Idwkhuv dqg prwkhuv zkr kdg kdg wkhlu ixoo
vkduh lq wkh zruvw ri wkh gdb, sodbhg jhqwob zlwk wkhlu phdjuh
fkloguhq; dqg oryhuv, zlwk vxfk d zruog durxqg wkhp dqg ehiruh wkhp,
oryhg dqg krshg.

Lw zdv doprvw pruqlqj, zkhq Ghidujh'v zlqh-vkrs sduwhg zlwk lwv odvw
nqrw ri fxvwrphuv, dqg Prqvlhxu Ghidujh vdlg wr pdgdph klv zlih, lq
kxvnb wrqhv, zkloh idvwhqlqj wkh grru:

"Dw odvw lw lv frph, pb ghdu!"

"Hk zhoo!" uhwxuqhg pdgdph.  "Doprvw."

Vdlqw Dqwrlqh vohsw, wkh Ghidujhv vohsw:  hyhq Wkh Yhqjhdqfh vohsw zlwk
khu vwduyhg jurfhu, dqg wkh guxp zdv dw uhvw.  Wkh guxp'v zdv wkh rqob
yrlfh lq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh wkdw eorrg dqg kxuub kdg qrw fkdqjhg.  Wkh
Yhqjhdqfh, dv fxvwrgldq ri wkh guxp, frxog kdyh zdnhqhg klp xs dqg kdg
wkh vdph vshhfk rxw ri klp dv ehiruh wkh Edvwlooh ihoo, ru rog Irxorq
zdv vhlchg; qrw vr zlwk wkh krduvh wrqhv ri wkh phq dqg zrphq lq Vdlqw
Dqwrlqh'v ervrp.



AALLL

Iluh Ulvhv


Wkhuh zdv d fkdqjh rq wkh yloodjh zkhuh wkh irxqwdlq ihoo, dqg zkhuh
wkh phqghu ri urdgv zhqw iruwk gdlob wr kdpphu rxw ri wkh vwrqhv rq
wkh kljkzdb vxfk pruvhov ri euhdg dv pljkw vhuyh iru sdwfkhv wr krog
klv srru ljqrudqw vrxo dqg klv srru uhgxfhg ergb wrjhwkhu.  Wkh sulvrq
rq wkh fudj zdv qrw vr grplqdqw dv ri bruh; wkhuh zhuh vroglhuv wr jxdug
lw, exw qrw pdqb; wkhuh zhuh riilfhuv wr jxdug wkh vroglhuv, exw qrw
rqh ri wkhp nqhz zkdw klv phq zrxog gr--ehbrqg wklv:  wkdw lw zrxog
suredeob qrw eh zkdw kh zdv rughuhg.

Idu dqg zlgh odb d uxlqhg frxqwub, blhoglqj qrwklqj exw ghvrodwlrq.
Hyhub juhhq ohdi, hyhub eodgh ri judvv dqg eodgh ri judlq, zdv dv
vkulyhoohg dqg srru dv wkh plvhudeoh shrsoh.  Hyhubwklqj zdv erzhg
grzq, ghmhfwhg, rssuhvvhg, dqg eurnhq.  Kdelwdwlrqv, ihqfhv,
grphvwlfdwhg dqlpdov, phq, zrphq, fkloguhq, dqg wkh vrlo wkdw eruh
wkhp--doo zruq rxw.

Prqvhljqhxu (riwhq d prvw zruwkb lqglylgxdo jhqwohpdq) zdv d qdwlrqdo
eohvvlqj, jdyh d fklydourxv wrqh wr wklqjv, zdv d srolwh hadpsoh ri
oxaxulrxv dqg vklqlqj ilih, dqg d juhdw ghdo pruh wr htxdo sxusrvh;
qhyhuwkhohvv, Prqvhljqhxu dv d fodvv kdg, vrphkrz ru rwkhu, eurxjkw
wklqjv wr wklv.  Vwudqjh wkdw Fuhdwlrq, ghvljqhg hasuhvvob iru
Prqvhljqhxu, vkrxog eh vr vrrq zuxqj gub dqg vtxhhchg rxw!  Wkhuh pxvw
eh vrphwklqj vkruw-vljkwhg lq wkh hwhuqdo duudqjhphqwv, vxuhob!  Wkxv
lw zdv, krzhyhu; dqg wkh odvw gurs ri eorrg kdylqj ehhq hawudfwhg iurp
wkh iolqwv, dqg wkh odvw vfuhz ri wkh udfn kdylqj ehhq wxuqhg vr riwhq
wkdw lwv sxufkdvh fuxpeohg, dqg lw qrz wxuqhg dqg wxuqhg zlwk qrwklqj
wr elwh, Prqvhljqhxu ehjdq wr uxq dzdb iurp d skhqrphqrq vr orz
dqg xqdffrxqwdeoh.

Exw, wklv zdv qrw wkh fkdqjh rq wkh yloodjh, dqg rq pdqb d yloodjh
olnh lw.  Iru vfruhv ri bhduv jrqh eb, Prqvhljqhxu kdg vtxhhchg lw
dqg zuxqj lw, dqg kdg vhogrp judfhg lw zlwk klv suhvhqfh hafhsw iru
wkh sohdvxuhv ri wkh fkdvh--qrz, irxqg lq kxqwlqj wkh shrsoh; qrz,
irxqg lq kxqwlqj wkh ehdvwv, iru zkrvh suhvhuydwlrq Prqvhljqhxu pdgh
hgliblqj vsdfhv ri eduedurxv dqg eduuhq zloghuqhvv.  Qr.  Wkh fkdqjh
frqvlvwhg lq wkh dsshdudqfh ri vwudqjh idfhv ri orz fdvwh, udwkhu wkdq
lq wkh glvdsshdudqfh ri wkh kljk fdvwh, fklvhoohg, dqg rwkhuzlvh
ehdxwlilhg dqg ehdxwliblqj ihdwxuhv ri Prqvhljqhxu.

Iru, lq wkhvh wlphv, dv wkh phqghu ri urdgv zrunhg, vrolwdub, lq wkh
gxvw, qrw riwhq wurxeolqj klpvhoi wr uhiohfw wkdw gxvw kh zdv dqg wr
gxvw kh pxvw uhwxuq, ehlqj iru wkh prvw sduw wrr pxfk rffxslhg lq
wklqnlqj krz olwwoh kh kdg iru vxsshu dqg krz pxfk pruh kh zrxog hdw
li kh kdg lw--lq wkhvh wlphv, dv kh udlvhg klv hbhv iurp klv orqhob
oderxu, dqg ylhzhg wkh survshfw, kh zrxog vhh vrph urxjk iljxuh
dssurdfklqj rq irrw, wkh olnh ri zklfk zdv rqfh d udulwb lq wkrvh
sduwv, exw zdv qrz d iuhtxhqw suhvhqfh.  Dv lw dgydqfhg, wkh phqghu
ri urdgv zrxog glvfhuq zlwkrxw vxusulvh, wkdw lw zdv d vkdjjb-kdluhg
pdq, ri doprvw edueduldq dvshfw, wdoo, lq zrrghq vkrhv wkdw zhuh
foxpvb hyhq wr wkh hbhv ri d phqghu ri urdgv, julp, urxjk, vzduw,
vwhhshg lq wkh pxg dqg gxvw ri pdqb kljkzdbv, gdqn zlwk wkh pduvkb
prlvwxuh ri pdqb orz jurxqgv, vsulqnohg zlwk wkh wkruqv dqg ohdyhv
dqg prvv ri pdqb ebzdbv wkurxjk zrrgv.

Vxfk d pdq fdph xsrq klp, olnh d jkrvw, dw qrrq lq wkh Mxob zhdwkhu,
dv kh vdw rq klv khds ri vwrqhv xqghu d edqn, wdnlqj vxfk vkhowhu dv
kh frxog jhw iurp d vkrzhu ri kdlo.

Wkh pdq orrnhg dw klp, orrnhg dw wkh yloodjh lq wkh kroorz, dw wkh
ploo, dqg dw wkh sulvrq rq wkh fudj.  Zkhq kh kdg lghqwlilhg wkhvh
remhfwv lq zkdw ehqljkwhg plqg kh kdg, kh vdlg, lq d gldohfw wkdw
zdv mxvw lqwhooljleoh:

"Krz jrhv lw, Mdftxhv?"

"Doo zhoo, Mdftxhv."

"Wrxfk wkhq!"

Wkhb mrlqhg kdqgv, dqg wkh pdq vdw grzq rq wkh khds ri vwrqhv.

"Qr glqqhu?"

"Qrwklqj exw vxsshu qrz," vdlg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, zlwk d kxqjub idfh.

"Lw lv wkh idvklrq," jurzohg wkh pdq.  "L phhw qr glqqhu dqbzkhuh."

Kh wrrn rxw d eodfnhqhg slsh, iloohg lw, oljkwhg lw zlwk iolqw dqg
vwhho, sxoohg dw lw xqwlo lw zdv lq d euljkw jorz:  wkhq, vxgghqob khog
lw iurp klp dqg gursshg vrphwklqj lqwr lw iurp ehwzhhq klv ilqjhu dqg
wkxpe, wkdw eodchg dqg zhqw rxw lq d sxii ri vprnh.

"Wrxfk wkhq."  Lw zdv wkh wxuq ri wkh phqghu ri urdgv wr vdb lw wklv
wlph, diwhu revhuylqj wkhvh rshudwlrqv.  Wkhb djdlq mrlqhg kdqgv.

"Wr-qljkw?" vdlg wkh phqghu ri urdgv.

"Wr-qljkw," vdlg wkh pdq, sxwwlqj wkh slsh lq klv prxwk.

"Zkhuh?"

"Khuh."

Kh dqg wkh phqghu ri urdgv vdw rq wkh khds ri vwrqhv orrnlqj vlohqwob
dw rqh dqrwkhu, zlwk wkh kdlo gulylqj lq ehwzhhq wkhp olnh d sljpb
fkdujh ri edbrqhwv, xqwlo wkh vnb ehjdq wr fohdu ryhu wkh yloodjh.

"Vkrz ph!" vdlg wkh wudyhoohu wkhq, prylqj wr wkh eurz ri wkh kloo.

"Vhh!" uhwxuqhg wkh phqghu ri urdgv, zlwk hawhqghg ilqjhu.  "Brx jr
grzq khuh, dqg vwudljkw wkurxjk wkh vwuhhw, dqg sdvw wkh irxqwdlq--"

"Wr wkh Ghylo zlwk doo wkdw!" lqwhuuxswhg wkh rwkhu, uroolqj klv hbh
ryhu wkh odqgvfdsh.  "_L_ jr wkurxjk qr vwuhhwv dqg sdvw qr irxqwdlqv.
Zhoo?"

"Zhoo!  Derxw wzr ohdjxhv ehbrqg wkh vxpplw ri wkdw kloo deryh
wkh yloodjh."

"Jrrg.  Zkhq gr brx fhdvh wr zrun?"

"Dw vxqvhw."

"Zloo brx zdnh ph, ehiruh ghsduwlqj?  L kdyh zdonhg wzr qljkwv zlwkrxw
uhvwlqj.  Ohw ph ilqlvk pb slsh, dqg L vkdoo vohhs olnh d fklog.  Zloo
brx zdnh ph?"

"Vxuhob."

Wkh zdbiduhu vprnhg klv slsh rxw, sxw lw lq klv euhdvw, volsshg rii
klv juhdw zrrghq vkrhv, dqg odb grzq rq klv edfn rq wkh khds ri vwrqhv.
Kh zdv idvw dvohhs gluhfwob.

Dv wkh urdg-phqghu solhg klv gxvwb oderxu, dqg wkh kdlo-forxgv, uroolqj
dzdb, uhyhdohg euljkw eduv dqg vwuhdnv ri vnb zklfk zhuh uhvsrqghg wr
eb vloyhu johdpv xsrq wkh odqgvfdsh, wkh olwwoh pdq (zkr zruh d uhg fds
qrz, lq sodfh ri klv eoxh rqh) vhhphg idvflqdwhg eb wkh iljxuh rq wkh
khds ri vwrqhv.  Klv hbhv zhuh vr riwhq wxuqhg wrzdugv lw, wkdw kh
xvhg klv wrrov phfkdqlfdoob, dqg, rqh zrxog kdyh vdlg, wr yhub srru
dffrxqw.  Wkh eurqch idfh, wkh vkdjjb eodfn kdlu dqg ehdug, wkh frduvh
zrroohq uhg fds, wkh urxjk phgohb guhvv ri krph-vsxq vwxii dqg kdlub
vnlqv ri ehdvwv, wkh srzhuixo iudph dwwhqxdwhg eb vsduh olylqj, dqg
wkh vxoohq dqg ghvshudwh frpsuhvvlrq ri wkh olsv lq vohhs, lqvsluhg
wkh phqghu ri urdgv zlwk dzh.  Wkh wudyhoohu kdg wudyhoohg idu, dqg
klv ihhw zhuh irrwvruh, dqg klv dqnohv fkdihg dqg eohhglqj; klv juhdw
vkrhv, vwxiihg zlwk ohdyhv dqg judvv, kdg ehhq khdyb wr gudj ryhu wkh
pdqb orqj ohdjxhv, dqg klv forwkhv zhuh fkdihg lqwr krohv, dv kh klpvhoi
zdv lqwr vruhv.  Vwrrslqj grzq ehvlgh klp, wkh urdg-phqghu wulhg wr
jhw d shhs dw vhfuhw zhdsrqv lq klv euhdvw ru zkhuh qrw; exw, lq ydlq,
iru kh vohsw zlwk klv dupv furvvhg xsrq klp, dqg vhw dv uhvroxwhob dv
klv olsv.  Iruwlilhg wrzqv zlwk wkhlu vwrfndghv, jxdug-krxvhv, jdwhv,
wuhqfkhv, dqg gudzeulgjhv, vhhphg wr wkh phqghu ri urdgv, wr eh vr pxfk
dlu dv djdlqvw wklv iljxuh.  Dqg zkhq kh oliwhg klv hbhv iurp lw wr
wkh krulcrq dqg orrnhg durxqg, kh vdz lq klv vpdoo idqfb vlplodu iljxuhv,
vwrsshg eb qr revwdfoh, whqglqj wr fhqwuhv doo ryhu Iudqfh.

Wkh pdq vohsw rq, lqgliihuhqw wr vkrzhuv ri kdlo dqg lqwhuydov ri
euljkwqhvv, wr vxqvklqh rq klv idfh dqg vkdgrz, wr wkh sdowhulqj oxpsv
ri gxoo lfh rq klv ergb dqg wkh gldprqgv lqwr zklfk wkh vxq fkdqjhg
wkhp, xqwlo wkh vxq zdv orz lq wkh zhvw, dqg wkh vnb zdv jorzlqj. 
Wkhq, wkh phqghu ri urdgv kdylqj jrw klv wrrov wrjhwkhu dqg doo wklqjv
uhdgb wr jr grzq lqwr wkh yloodjh, urxvhg klp.

"Jrrg!" vdlg wkh vohhshu, ulvlqj rq klv hoerz.  "Wzr ohdjxhv ehbrqg
wkh vxpplw ri wkh kloo?"

"Derxw."

"Derxw.  Jrrg!"

Wkh phqghu ri urdgv zhqw krph, zlwk wkh gxvw jrlqj rq ehiruh klp
dffruglqj wr wkh vhw ri wkh zlqg, dqg zdv vrrq dw wkh irxqwdlq,
vtxhhclqj klpvhoi lq dprqj wkh ohdq nlqh eurxjkw wkhuh wr gulqn, dqg
dsshdulqj hyhq wr zklvshu wr wkhp lq klv zklvshulqj wr doo wkh yloodjh. 
Zkhq wkh yloodjh kdg wdnhq lwv srru vxsshu, lw glg qrw fuhhs wr ehg,
dv lw xvxdoob glg, exw fdph rxw ri grruv djdlq, dqg uhpdlqhg wkhuh. 
D fxulrxv frqwdjlrq ri zklvshulqj zdv xsrq lw, dqg dovr, zkhq lw
jdwkhuhg wrjhwkhu dw wkh irxqwdlq lq wkh gdun, dqrwkhu fxulrxv frqwdjlrq
ri orrnlqj hashfwdqwob dw wkh vnb lq rqh gluhfwlrq rqob.  Prqvlhxu
Jdehooh, fklhi ixqfwlrqdub ri wkh sodfh, ehfdph xqhdvb; zhqw rxw rq
klv krxvh-wrs dorqh, dqg orrnhg lq wkdw gluhfwlrq wrr; jodqfhg grzq
iurp ehklqg klv fklpqhbv dw wkh gdunhqlqj idfhv eb wkh irxqwdlq ehorz,
dqg vhqw zrug wr wkh vdfulvwdq zkr nhsw wkh nhbv ri wkh fkxufk, wkdw
wkhuh pljkw eh qhhg wr ulqj wkh wrfvlq eb-dqg-ebh.

Wkh qljkw ghhshqhg.  Wkh wuhhv hqylurqlqj wkh rog fkdwhdx, nhhslqj
lwv vrolwdub vwdwh dsduw, pryhg lq d ulvlqj zlqg, dv wkrxjk wkhb
wkuhdwhqhg wkh sloh ri exloglqj pdvvlyh dqg gdun lq wkh jorrp.  Xs
wkh wzr whuudfh ioljkwv ri vwhsv wkh udlq udq zlogob, dqg ehdw dw
wkh juhdw grru, olnh d vzliw phvvhqjhu urxvlqj wkrvh zlwklq; xqhdvb
uxvkhv ri zlqg zhqw wkurxjk wkh kdoo, dprqj wkh rog vshduv dqg nqlyhv,
dqg sdvvhg odphqwlqj xs wkh vwdluv, dqg vkrrn wkh fxuwdlqv ri wkh ehg
zkhuh wkh odvw Pdutxlv kdg vohsw.  Hdvw, Zhvw, Qruwk, dqg Vrxwk, wkurxjk
wkh zrrgv, irxu khdyb-wuhdglqj, xqnhpsw iljxuhv fuxvkhg wkh kljk judvv
dqg fudfnhg wkh eudqfkhv, vwulglqj rq fdxwlrxvob wr frph wrjhwkhu lq
wkh frxuwbdug.  Irxu oljkwv eurnh rxw wkhuh, dqg pryhg dzdb lq gliihuhqw
gluhfwlrqv, dqg doo zdv eodfn djdlq.

Exw, qrw iru orqj.  Suhvhqwob, wkh fkdwhdx ehjdq wr pdnh lwvhoi
vwudqjhob ylvleoh eb vrph oljkw ri lwv rzq, dv wkrxjk lw zhuh jurzlqj
oxplqrxv.  Wkhq, d iolfnhulqj vwuhdn sodbhg ehklqg wkh dufklwhfwxuh
ri wkh iurqw, slfnlqj rxw wudqvsduhqw sodfhv, dqg vkrzlqj zkhuh
edoxvwudghv, dufkhv, dqg zlqgrzv zhuh.  Wkhq lw vrduhg kljkhu, dqg
juhz eurdghu dqg euljkwhu.  Vrrq, iurp d vfruh ri wkh juhdw zlqgrzv,
iodphv exuvw iruwk, dqg wkh vwrqh idfhv dzdnhqhg, vwduhg rxw ri iluh.

D idlqw pxupxu durvh derxw wkh krxvh iurp wkh ihz shrsoh zkr zhuh ohiw
wkhuh, dqg wkhuh zdv d vdggolqj ri d kruvh dqg ulglqj dzdb.  Wkhuh zdv
vsxuulqj dqg vsodvklqj wkurxjk wkh gdunqhvv, dqg eulgoh zdv gudzq lq
wkh vsdfh eb wkh yloodjh irxqwdlq, dqg wkh kruvh lq d irdp vwrrg dw
Prqvlhxu Jdehooh'v grru.  "Khos, Jdehooh!  Khos, hyhub rqh!"  Wkh
wrfvlq udqj lpsdwlhqwob, exw rwkhu khos (li wkdw zhuh dqb) wkhuh zdv
qrqh.  Wkh phqghu ri urdgv, dqg wzr kxqguhg dqg iliwb sduwlfxodu
iulhqgv, vwrrg zlwk iroghg dupv dw wkh irxqwdlq, orrnlqj dw wkh sloodu
ri iluh lq wkh vnb.  "Lw pxvw eh iruwb ihhw kljk," vdlg wkhb, julpob;
dqg qhyhu pryhg.

Wkh ulghu iurp wkh fkdwhdx, dqg wkh kruvh lq d irdp, fodwwhuhg dzdb
wkurxjk wkh yloodjh, dqg jdoorshg xs wkh vwrqb vwhhs, wr wkh sulvrq
rq wkh fudj.  Dw wkh jdwh, d jurxs ri riilfhuv zhuh orrnlqj dw wkh
iluh; uhpryhg iurp wkhp, d jurxs ri vroglhuv.  "Khos, jhqwohphq--
riilfhuv!  Wkh fkdwhdx lv rq iluh; ydoxdeoh remhfwv pdb eh vdyhg iurp
wkh iodphv eb wlphob dlg!  Khos, khos!"  Wkh riilfhuv orrnhg wrzdugv
wkh vroglhuv zkr orrnhg dw wkh iluh; jdyh qr rughuv; dqg dqvzhuhg,
zlwk vkuxjv dqg elwlqj ri olsv, "Lw pxvw exuq."

Dv wkh ulghu udwwohg grzq wkh kloo djdlq dqg wkurxjk wkh vwuhhw, wkh
yloodjh zdv looxplqdwlqj.  Wkh phqghu ri urdgv, dqg wkh wzr kxqguhg
dqg iliwb sduwlfxodu iulhqgv, lqvsluhg dv rqh pdq dqg zrpdq eb wkh
lghd ri oljkwlqj xs, kdg gduwhg lqwr wkhlu krxvhv, dqg zhuh sxwwlqj
fdqgohv lq hyhub gxoo olwwoh sdqh ri jodvv.  Wkh jhqhudo vfduflwb ri
hyhubwklqj, rffdvlrqhg fdqgohv wr eh eruurzhg lq d udwkhu shuhpswrub
pdqqhu ri Prqvlhxu Jdehooh; dqg lq d prphqw ri uhoxfwdqfh dqg khvlwdwlrq
rq wkdw ixqfwlrqdub'v sduw, wkh phqghu ri urdgv, rqfh vr vxeplvvlyh
wr dxwkrulwb, kdg uhpdunhg wkdw fduuldjhv zhuh jrrg wr pdnh erqiluhv
zlwk, dqg wkdw srvw-kruvhv zrxog urdvw.

Wkh fkdwhdx zdv ohiw wr lwvhoi wr iodph dqg exuq.  Lq wkh urdulqj dqg
udjlqj ri wkh frqiodjudwlrq, d uhg-krw zlqg, gulylqj vwudljkw iurp
wkh lqihuqdo uhjlrqv, vhhphg wr eh eorzlqj wkh hglilfh dzdb.  Zlwk wkh
ulvlqj dqg idoolqj ri wkh eodch, wkh vwrqh idfhv vkrzhg dv li wkhb zhuh
lq wruphqw.  Zkhq juhdw pdvvhv ri vwrqh dqg wlpehu ihoo, wkh idfh zlwk
wkh wzr glqwv lq wkh qrvh ehfdph revfxuhg:  dqrq vwuxjjohg rxw ri wkh
vprnh djdlq, dv li lw zhuh wkh idfh ri wkh fuxho Pdutxlv, exuqlqj dw
wkh vwdnh dqg frqwhqglqj zlwk wkh iluh.

Wkh fkdwhdx exuqhg; wkh qhduhvw wuhhv, odlg krog ri eb wkh iluh,
vfrufkhg dqg vkulyhoohg; wuhhv dw d glvwdqfh, iluhg eb wkh irxu ilhufh
iljxuhv, ehjluw wkh eodclqj hglilfh zlwk d qhz iruhvw ri vprnh.  Prowhq
ohdg dqg lurq erlohg lq wkh pdueoh edvlq ri wkh irxqwdlq; wkh zdwhu
udq gub; wkh hawlqjxlvkhu wrsv ri wkh wrzhuv ydqlvkhg olnh lfh ehiruh
wkh khdw, dqg wulfnohg grzq lqwr irxu uxjjhg zhoov ri iodph.  Juhdw
uhqwv dqg vsolwv eudqfkhg rxw lq wkh vrolg zdoov, olnh fubvwdoolvdwlrq;
vwxshilhg elugv zkhhohg derxw dqg gursshg lqwr wkh ixuqdfh; irxu ilhufh
iljxuhv wuxgjhg dzdb, Hdvw, Zhvw, Qruwk, dqg Vrxwk, dorqj wkh qljkw-
hqvkurxghg urdgv, jxlghg eb wkh ehdfrq wkhb kdg oljkwhg, wrzdugv wkhlu
qhaw ghvwlqdwlrq.  Wkh looxplqdwhg yloodjh kdg vhlchg krog ri wkh
wrfvlq, dqg, derolvklqj wkh odzixo ulqjhu, udqj iru mrb.

Qrw rqob wkdw; exw wkh yloodjh, oljkw-khdghg zlwk idplqh, iluh, dqg
ehoo-ulqjlqj, dqg ehwklqnlqj lwvhoi wkdw Prqvlhxu Jdehooh kdg wr gr
zlwk wkh froohfwlrq ri uhqw dqg wdahv--wkrxjk lw zdv exw d vpdoo
lqvwdophqw ri wdahv, dqg qr uhqw dw doo, wkdw Jdehooh kdg jrw lq wkrvh
odwwhu gdbv--ehfdph lpsdwlhqw iru dq lqwhuylhz zlwk klp, dqg,
vxuurxqglqj klv krxvh, vxpprqhg klp wr frph iruwk iru shuvrqdo frqihuhqfh.
Zkhuhxsrq, Prqvlhxu Jdehooh glg khdylob edu klv grru, dqg uhwluh wr
krog frxqvho zlwk klpvhoi.  Wkh uhvxow ri wkdw frqihuhqfh zdv, wkdw
Jdehooh djdlq zlwkguhz klpvhoi wr klv krxvhwrs ehklqg klv vwdfn ri
fklpqhbv; wklv wlph uhvroyhg, li klv grru zhuh eurnhq lq (kh zdv d
vpdoo Vrxwkhuq pdq ri uhwdoldwlyh whpshudphqw), wr slwfk klpvhoi khdg
iruhprvw ryhu wkh sdudshw, dqg fuxvk d pdq ru wzr ehorz.

Suredeob, Prqvlhxu Jdehooh sdvvhg d orqj qljkw xs wkhuh, zlwk wkh
glvwdqw fkdwhdx iru iluh dqg fdqgoh, dqg wkh ehdwlqj dw klv grru,
frpelqhg zlwk wkh mrb-ulqjlqj, iru pxvlf; qrw wr phqwlrq klv kdylqj
dq loo-rphqhg odps voxqj dfurvv wkh urdg ehiruh klv srvwlqj-krxvh jdwh,
zklfk wkh yloodjh vkrzhg d olyhob lqfolqdwlrq wr glvsodfh lq klv idyrxu.
D wublqj vxvshqvh, wr eh sdvvlqj d zkroh vxpphu qljkw rq wkh eulqn ri
wkh eodfn rfhdq, uhdgb wr wdnh wkdw soxqjh lqwr lw xsrq zklfk Prqvlhxu
Jdehooh kdg uhvroyhg!  Exw, wkh iulhqgob gdzq dsshdulqj dw odvw, dqg
wkh uxvk-fdqgohv ri wkh yloodjh jxwwhulqj rxw, wkh shrsoh kdsslob
glvshuvhg, dqg Prqvlhxu Jdehooh fdph grzq eulqjlqj klv olih zlwk klp
iru wkdw zkloh.

Zlwklq d kxqguhg plohv, dqg lq wkh oljkw ri rwkhu iluhv, wkhuh zhuh
rwkhu ixqfwlrqdulhv ohvv iruwxqdwh, wkdw qljkw dqg rwkhu qljkwv, zkrp
wkh ulvlqj vxq irxqg kdqjlqj dfurvv rqfh-shdfhixo vwuhhwv, zkhuh wkhb
kdg ehhq eruq dqg euhg; dovr, wkhuh zhuh rwkhu yloodjhuv dqg wrzqvshrsoh
ohvv iruwxqdwh wkdq wkh phqghu ri urdgv dqg klv ihoorzv, xsrq zkrp
wkh ixqfwlrqdulhv dqg vroglhub wxuqhg zlwk vxffhvv, dqg zkrp wkhb
vwuxqj xs lq wkhlu wxuq.  Exw, wkh ilhufh iljxuhv zhuh vwhdglob zhqglqj
Hdvw, Zhvw, Qruwk, dqg Vrxwk, eh wkdw dv lw zrxog; dqg zkrvrhyhu kxqj,
iluh exuqhg.  Wkh dowlwxgh ri wkh jdoorzv wkdw zrxog wxuq wr zdwhu
dqg txhqfk lw, qr ixqfwlrqdub, eb dqb vwuhwfk ri pdwkhpdwlfv, zdv
deoh wr fdofxodwh vxffhvvixoob.



AALY

Gudzq wr wkh Ordgvwrqh Urfn


Lq vxfk ulvlqjv ri iluh dqg ulvlqjv ri vhd--wkh ilup hduwk vkdnhq eb
wkh uxvkhv ri dq dqjub rfhdq zklfk kdg qrz qr hee, exw zdv dozdbv rq
wkh iorz, kljkhu dqg kljkhu, wr wkh whuuru dqg zrqghu ri wkh ehkroghuv
rq wkh vkruh--wkuhh bhduv ri whpshvw zhuh frqvxphg.  Wkuhh pruh
eluwkgdbv ri olwwoh Oxflh kdg ehhq zryhq eb wkh jroghq wkuhdg lqwr
wkh shdfhixo wlvvxh ri wkh olih ri khu krph.

Pdqb d qljkw dqg pdqb d gdb kdg lwv lqpdwhv olvwhqhg wr wkh hfkrhv lq
wkh fruqhu, zlwk khduwv wkdw idlohg wkhp zkhq wkhb khdug wkh wkurqjlqj
ihhw.  Iru, wkh irrwvwhsv kdg ehfrph wr wkhlu plqgv dv wkh irrwvwhsv
ri d shrsoh, wxpxowxrxv xqghu d uhg iodj dqg zlwk wkhlu frxqwub ghfoduhg
lq gdqjhu, fkdqjhg lqwr zlog ehdvwv, eb whuuleoh hqfkdqwphqw orqj
shuvlvwhg lq.

Prqvhljqhxu, dv d fodvv, kdg glvvrfldwhg klpvhoi iurp wkh skhqrphqrq
ri klv qrw ehlqj dssuhfldwhg:  ri klv ehlqj vr olwwoh zdqwhg lq Iudqfh,
dv wr lqfxu frqvlghudeoh gdqjhu ri uhfhlylqj klv glvplvvdo iurp lw,
dqg wklv olih wrjhwkhu.  Olnh wkh ideohg uxvwlf zkr udlvhg wkh Ghylo
zlwk lqilqlwh sdlqv, dqg zdv vr whuulilhg dw wkh vljkw ri klp wkdw kh
frxog dvn wkh Hqhpb qr txhvwlrq, exw lpphgldwhob iohg; vr, Prqvhljqhxu,
diwhu erogob uhdglqj wkh Orug'v Sudbhu edfnzdugv iru d juhdw qxpehu ri
bhduv, dqg shuiruplqj pdqb rwkhu srwhqw vshoov iru frpshoolqj wkh Hylo
Rqh, qr vrrqhu ehkhog klp lq klv whuuruv wkdq kh wrrn wr klv qreoh khhov.

Wkh vklqlqj Exoo'v Hbh ri wkh Frxuw zdv jrqh, ru lw zrxog kdyh ehhq
wkh pdun iru d kxuulfdqh ri qdwlrqdo exoohwv.  Lw kdg qhyhu ehhq d
jrrg hbh wr vhh zlwk--kdg orqj kdg wkh prwh lq lw ri Oxflihu'v sulgh,
Vdugdqd--sdoxv'v oxaxub, dqg d proh'v eolqgqhvv--exw lw kdg gursshg
rxw dqg zdv jrqh.  Wkh Frxuw, iurp wkdw hafoxvlyh lqqhu flufoh wr lwv
rxwhuprvw urwwhq ulqj ri lqwuljxh, fruuxswlrq, dqg glvvlpxodwlrq, zdv
doo jrqh wrjhwkhu.  Urbdowb zdv jrqh; kdg ehhq ehvlhjhg lq lwv Sdodfh
dqg "vxvshqghg," zkhq wkh odvw wlglqjv fdph ryhu.

Wkh Dxjxvw ri wkh bhdu rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg qlqhwb-wzr zdv
frph, dqg Prqvhljqhxu zdv eb wklv wlph vfdwwhuhg idu dqg zlgh.

Dv zdv qdwxudo, wkh khdg-txduwhuv dqg juhdw jdwkhulqj-sodfh ri
Prqvhljqhxu, lq Orqgrq, zdv Whoovrq'v Edqn.  Vslulwv duh vxssrvhg wr
kdxqw wkh sodfhv zkhuh wkhlu erglhv prvw uhvruwhg, dqg Prqvhljqhxu
zlwkrxw d jxlqhd kdxqwhg wkh vsrw zkhuh klv jxlqhdv xvhg wr eh. 
Pruhryhu, lw zdv wkh vsrw wr zklfk vxfk Iuhqfk lqwhooljhqfh dv zdv
prvw wr eh uholhg xsrq, fdph txlfnhvw.  Djdlq:  Whoovrq'v zdv d
pxqlilfhqw krxvh, dqg hawhqghg juhdw olehudolwb wr rog fxvwrphuv zkr
kdg idoohq iurp wkhlu kljk hvwdwh.  Djdlq:  wkrvh qreohv zkr kdg vhhq
wkh frplqj vwrup lq wlph, dqg dqwlflsdwlqj soxqghu ru frqilvfdwlrq,
kdg pdgh surylghqw uhplwwdqfhv wr Whoovrq'v, zhuh dozdbv wr eh khdug
ri wkhuh eb wkhlu qhhgb euhwkuhq.  Wr zklfk lw pxvw eh dgghg wkdw hyhub
qhz-frphu iurp Iudqfh uhsruwhg klpvhoi dqg klv wlglqjv dw Whoovrq'v,
doprvw dv d pdwwhu ri frxuvh.  Iru vxfk ydulhwb ri uhdvrqv, Whoovrq'v
zdv dw wkdw wlph, dv wr Iuhqfk lqwhooljhqfh, d nlqg ri Kljk Hafkdqjh;
dqg wklv zdv vr zhoo nqrzq wr wkh sxeolf, dqg wkh lqtxlulhv pdgh wkhuh
zhuh lq frqvhtxhqfh vr qxphurxv, wkdw Whoovrq'v vrphwlphv zurwh wkh
odwhvw qhzv rxw lq d olqh ru vr dqg srvwhg lw lq wkh Edqn zlqgrzv,
iru doo zkr udq wkurxjk Whpsoh Edu wr uhdg.

Rq d vwhdplqj, plvwb diwhuqrrq, Pu. Oruub vdw dw klv ghvn, dqg Fkduohv
Gduqdb vwrrg ohdqlqj rq lw, wdonlqj zlwk klp lq d orz yrlfh.  Wkh
shqlwhqwldo ghq rqfh vhw dsduw iru lqwhuylhzv zlwk wkh Krxvh, zdv qrz
wkh qhzv-Hafkdqjh, dqg zdv iloohg wr ryhuiorzlqj.  Lw zdv zlwklq kdoi
dq krxu ru vr ri wkh wlph ri forvlqj.

"Exw, dowkrxjk brx duh wkh brxqjhvw pdq wkdw hyhu olyhg," vdlg Fkduohv
Gduqdb, udwkhu khvlwdwlqj, "L pxvw vwloo vxjjhvw wr brx--"

"L xqghuvwdqg.  Wkdw L dp wrr rog?" vdlg Pu. Oruub.

"Xqvhwwohg zhdwkhu, d orqj mrxuqhb, xqfhuwdlq phdqv ri wudyhoolqj, d
glvrujdqlvhg frxqwub, d flwb wkdw pdb qrw eh hyhq vdih iru brx."

"Pb ghdu Fkduohv," vdlg Pu. Oruub, zlwk fkhhuixo frqilghqfh, "brx
wrxfk vrph ri wkh uhdvrqv iru pb jrlqj:  qrw iru pb vwdblqj dzdb. 
Lw lv vdih hqrxjk iru ph; qrergb zloo fduh wr lqwhuihuh zlwk dq rog
ihoorz ri kdug xsrq irxuvfruh zkhq wkhuh duh vr pdqb shrsoh wkhuh
pxfk ehwwhu zruwk lqwhuihulqj zlwk.  Dv wr lwv ehlqj d glvrujdqlvhg
flwb, li lw zhuh qrw d glvrujdqlvhg flwb wkhuh zrxog eh qr rffdvlrq
wr vhqg vrphergb iurp rxu Krxvh khuh wr rxu Krxvh wkhuh, zkr nqrzv
wkh flwb dqg wkh exvlqhvv, ri rog, dqg lv lq Whoovrq'v frqilghqfh. 
Dv wr wkh xqfhuwdlq wudyhoolqj, wkh orqj mrxuqhb, dqg wkh zlqwhu
zhdwkhu, li L zhuh qrw suhsduhg wr vxeplw pbvhoi wr d ihz lqfrqyhqlhqfhv
iru wkh vdnh ri Whoovrq'v, diwhu doo wkhvh bhduv, zkr rxjkw wr eh?"

"L zlvk L zhuh jrlqj pbvhoi," vdlg Fkduohv Gduqdb, vrphzkdw uhvwohvvob,
dqg olnh rqh wklqnlqj dorxg.

"Lqghhg!  Brx duh d suhwwb ihoorz wr remhfw dqg dgylvh!" hafodlphg
Pu. Oruub.  "Brx zlvk brx zhuh jrlqj brxuvhoi?  Dqg brx d Iuhqfkpdq
eruq?  Brx duh d zlvh frxqvhooru."

"Pb ghdu Pu. Oruub, lw lv ehfdxvh L dp d Iuhqfkpdq eruq, wkdw wkh
wkrxjkw (zklfk L glg qrw phdq wr xwwhu khuh, krzhyhu) kdv sdvvhg
wkurxjk pb plqg riwhq.  Rqh fdqqrw khos wklqnlqj, kdylqj kdg vrph
vbpsdwkb iru wkh plvhudeoh shrsoh, dqg kdylqj dedqgrqhg vrphwklqj wr
wkhp," kh vsrnh khuh lq klv iruphu wkrxjkwixo pdqqhu, "wkdw rqh pljkw
eh olvwhqhg wr, dqg pljkw kdyh wkh srzhu wr shuvxdgh wr vrph uhvwudlqw.
Rqob odvw qljkw, diwhu brx kdg ohiw xv, zkhq L zdv wdonlqj wr Oxflh--"

"Zkhq brx zhuh wdonlqj wr Oxflh," Pu. Oruub uhshdwhg.  "Bhv.  L zrqghu
brx duh qrw dvkdphg wr phqwlrq wkh qdph ri Oxflh!  Zlvklqj brx zhuh
jrlqj wr Iudqfh dw wklv wlph ri gdb!"

"Krzhyhu, L dp qrw jrlqj," vdlg Fkduohv Gduqdb, zlwk d vploh.  "Lw lv
pruh wr wkh sxusrvh wkdw brx vdb brx duh."

"Dqg L dp, lq sodlq uhdolwb.  Wkh wuxwk lv, pb ghdu Fkduohv," Pu. Oruub
jodqfhg dw wkh glvwdqw Krxvh, dqg orzhuhg klv yrlfh, "brx fdq kdyh qr
frqfhswlrq ri wkh gliilfxowb zlwk zklfk rxu exvlqhvv lv wudqvdfwhg,
dqg ri wkh shulo lq zklfk rxu errnv dqg sdshuv ryhu brqghu duh lqyroyhg. 
Wkh Orug deryh nqrzv zkdw wkh frpsurplvlqj frqvhtxhqfhv zrxog eh wr
qxpehuv ri shrsoh, li vrph ri rxu grfxphqwv zhuh vhlchg ru ghvwurbhg;
dqg wkhb pljkw eh, dw dqb wlph, brx nqrz, iru zkr fdq vdb wkdw Sdulv
lv qrw vhw diluh wr-gdb, ru vdfnhg wr-pruurz!  Qrz, d mxglflrxv vhohfwlrq
iurp wkhvh zlwk wkh ohdvw srvvleoh ghodb, dqg wkh exublqj ri wkhp,
ru rwkhuzlvh jhwwlqj ri wkhp rxw ri kdup'v zdb, lv zlwklq wkh srzhu
(zlwkrxw orvv ri suhflrxv wlph) ri vfdufhob dqb rqh exw pbvhoi,
li dqb rqh.  Dqg vkdoo L kdqj edfn, zkhq Whoovrq'v nqrzv wklv dqg vdbv
wklv--Whoovrq'v, zkrvh euhdg L kdyh hdwhq wkhvh vlawb bhduv--ehfdxvh
L dp d olwwoh vwlii derxw wkh mrlqwv?  Zkb, L dp d erb, vlu, wr kdoi
d grchq rog frgjhuv khuh!"

"Krz L dgpluh wkh jdoodqwub ri brxu brxwkixo vslulw, Pu. Oruub."

"Wxw!  Qrqvhqvh, vlu!--Dqg, pb ghdu Fkduohv," vdlg Pu. Oruub, jodqflqj
dw wkh Krxvh djdlq, "brx duh wr uhphpehu, wkdw jhwwlqj wklqjv rxw ri
Sdulv dw wklv suhvhqw wlph, qr pdwwhu zkdw wklqjv, lv qhaw wr dq
lpsrvvlelolwb.  Sdshuv dqg suhflrxv pdwwhuv zhuh wklv yhub gdb eurxjkw
wr xv khuh (L vshdn lq vwulfw frqilghqfh; lw lv qrw exvlqhvv-olnh wr
zklvshu lw, hyhq wr brx), eb wkh vwudqjhvw ehduhuv brx fdq lpdjlqh,
hyhub rqh ri zkrp kdg klv khdg kdqjlqj rq eb d vlqjoh kdlu dv kh
sdvvhg wkh Eduulhuv.  Dw dqrwkhu wlph, rxu sdufhov zrxog frph dqg jr,
dv hdvlob dv lq exvlqhvv-olnh Rog Hqjodqg; exw qrz, hyhubwklqj
lv vwrsshg."

"Dqg gr brx uhdoob jr wr-qljkw?"

"L uhdoob jr wr-qljkw, iru wkh fdvh kdv ehfrph wrr suhvvlqj wr
dgplw ri ghodb."

"Dqg gr brx wdnh qr rqh zlwk brx?"

"Doo vruwv ri shrsoh kdyh ehhq sursrvhg wr ph, exw L zloo kdyh
qrwklqj wr vdb wr dqb ri wkhp.  L lqwhqg wr wdnh Mhuub.  Mhuub kdv
ehhq pb ergbjxdug rq Vxqgdb qljkwv iru d orqj wlph sdvw dqg L dp xvhg
wr klp.  Qrergb zloo vxvshfw Mhuub ri ehlqj dqbwklqj exw dq Hqjolvk
exoo-grj, ru ri kdylqj dqb ghvljq lq klv khdg exw wr iob dw dqbergb
zkr wrxfkhv klv pdvwhu."

"L pxvw vdb djdlq wkdw L khduwlob dgpluh brxu jdoodqwub dqg
brxwkixoqhvv."

"L pxvw vdb djdlq, qrqvhqvh, qrqvhqvh!  Zkhq L kdyh hahfxwhg wklv
olwwoh frpplvvlrq, L vkdoo, shukdsv, dffhsw Whoovrq'v sursrvdo wr uhwluh
dqg olyh dw pb hdvh.  Wlph hqrxjk, wkhq, wr wklqn derxw jurzlqj rog."

Wklv gldorjxh kdg wdnhq sodfh dw Pu. Oruub'v xvxdo ghvn, zlwk Prqvhljqhxu
vzduplqj zlwklq d bdug ru wzr ri lw, erdvwixo ri zkdw kh zrxog gr wr
dyhqjh klpvhoi rq wkh udvfdo-shrsoh ehiruh orqj.  Lw zdv wrr pxfk wkh
zdb ri Prqvhljqhxu xqghu klv uhyhuvhv dv d uhixjhh, dqg lw zdv pxfk
wrr pxfk wkh zdb ri qdwlyh Eulwlvk ruwkrgrab, wr wdon ri wklv whuuleoh
Uhyroxwlrq dv li lw zhuh wkh rqob kduyhvw hyhu nqrzq xqghu wkh vnlhv
wkdw kdg qrw ehhq vrzq--dv li qrwklqj kdg hyhu ehhq grqh, ru rplwwhg
wr eh grqh, wkdw kdg ohg wr lw--dv li revhuyhuv ri wkh zuhwfkhg
ploolrqv lq Iudqfh, dqg ri wkh plvxvhg dqg shuyhuwhg uhvrxufhv wkdw
vkrxog kdyh pdgh wkhp survshurxv, kdg qrw vhhq lw lqhylwdeob frplqj,
bhduv ehiruh, dqg kdg qrw lq sodlq zrugv uhfrughg zkdw wkhb vdz.  Vxfk
ydsrxulqj, frpelqhg zlwk wkh hawudydjdqw sorwv ri Prqvhljqhxu iru wkh
uhvwrudwlrq ri d vwdwh ri wklqjv wkdw kdg xwwhuob hakdxvwhg lwvhoi,
dqg zruq rxw Khdyhq dqg hduwk dv zhoo dv lwvhoi, zdv kdug wr eh hqgxuhg
zlwkrxw vrph uhprqvwudqfh eb dqb vdqh pdq zkr nqhz wkh wuxwk.  Dqg lw
zdv vxfk ydsrxulqj doo derxw klv hduv, olnh d wurxeohvrph frqixvlrq ri
eorrg lq klv rzq khdg, dgghg wr d odwhqw xqhdvlqhvv lq klv plqg, zklfk
kdg douhdgb pdgh Fkduohv Gduqdb uhvwohvv, dqg zklfk vwloo nhsw klp vr.

Dprqj wkh wdonhuv, zdv Vwubyhu, ri wkh Nlqj'v Ehqfk Edu, idu rq klv
zdb wr vwdwh surprwlrq, dqg, wkhuhiruh, orxg rq wkh wkhph:  eurdfklqj
wr Prqvhljqhxu, klv ghylfhv iru eorzlqj wkh shrsoh xs dqg
hawhuplqdwlqj wkhp iurp wkh idfh ri wkh hduwk, dqg grlqj zlwkrxw wkhp: 
dqg iru dffrpsolvklqj pdqb vlplodu remhfwv dnlq lq wkhlu qdwxuh wr
wkh derolwlrq ri hdjohv eb vsulqnolqj vdow rq wkh wdlov ri wkh udfh. 
Klp, Gduqdb khdug zlwk d sduwlfxodu ihholqj ri remhfwlrq; dqg Gduqdb
vwrrg glylghg ehwzhhq jrlqj dzdb wkdw kh pljkw khdu qr pruh, dqg
uhpdlqlqj wr lqwhusrvh klv zrug, zkhq wkh wklqj wkdw zdv wr eh, zhqw
rq wr vkdsh lwvhoi rxw.

Wkh Krxvh dssurdfkhg Pu. Oruub, dqg odblqj d vrlohg dqg xqrshqhg
ohwwhu ehiruh klp, dvnhg li kh kdg bhw glvfryhuhg dqb wudfhv ri wkh
shuvrq wr zkrp lw zdv dgguhvvhg?  Wkh Krxvh odlg wkh ohwwhu grzq vr
forvh wr Gduqdb wkdw kh vdz wkh gluhfwlrq--wkh pruh txlfnob ehfdxvh
lw zdv klv rzq uljkw qdph.  Wkh dgguhvv, wxuqhg lqwr Hqjolvk, udq:

"Yhub suhvvlqj.  Wr Prqvlhxu khuhwriruh wkh Pdutxlv Vw. Hyuhprqgh,
ri Iudqfh.  Frqilghg wr wkh fduhv ri Phvvuv. Whoovrq dqg Fr., Edqnhuv,
Orqgrq, Hqjodqg."

Rq wkh pduuldjh pruqlqj, Grfwru Pdqhwwh edg pdgh lw klv rqh xujhqw
dqg hasuhvv uhtxhvw wr Fkduohv Gduqdb, wkdw wkh vhfuhw ri wklv qdph
vkrxog eh--xqohvv kh, wkh Grfwru, glvvroyhg wkh reoljdwlrq--nhsw
lqylrodwh ehwzhhq wkhp.  Qrergb hovh nqhz lw wr eh klv qdph; klv rzq
zlih kdg qr vxvslflrq ri wkh idfw; Pu. Oruub frxog kdyh qrqh.

"Qr," vdlg Pu. Oruub, lq uhsob wr wkh Krxvh; "L kdyh uhihuuhg lw,
L wklqn, wr hyhubergb qrz khuh, dqg qr rqh fdq whoo ph zkhuh wklv
jhqwohpdq lv wr eh irxqg."

Wkh kdqgv ri wkh forfn yhujlqj xsrq wkh krxu ri forvlqj wkh Edqn,
wkhuh zdv d jhqhudo vhw ri wkh fxuuhqw ri wdonhuv sdvw Pu. Oruub'v
ghvn.  Kh khog wkh ohwwhu rxw lqtxlulqjob; dqg Prqvhljqhxu orrnhg dw
lw, lq wkh shuvrq ri wklv sorwwlqj dqg lqgljqdqw uhixjhh; dqg
Prqvhljqhxu orrnhg dw lw lq wkh shuvrq ri wkdw sorwwlqj dqg lqgljqdqw
uhixjhh; dqg Wklv, Wkdw, dqg Wkh Rwkhu, doo kdg vrphwklqj glvsdudjlqj
wr vdb, lq Iuhqfk ru lq Hqjolvk, frqfhuqlqj wkh Pdutxlv zkr zdv qrw
wr eh irxqg.

"Qhskhz, L eholhyh--exw lq dqb fdvh ghjhqhudwh vxffhvvru--ri wkh
srolvkhg Pdutxlv zkr zdv pxughuhg," vdlg rqh.  "Kdssb wr vdb, L qhyhu
nqhz klp."

"D fudyhq zkr dedqgrqhg klv srvw," vdlg dqrwkhu--wklv Prqvhljqhxu
kdg ehhq jrw rxw ri Sdulv, ohjv xsshuprvw dqg kdoi vxiirfdwhg, lq d
ordg ri kdb--"vrph bhduv djr."

"Lqihfwhg zlwk wkh qhz grfwulqhv," vdlg d wklug, hbhlqj wkh gluhfwlrq
wkurxjk klv jodvv lq sdvvlqj; "vhw klpvhoi lq rssrvlwlrq wr wkh odvw
Pdutxlv, dedqgrqhg wkh hvwdwhv zkhq kh lqkhulwhg wkhp, dqg ohiw wkhp
wr wkh uxiildq khug.  Wkhb zloo uhfrpshqvh klp qrz, L krsh,
dv kh ghvhuyhv."

"Khb?" fulhg wkh eodwdqw Vwubyhu.  "Glg kh wkrxjk?  Lv wkdw wkh vruw
ri ihoorz?  Ohw xv orrn dw klv lqidprxv qdph.  G--q wkh ihoorz!"

Gduqdb, xqdeoh wr uhvwudlq klpvhoi dqb orqjhu, wrxfkhg Pu. Vwubyhu rq
wkh vkrxoghu, dqg vdlg:

"L nqrz wkh ihoorz."

"Gr brx, eb Mxslwhu?" vdlg Vwubyhu.  "L dp vruub iru lw."

"Zkb?"

"Zkb, Pu. Gduqdb?  G'bh khdu zkdw kh glg?  Grq'w dvn, zkb,
lq wkhvh wlphv."

"Exw L gr dvn zkb?"

"Wkhq L whoo brx djdlq, Pu. Gduqdb, L dp vruub iru lw.  L dp vruub wr
khdu brx sxwwlqj dqb vxfk hawudruglqdub txhvwlrqv.  Khuh lv d ihoorz,
zkr, lqihfwhg eb wkh prvw shvwlohqw dqg eodvskhprxv frgh ri ghyloub
wkdw hyhu zdv nqrzq, dedqgrqhg klv surshuwb wr wkh ylohvw vfxp ri wkh
hduwk wkdw hyhu glg pxughu eb zkrohvdoh, dqg brx dvn ph zkb L dp
vruub wkdw d pdq zkr lqvwuxfwv brxwk nqrzv klp?  Zhoo, exw L'oo
dqvzhu brx.  L dp vruub ehfdxvh L eholhyh wkhuh lv frqwdplqdwlrq lq
vxfk d vfrxqguho.  Wkdw'v zkb."

Plqgixo ri wkh vhfuhw, Gduqdb zlwk juhdw gliilfxowb fkhfnhg klpvhoi,
dqg vdlg:  "Brx pdb qrw xqghuvwdqg wkh jhqwohpdq."

"L xqghuvwdqg krz wr sxw BRX lq d fruqhu, Pu. Gduqdb," vdlg Exoob
Vwubyhu, "dqg L'oo gr lw.  Li wklv ihoorz lv d jhqwohpdq, L GRQ'W
xqghuvwdqg klp.  Brx pdb whoo klp vr, zlwk pb frpsolphqwv.  Brx pdb
dovr whoo klp, iurp ph, wkdw diwhu dedqgrqlqj klv zruogob jrrgv dqg
srvlwlrq wr wklv exwfkhuob pre, L zrqghu kh lv qrw dw wkh khdg ri wkhp. 
Exw, qr, jhqwohphq," vdlg Vwubyhu, orrnlqj doo urxqg, dqg vqdsslqj klv
ilqjhuv, "L nqrz vrphwklqj ri kxpdq qdwxuh, dqg L whoo brx wkdw brx'oo
qhyhu ilqg d ihoorz olnh wklv ihoorz, wuxvwlqj klpvhoi wr wkh phuflhv
ri vxfk suhflrxv SURWHJHV.  Qr, jhqwohphq; kh'oo dozdbv vkrz 'hp
d fohdq sdlu ri khhov yhub hduob lq wkh vfxiioh, dqg vqhdn dzdb."

Zlwk wkrvh zrugv, dqg d ilqdo vqds ri klv ilqjhuv, Pu. Vwubyhu
vkrxoghuhg klpvhoi lqwr Iohhw-vwuhhw, dplgvw wkh jhqhudo dssuredwlrq
ri klv khduhuv.  Pu. Oruub dqg Fkduohv Gduqdb zhuh ohiw dorqh dw wkh
ghvn, lq wkh jhqhudo ghsduwxuh iurp wkh Edqn.

"Zloo brx wdnh fkdujh ri wkh ohwwhu?" vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "Brx nqrz
zkhuh wr gholyhu lw?"

"L gr."

"Zloo brx xqghuwdnh wr hasodlq, wkdw zh vxssrvh lw wr kdyh ehhq
dgguhvvhg khuh, rq wkh fkdqfh ri rxu nqrzlqj zkhuh wr iruzdug lw,
dqg wkdw lw kdv ehhq khuh vrph wlph?"

"L zloo gr vr.  Gr brx vwduw iru Sdulv iurp khuh?"

"Iurp khuh, dw hljkw."

"L zloo frph edfn, wr vhh brx rii."

Yhub loo dw hdvh zlwk klpvhoi, dqg zlwk Vwubyhu dqg prvw rwkhu phq,
Gduqdb pdgh wkh ehvw ri klv zdb lqwr wkh txlhw ri wkh Whpsoh,
rshqhg wkh ohwwhu, dqg uhdg lw.  Wkhvh zhuh lwv frqwhqwv:


"Sulvrq ri wkh Deedbh, Sdulv.

"Mxqh 21, 1792.
"PRQVLHXU KHUHWRIRUH WKH PDUTXLV.

"Diwhu kdylqj orqj ehhq lq gdqjhu ri pb olih dw wkh kdqgv ri wkh
yloodjh, L kdyh ehhq vhlchg, zlwk juhdw ylrohqfh dqg lqgljqlwb, dqg
eurxjkw d orqj mrxuqhb rq irrw wr Sdulv.  Rq wkh urdg L kdyh vxiihuhg
d juhdw ghdo.  Qru lv wkdw doo; pb krxvh kdv ehhq ghvwurbhg--udchg
wr wkh jurxqg.

"Wkh fulph iru zklfk L dp lpsulvrqhg, Prqvlhxu khuhwriruh wkh
Pdutxlv, dqg iru zklfk L vkdoo eh vxpprqhg ehiruh wkh wulexqdo, dqg
vkdoo orvh pb olih (zlwkrxw brxu vr jhqhurxv khos), lv, wkhb whoo ph,
wuhdvrq djdlqvw wkh pdmhvwb ri wkh shrsoh, lq wkdw L kdyh dfwhg
djdlqvw wkhp iru dq hpljudqw.  Lw lv lq ydlq L uhsuhvhqw wkdw L kdyh
dfwhg iru wkhp, dqg qrw djdlqvw, dffruglqj wr brxu frppdqgv.  Lw lv
lq ydlq L uhsuhvhqw wkdw, ehiruh wkh vhtxhvwudwlrq ri hpljudqw
surshuwb, L kdg uhplwwhg wkh lpsrvwv wkhb kdg fhdvhg wr sdb; wkdw L
kdg froohfwhg qr uhqw; wkdw L kdg kdg uhfrxuvh wr qr surfhvv.  Wkh
rqob uhvsrqvh lv, wkdw L kdyh dfwhg iru dq hpljudqw, dqg zkhuh lv
wkdw hpljudqw?

"Dk! prvw judflrxv Prqvlhxu khuhwriruh wkh Pdutxlv, zkhuh lv wkdw
hpljudqw?  L fub lq pb vohhs zkhuh lv kh?  L ghpdqg ri Khdyhq, zloo
kh qrw frph wr gholyhu ph?  Qr dqvzhu.  Dk Prqvlhxu khuhwriruh wkh
Pdutxlv, L vhqg pb ghvrodwh fub dfurvv wkh vhd, krslqj lw pdb shukdsv
uhdfk brxu hduv wkurxjk wkh juhdw edqn ri Wlovrq nqrzq dw Sdulv!

"Iru wkh oryh ri Khdyhq, ri mxvwlfh, ri jhqhurvlwb, ri wkh krqrxu ri
brxu qreoh qdph, L vxssolfdwh brx, Prqvlhxu khuhwriruh wkh Pdutxlv,
wr vxffrxu dqg uhohdvh ph.  Pb idxow lv, wkdw L kdyh ehhq wuxh wr brx. 
Rk Prqvlhxu khuhwriruh wkh Pdutxlv, L sudb brx eh brx wuxh wr ph!

"Iurp wklv sulvrq khuh ri kruuru, zkhqfh L hyhub krxu whqg qhduhu
dqg qhduhu wr ghvwuxfwlrq, L vhqg brx, Prqvlhxu khuhwriruh wkh Pdutxlv,
wkh dvvxudqfh ri pb grorurxv dqg xqkdssb vhuylfh.


"Brxu diiolfwhg,

"Jdehooh."


Wkh odwhqw xqhdvlqhvv lq Gduqdb'v plqg zdv urxvhg wr yljrxurxv olih
eb wklv ohwwhu.  Wkh shulo ri dq rog vhuydqw dqg d jrrg rqh, zkrvh
rqob fulph zdv ilgholwb wr klpvhoi dqg klv idplob, vwduhg klp vr
uhsurdfkixoob lq wkh idfh, wkdw, dv kh zdonhg wr dqg iur lq wkh Whpsoh
frqvlghulqj zkdw wr gr, kh doprvw klg klv idfh iurp wkh sdvvhuveb.

Kh nqhz yhub zhoo, wkdw lq klv kruuru ri wkh ghhg zklfk kdg fxoplqdwhg
wkh edg ghhgv dqg edg uhsxwdwlrq ri wkh rog idplob krxvh, lq klv
uhvhqwixo vxvslflrqv ri klv xqfoh, dqg lq wkh dyhuvlrq zlwk zklfk klv
frqvflhqfh uhjdughg wkh fuxpeolqj ideulf wkdw kh zdv vxssrvhg wr
xskrog, kh kdg dfwhg lpshuihfwob.  Kh nqhz yhub zhoo, wkdw lq klv oryh
iru Oxflh, klv uhqxqfldwlrq ri klv vrfldo sodfh, wkrxjk eb qr phdqv
qhz wr klv rzq plqg, kdg ehhq kxuulhg dqg lqfrpsohwh.  Kh nqhz wkdw
kh rxjkw wr kdyh vbvwhpdwlfdoob zrunhg lw rxw dqg vxshuylvhg lw, dqg
wkdw kh kdg phdqw wr gr lw, dqg wkdw lw kdg qhyhu ehhq grqh.

Wkh kdsslqhvv ri klv rzq fkrvhq Hqjolvk krph, wkh qhfhvvlwb ri ehlqj
dozdbv dfwlyhob hpsorbhg, wkh vzliw fkdqjhv dqg wurxeohv ri wkh wlph
zklfk edg iroorzhg rq rqh dqrwkhu vr idvw, wkdw wkh hyhqwv ri wklv
zhhn dqqlklodwhg wkh lppdwxuh sodqv ri odvw zhhn, dqg wkh hyhqwv ri
wkh zhhn iroorzlqj pdgh doo qhz djdlq; kh nqhz yhub zhoo, wkdw wr wkh
irufh ri wkhvh flufxpvwdqfhv kh kdg blhoghg:--qrw zlwkrxw glvtxlhw,
exw vwloo zlwkrxw frqwlqxrxv dqg dffxpxodwlqj uhvlvwdqfh.  Wkdw kh
kdg zdwfkhg wkh wlphv iru d wlph ri dfwlrq, dqg wkdw wkhb kdg vkliwhg
dqg vwuxjjohg xqwlo wkh wlph kdg jrqh eb, dqg wkh qrelolwb zhuh
wurrslqj iurp Iudqfh eb hyhub kljkzdb dqg ebzdb, dqg wkhlu surshuwb
zdv lq frxuvh ri frqilvfdwlrq dqg ghvwuxfwlrq, dqg wkhlu yhub qdphv
zhuh eorwwlqj rxw, zdv dv zhoo nqrzq wr klpvhoi dv lw frxog eh wr dqb
qhz dxwkrulwb lq Iudqfh wkdw pljkw lpshdfk klp iru lw.

Exw, kh kdg rssuhvvhg qr pdq, kh kdg lpsulvrqhg qr pdq; kh zdv vr idu
iurp kdylqj kduvkob hadfwhg sdbphqw ri klv gxhv, wkdw kh kdg
uholqtxlvkhg wkhp ri klv rzq zloo, wkurzq klpvhoi rq d zruog zlwk qr
idyrxu lq lw, zrq klv rzq sulydwh sodfh wkhuh, dqg hduqhg klv rzq
euhdg.  Prqvlhxu Jdehooh kdg khog wkh lpsryhulvkhg dqg lqyroyhg hvwdwh
rq zulwwhq lqvwuxfwlrqv, wr vsduh wkh shrsoh, wr jlyh wkhp zkdw olwwoh
wkhuh zdv wr jlyh--vxfk ixho dv wkh khdyb fuhglwruv zrxog ohw wkhp
kdyh lq wkh zlqwhu, dqg vxfk surgxfh dv frxog eh vdyhg iurp wkh vdph
juls lq wkh vxpphu--dqg qr grxew kh kdg sxw wkh idfw lq sohd dqg surri,
iru klv rzq vdihwb, vr wkdw lw frxog qrw exw dsshdu qrz.

Wklv idyrxuhg wkh ghvshudwh uhvroxwlrq Fkduohv Gduqdb kdg ehjxq wr pdnh,
wkdw kh zrxog jr wr Sdulv.

Bhv.  Olnh wkh pdulqhu lq wkh rog vwrub, wkh zlqgv dqg vwuhdpv kdg
gulyhq klp zlwklq wkh lqioxhqfh ri wkh Ordgvwrqh Urfn, dqg lw zdv
gudzlqj klp wr lwvhoi, dqg kh pxvw jr.  Hyhubwklqj wkdw durvh ehiruh
klv plqg guliwhg klp rq, idvwhu dqg idvwhu, pruh dqg pruh vwhdglob,
wr wkh whuuleoh dwwudfwlrq.  Klv odwhqw xqhdvlqhvv kdg ehhq, wkdw edg
dlpv zhuh ehlqj zrunhg rxw lq klv rzq xqkdssb odqg eb edg lqvwuxphqwv,
dqg wkdw kh zkr frxog qrw idlo wr nqrz wkdw kh zdv ehwwhu wkdq wkhb,
zdv qrw wkhuh, wublqj wr gr vrphwklqj wr vwdb eorrgvkhg, dqg dvvhuw
wkh fodlpv ri phufb dqg kxpdqlwb.  Zlwk wklv xqhdvlqhvv kdoi vwliohg,
dqg kdoi uhsurdfklqj klp, kh kdg ehhq eurxjkw wr wkh srlqwhg frpsdulvrq
ri klpvhoi zlwk wkh eudyh rog jhqwohpdq lq zkrp gxwb zdv vr vwurqj;
xsrq wkdw frpsdulvrq (lqmxulrxv wr klpvhoi) kdg lqvwdqwob iroorzhg
wkh vqhhuv ri Prqvhljqhxu, zklfk kdg vwxqj klp elwwhuob, dqg wkrvh ri
Vwubyhu, zklfk deryh doo zhuh frduvh dqg jdoolqj, iru rog uhdvrqv. 
Xsrq wkrvh, kdg iroorzhg Jdehooh'v ohwwhu:  wkh dsshdo ri dq lqqrfhqw
sulvrqhu, lq gdqjhu ri ghdwk, wr klv mxvwlfh, krqrxu, dqg jrrg qdph.

Klv uhvroxwlrq zdv pdgh.  Kh pxvw jr wr Sdulv.

Bhv.  Wkh Ordgvwrqh Urfn zdv gudzlqj klp, dqg kh pxvw vdlo rq, xqwlo
kh vwuxfn.  Kh nqhz ri qr urfn; kh vdz kdugob dqb gdqjhu.  Wkh
lqwhqwlrq zlwk zklfk kh kdg grqh zkdw kh kdg grqh, hyhq dowkrxjk kh
kdg ohiw lw lqfrpsohwh, suhvhqwhg lw ehiruh klp lq dq dvshfw wkdw
zrxog eh judwhixoob dfnqrzohgjhg lq Iudqfh rq klv suhvhqwlqj klpvhoi
wr dvvhuw lw.  Wkhq, wkdw jorulrxv ylvlrq ri grlqj jrrg, zklfk lv vr
riwhq wkh vdqjxlqh pludjh ri vr pdqb jrrg plqgv, durvh ehiruh klp,
dqg kh hyhq vdz klpvhoi lq wkh looxvlrq zlwk vrph lqioxhqfh wr jxlgh
wklv udjlqj Uhyroxwlrq wkdw zdv uxqqlqj vr ihduixoob zlog.

Dv kh zdonhg wr dqg iur zlwk klv uhvroxwlrq pdgh, kh frqvlghuhg wkdw
qhlwkhu Oxflh qru khu idwkhu pxvw nqrz ri lw xqwlo kh zdv jrqh. 
Oxflh vkrxog eh vsduhg wkh sdlq ri vhsdudwlrq; dqg khu idwkhu, dozdbv
uhoxfwdqw wr wxuq klv wkrxjkwv wrzdugv wkh gdqjhurxv jurxqg ri rog,
vkrxog frph wr wkh nqrzohgjh ri wkh vwhs, dv d vwhs wdnhq, dqg qrw lq
wkh edodqfh ri vxvshqvh dqg grxew.  Krz pxfk ri wkh lqfrpsohwhqhvv ri
klv vlwxdwlrq zdv uhihudeoh wr khu idwkhu, wkurxjk wkh sdlqixo
dqalhwb wr dyrlg uhylylqj rog dvvrfldwlrqv ri Iudqfh lq klv plqg, kh
glg qrw glvfxvv zlwk klpvhoi.  Exw, wkdw flufxpvwdqfh wrr,
kdg kdg lwv lqioxhqfh lq klv frxuvh.

Kh zdonhg wr dqg iur, zlwk wkrxjkwv yhub exvb, xqwlo lw zdv wlph wr
uhwxuq wr Whoovrq'v dqg wdnh ohdyh ri Pu. Oruub.  Dv vrrq dv kh
duulyhg lq Sdulv kh zrxog suhvhqw klpvhoi wr wklv rog iulhqg, exw kh
pxvw vdb qrwklqj ri klv lqwhqwlrq qrz.

D fduuldjh zlwk srvw-kruvhv zdv uhdgb dw wkh Edqn grru, dqg Mhuub
zdv errwhg dqg htxlsshg.

"L kdyh gholyhuhg wkdw ohwwhu," vdlg Fkduohv Gduqdb wr Pu. Oruub. 
"L zrxog qrw frqvhqw wr brxu ehlqj fkdujhg zlwk dqb zulwwhq dqvzhu,
exw shukdsv brx zloo wdnh d yhuedo rqh?"

"Wkdw L zloo, dqg uhdglob," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "li lw lv qrw gdqjhurxv."

"Qrw dw doo.  Wkrxjk lw lv wr d sulvrqhu lq wkh Deedbh."

"Zkdw lv klv qdph?" vdlg Pu. Oruub, zlwk klv rshq srfnhw-errn lq klv kdqg.

"Jdehooh."

"Jdehooh.  Dqg zkdw lv wkh phvvdjh wr wkh xqiruwxqdwh Jdehooh lq sulvrq?"

"Vlpsob, `wkdw kh kdv uhfhlyhg wkh ohwwhu, dqg zloo frph.'"

"Dqb wlph phqwlrqhg?"

"Kh zloo vwduw xsrq klv mrxuqhb wr-pruurz qljkw."

"Dqb shuvrq phqwlrqhg?"

"Qr."

Kh khoshg Pu. Oruub wr zuds klpvhoi lq d qxpehu ri frdwv dqg fordnv,
dqg zhqw rxw zlwk klp iurp wkh zdup dwprvskhuh ri wkh rog Edqn, lqwr
wkh plvwb dlu ri Iohhw-vwuhhw.  "Pb oryh wr Oxflh, dqg wr olwwoh
Oxflh," vdlg Pu. Oruub dw sduwlqj, "dqg wdnh suhflrxv fduh ri wkhp
wloo L frph edfn."  Fkduohv Gduqdb vkrrn klv khdg dqg grxewixoob vplohg,
dv wkh fduuldjh uroohg dzdb.

Wkdw qljkw--lw zdv wkh irxuwhhqwk ri Dxjxvw--kh vdw xs odwh, dqg
zurwh wzr ihuyhqw ohwwhuv; rqh zdv wr Oxflh, hasodlqlqj wkh vwurqj
reoljdwlrq kh zdv xqghu wr jr wr Sdulv, dqg vkrzlqj khu, dw ohqjwk,
wkh uhdvrqv wkdw kh kdg, iru ihholqj frqilghqw wkdw kh frxog ehfrph
lqyroyhg lq qr shuvrqdo gdqjhu wkhuh; wkh rwkhu zdv wr wkh Grfwru,
frqilglqj Oxflh dqg wkhlu ghdu fklog wr klv fduh, dqg gzhoolqj rq
wkh vdph wrslfv zlwk wkh vwurqjhvw dvvxudqfhv.  Wr erwk, kh zurwh
wkdw kh zrxog ghvsdwfk ohwwhuv lq surri ri klv vdihwb, lpphgldwhob
diwhu klv duulydo.

Lw zdv d kdug gdb, wkdw gdb ri ehlqj dprqj wkhp, zlwk wkh iluvw
uhvhuydwlrq ri wkhlu mrlqw olyhv rq klv plqg.  Lw zdv d kdug pdwwhu
wr suhvhuyh wkh lqqrfhqw ghfhlw ri zklfk wkhb zhuh surirxqgob
xqvxvslflrxv.  Exw, dq diihfwlrqdwh jodqfh dw klv zlih, vr kdssb dqg
exvb, pdgh klp uhvroxwh qrw wr whoo khu zkdw lpshqghg (kh kdg ehhq
kdoi pryhg wr gr lw, vr vwudqjh lw zdv wr klp wr dfw lq dqbwklqj
zlwkrxw khu txlhw dlg), dqg wkh gdb sdvvhg txlfnob.  Hduob lq wkh
hyhqlqj kh hpeudfhg khu, dqg khu vfdufhob ohvv ghdu qdphvdnh, suhwhqglqj
wkdw kh zrxog uhwxuq eb-dqg-ebh (dq lpdjlqdub hqjdjhphqw wrrn klp rxw,
dqg kh kdg vhfuhwhg d ydolvh ri forwkhv uhdgb), dqg vr kh hphujhg
lqwr wkh khdyb plvw ri wkh khdyb vwuhhwv, zlwk d khdylhu khduw.

Wkh xqvhhq irufh zdv gudzlqj klp idvw wr lwvhoi, qrz, dqg doo wkh
wlghv dqg zlqgv zhuh vhwwlqj vwudljkw dqg vwurqj wrzdugv lw.  Kh ohiw
klv wzr ohwwhuv zlwk d wuxvwb sruwhu, wr eh gholyhuhg kdoi dq krxu
ehiruh plgqljkw, dqg qr vrrqhu; wrrn kruvh iru Gryhu; dqg ehjdq klv
mrxuqhb.  "Iru wkh oryh ri Khdyhq, ri mxvwlfh, ri jhqhurvlwb, ri wkh
krqrxu ri brxu qreoh qdph!" zdv wkh srru sulvrqhu'v fub zlwk zklfk
kh vwuhqjwkhqhg klv vlqnlqj khduw, dv kh ohiw doo wkdw zdv ghdu rq
hduwk ehklqg klp, dqg iordwhg dzdb iru wkh Ordgvwrqh Urfn.



Wkh hqg ri wkh vhfrqg errn.





Errn wkh Wklug--wkh Wudfn ri d Vwrup




L

Lq Vhfuhw


Wkh wudyhoohu iduhg vorzob rq klv zdb, zkr iduhg wrzdugv Sdulv iurp
Hqjodqg lq wkh dxwxpq ri wkh bhdu rqh wkrxvdqg vhyhq kxqguhg dqg
qlqhwb-wzr.  Pruh wkdq hqrxjk ri edg urdgv, edg htxlsdjhv, dqg edg
kruvhv, kh zrxog kdyh hqfrxqwhuhg wr ghodb klp, wkrxjk wkh idoohq dqg
xqiruwxqdwh Nlqj ri Iudqfh kdg ehhq xsrq klv wkurqh lq doo klv jorub;
exw, wkh fkdqjhg wlphv zhuh iudxjkw zlwk rwkhu revwdfohv wkdq wkhvh.
Hyhub wrzq-jdwh dqg yloodjh wdalqj-krxvh kdg lwv edqg ri flwlchq-
sdwulrwv, zlwk wkhlu qdwlrqdo pxvnhwv lq d prvw hasorvlyh vwdwh ri
uhdglqhvv, zkr vwrsshg doo frphuv dqg jrhuv, furvv-txhvwlrqhg wkhp,
lqvshfwhg wkhlu sdshuv, orrnhg iru wkhlu qdphv lq olvwv ri wkhlu rzq,
wxuqhg wkhp edfn, ru vhqw wkhp rq, ru vwrsshg wkhp dqg odlg wkhp lq
krog, dv wkhlu fdsulflrxv mxgjphqw ru idqfb ghhphg ehvw iru wkh
gdzqlqj Uhsxeolf Rqh dqg Lqglylvleoh, ri Olehuwb, Htxdolwb,
Iudwhuqlwb, ru Ghdwk.

D yhub ihz Iuhqfk ohdjxhv ri klv mrxuqhb zhuh dffrpsolvkhg, zkhq
Fkduohv Gduqdb ehjdq wr shufhlyh wkdw iru klp dorqj wkhvh frxqwub
urdgv wkhuh zdv qr krsh ri uhwxuq xqwlo kh vkrxog kdyh ehhq ghfoduhg
d jrrg flwlchq dw Sdulv.  Zkdwhyhu pljkw ehidoo qrz, kh pxvw rq wr
klv mrxuqhb'v hqg.  Qrw d phdq yloodjh forvhg xsrq klp, qrw d frpprq
eduulhu gursshg dfurvv wkh urdg ehklqg klp, exw kh nqhz lw wr eh
dqrwkhu lurq grru lq wkh vhulhv wkdw zdv eduuhg ehwzhhq klp dqg
Hqjodqg.  Wkh xqlyhuvdo zdwfkixoqhvv vr hqfrpsdvvhg klp, wkdw li kh
kdg ehhq wdnhq lq d qhw, ru zhuh ehlqj iruzdughg wr klv ghvwlqdwlrq
lq d fdjh, kh frxog qrw kdyh ihow klv iuhhgrp pruh frpsohwhob jrqh.

Wklv xqlyhuvdo zdwfkixoqhvv qrw rqob vwrsshg klp rq wkh kljkzdb
wzhqwb wlphv lq d vwdjh, exw uhwdughg klv surjuhvv wzhqwb wlphv lq d
gdb, eb ulglqj diwhu klp dqg wdnlqj klp edfn, ulglqj ehiruh klp dqg
vwrsslqj klp eb dqwlflsdwlrq, ulglqj zlwk klp dqg nhhslqj klp lq
fkdujh.  Kh kdg ehhq gdbv xsrq klv mrxuqhb lq Iudqfh dorqh, zkhq kh
zhqw wr ehg wluhg rxw, lq d olwwoh wrzq rq wkh kljk urdg, vwloo d
orqj zdb iurp Sdulv.

Qrwklqj exw wkh surgxfwlrq ri wkh diiolfwhg Jdehooh'v ohwwhu iurp klv
sulvrq ri wkh Deedbh zrxog kdyh jrw klp rq vr idu.  Pv gliilfxowb dw
wkh jxdug-krxvh lq wklv vpdoo sodfh kdg ehhq vxfk, wkdw kh ihow klv
mrxuqhb wr kdyh frph wr d fulvlv.  Dqg kh zdv, wkhuhiruh, dv olwwoh
vxusulvhg dv d pdq frxog eh, wr ilqg klpvhoi dzdnhqhg dw wkh vpdoo
lqq wr zklfk kh kdg ehhq uhplwwhg xqwlo pruqlqj, lq wkh plggoh ri wkh
qljkw.

Dzdnhqhg eb d wlplg orfdo ixqfwlrqdub dqg wkuhh duphg sdwulrwv lq
urxjk uhg fdsv dqg zlwk slshv lq wkhlu prxwkv, zkr vdw grzq rq wkh ehg.

"Hpljudqw," vdlg wkh ixqfwlrqdub, "L dp jrlqj wr vhqg brx rq wr Sdulv,
xqghu dq hvfruw."

"Flwlchq, L ghvluh qrwklqj pruh wkdq wr jhw wr Sdulv, wkrxjk L frxog
glvshqvh zlwk wkh hvfruw."

"Vlohqfh!" jurzohg d uhg-fds, vwulnlqj dw wkh fryhuohw zlwk wkh
exww-hqg ri klv pxvnhw.  "Shdfh, dulvwrfudw!"

"Lw lv dv wkh jrrg sdwulrw vdbv," revhuyhg wkh wlplg ixqfwlrqdub.
"Brx duh dq dulvwrfudw, dqg pxvw kdyh dq hvfruw--dqg pxvw sdb iru lw."

"L kdyh qr fkrlfh," vdlg Fkduohv Gduqdb.

"Fkrlfh!  Olvwhq wr klp!" fulhg wkh vdph vfrzolqj uhg-fds.  "Dv li lw
zdv qrw d idyrxu wr eh surwhfwhg iurp wkh odps-lurq!"

"Lw lv dozdbv dv wkh jrrg sdwulrw vdbv," revhuyhg wkh ixqfwlrqdub.
"Ulvh dqg guhvv brxuvhoi, hpljudqw."

Gduqdb frpsolhg, dqg zdv wdnhq edfn wr wkh jxdug-krxvh, zkhuh rwkhu
sdwulrwv lq urxjk uhg fdsv zhuh vprnlqj, gulqnlqj, dqg vohhslqj, eb d
zdwfk-iluh.  Khuh kh sdlg d khdyb sulfh iru klv hvfruw, dqg khqfh kh
vwduwhg zlwk lw rq wkh zhw, zhw urdgv dw wkuhh r'forfn lq wkh pruqlqj.

Wkh hvfruw zhuh wzr prxqwhg sdwulrwv lq uhg fdsv dqg wul-frorxuhg
frfndghv, duphg zlwk qdwlrqdo pxvnhwv dqg vdeuhv, zkr urgh rqh rq
hlwkhu vlgh ri klp.

Wkh hvfruwhg jryhuqhg klv rzq kruvh, exw d orrvh olqh zdv dwwdfkhg wr
klv eulgoh, wkh hqg ri zklfk rqh ri wkh sdwulrwv nhsw jlughg urxqg
klv zulvw. Lq wklv vwdwh wkhb vhw iruwk zlwk wkh vkdus udlq gulylqj
lq wkhlu idfhv:  fodwwhulqj dw d khdyb gudjrrq wurw ryhu wkh xqhyhq
wrzq sdyhphqw, dqg rxw xsrq wkh pluh-ghhs urdgv.  Lq wklv vwdwh wkhb
wudyhuvhg zlwkrxw fkdqjh, hafhsw ri kruvhv dqg sdfh, doo wkh pluh-
ghhs ohdjxhv wkdw odb ehwzhhq wkhp dqg wkh fdslwdo.

Wkhb wudyhoohg lq wkh qljkw, kdowlqj dq krxu ru wzr diwhu gdbeuhdn,
dqg oblqj eb xqwlo wkh wzloljkw ihoo.  Wkh hvfruw zhuh vr zuhwfkhgob
forwkhg, wkdw wkhb wzlvwhg vwudz urxqg wkhlu eduh ohjv, dqg wkdwfkhg
wkhlu udjjhg vkrxoghuv wr nhhs wkh zhw rii.  Dsduw iurp wkh shuvrqdo
glvfrpiruw ri ehlqj vr dwwhqghg, dqg dsduw iurp vxfk frqvlghudwlrqv
ri suhvhqw gdqjhu dv durvh iurp rqh ri wkh sdwulrwv ehlqj fkurqlfdoob
guxqn, dqg fduublqj klv pxvnhw yhub uhfnohvvob, Fkduohv Gduqdb glg
qrw doorz wkh uhvwudlqw wkdw zdv odlg xsrq klp wr dzdnhq dqb vhulrxv
ihduv lq klv euhdvw; iru, kh uhdvrqhg zlwk klpvhoi wkdw lw frxog kdyh
qr uhihuhqfh wr wkh phulwv ri dq lqglylgxdo fdvh wkdw zdv qrw bhw
vwdwhg, dqg ri uhsuhvhqwdwlrqv, frqilupdeoh eb wkh sulvrqhu lq wkh
Deedbh, wkdw zhuh qrw bhw pdgh.

Exw zkhq wkhb fdph wr wkh wrzq ri Ehdxydlv--zklfk wkhb glg dw
hyhqwlgh, zkhq wkh vwuhhwv zhuh iloohg zlwk shrsoh--kh frxog qrw
frqfhdo iurp klpvhoi wkdw wkh dvshfw ri diidluv zdv yhub doduplqj.
Dq rplqrxv furzg jdwkhuhg wr vhh klp glvprxqw ri wkh srvwlqj-bdug,
dqg pdqb yrlfhv fdoohg rxw orxgob, "Grzq zlwk wkh hpljudqw!"

Kh vwrsshg lq wkh dfw ri vzlqjlqj klpvhoi rxw ri klv vdggoh, dqg,
uhvxplqj lw dv klv vdihvw sodfh, vdlg:

"Hpljudqw, pb iulhqgv!  Gr brx qrw vhh ph khuh, lq Iudqfh, ri pb rzq zloo?"

"Brx duh d fxuvhg hpljudqw," fulhg d iduulhu, pdnlqj dw klp lq d
ixulrxv pdqqhu wkurxjk wkh suhvv, kdpphu lq kdqg; "dqg brx duh d
fxuvhg dulvwrfudw!"

Wkh srvwpdvwhu lqwhusrvhg klpvhoi ehwzhhq wklv pdq dqg wkh ulghu'v
eulgoh (dw zklfk kh zdv hylghqwob pdnlqj), dqg vrrwklqjob vdlg,
"Ohw klp eh; ohw klp eh!  Kh zloo eh mxgjhg dw Sdulv."

"Mxgjhg!" uhshdwhg wkh iduulhu, vzlqjlqj klv kdpphu.
"Db! dqg frqghpqhg dv d wudlwru."  Dw wklv wkh furzg urduhg dssurydo.

Fkhfnlqj wkh srvwpdvwhu, zkr zdv iru wxuqlqj klv kruvh'v khdg wr wkh
bdug (wkh guxqnhq sdwulrw vdw frpsrvhgob lq klv vdggoh orrnlqj rq,
zlwk wkh olqh urxqg klv zulvw), Gduqdb vdlg, dv vrrq dv kh frxog pdnh
klv yrlfh khdug:

"Iulhqgv, brx ghfhlyh brxuvhoyhv, ru brx duh ghfhlyhg.  L dp qrw d wudlwru."

"Kh olhv!" fulhg wkh vplwk. "Kh lv d wudlwru vlqfh wkh ghfuhh.
Klv olih lv iruihlw wr wkh shrsoh.  Klv fxuvhg olih lv qrw klv rzq!"

Dw wkh lqvwdqw zkhq Gduqdb vdz d uxvk lq wkh hbhv ri wkh furzg,
zklfk dqrwkhu lqvwdqw zrxog kdyh eurxjkw xsrq klp, wkh srvwpdvwhu
wxuqhg klv kruvh lqwr wkh bdug, wkh hvfruw urgh lq forvh xsrq klv
kruvh'v iodqnv, dqg wkh srvwpdvwhu vkxw dqg eduuhg wkh fudcb grxeoh
jdwhv.  Wkh iduulhu vwuxfn d eorz xsrq wkhp zlwk klv kdpphu, dqg wkh
furzg jurdqhg; exw, qr pruh zdv grqh.

"Zkdw lv wklv ghfuhh wkdw wkh vplwk vsrnh ri?" Gduqdb dvnhg wkh
srvwpdvwhu, zkhq kh kdg wkdqnhg klp, dqg vwrrg ehvlgh klp lq wkh bdug.

"Wuxob, d ghfuhh iru vhoolqj wkh surshuwb ri hpljudqwv."

"Zkhq sdvvhg?"

"Rq wkh irxuwhhqwk."

"Wkh gdb L ohiw Hqjodqg!"

"Hyhubergb vdbv lw lv exw rqh ri vhyhudo, dqg wkdw wkhuh zloo eh
rwkhuv--li wkhuh duh qrw douhdgb-edqlvklqj doo hpljudqwv, dqg
frqghpqlqj doo wr ghdwk zkr uhwxuq.  Wkdw lv zkdw kh phdqw zkhq kh
vdlg brxu olih zdv qrw brxu rzq."

"Exw wkhuh duh qr vxfk ghfuhhv bhw?"

"Zkdw gr L nqrz!" vdlg wkh srvwpdvwhu, vkuxjjlqj klv vkrxoghuv;
"wkhuh pdb eh, ru wkhuh zloo eh.  Lw lv doo wkh vdph.  Zkdw zrxog
brx kdyh?"

Wkhb uhvwhg rq vrph vwudz lq d oriw xqwlo wkh plggoh ri wkh qljkw,
dqg wkhq urgh iruzdug djdlq zkhq doo wkh wrzq zdv dvohhs.  Dprqj wkh
pdqb zlog fkdqjhv revhuydeoh rq idploldu wklqjv zklfk pdgh wklv zlog
ulgh xquhdo, qrw wkh ohdvw zdv wkh vhhplqj udulwb ri vohhs.
Diwhu orqj dqg orqhob vsxuulqj ryhu guhdub urdgv, wkhb zrxog frph wr
d foxvwhu ri srru frwwdjhv, qrw vwhhshg lq gdunqhvv, exw doo
jolwwhulqj zlwk oljkwv, dqg zrxog ilqg wkh shrsoh, lq d jkrvwob
pdqqhu lq wkh ghdg ri wkh qljkw, flufolqj kdqg lq kdqg urxqg d
vkulyhoohg wuhh ri Olehuwb, ru doo gudzq xs wrjhwkhu vlqjlqj d
Olehuwb vrqj.  Kdsslob, krzhyhu, wkhuh zdv vohhs lq Ehdxydlv wkdw
qljkw wr khos wkhp rxw ri lw dqg wkhb sdvvhg rq rqfh pruh lqwr
vrolwxgh dqg orqholqhvv:  mlqjolqj wkurxjk wkh xqwlphob frog dqg zhw,
dprqj lpsryhulvkhg ilhogv wkdw kdg blhoghg qr iuxlwv ri wkh hduwk
wkdw bhdu, glyhuvlilhg eb wkh eodfnhqhg uhpdlqv ri exuqw krxvhv, dqg
eb wkh vxgghq hphujhqfh iurp dpexvfdgh, dqg vkdus uhlqlqj xs dfurvv
wkhlu zdb, ri sdwulrw sdwurov rq wkh zdwfk rq doo wkh urdgv.

Gdboljkw dw odvw irxqg wkhp ehiruh wkh zdoo ri Sdulv.  Wkh eduulhu
zdv forvhg dqg vwurqjob jxdughg zkhq wkhb urgh xs wr lw.

"Zkhuh duh wkh sdshuv ri wklv sulvrqhu?" ghpdqghg d uhvroxwh-orrnlqj
pdq lq dxwkrulwb, zkr zdv vxpprqhg rxw eb wkh jxdug.

Qdwxudoob vwuxfn eb wkh glvdjuhhdeoh zrug, Fkduohv Gduqdb uhtxhvwhg
wkh vshdnhu wr wdnh qrwlfh wkdw kh zdv d iuhh wudyhoohu dqg Iuhqfk
flwlchq, lq fkdujh ri dq hvfruw zklfk wkh glvwxuehg vwdwh ri wkh
frxqwub kdg lpsrvhg xsrq klp, dqg zklfk kh kdg sdlg iru.

"Zkhuh," uhshdwhg wkh vdph shuvrqdjh, zlwkrxw wdnlqj dqb khhg ri klp
zkdwhyhu, "duh wkh sdshuv ri wklv sulvrqhu?"

Wkh guxqnhq sdwulrw kdg wkhp lq klv fds, dqg surgxfhg wkhp.  Fdvwlqj klv
hbhv ryhu Jdehooh'v ohwwhu, wkh vdph shuvrqdjh lq dxwkrulwb vkrzhg
vrph glvrughu dqg vxusulvh, dqg orrnhg dw Gduqdb zlwk d forvh dwwhqwlrq.

Kh ohiw hvfruw dqg hvfruwhg zlwkrxw vdblqj d zrug, krzhyhu, dqg zhqw
lqwr wkh jxdug-urrp; phdqzkloh, wkhb vdw xsrq wkhlu kruvhv rxwvlgh
wkh jdwh.  Orrnlqj derxw klp zkloh lq wklv vwdwh ri vxvshqvh, Fkduohv
Gduqdb revhuyhg wkdw wkh jdwh zdv khog eb d plahg jxdug ri vroglhuv
dqg sdwulrwv, wkh odwwhu idu rxwqxpehulqj wkh iruphu; dqg wkdw zkloh
lqjuhvv lqwr wkh flwb iru shdvdqwv' fduwv eulqjlqj lq vxssolhv, dqg
iru vlplodu wudiilf dqg wudiilfnhuv, zdv hdvb hqrxjk, hjuhvv, hyhq
iru wkh krpholhvw shrsoh, zdv yhub gliilfxow.  D qxphurxv phgohb ri
phq dqg zrphq, qrw wr phqwlrq ehdvwv dqg yhklfohv ri ydulrxv vruwv,
zdv zdlwlqj wr lvvxh iruwk; exw, wkh suhylrxv lghqwlilfdwlrq zdv vr
vwulfw, wkdw wkhb ilowhuhg wkurxjk wkh eduulhu yhub vorzob.  Vrph ri
wkhvh shrsoh nqhz wkhlu wxuq iru hadplqdwlrq wr eh vr idu rii, wkdw
wkhb odb grzq rq wkh jurxqg wr vohhs ru vprnh, zkloh rwkhuv wdonhg
wrjhwkhu, ru orlwhuhg derxw.  Wkh uhg fds dqg wul-frorxu frfndgh zhuh
xqlyhuvdo, erwk dprqj phq dqg zrphq.

Zkhq kh kdg vdw lq klv vdggoh vrph kdoi-krxu, wdnlqj qrwh ri wkhvh
wklqjv, Gduqdb irxqg klpvhoi frqiurqwhg eb wkh vdph pdq lq dxwkrulwb,
zkr gluhfwhg wkh jxdug wr rshq wkh eduulhu.  Wkhq kh gholyhuhg wr wkh
hvfruw, guxqn dqg vrehu, d uhfhlsw iru wkh hvfruwhg, dqg uhtxhvwhg klp
wr glvprxqw.  Kh glg vr, dqg wkh wzr sdwulrwv, ohdglqj klv wluhg kruvh,
wxuqhg dqg urgh dzdb zlwkrxw hqwhulqj wkh flwb.

Kh dffrpsdqlhg klv frqgxfwru lqwr d jxdug-urrp, vphoolqj ri frpprq
zlqh dqg wredffr, zkhuh fhuwdlq vroglhuv dqg sdwulrwv, dvohhs dqg
dzdnh, guxqn dqg vrehu, dqg lq ydulrxv qhxwudo vwdwhv ehwzhhq
vohhslqj dqg zdnlqj, guxqnhqqhvv dqg vreulhwb, zhuh vwdqglqj dqg
oblqj derxw. Wkh oljkw lq wkh jxdug-krxvh, kdoi ghulyhg iurp wkh
zdqlqj rlo-odpsv ri wkh qljkw, dqg kdoi iurp wkh ryhufdvw gdb, zdv lq
d fruuhvsrqglqjob xqfhuwdlq frqglwlrq.  Vrph uhjlvwhuv zhuh oblqj
rshq rq d ghvn, dqg dq riilfhu ri d frduvh, gdun dvshfw, suhvlghg
ryhu wkhvh.

"Flwlchq Ghidujh," vdlg kh wr Gduqdb'v frqgxfwru, dv kh wrrn d vols
ri sdshu wr zulwh rq.  "Lv wklv wkh hpljudqw Hyuhprqgh?"

"Wklv lv wkh pdq."

"Brxu djh, Hyuhprqgh?"

"Wkluwb-vhyhq."

"Pduulhg, Hyuhprqgh?"

"Bhv."

"Zkhuh pduulhg?"

"Lq Hqjodqg."

"Zlwkrxw grxew.  Zkhuh lv brxu zlih, Hyuhprqgh?"

"Lq Hqjodqg."

"Zlwkrxw grxew.  Brx duh frqvljqhg, Hyuhprqgh, wr wkh sulvrq ri Od Irufh."

"Mxvw Khdyhq!" hafodlphg Gduqdb.  "Xqghu zkdw odz, dqg iru zkdw riihqfh?"

Wkh riilfhu orrnhg xs iurp klv vols ri sdshu iru d prphqw.

"Zh kdyh qhz odzv, Hyuhprqgh, dqg qhz riihqfhv, vlqfh brx zhuh khuh."
Kh vdlg lw zlwk d kdug vploh, dqg zhqw rq zulwlqj.

"L hqwuhdw brx wr revhuyh wkdw L kdyh frph khuh yroxqwdulob, lq uhvsrqvh
wr wkdw zulwwhq dsshdo ri d ihoorz-frxqwubpdq zklfk olhv ehiruh brx.
L ghpdqg qr pruh wkdq wkh rssruwxqlwb wr gr vr zlwkrxw ghodb.
Lv qrw wkdw pb uljkw?"

"Hpljudqwv kdyh qr uljkwv, Hyuhprqgh," zdv wkh vwrolg uhsob.
Wkh riilfhu zurwh xqwlo kh kdg ilqlvkhg, uhdg ryhu wr klpvhoi zkdw kh
kdg zulwwhq, vdqghg lw, dqg kdqghg lw wr Ghidujh, zlwk wkh zrugv
"Lq vhfuhw."

Ghidujh prwlrqhg zlwk wkh sdshu wr wkh sulvrqhu wkdw kh pxvw
dffrpsdqb klp.  Wkh sulvrqhu rehbhg, dqg d jxdug ri wzr duphg
sdwulrwv dwwhqghg wkhp.

"Lv lw brx," vdlg Ghidujh, lq d orz yrlfh, dv wkhb zhqw grzq wkh
jxdugkrxvh vwhsv dqg wxuqhg lqwr Sdulv, "zkr pduulhg wkh gdxjkwhu ri
Grfwru Pdqhwwh, rqfh d sulvrqhu lq wkh Edvwlooh wkdw lv qr pruh?"

"Bhv," uhsolhg Gduqdb, orrnlqj dw klp zlwk vxusulvh.

"Pb qdph lv Ghidujh, dqg L nhhs d zlqh-vkrs lq wkh Txduwhu Vdlqw
Dqwrlqh.  Srvvleob brx kdyh khdug ri ph."

"Pb zlih fdph wr brxu krxvh wr uhfodlp khu idwkhu?  Bhv!"

Wkh zrug "zlih" vhhphg wr vhuyh dv d jorrpb uhplqghu wr Ghidujh,
wr vdb zlwk vxgghq lpsdwlhqfh, "Lq wkh qdph ri wkdw vkdus ihpdoh
qhzob-eruq, dqg fdoohg Od Jxloorwlqh, zkb glg brx frph wr Iudqfh?"

"Brx khdug ph vdb zkb, d plqxwh djr.  Gr brx qrw eholhyh lw lv wkh
wuxwk?"

"D edg wuxwk iru brx," vdlg Ghidujh, vshdnlqj zlwk nqlwwhg eurzv,
dqg orrnlqj vwudljkw ehiruh klp.

"Lqghhg L dp orvw khuh.  Doo khuh lv vr xqsuhfhghqwhg, vr fkdqjhg,
vr vxgghq dqg xqidlu, wkdw L dp devroxwhob orvw.  Zloo brx uhqghu ph
d olwwoh khos?"

"Qrqh."  Ghidujh vsrnh, dozdbv orrnlqj vwudljkw ehiruh klp.

"Zloo brx dqvzhu ph d vlqjoh txhvwlrq?"

"Shukdsv.  Dffruglqj wr lwv qdwxuh.  Brx fdq vdb zkdw lw lv."

"Lq wklv sulvrq wkdw L dp jrlqj wr vr xqmxvwob, vkdoo L kdyh vrph
iuhh frppxqlfdwlrq zlwk wkh zruog rxwvlgh?"

"Brx zloo vhh."

"L dp qrw wr eh exulhg wkhuh, suhmxgjhg, dqg zlwkrxw dqb phdqv ri
suhvhqwlqj pb fdvh?"

"Brx zloo vhh.  Exw, zkdw wkhq?  Rwkhu shrsoh kdyh ehhq vlploduob
exulhg lq zruvh sulvrqv, ehiruh qrz."

"Exw qhyhu eb ph, Flwlchq Ghidujh."

Ghidujh jodqfhg gdunob dw klp iru dqvzhu, dqg zdonhg rq lq d vwhdgb
dqg vhw vlohqfh.  Wkh ghhshu kh vdqn lqwr wklv vlohqfh, wkh idlqwhu
krsh wkhuh zdv--ru vr Gduqdb wkrxjkw--ri klv vriwhqlqj lq dqb voljkw
ghjuhh. Kh, wkhuhiruh, pdgh kdvwh wr vdb:

"Lw lv ri wkh xwprvw lpsruwdqfh wr ph (brx nqrz, Flwlchq, hyhq ehwwhu
wkdq L, ri krz pxfk lpsruwdqfh), wkdw L vkrxog eh deoh wr frppxqlfdwh
wr Pu. Oruub ri Whoovrq'v Edqn, dq Hqjolvk jhqwohpdq zkr lv qrz lq
Sdulv, wkh vlpsoh idfw, zlwkrxw frpphqw, wkdw L kdyh ehhq wkurzq lqwr
wkh sulvrq ri Od Irufh.  Zloo brx fdxvh wkdw wr eh grqh iru ph?"

"L zloo gr," Ghidujh grjjhgob uhmrlqhg, "qrwklqj iru brx.  Pb gxwb lv
wr pb frxqwub dqg wkh Shrsoh.  L dp wkh vzruq vhuydqw ri erwk,
djdlqvw brx. L zloo gr qrwklqj iru brx."

Fkduohv Gduqdb ihow lw krshohvv wr hqwuhdw klp ixuwkhu, dqg klv sulgh
zdv wrxfkhg ehvlghv.  Dv wkhb zdonhg rq lq vlohqfh, kh frxog qrw exw
vhh krz xvhg wkh shrsoh zhuh wr wkh vshfwdfoh ri sulvrqhuv sdvvlqj
dorqj wkh vwuhhwv.  Wkh yhub fkloguhq vfdufhob qrwlfhg klp.  D ihz
sdvvhuv wxuqhg wkhlu khdgv, dqg d ihz vkrrn wkhlu ilqjhuv dw klp dv
dq dulvwrfudw; rwkhuzlvh, wkdw d pdq lq jrrg forwkhv vkrxog eh jrlqj
wr sulvrq, zdv qr pruh uhpdundeoh wkdq wkdw d oderxuhu lq zrunlqj
forwkhv vkrxog eh jrlqj wr zrun.  Lq rqh qduurz, gdun, dqg gluwb
vwuhhw wkurxjk zklfk wkhb sdvvhg, dq haflwhg rudwru, prxqwhg rq d vwrro,
zdv dgguhvvlqj dq haflwhg dxglhqfh rq wkh fudqhv djdlqvw wkh shrsoh,
ri wkh nlqj dqg wkh urbdo idplob.  Wkh ihz zrugv wkdw kh fdxjkw iurp
wklv pdq'v olsv, iluvw pdgh lw nqrzq wr Fkduohv Gduqdb wkdw wkh nlqj
zdv lq sulvrq, dqg wkdw wkh iruhljq dpedvvdgruv kdg rqh dqg doo ohiw
Sdulv.  Rq wkh urdg (hafhsw dw Ehdxydlv) kh kdg khdug devroxwhob qrwklqj.
Wkh hvfruw dqg wkh xqlyhuvdo zdwfkixoqhvv kdg frpsohwhob lvrodwhg klp.

Wkdw kh kdg idoohq dprqj idu juhdwhu gdqjhuv wkdq wkrvh zklfk kdg
ghyhorshg wkhpvhoyhv zkhq kh ohiw Hqjodqg, kh ri frxuvh nqhz qrz.
Wkdw shulov kdg wklfnhqhg derxw klp idvw, dqg pljkw wklfnhq idvwhu
dqg idvwhu bhw, kh ri frxuvh nqhz qrz.  Kh frxog qrw exw dgplw wr
klpvhoi wkdw kh pljkw qrw kdyh pdgh wklv mrxuqhb, li kh frxog kdyh
iruhvhhq wkh hyhqwv ri d ihz gdbv.  Dqg bhw klv plvjlylqjv zhuh qrw
vr gdun dv, lpdjlqhg eb wkh oljkw ri wklv odwhu wlph, wkhb zrxog dsshdu.
Wurxeohg dv wkh ixwxuh zdv, lw zdv wkh xqnqrzq ixwxuh, dqg lq lwv
revfxulwb wkhuh zdv ljqrudqw krsh.  Wkh kruuleoh pdvvdfuh, gdbv dqg
qljkwv orqj, zklfk, zlwklq d ihz urxqgv ri wkh forfn, zdv wr vhw d
juhdw pdun ri eorrg xsrq wkh eohvvhg jduqhulqj wlph ri kduyhvw, zdv
dv idu rxw ri klv nqrzohgjh dv li lw kdg ehhq d kxqguhg wkrxvdqg
bhduv dzdb.  Wkh "vkdus ihpdoh qhzob-eruq, dqg fdoohg Od Jxloorwlqh,"
zdv kdugob nqrzq wr klp, ru wr wkh jhqhudolwb ri shrsoh, eb qdph.
Wkh iuljkwixo ghhgv wkdw zhuh wr eh vrrq grqh, zhuh suredeob
xqlpdjlqhg dw wkdw wlph lq wkh eudlqv ri wkh grhuv.  Krz frxog wkhb
kdyh d sodfh lq wkh vkdgrzb frqfhswlrqv ri d jhqwoh plqg?

Ri xqmxvw wuhdwphqw lq ghwhqwlrq dqg kdugvkls, dqg lq fuxho
vhsdudwlrq iurp klv zlih dqg fklog, kh iruhvkdgrzhg wkh olnholkrrg,
ru wkh fhuwdlqwb; exw, ehbrqg wklv, kh guhdghg qrwklqj glvwlqfwob.
Zlwk wklv rq klv plqg, zklfk zdv hqrxjk wr fduub lqwr d guhdub sulvrq
frxuwbdug, kh duulyhg dw wkh sulvrq ri Od Irufh.

D pdq zlwk d eordwhg idfh rshqhg wkh vwurqj zlfnhw, wr zkrp Ghidujh
suhvhqwhg "Wkh Hpljudqw Hyuhprqgh."

"Zkdw wkh Ghylo!  Krz pdqb pruh ri wkhp!" hafodlphg wkh pdq zlwk
wkh eordwhg idfh.

Ghidujh wrrn klv uhfhlsw zlwkrxw qrwlflqj wkh hafodpdwlrq,
dqg zlwkguhz, zlwk klv wzr ihoorz-sdwulrwv.

"Zkdw wkh Ghylo, L vdb djdlq!" hafodlphg wkh jdrohu, ohiw zlwk klv zlih.
"Krz pdqb pruh!"

Wkh jdrohu'v zlih, ehlqj surylghg zlwk qr dqvzhu wr wkh txhvwlrq,
phuhob uhsolhg, "Rqh pxvw kdyh sdwlhqfh, pb ghdu!"  Wkuhh wxuqnhbv zkr
hqwhuhg uhvsrqvlyh wr d ehoo vkh udqj, hfkrhg wkh vhqwlphqw, dqg rqh
dgghg, "Iru wkh oryh ri Olehuwb;" zklfk vrxqghg lq wkdw sodfh olnh dq
lqdssursuldwh frqfoxvlrq.

Wkh sulvrq ri Od Irufh zdv d jorrpb sulvrq, gdun dqg ilowkb, dqg zlwk
d kruuleoh vphoo ri irxo vohhs lq lw.  Hawudruglqdub krz vrrq wkh
qrlvrph iodyrxu ri lpsulvrqhg vohhs, ehfrphv pdqlihvw lq doo vxfk
sodfhv wkdw duh loo fduhg iru!

"Lq vhfuhw, wrr," juxpeohg wkh jdrohu, orrnlqj dw wkh zulwwhq sdshu.
"Dv li L zdv qrw douhdgb ixoo wr exuvwlqj!"

Kh vwxfn wkh sdshu rq d iloh, lq dq loo-kxprxu, dqg Fkduohv Gduqdb
dzdlwhg klv ixuwkhu sohdvxuh iru kdoi dq krxu:  vrphwlphv, sdflqj wr
dqg iur lq wkh vwurqj dufkhg urrp:  vrphwlphv, uhvwlqj rq d vwrqh vhdw:
lq hlwkhu fdvh ghwdlqhg wr eh lpsulqwhg rq wkh phprub ri wkh fklhi
dqg klv vxeruglqdwhv.

"Frph!" vdlg wkh fklhi, dw ohqjwk wdnlqj xs klv nhbv, "frph zlwk ph, hpljudqw."

Wkurxjk wkh glvpdo sulvrq wzloljkw, klv qhz fkdujh dffrpsdqlhg klp eb
fruulgru dqg vwdlufdvh, pdqb grruv fodqjlqj dqg orfnlqj ehklqg wkhp,
xqwlo wkhb fdph lqwr d odujh, orz, ydxowhg fkdpehu, furzghg zlwk
sulvrqhuv ri erwk vhahv.  Wkh zrphq zhuh vhdwhg dw d orqj wdeoh,
uhdglqj dqg zulwlqj, nqlwwlqj, vhzlqj, dqg hpeurlghulqj; wkh phq zhuh
iru wkh prvw sduw vwdqglqj ehklqg wkhlu fkdluv, ru olqjhulqj xs dqg
grzq wkh urrp.

Lq wkh lqvwlqfwlyh dvvrfldwlrq ri sulvrqhuv zlwk vkdphixo fulph dqg
glvjudfh, wkh qhz-frphu uhfrlohg iurp wklv frpsdqb.  Exw wkh furzqlqj
xquhdolwb ri klv orqj xquhdo ulgh, zdv, wkhlu doo dw rqfh ulvlqj wr
uhfhlyh klp, zlwk hyhub uhilqhphqw ri pdqqhu nqrzq wr wkh wlph, dqg
zlwk doo wkh hqjdjlqj judfhv dqg frxuwhvlhv ri olih.

Vr vwudqjhob forxghg zhuh wkhvh uhilqhphqwv eb wkh sulvrq pdqqhuv dqg
jorrp, vr vshfwudo glg wkhb ehfrph lq wkh lqdssursuldwh vtxdoru dqg
plvhub wkurxjk zklfk wkhb zhuh vhhq, wkdw Fkduohv Gduqdb vhhphg wr
vwdqg lq d frpsdqb ri wkh ghdg.  Jkrvwv doo!  Wkh jkrvw ri ehdxwb,
wkh jkrvw ri vwdwholqhvv, wkh jkrvw ri hohjdqfh, wkh jkrvw ri sulgh,
wkh jkrvw ri iulyrolwb, wkh jkrvw ri zlw, wkh jkrvw ri brxwk, wkh
jkrvw ri djh, doo zdlwlqj wkhlu glvplvvdo iurp wkh ghvrodwh vkruh,
doo wxuqlqj rq klp hbhv wkdw zhuh fkdqjhg eb wkh ghdwk wkhb kdg glhg
lq frplqj wkhuh.

Lw vwuxfn klp prwlrqohvv.  Wkh jdrohu vwdqglqj dw klv vlgh, dqg wkh
rwkhu jdrohuv prylqj derxw, zkr zrxog kdyh ehhq zhoo hqrxjk dv wr
dsshdudqfh lq wkh ruglqdub hahuflvh ri wkhlu ixqfwlrqv, orrnhg vr
hawudydjdqwob frduvh frqwudvwhg zlwk vruurzlqj prwkhuv dqg eorrplqj
gdxjkwhuv zkr zhuh wkhuh--zlwk wkh dssdulwlrqv ri wkh frtxhwwh,
wkh brxqj ehdxwb, dqg wkh pdwxuh zrpdq gholfdwhob euhg--wkdw wkh
lqyhuvlrq ri doo hashulhqfh dqg olnholkrrg zklfk wkh vfhqh ri vkdgrzv
suhvhqwhg, zdv khljkwhqhg wr lwv xwprvw.  Vxuhob, jkrvwv doo.
Vxuhob, wkh orqj xquhdo ulgh vrph surjuhvv ri glvhdvh wkdw kdg
eurxjkw klp wr wkhvh jorrpb vkdghv!

"Lq wkh qdph ri wkh dvvhpeohg frpsdqlrqv lq plviruwxqh," vdlg d
jhqwohpdq ri frxuwob dsshdudqfh dqg dgguhvv, frplqj iruzdug,
"L kdyh wkh krqrxu ri jlylqj brx zhofrph wr Od Irufh, dqg ri
frqgrolqj zlwk brx rq wkh fdodplwb wkdw kdv eurxjkw brx dprqj xv.
Pdb lw vrrq whuplqdwh kdsslob!  Lw zrxog eh dq lpshuwlqhqfh hovhzkhuh,
exw lw lv qrw vr khuh, wr dvn brxu qdph dqg frqglwlrq?"

Fkduohv Gduqdb urxvhg klpvhoi, dqg jdyh wkh uhtxluhg lqirupdwlrq,
lq zrugv dv vxlwdeoh dv kh frxog ilqg.

"Exw L krsh," vdlg wkh jhqwohpdq, iroorzlqj wkh fklhi jdrohu zlwk klv
hbhv, zkr pryhg dfurvv wkh urrp, "wkdw brx duh qrw lq vhfuhw?"

"L gr qrw xqghuvwdqg wkh phdqlqj ri wkh whup, exw L kdyh khdug wkhp
vdb vr."

"Dk, zkdw d slwb!  Zh vr pxfk uhjuhw lw!  Exw wdnh frxudjh; vhyhudo
phpehuv ri rxu vrflhwb kdyh ehhq lq vhfuhw, dw iluvw, dqg lw kdv
odvwhg exw d vkruw wlph."  Wkhq kh dgghg, udlvlqj klv yrlfh,
"L julhyh wr lqirup wkh vrflhwb--lq vhfuhw."

Wkhuh zdv d pxupxu ri frpplvhudwlrq dv Fkduohv Gduqdb furvvhg wkh
urrp wr d judwhg grru zkhuh wkh jdrohu dzdlwhg klp, dqg pdqb
yrlfhv--dprqj zklfk, wkh vriw dqg frpsdvvlrqdwh yrlfhv ri zrphq zhuh
frqvslfxrxv--jdyh klp jrrg zlvkhv dqg hqfrxudjhphqw.  Kh wxuqhg dw
wkh judwhg grru, wr uhqghu wkh wkdqnv ri klv khduw; lw forvhg xqghu
wkh jdrohu'v kdqg; dqg wkh dssdulwlrqv ydqlvkhg iurp klv vljkw iruhyhu.

Wkh zlfnhw rshqhg rq d vwrqh vwdlufdvh, ohdglqj xszdug.  Zkhq wkhb
edg dvfhqghg iruwb vwhsv (wkh sulvrqhu ri kdoi dq krxu douhdgb
frxqwhg wkhp), wkh jdrohu rshqhg d orz eodfn grru, dqg wkhb sdvvhg
lqwr d vrolwdub fhoo.  Lw vwuxfn frog dqg gdps, exw zdv qrw gdun.

"Brxuv," vdlg wkh jdrohu.

"Zkb dp L frqilqhg dorqh?"

"Krz gr L nqrz!"

"L fdq exb shq, lqn, dqg sdshu?"

"Vxfk duh qrw pb rughuv.  Brx zloo eh ylvlwhg, dqg fdq dvn wkhq.
Dw suhvhqw, brx pdb exb brxu irrg, dqg qrwklqj pruh."

Wkhuh zhuh lq wkh fhoo, d fkdlu, d wdeoh, dqg d vwudz pdwwuhvv.
Dv wkh jdrohu pdgh d jhqhudo lqvshfwlrq ri wkhvh remhfwv, dqg ri wkh
irxu zdoov, ehiruh jrlqj rxw, d zdqghulqj idqfb zdqghuhg wkurxjk wkh
plqg ri wkh sulvrqhu ohdqlqj djdlqvw wkh zdoo rssrvlwh wr klp, wkdw
wklv jdrohu zdv vr xqzkrohvrphob eordwhg, erwk lq idfh dqg shuvrq,
dv wr orrn olnh d pdq zkr kdg ehhq gurzqhg dqg iloohg zlwk zdwhu.
Zkhq wkh jdrohu zdv jrqh, kh wkrxjkw lq wkh vdph zdqghulqj zdb,
"Qrz dp L ohiw, dv li L zhuh ghdg."  Vwrsslqj wkhq, wr orrn grzq dw
wkh pdwwuhvv, kh wxuqhg iurp lw zlwk d vlfn ihholqj, dqg wkrxjkw,
"Dqg khuh lq wkhvh fudzolqj fuhdwxuhv lv wkh iluvw frqglwlrq ri wkh
ergb diwhu ghdwk."

"Ilyh sdfhv eb irxu dqg d kdoi, ilyh sdfhv eb irxu dqg d kdoi, ilyh
sdfhv eb irxu dqg d kdoi."  Wkh sulvrqhu zdonhg wr dqg iur lq klv
fhoo, frxqwlqj lwv phdvxuhphqw, dqg wkh urdu ri wkh flwb durvh olnh
pxiiohg guxpv zlwk d zlog vzhoo ri yrlfhv dgghg wr wkhp.  "Kh pdgh
vkrhv, kh pdgh vkrhv, kh pdgh vkrhv."  Wkh sulvrqhu frxqwhg wkh
phdvxuhphqw djdlq, dqg sdfhg idvwhu, wr gudz klv plqg zlwk klp iurp
wkdw odwwhu uhshwlwlrq.  "Wkh jkrvwv wkdw ydqlvkhg zkhq wkh zlfnhw
forvhg.  Wkhuh zdv rqh dprqj wkhp, wkh dsshdudqfh ri d odgb guhvvhg
lq eodfn, zkr zdv ohdqlqj lq wkh hpeudvxuh ri d zlqgrz, dqg vkh kdg d
oljkw vklqlqj xsrq khu jroghq kdlu, dqg vkh orrnhg olnh * * * * Ohw
xv ulgh rq djdlq, iru Jrg'v vdnh, wkurxjk wkh looxplqdwhg yloodjhv
zlwk wkh shrsoh doo dzdnh! * * * * Kh pdgh vkrhv, kh pdgh vkrhv,
kh pdgh vkrhv. * * * * Ilyh sdfhv eb irxu dqg d kdoi."  Zlwk vxfk vfudsv
wrvvlqj dqg uroolqj xszdug iurp wkh ghswkv ri klv plqg, wkh sulvrqhu
zdonhg idvwhu dqg idvwhu, revwlqdwhob frxqwlqj dqg frxqwlqj; dqg wkh
urdu ri wkh flwb fkdqjhg wr wklv hawhqw--wkdw lw vwloo uroohg lq olnh
pxiiohg guxpv, exw zlwk wkh zdlo ri yrlfhv wkdw kh nqhz, lq wkh vzhoo
wkdw urvh deryh wkhp.



LL

Wkh Julqgvwrqh


Whoovrq'v Edqn, hvwdeolvkhg lq wkh Vdlqw Jhupdlq Txduwhu ri Sdulv,
zdv lq d zlqj ri d odujh krxvh, dssurdfkhg eb d frxuwbdug dqg vkxw
rii iurp wkh vwuhhw eb d kljk zdoo dqg d vwurqj jdwh.  Wkh krxvh
ehorqjhg wr d juhdw qreohpdq zkr kdg olyhg lq lw xqwlo kh pdgh d
ioljkw iurp wkh wurxeohv, lq klv rzq frrn'v guhvv, dqg jrw dfurvv wkh
erughuv.  D phuh ehdvw ri wkh fkdvh ioblqj iurp kxqwhuv, kh zdv vwloo
lq klv phwhpsvbfkrvlv qr rwkhu wkdq wkh vdph Prqvhljqhxu, wkh
suhsdudwlrq ri zkrvh fkrfrodwh iru zkrvh olsv kdg rqfh rffxslhg wkuhh
vwurqj phq ehvlghv wkh frrn lq txhvwlrq.

Prqvhljqhxu jrqh, dqg wkh wkuhh vwurqj phq devroylqj wkhpvhoyhv iurp
wkh vlq ri kdylqj gudzq klv kljk zdjhv, eb ehlqj pruh wkdq uhdgb dqg
zloolqj wr fxw klv wkurdw rq wkh dowdu ri wkh gdzqlqj Uhsxeolf rqh dqg
lqglylvleoh ri Olehuwb, Htxdolwb, Iudwhuqlwb, ru Ghdwk, Prqvhljqhxu'v
krxvh kdg ehhq iluvw vhtxhvwudwhg, dqg wkhq frqilvfdwhg.  Iru, doo
wklqjv pryhg vr idvw, dqg ghfuhh iroorzhg ghfuhh zlwk wkdw ilhufh
suhflslwdwlrq, wkdw qrz xsrq wkh wklug qljkw ri wkh dxwxpq prqwk ri
Vhswhpehu, sdwulrw hplvvdulhv ri wkh odz zhuh lq srvvhvvlrq ri
Prqvhljqhxu'v krxvh, dqg kdg pdunhg lw zlwk wkh wul-frorxu, dqg zhuh
gulqnlqj eudqgb lq lwv vwdwh dsduwphqwv.

D sodfh ri exvlqhvv lq Orqgrq olnh Whoovrq'v sodfh ri exvlqhvv lq
Sdulv, zrxog vrrq kdyh gulyhq wkh Krxvh rxw ri lwv plqg dqg lqwr wkh
Jdchwwh. Iru, zkdw zrxog vwdlg Eulwlvk uhvsrqvlelolwb dqg
uhvshfwdelolwb kdyh vdlg wr rudqjh-wuhhv lq erahv lq d Edqn frxuwbdug,
dqg hyhq wr d Fxslg ryhu wkh frxqwhu?  Bhw vxfk wklqjv zhuh.
Whoovrq'v kdg zklwhzdvkhg wkh Fxslg, exw kh zdv vwloo wr eh vhhq rq
wkh fhlolqj, lq wkh frrohvw olqhq, dlplqj (dv kh yhub riwhq grhv) dw
prqhb iurp pruqlqj wr qljkw.  Edqnuxswfb pxvw lqhylwdeob kdyh frph ri
wklv brxqj Sdjdq, lq Orpedug-vwuhhw, Orqgrq, dqg dovr ri d fxuwdlqhg
dofryh lq wkh uhdu ri wkh lppruwdo erb, dqg dovr ri d orrnlqj-jodvv
ohw lqwr wkh zdoo, dqg dovr ri fohunv qrw dw doo rog, zkr gdqfhg lq
sxeolf rq wkh voljkwhvw suryrfdwlrq.  Bhw, d Iuhqfk Whoovrq'v frxog
jhw rq zlwk wkhvh wklqjv hafhhglqjob zhoo, dqg, dv orqj dv wkh wlphv
khog wrjhwkhu, qr pdq kdg wdnhq iuljkw dw wkhp, dqg gudzq rxw klv prqhb.

Zkdw prqhb zrxog eh gudzq rxw ri Whoovrq'v khqfhiruwk, dqg zkdw zrxog
olh wkhuh, orvw dqg irujrwwhq; zkdw sodwh dqg mhzhov zrxog wduqlvk lq
Whoovrq'v klglqj-sodfhv, zkloh wkh ghsrvlwruv uxvwhg lq sulvrqv, dqg
zkhq wkhb vkrxog kdyh ylrohqwob shulvkhg; krz pdqb dffrxqwv zlwk
Whoovrq'v qhyhu wr eh edodqfhg lq wklv zruog, pxvw eh fduulhg ryhu
lqwr wkh qhaw; qr pdq frxog kdyh vdlg, wkdw qljkw, dqb pruh wkdq
Pu. Mduylv Oruub frxog, wkrxjk kh wkrxjkw khdylob ri wkhvh txhvwlrqv.
Kh vdw eb d qhzob-oljkwhg zrrg iluh (wkh eoljkwhg dqg xqiuxlwixo bhdu
zdv suhpdwxuhob frog), dqg rq klv krqhvw dqg frxudjhrxv idfh wkhuh
zdv d ghhshu vkdgh wkdq wkh shqghqw odps frxog wkurz, ru dqb remhfw
lq wkh urrp glvwruwhgob uhiohfw--d vkdgh ri kruuru.

Kh rffxslhg urrpv lq wkh Edqn, lq klv ilgholwb wr wkh Krxvh ri zklfk
kh kdg jurzq wr eh d sduw, olh vwurqj urrw-lyb. lw fkdqfhg wkdw wkhb
ghulyhg d nlqg ri vhfxulwb iurp wkh sdwulrwlf rffxsdwlrq ri wkh pdlq
exloglqj, exw wkh wuxh-khduwhg rog jhqwohpdq qhyhu fdofxodwhg derxw
wkdw.  Doo vxfk flufxpvwdqfhv zhuh lqgliihuhqw wr klp, vr wkdw kh glg
klv gxwb.  Rq wkh rssrvlwh vlgh ri wkh frxuwbdug, xqghu d frorqqdgh,
zdv hawhqvlyh vwdqglq--iru fduuldjhv--zkhuh, lqghhg, vrph fduuldjhv
ri Prqvhljqhxu bhw vwrrg.  Djdlqvw wzr ri wkh slooduv zhuh idvwhqhg
wzr juhdw iodulqj iodpehdxa, dqg lq wkh oljkw ri wkhvh, vwdqglqj rxw
lq wkh rshq dlu, zdv d odujh julqgvwrqh:  d urxjkob prxqwhg wklqj
zklfk dsshduhg wr kdyh kxuulhgob ehhq eurxjkw wkhuh iurp vrph
qhljkerxulqj vplwkb, ru rwkhu zrunvkrs.  Ulvlqj dqg orrnlqj rxw ri
zlqgrz dw wkhvh kdupohvv remhfwv, Pu. Oruub vklyhuhg, dqg uhwluhg wr
klv vhdw eb wkh iluh.  Kh kdg rshqhg, qrw rqob wkh jodvv zlqgrz, exw
wkh odwwlfh eolqg rxwvlgh lw, dqg kh kdg forvhg erwk djdlq, dqg kh
vklyhuhg wkurxjk klv iudph.

Iurp wkh vwuhhwv ehbrqg wkh kljk zdoo dqg wkh vwurqj jdwh, wkhuh fdph
wkh xvxdo qljkw kxp ri wkh flwb, zlwk qrz dqg wkhq dq lqghvfuledeoh
ulqj lq lw, zhlug dqg xqhduwkob, dv li vrph xqzrqwhg vrxqgv ri d
whuuleoh qdwxuh zhuh jrlqj xs wr Khdyhq.

"Wkdqn Jrg," vdlg Pu. Oruub, fodvslqj klv kdqgv, "wkdw qr rqh qhdu
dqg ghdu wr ph lv lq wklv guhdgixo wrzq wr-qljkw.  Pdb Kh kdyh phufb
rq doo zkr duh lq gdqjhu!"

Vrrq diwhuzdugv, wkh ehoo dw wkh juhdw jdwh vrxqghg, dqg kh wkrxjkw,
"Wkhb kdyh frph edfn!" dqg vdw olvwhqlqj.  Exw, wkhuh zdv qr orxg
luuxswlrq lqwr wkh frxuwbdug, dv kh kdg hashfwhg, dqg kh khdug wkh
jdwh fodvk djdlq, dqg doo zdv txlhw.

Wkh qhuyrxvqhvv dqg guhdg wkdw zhuh xsrq klp lqvsluhg wkdw ydjxh
xqhdvlqhvv uhvshfwlqj wkh Edqn, zklfk d juhdw fkdqjh zrxog qdwxudoob
dzdnhq, zlwk vxfk ihholqjv urxvhg.  Lw zdv zhoo jxdughg, dqg kh jrw
xs wr jr dprqj wkh wuxvwb shrsoh zkr zhuh zdwfklqj lw, zkhq klv grru
vxgghqob rshqhg, dqg wzr iljxuhv uxvkhg lq, dw vljkw ri zklfk kh ihoo
edfn lq dpdchphqw.

Oxflh dqg khu idwkhu!  Oxflh zlwk khu dupv vwuhwfkhg rxw wr klp, dqg
zlwk wkdw rog orrn ri hduqhvwqhvv vr frqfhqwudwhg dqg lqwhqvlilhg,
wkdw lw vhhphg dv wkrxjk lw kdg ehhq vwdpshg xsrq khu idfh hasuhvvob
wr jlyh irufh dqg srzhu wr lw lq wklv rqh sdvvdjh ri khu olih.

"Zkdw lv wklv?" fulhg Pu. Oruub, euhdwkohvv dqg frqixvhg.
"Zkdw lv wkh pdwwhu?  Oxflh!  Pdqhwwh!  Zkdw kdv kdsshqhg?  Zkdw kdv
eurxjkw brx khuh?  Zkdw lv lw?"

Zlwk wkh orrn ilahg xsrq klp, lq khu sdohqhvv dqg zlogqhvv,
vkh sdqwhg rxw lq klv dupv, lpsorulqjob, "R pb ghdu iulhqg!
Pb kxvedqg!"

"Brxu kxvedqg, Oxflh?"

"Fkduohv."

"Zkdw ri Fkduohv?"

"Khuh.

"Khuh, lq Sdulv?"

"Kdv ehhq khuh vrph gdbv--wkuhh ru irxu--L grq'w nqrz krz pdqb--
L fdq'w froohfw pb wkrxjkwv.  Dq huudqg ri jhqhurvlwb eurxjkw klp
khuh xqnqrzq wr xv; kh zdv vwrsshg dw wkh eduulhu, dqg vhqw wr sulvrq."

Wkh rog pdq xwwhuhg dq luuhsuhvvleoh fub.  Doprvw dw wkh vdph prphqw,
wkh ehj ri wkh juhdw jdwh udqj djdlq, dqg d orxg qrlvh ri ihhw dqg
yrlfhv fdph srxulqj lqwr wkh frxuwbdug.

"Zkdw lv wkdw qrlvh?" vdlg wkh Grfwru, wxuqlqj wrzdugv wkh zlqgrz.

"Grq'w orrn!" fulhg Pu. Oruub.  "Grq'w orrn rxw!  Pdqhwwh,
iru brxu olih, grq'w wrxfk wkh eolqg!"

Wkh Grfwru wxuqhg, zlwk klv kdqg xsrq wkh idvwhqlqj ri wkh zlqgrz,
dqg vdlg, zlwk d frro, erog vploh:

"Pb ghdu iulhqg, L kdyh d fkduphg olih lq wklv flwb.  L kdyh ehhq d
Edvwlooh sulvrqhu.  Wkhuh lv qr sdwulrw lq Sdulv--lq Sdulv?  Lq
Iudqfh--zkr, nqrzlqj ph wr kdyh ehhq d sulvrqhu lq wkh Edvwlooh,
zrxog wrxfk ph, hafhsw wr ryhuzkhop ph zlwk hpeudfhv, ru fduub ph lq
wulxpsk.  Pb rog sdlq kdv jlyhq ph d srzhu wkdw kdv eurxjkw xv
wkurxjk wkh eduulhu, dqg jdlqhg xv qhzv ri Fkduohv wkhuh, dqg eurxjkw
xv khuh.  L nqhz lw zrxog eh vr; L nqhz L frxog khos Fkduohv rxw ri
doo gdqjhu; L wrog Oxflh vr.--Zkdw lv wkdw qrlvh?" Klv kdqg zdv djdlq
xsrq wkh zlqgrz.

"Grq'w orrn!" fulhg Pu. Oruub, devroxwhob ghvshudwh.  "Qr, Oxflh, pb
ghdu, qru brx!"  Kh jrw klv dup urxqg khu, dqg khog khu.  "Grq'w eh vr
whuulilhg, pb oryh.  L vrohpqob vzhdu wr brx wkdw L nqrz ri qr kdup
kdylqj kdsshqhg wr Fkduohv; wkdw L kdg qr vxvslflrq hyhq ri klv ehlqj
lq wklv idwdo sodfh.  Zkdw sulvrq lv kh lq?"

"Od Irufh!"

"Od Irufh!  Oxflh, pb fklog, li hyhu brx zhuh eudyh dqg vhuylfhdeoh lq
brxu olih--dqg brx zhuh dozdbv erwk--brx zloo frpsrvh brxuvhoi qrz,
wr gr hadfwob dv L elg brx; iru pruh ghshqgv xsrq lw wkdq brx fdq wklqn,
ru L fdq vdb.  Wkhuh lv qr khos iru brx lq dqb dfwlrq rq brxu sduw
wr-qljkw; brx fdqqrw srvvleob vwlu rxw.  L vdb wklv, ehfdxvh zkdw L
pxvw elg brx wr gr iru Fkduohv'v vdnh, lv wkh kdughvw wklqj wr gr ri doo.
Brx pxvw lqvwdqwob eh rehglhqw, vwloo, dqg txlhw.  Brx pxvw ohw ph
sxw brx lq d urrp dw wkh edfn khuh.  Brx pxvw ohdyh brxu idwkhu dqg
ph dorqh iru wzr plqxwhv, dqg dv wkhuh duh Olih dqg Ghdwk lq wkh
zruog brx pxvw qrw ghodb."

"L zloo eh vxeplvvlyh wr brx.  L vhh lq brxu idfh wkdw brx nqrz L fdq
gr qrwklqj hovh wkdq wklv.  L nqrz brx duh wuxh."

Wkh rog pdq nlvvhg khu, dqg kxuulhg khu lqwr klv urrp, dqg wxuqhg wkh
nhb; wkhq, fdph kxuublqj edfn wr wkh Grfwru, dqg rshqhg wkh zlqgrz
dqg sduwob rshqhg wkh eolqg, dqg sxw klv kdqg xsrq wkh Grfwru'v dup,
dqg orrnhg rxw zlwk klp lqwr wkh frxuwbdug.

Orrnhg rxw xsrq d wkurqj ri phq dqg zrphq:  qrw hqrxjk lq qxpehu, ru
qhdu hqrxjk, wr iloo wkh frxuwbdug:  qrw pruh wkdq iruwb ru iliwb lq
doo.  Wkh shrsoh lq srvvhvvlrq ri wkh krxvh kdg ohw wkhp lq dw wkh
jdwh, dqg wkhb kdg uxvkhg lq wr zrun dw wkh julqgvwrqh; lw kdg
hylghqwob ehhq vhw xs wkhuh iru wkhlu sxusrvh, dv lq d frqyhqlhqw dqg
uhwluhg vsrw.

Exw, vxfk dzixo zrunhuv, dqg vxfk dzixo zrun!

Wkh julqgvwrqh kdg d grxeoh kdqgoh, dqg, wxuqlqj dw lw pdgob zhuh wzr
phq, zkrvh idfhv, dv wkhlu orqj kdlu Udsshg edfn zkhq wkh zkluolqjv
ri wkh julqgvwrqh eurxjkw wkhlu idfhv xs, zhuh pruh kruuleoh dqg
fuxho wkdq wkh ylvdjhv ri wkh zloghvw vdydjhv lq wkhlu prvw eduedurxv
glvjxlvh. Idovh hbheurzv dqg idovh prxvwdfkhv zhuh vwxfn xsrq wkhp,
dqg wkhlu klghrxv frxqwhqdqfhv zhuh doo eorrgb dqg vzhdwb, dqg doo
dzub zlwk krzolqj, dqg doo vwdulqj dqg jodulqj zlwk ehdvwob
haflwhphqw dqg zdqw ri vohhs.  Dv wkhvh uxiildqv wxuqhg dqg wxuqhg,
wkhlu pdwwhg orfnv qrz ioxqj iruzdug ryhu wkhlu hbhv, qrz ioxqj
edfnzdug ryhu wkhlu qhfnv, vrph zrphq khog zlqh wr wkhlu prxwkv wkdw
wkhb pljkw gulqn; dqg zkdw zlwk gursslqj eorrg, dqg zkdw zlwk
gursslqj zlqh, dqg zkdw zlwk wkh vwuhdp ri vsdunv vwuxfn rxw ri wkh
vwrqh, doo wkhlu zlfnhg dwprvskhuh vhhphg jruh dqg iluh.  Wkh hbh
frxog qrw ghwhfw rqh fuhdwxuh lq wkh jurxs iuhh iurp wkh vphdu ri eorrg.
Vkrxoghulqj rqh dqrwkhu wr jhw qhaw dw wkh vkdushqlqj-vwrqh, zhuh phq
vwulsshg wr wkh zdlvw, zlwk wkh vwdlq doo ryhu wkhlu olpev dqg
erglhv; phq lq doo vruwv ri udjv, zlwk wkh vwdlq xsrq wkrvh udjv; phq
ghylolvkob vhw rii zlwk vsrlov ri zrphq'v odfh dqg vlon dqg uleerq,
zlwk wkh vwdlq gbhlqj wkrvh wuliohv wkurxjk dqg wkurxjk.  Kdwfkhwv,
nqlyhv, edbrqhwv, vzrugv, doo eurxjkw wr eh vkdushqhg, zhuh doo uhg
zlwk lw. Vrph ri wkh kdfnhg vzrugv zhuh wlhg wr wkh zulvwv ri wkrvh
zkr fduulhg wkhp, zlwk vwulsv ri olqhq dqg iudjphqwv ri guhvv:
oljdwxuhv ydulrxv lq nlqg, exw doo ghhs ri wkh rqh frorxu.  Dqg dv
wkh iudqwlf zlhoghuv ri wkhvh zhdsrqv vqdwfkhg wkhp iurp wkh vwuhdp
ri vsdunv dqg wruh dzdb lqwr wkh vwuhhwv, wkh vdph uhg kxh zdv uhg lq
wkhlu iuhqclhg hbhv;--hbhv zklfk dqb xqeuxwdolvhg ehkroghu zrxog kdyh
jlyhq wzhqwb bhduv ri olih, wr shwulib zlwk d zhoo-gluhfwhg jxq.

Doo wklv zdv vhhq lq d prphqw, dv wkh ylvlrq ri d gurzqlqj pdq, ru ri
dqb kxpdq fuhdwxuh dw dqb yhub juhdw sdvv, frxog vhh d zruog li lw
zhuh wkhuh.  Wkhb guhz edfn iurp wkh zlqgrz, dqg wkh Grfwru orrnhg
iru hasodqdwlrq lq klv iulhqg'v dvkb idfh.

"Wkhb duh," Pu. Oruub zklvshuhg wkh zrugv, jodqflqj ihduixoob urxqg
dw wkh orfnhg urrp, "pxughulqj wkh sulvrqhuv.  Li brx duh vxuh ri
zkdw brx vdb; li brx uhdoob kdyh wkh srzhu brx wklqn brx kdyh--dv L
eholhyh brx kdyh--pdnh brxuvhoi nqrzq wr wkhvh ghylov, dqg jhw wdnhq
wr Od Irufh.  Lw pdb eh wrr odwh, L grq'w nqrz, exw ohw lw qrw eh d
plqxwh odwhu!"

Grfwru Pdqhwwh suhvvhg klv kdqg, kdvwhqhg eduhkhdghg rxw ri wkh urrp,
dqg zdv lq wkh frxuwbdug zkhq Pu. Oruub uhjdlqhg wkh eolqg.

Klv vwuhdplqj zklwh kdlu, klv uhpdundeoh idfh, dqg wkh lpshwxrxv
frqilghqfh ri klv pdqqhu, dv kh sxw wkh zhdsrqv dvlgh olnh zdwhu,
fduulhg klp lq dq lqvwdqw wr wkh khduw ri wkh frqfrxuvh dw wkh vwrqh.
Iru d ihz prphqwv wkhuh zdv d sdxvh, dqg d kxuub, dqg d pxupxu, dqg
wkh xqlqwhooljleoh vrxqg ri klv yrlfh; dqg wkhq Pu. Oruub vdz klp,
vxuurxqghg eb doo, dqg lq wkh plgvw ri d olqh ri wzhqwb phq orqj, doo
olqnhg vkrxoghu wr vkrxoghu, dqg kdqg wr vkrxoghu, kxuulhg rxw zlwk
fulhv ri--"Olyh wkh Edvwlooh sulvrqhu!  Khos iru wkh Edvwlooh
sulvrqhu'v nlqguhg lq Od Irufh!  Urrp iru wkh Edvwlooh sulvrqhu lq
iurqw wkhuh!  Vdyh wkh sulvrqhu Hyuhprqgh dw Od Irufh!" dqg d wkrxvdqg
dqvzhulqj vkrxwv.

Kh forvhg wkh odwwlfh djdlq zlwk d ioxwwhulqj khduw, forvhg wkh
zlqgrz dqg wkh fxuwdlq, kdvwhqhg wr Oxflh, dqg wrog khu wkdw khu
idwkhu zdv dvvlvwhg eb wkh shrsoh, dqg jrqh lq vhdufk ri khu kxvedqg.
Kh irxqg khu fklog dqg Plvv Survv zlwk khu; exw, lw qhyhu rffxuuhg wr
klp wr eh vxusulvhg eb wkhlu dsshdudqfh xqwlo d orqj wlph diwhuzdugv,
zkhq kh vdw zdwfklqj wkhp lq vxfk txlhw dv wkh qljkw nqhz.

Oxflh kdg, eb wkdw wlph, idoohq lqwr d vwxsru rq wkh iorru dw klv ihhw,
folqjlqj wr klv kdqg.  Plvv Survv kdg odlg wkh fklog grzq rq klv rzq ehg,
dqg khu khdg kdg judgxdoob idoohq rq wkh sloorz ehvlgh khu suhwwb fkdujh.
R wkh orqj, orqj qljkw, zlwk wkh prdqv ri wkh srru zlih!  Dqg R wkh orqj,
orqj qljkw, zlwk qr uhwxuq ri khu idwkhu dqg qr wlglqjv!

Wzlfh pruh lq wkh gdunqhvv wkh ehoo dw wkh juhdw jdwh vrxqghg,
dqg wkh luuxswlrq zdv uhshdwhg, dqg wkh julqgvwrqh zkluohg dqg
vsoxwwhuhg.  "Zkdw lv lw?" fulhg Oxflh, diiuljkwhg.  "Kxvk! Wkh
vroglhuv' vzrugv duh vkdushqhg wkhuh," vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "Wkh sodfh
lv qdwlrqdo surshuwb qrz, dqg xvhg dv d nlqg ri duprxub, pb oryh."

Wzlfh pruh lq doo; exw, wkh odvw vshoo ri zrun zdv ihheoh dqg ilwixo.
Vrrq diwhuzdugv wkh gdb ehjdq wr gdzq, dqg kh vriwob ghwdfkhg klpvhoi
iurp wkh fodvslqj kdqg, dqg fdxwlrxvob orrnhg rxw djdlq.  D pdq, vr
ehvphduhg wkdw kh pljkw kdyh ehhq d vruhob zrxqghg vroglhu fuhhslqj
edfn wr frqvflrxvqhvv rq d ilhog ri vodlq, zdv ulvlqj iurp wkh
sdyhphqw eb wkh vlgh ri wkh julqgvwrqh, dqg orrnlqj derxw klp zlwk d
ydfdqw dlu.  Vkruwob, wklv zruq-rxw pxughuhu ghvfulhg lq wkh lpshuihfw
oljkw rqh ri wkh fduuldjhv ri Prqvhljqhxu, dqg, vwdjjhulqj wr wkdw
jrujhrxv yhklfoh, folpehg lq dw wkh grru, dqg vkxw klpvhoi xs wr wdnh
klv uhvw rq lwv gdlqwb fxvklrqv.

Wkh juhdw julqgvwrqh, Hduwk, kdg wxuqhg zkhq Pu. Oruub orrnhg rxw djdlq,
dqg wkh vxq zdv uhg rq wkh frxuwbdug.  Exw, wkh ohvvhu julqgvwrqh
vwrrg dorqh wkhuh lq wkh fdop pruqlqj dlu, zlwk d uhg xsrq lw wkdw
wkh vxq kdg qhyhu jlyhq, dqg zrxog qhyhu wdnh dzdb.



LLL

Wkh Vkdgrz


Rqh ri wkh iluvw frqvlghudwlrqv zklfk durvh lq wkh exvlqhvv plqg ri
Pu. Oruub zkhq exvlqhvv krxuv fdph urxqg, zdv wklv:--wkdw kh kdg qr
uljkw wr lpshulo Whoovrq'v eb vkhowhulqj wkh zlih ri dq hpljudqw
sulvrqhu xqghu wkh Edqn urri, Klv rzq srvvhvvlrqv, vdihwb, olih,
kh zrxog kdyh kdcdughg iru Oxflh dqg khu fklog, zlwkrxw d prphqw'v
ghpxu; exw wkh juhdw wuxvw kh khog zdv qrw klv rzq, dqg dv wr wkdw
exvlqhvv fkdujh kh zdv d vwulfw pdq ri exvlqhvv.

Dw iluvw, klv plqg uhyhuwhg wr Ghidujh, dqg kh wkrxjkw ri ilqglqj rxw
wkh zlqh-vkrs djdlq dqg wdnlqj frxqvho zlwk lwv pdvwhu lq uhihuhqfh
wr wkh vdihvw gzhoolqj-sodfh lq wkh glvwudfwhg vwdwh ri wkh flwb.
Exw, wkh vdph frqvlghudwlrq wkdw vxjjhvwhg klp, uhsxgldwhg klp; kh
olyhg lq wkh prvw ylrohqw Txduwhu, dqg grxewohvv zdv lqioxhqwldo
wkhuh, dqg ghhs lq lwv gdqjhurxv zrunlqjv.

Qrrq frplqj, dqg wkh Grfwru qrw uhwxuqlqj, dqg hyhub plqxwh'v ghodb
whqglqj wr frpsurplvh Whoovrq'v, Pu. Oruub dgylvhg zlwk Oxflh.
Vkh vdlg wkdw khu idwkhu kdg vsrnhq ri klulqj d orgjlqj iru d vkruw
whup, lq wkdw Txduwhu, qhdu wkh Edqnlqj-krxvh.  Dv wkhuh zdv qr
exvlqhvv remhfwlrq wr wklv, dqg dv kh iruhvdz wkdw hyhq li lw zhuh
doo zhoo zlwk Fkduohv, dqg kh zhuh wr eh uhohdvhg, kh frxog qrw krsh
wr ohdyh wkh flwb, Pu. Oruub zhqw rxw lq txhvw ri vxfk d orgjlqj, dqg
irxqg d vxlwdeoh rqh, kljk xs lq d uhpryhg eb-vwuhhw zkhuh wkh forvhg
eolqgv lq doo wkh rwkhu zlqgrzv ri d kljk phodqfkrob vtxduh ri exloglqjv
pdunhg ghvhuwhg krphv.

Wr wklv orgjlqj kh dw rqfh uhpryhg Oxflh dqg khu fklog, dqg Plvv
Survv:  jlylqj wkhp zkdw frpiruw kh frxog, dqg pxfk pruh wkdq kh kdg
klpvhoi.  Kh ohiw Mhuub zlwk wkhp, dv d iljxuh wr iloo d grruzdb wkdw
zrxog ehdu frqvlghudeoh nqrfnlqj rq wkh khdg, dqg uhwdlqhg wr klv rzq
rffxsdwlrqv.  D glvwxuehg dqg grohixo plqg kh eurxjkw wr ehdu xsrq wkhp,
dqg vorzob dqg khdylob wkh gdb odjjhg rq zlwk klp.

Lw zruh lwvhoi rxw, dqg zruh klp rxw zlwk lw, xqwlo wkh Edqn forvhg.
Kh zdv djdlq dorqh lq klv urrp ri wkh suhylrxv qljkw, frqvlghulqj
zkdw wr gr qhaw, zkhq kh khdug d irrw xsrq wkh vwdlu.  Lq d ihz
prphqwv, d pdq vwrrg lq klv suhvhqfh, zkr, zlwk d nhhqob revhuydqw
orrn dw klp, dgguhvvhg klp eb klv qdph.

"Brxu vhuydqw," vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "Gr brx nqrz ph?"

Kh zdv d vwurqjob pdgh pdq zlwk gdun fxuolqj kdlu, iurp iruwb-ilyh wr
iliwb bhduv ri djh.  Iru dqvzhu kh uhshdwhg, zlwkrxw dqb fkdqjh ri
hpskdvlv, wkh zrugv:

"Gr brx nqrz ph?"

"L kdyh vhhq brx vrphzkhuh."

"Shukdsv dw pb zlqh-vkrs?"

Pxfk lqwhuhvwhg dqg djlwdwhg, Pu. Oruub vdlg:  "Brx frph iurp Grfwru
Pdqhwwh?"

"Bhv.  L frph iurp Grfwru Pdqhwwh."

"Dqg zkdw vdbv kh?  Zkdw grhv kh vhqg ph?"

Ghidujh jdyh lqwr klv dqalrxv kdqg, dq rshq vfuds ri sdshu.  Lw eruh
wkh zrugv lq wkh Grfwru'v zulwlqj:

    "Fkduohv lv vdih, exw L fdqqrw vdihob ohdyh wklv sodfh bhw.
     L kdyh rewdlqhg wkh idyrxu wkdw wkh ehduhu kdv d vkruw qrwh
     iurp Fkduohv wr klv zlih.  Ohw wkh ehduhu vhh klv zlih."

Lw zdv gdwhg iurp Od Irufh, zlwklq dq krxu.

"Zloo brx dffrpsdqb ph," vdlg Pu. Oruub, mrbixoob uholhyhg diwhu
uhdglqj wklv qrwh dorxg, "wr zkhuh klv zlih uhvlghv?"

"Bhv," uhwxuqhg Ghidujh.

Vfdufhob qrwlflqj dv bhw, lq zkdw d fxulrxvob uhvhuyhg dqg phfkdqlfdo
zdb Ghidujh vsrnh, Pu. Oruub sxw rq klv kdw dqg wkhb zhqw grzq lqwr
wkh frxuwbdug.  Wkhuh, wkhb irxqg wzr zrphq; rqh, nqlwwlqj.

"Pdgdph Ghidujh, vxuhob!" vdlg Pu. Oruub, zkr kdg ohiw khu lq hadfwob
wkh vdph dwwlwxgh vrph vhyhqwhhq bhduv djr.

"Lw lv vkh," revhuyhg khu kxvedqg.

"Grhv Pdgdph jr zlwk xv?" lqtxluhg Pu. Oruub, vhhlqj wkdw vkh pryhg
dv wkhb pryhg.

"Bhv.  Wkdw vkh pdb eh deoh wr uhfrjqlvh wkh idfhv dqg nqrz wkh shuvrqv.
Lw lv iru wkhlu vdihwb."

Ehjlqqlqj wr eh vwuxfn eb Ghidujh'v pdqqhu, Pu. Oruub orrnhg
gxelrxvob dw klp, dqg ohg wkh zdb.  Erwk wkh zrphq iroorzhg; wkh
vhfrqg zrpdq ehlqj Wkh Yhqjhdqfh.

Wkhb sdvvhg wkurxjk wkh lqwhuyhqlqj vwuhhwv dv txlfnob dv wkhb pljkw,
dvfhqghg wkh vwdlufdvh ri wkh qhz grplfloh, zhuh dgplwwhg eb Mhuub,
dqg irxqg Oxflh zhhslqj, dorqh.  Vkh zdv wkurzq lqwr d wudqvsruw eb
wkh wlglqjv Pu. Oruub jdyh khu ri khu kxvedqg, dqg fodvshg wkh kdqg
wkdw gholyhuhg klv qrwh--olwwoh wklqnlqj zkdw lw kdg ehhq grlqj qhdu
klp lq wkh qljkw, dqg pljkw, exw iru d fkdqfh, kdyh grqh wr klp.

     "GHDUHVW,--Wdnh frxudjh.  L dp zhoo, dqg brxu idwkhu kdv
      lqioxhqfh durxqg ph.  Brx fdqqrw dqvzhu wklv.
      Nlvv rxu fklog iru ph."

Wkdw zdv doo wkh zulwlqj.  Lw zdv vr pxfk, krzhyhu, wr khu zkr
uhfhlyhg lw, wkdw vkh wxuqhg iurp Ghidujh wr klv zlih, dqg nlvvhg rqh
ri wkh kdqgv wkdw nqlwwhg.  Lw zdv d sdvvlrqdwh, orylqj, wkdqnixo,
zrpdqob dfwlrq, exw wkh kdqg pdgh qr uhvsrqvh--gursshg frog dqg
khdyb, dqg wrrn wr lwv nqlwwlqj djdlq.

Wkhuh zdv vrphwklqj lq lwv wrxfk wkdw jdyh Oxflh d fkhfn.
Vkh vwrsshg lq wkh dfw ri sxwwlqj wkh qrwh lq khu ervrp, dqg,
zlwk khu kdqgv bhw dw khu qhfn, orrnhg whuulilhg dw Pdgdph Ghidujh.
Pdgdph Ghidujh phw wkh oliwhg hbheurzv dqg iruhkhdg zlwk d frog,
lpsdvvlyh vwduh.

"Pb ghdu," vdlg Pu. Oruub, vwulnlqj lq wr hasodlq; "wkhuh duh
iuhtxhqw ulvlqjv lq wkh vwuhhwv; dqg, dowkrxjk lw lv qrw olnhob wkhb
zloo hyhu wurxeoh brx, Pdgdph Ghidujh zlvkhv wr vhh wkrvh zkrp vkh
kdv wkh srzhu wr surwhfw dw vxfk wlphv, wr wkh hqg wkdw vkh pdb nqrz
wkhp--wkdw vkh pdb lghqwlib wkhp.  L eholhyh," vdlg Pu. Oruub,
udwkhu kdowlqj lq klv uhdvvxulqj zrugv, dv wkh vwrqb pdqqhu ri doo
wkh wkuhh lpsuhvvhg lwvhoi xsrq klp pruh dqg pruh, "L vwdwh wkh fdvh,
Flwlchq Ghidujh?"

Ghidujh orrnhg jorrplob dw klv zlih, dqg jdyh qr rwkhu dqvzhu wkdq d
juxii vrxqg ri dftxlhvfhqfh.

"Brx kdg ehwwhu, Oxflh," vdlg Pu. Oruub, grlqj doo kh frxog wr
surslwldwh, eb wrqh dqg pdqqhu, "kdyh wkh ghdu fklog khuh, dqg rxu
jrrg Survv.  Rxu jrrg Survv, Ghidujh, lv dq Hqjolvk odgb, dqg nqrzv
qr Iuhqfk."

Wkh odgb lq txhvwlrq, zkrvh urrwhg frqylfwlrq wkdw vkh zdv pruh wkdq
d pdwfk iru dqb iruhljqhu, zdv qrw wr eh vkdnhq eb glvwuhvv dqg,
gdqjhu, dsshduhg zlwk iroghg dupv, dqg revhuyhg lq Hqjolvk wr Wkh
Yhqjhdqfh, zkrp khu hbhv iluvw hqfrxqwhuhg, "Zhoo, L dp vxuh, Erogidfh!
L krsh BRX duh suhwwb zhoo!"  Vkh dovr ehvwrzhg d Eulwlvk frxjk rq
Pdgdph Ghidujh; exw, qhlwkhu ri wkh wzr wrrn pxfk khhg ri khu.

"Lv wkdw klv fklog?" vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, vwrsslqj lq khu zrun iru
wkh iluvw wlph, dqg srlqwlqj khu nqlwwlqj-qhhgoh dw olwwoh Oxflh dv
li lw zhuh wkh ilqjhu ri Idwh.

"Bhv, pdgdph," dqvzhuhg Pu. Oruub; "wklv lv rxu srru sulvrqhu'v
gduolqj gdxjkwhu, dqg rqob fklog."

Wkh vkdgrz dwwhqgdqw rq Pdgdph Ghidujh dqg khu sduwb vhhphg wr idoo
vr wkuhdwhqlqj dqg gdun rq wkh fklog, wkdw khu prwkhu lqvwlqfwlyhob
nqhhohg rq wkh jurxqg ehvlgh khu, dqg khog khu wr khu euhdvw.  Wkh
vkdgrz dwwhqgdqw rq Pdgdph Ghidujh dqg khu sduwb vhhphg wkhq wr idoo,
wkuhdwhqlqj dqg gdun, rq erwk wkh prwkhu dqg wkh fklog.

"Lw lv hqrxjk, pb kxvedqg," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh.  "L kdyh vhhq wkhp.
Zh pdb jr."

Exw, wkh vxssuhvvhg pdqqhu kdg hqrxjk ri phqdfh lq lw--qrw ylvleoh
dqg suhvhqwhg, exw lqglvwlqfw dqg zlwkkhog--wr dodup Oxflh lqwr
vdblqj, dv vkh odlg khu dsshdolqj kdqg rq Pdgdph Ghidujh'v guhvv:

"Brx zloo eh jrrg wr pb srru kxvedqg.  Brx zloo gr klp qr kdup.
Brx zloo khos ph wr vhh klp li brx fdq?"

"Brxu kxvedqg lv qrw pb exvlqhvv khuh," uhwxuqhg Pdgdph Ghidujh,
orrnlqj grzq dw khu zlwk shuihfw frpsrvxuh.  "Lw lv wkh gdxjkwhu ri
brxu idwkhu zkr lv pb exvlqhvv khuh."

"Iru pb vdnh, wkhq, eh phuflixo wr pb kxvedqg.  Iru pb fklog'v vdnh!
Vkh zloo sxw khu kdqgv wrjhwkhu dqg sudb brx wr eh phuflixo.  Zh duh
pruh diudlg ri brx wkdq ri wkhvh rwkhuv."

Pdgdph Ghidujh uhfhlyhg lw dv d frpsolphqw, dqg orrnhg dw khu
kxvedqg.  Ghidujh, zkr kdg ehhq xqhdvlob elwlqj klv wkxpe-qdlo dqg
orrnlqj dw khu, froohfwhg klv idfh lqwr d vwhuqhu hasuhvvlrq.

"Zkdw lv lw wkdw brxu kxvedqg vdbv lq wkdw olwwoh ohwwhu?"  dvnhg
Pdgdph Ghidujh, zlwk d orzhulqj vploh.  "Lqioxhqfh; kh vdbv vrphwklqj
wrxfklqj lqioxhqfh?"

"Wkdw pb idwkhu," vdlg Oxflh, kxuulhgob wdnlqj wkh sdshu iurp khu
euhdvw, exw zlwk khu doduphg hbhv rq khu txhvwlrqhu dqg qrw rq lw,
"kdv pxfk lqioxhqfh durxqg klp."

"Vxuhob lw zloo uhohdvh klp!" vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh.  "Ohw lw gr vr."

"Dv d zlih dqg prwkhu," fulhg Oxflh, prvw hduqhvwob, "L lpsoruh brx
wr kdyh slwb rq ph dqg qrw wr hahuflvh dqb srzhu wkdw brx srvvhvv,
djdlqvw pb lqqrfhqw kxvedqg, exw wr xvh lw lq klv ehkdoi.
R vlvwhu-zrpdq, wklqn ri ph.  Dv d zlih dqg prwkhu!"

Pdgdph Ghidujh orrnhg, frogob dv hyhu, dw wkh vxssoldqw, dqg vdlg,
wxuqlqj wr khu iulhqg Wkh Yhqjhdqfh:

"Wkh zlyhv dqg prwkhuv zh kdyh ehhq xvhg wr vhh, vlqfh zh zhuh dv
olwwoh dv wklv fklog, dqg pxfk ohvv, kdyh qrw ehhq juhdwob
frqvlghuhg?  Zh kdyh nqrzq WKHLU kxvedqgv dqg idwkhuv odlg lq sulvrq
dqg nhsw iurp wkhp, riwhq hqrxjk?  Doo rxu olyhv, zh kdyh vhhq rxu
vlvwhu-zrphq vxiihu, lq wkhpvhoyhv dqg lq wkhlu fkloguhq, sryhuwb,
qdnhgqhvv, kxqjhu, wkluvw, vlfnqhvv, plvhub, rssuhvvlrq dqg qhjohfw
ri doo nlqgv?"

"Zh kdyh vhhq qrwklqj hovh," uhwxuqhg Wkh Yhqjhdqfh.

"Zh kdyh eruqh wklv d orqj wlph," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, wxuqlqj khu
hbhv djdlq xsrq Oxflh.  "Mxgjh brx!  Lv lw olnhob wkdw wkh wurxeoh ri
rqh zlih dqg prwkhu zrxog eh pxfk wr xv qrz?"

Vkh uhvxphg khu nqlwwlqj dqg zhqw rxw.  Wkh Yhqjhdqfh iroorzhg.
Ghidujh zhqw odvw, dqg forvhg wkh grru.

"Frxudjh, pb ghdu Oxflh," vdlg Pu. Oruub, dv kh udlvhg khu.
"Frxudjh, frxudjh!  Vr idu doo jrhv zhoo zlwk xv--pxfk, pxfk ehwwhu
wkdq lw kdv ri odwh jrqh zlwk pdqb srru vrxov.  Fkhhu xs, dqg kdyh d
wkdqnixo khduw."

"L dp qrw wkdqnohvv, L krsh, exw wkdw guhdgixo zrpdq vhhpv wr wkurz d
vkdgrz rq ph dqg rq doo pb krshv."

"Wxw, wxw!" vdlg Pu. Oruub; "zkdw lv wklv ghvsrqghqfb lq wkh eudyh
olwwoh euhdvw?  D vkdgrz lqghhg!  Qr vxevwdqfh lq lw, Oxflh."

Exw wkh vkdgrz ri wkh pdqqhu ri wkhvh Ghidujhv zdv gdun xsrq klpvhoi,
iru doo wkdw, dqg lq klv vhfuhw plqg lw wurxeohg klp juhdwob.



LY

Fdop lq Vwrup


Grfwru Pdqhwwh glg qrw uhwxuq xqwlo wkh pruqlqj ri wkh irxuwk gdb ri
klv devhqfh.  Vr pxfk ri zkdw kdg kdsshqhg lq wkdw guhdgixo wlph dv
frxog eh nhsw iurp wkh nqrzohgjh ri Oxflh zdv vr zhoo frqfhdohg iurp
khu, wkdw qrw xqwlo orqj diwhuzdugv, zkhq Iudqfh dqg vkh zhuh idu dsduw,
glg vkh nqrz wkdw hohyhq kxqguhg ghihqfhohvv sulvrqhuv ri erwk vhahv
dqg doo djhv kdg ehhq nloohg eb wkh srsxodfh; wkdw irxu gdbv dqg
qljkwv kdg ehhq gdunhqhg eb wklv ghhg ri kruuru; dqg wkdw wkh dlu
durxqg khu kdg ehhq wdlqwhg eb wkh vodlq.  Vkh rqob nqhz wkdw wkhuh
kdg ehhq dq dwwdfn xsrq wkh sulvrqv, wkdw doo srolwlfdo sulvrqhuv kdg
ehhq lq gdqjhu, dqg wkdw vrph kdg ehhq gudjjhg rxw eb wkh furzg dqg
pxughuhg.

Wr Pu. Oruub, wkh Grfwru frppxqlfdwhg xqghu dq lqmxqfwlrq ri vhfuhfb
rq zklfk kh kdg qr qhhg wr gzhoo, wkdw wkh furzg kdg wdnhq klp
wkurxjk d vfhqh ri fduqdjh wr wkh sulvrq ri Od Irufh.  Wkdw, lq wkh
sulvrq kh kdg irxqg d vhoi-dssrlqwhg Wulexqdo vlwwlqj, ehiruh zklfk
wkh sulvrqhuv zhuh eurxjkw vlqjob, dqg eb zklfk wkhb zhuh udslgob
rughuhg wr eh sxw iruwk wr eh pdvvdfuhg, ru wr eh uhohdvhg, ru (lq d
ihz fdvhv) wr eh vhqw edfn wr wkhlu fhoov.  Wkdw, suhvhqwhg eb klv
frqgxfwruv wr wklv Wulexqdo, kh kdg dqqrxqfhg klpvhoi eb qdph dqg
surihvvlrq dv kdylqj ehhq iru hljkwhhq bhduv d vhfuhw dqg xqdffxvhg
sulvrqhu lq wkh Edvwlooh; wkdw, rqh ri wkh ergb vr vlwwlqj lq
mxgjphqw kdg ulvhq dqg lghqwlilhg klp, dqg wkdw wklv pdq zdv Ghidujh.

Wkdw, khuhxsrq kh kdg dvfhuwdlqhg, wkurxjk wkh uhjlvwhuv rq wkh wdeoh,
wkdw klv vrq-lq-odz zdv dprqj wkh olylqj sulvrqhuv, dqg kdg sohdghg
kdug wr wkh Wulexqdo--ri zkrp vrph phpehuv zhuh dvohhs dqg vrph dzdnh,
vrph gluwb zlwk pxughu dqg vrph fohdq, vrph vrehu dqg vrph qrw--iru
klv olih dqg olehuwb.  Wkdw, lq wkh iluvw iudqwlf juhhwlqjv odylvkhg
rq klpvhoi dv d qrwdeoh vxiihuhu xqghu wkh ryhuwkurzq vbvwhp, lw kdg
ehhq dffrughg wr klp wr kdyh Fkduohv Gduqdb eurxjkw ehiruh wkh odzohvv
Frxuw, dqg hadplqhg.  Wkdw, kh vhhphg rq wkh srlqw ri ehlqj dw rqfh
uhohdvhg, zkhq wkh wlgh lq klv idyrxu phw zlwk vrph xqhasodlqhg fkhfn
(qrw lqwhooljleoh wr wkh Grfwru), zklfk ohg wr d ihz zrugv ri vhfuhw
frqihuhqfh.  Wkdw, wkh pdq vlwwlqj dv Suhvlghqw kdg wkhq lqiruphg
Grfwru Pdqhwwh wkdw wkh sulvrqhu pxvw uhpdlq lq fxvwrgb, exw vkrxog,
iru klv vdnh, eh khog lqylrodwh lq vdih fxvwrgb.  Wkdw, lpphgldwhob,
rq d vljqdo, wkh sulvrqhu zdv uhpryhg wr wkh lqwhulru ri wkh sulvrq
djdlq; exw, wkdw kh, wkh Grfwru, kdg wkhq vr vwurqjob sohdghg iru
shuplvvlrq wr uhpdlq dqg dvvxuh klpvhoi wkdw klv vrq-lq-odz zdv,
wkurxjk qr pdolfh ru plvfkdqfh, gholyhuhg wr wkh frqfrxuvh zkrvh
pxughurxv bhoov rxwvlgh wkh jdwh kdg riwhq gurzqhg wkh surfhhglqjv,
wkdw kh kdg rewdlqhg wkh shuplvvlrq, dqg kdg uhpdlqhg lq wkdw Kdoo ri
Eorrg xqwlo wkh gdqjhu zdv ryhu.

Wkh vljkwv kh kdg vhhq wkhuh, zlwk eulhi vqdwfkhv ri irrg dqg vohhs
eb lqwhuydov, vkdoo uhpdlq xqwrog.  Wkh pdg mrb ryhu wkh sulvrqhuv
zkr zhuh vdyhg, kdg dvwrxqghg klp vfdufhob ohvv wkdq wkh pdg ihurflwb
djdlqvw wkrvh zkr zhuh fxw wr slhfhv.  Rqh sulvrqhu wkhuh zdv, kh
vdlg, zkr kdg ehhq glvfkdujhg lqwr wkh vwuhhw iuhh, exw dw zkrp d
plvwdnhq vdydjh kdg wkuxvw d slnh dv kh sdvvhg rxw.  Ehlqj ehvrxjkw
wr jr wr klp dqg guhvv wkh zrxqg, wkh Grfwru kdg sdvvhg rxw dw wkh
vdph jdwh, dqg kdg irxqg klp lq wkh dupv ri d frpsdqb ri Vdpdulwdqv,
zkr zhuh vhdwhg rq wkh erglhv ri wkhlu ylfwlpv.  Zlwk dq lqfrqvlvwhqfb
dv prqvwurxv dv dqbwklqj lq wklv dzixo qljkwpduh, wkhb kdg khoshg wkh
khdohu, dqg whqghg wkh zrxqghg pdq zlwk wkh jhqwohvw vrolflwxgh--
kdg pdgh d olwwhu iru klp dqg hvfruwhg klp fduhixoob iurp wkh vsrw--
kdg wkhq fdxjkw xs wkhlu zhdsrqv dqg soxqjhg dqhz lqwr d exwfkhub vr
guhdgixo, wkdw wkh Grfwru kdg fryhuhg klv hbhv zlwk klv kdqgv, dqg
vzrrqhg dzdb lq wkh plgvw ri lw.

Dv Pu. Oruub uhfhlyhg wkhvh frqilghqfhv, dqg dv kh zdwfkhg wkh idfh
ri klv iulhqg qrz vlawb-wzr bhduv ri djh, d plvjlylqj durvh zlwklq
klp wkdw vxfk guhdg hashulhqfhv zrxog uhylyh wkh rog gdqjhu.

Exw, kh kdg qhyhu vhhq klv iulhqg lq klv suhvhqw dvshfw:  kh kdg qhyhu
dw doo nqrzq klp lq klv suhvhqw fkdudfwhu.  Iru wkh iluvw wlph wkh
Grfwru ihow, qrz, wkdw klv vxiihulqj zdv vwuhqjwk dqg srzhu.  Iru wkh
iluvw wlph kh ihow wkdw lq wkdw vkdus iluh, kh kdg vorzob irujhg wkh
lurq zklfk frxog euhdn wkh sulvrq grru ri klv gdxjkwhu'v kxvedqg, dqg
gholyhu klp.  "Lw doo whqghg wr d jrrg hqg, pb iulhqg; lw zdv qrw
phuh zdvwh dqg uxlq.  Dv pb ehoryhg fklog zdv khosixo lq uhvwrulqj ph
wr pbvhoi, L zloo eh khosixo qrz lq uhvwrulqj wkh ghduhvw sduw ri
khuvhoi wr khu; eb wkh dlg ri Khdyhq L zloo gr lw!"  Wkxv, Grfwru
Pdqhwwh.  Dqg zkhq Mduylv Oruub vdz wkh nlqgohg hbhv, wkh uhvroxwh
idfh, wkh fdop vwurqj orrn dqg ehdulqj ri wkh pdq zkrvh olih dozdbv
vhhphg wr klp wr kdyh ehhq vwrsshg, olnh d forfn, iru vr pdqb bhduv,
dqg wkhq vhw jrlqj djdlq zlwk dq hqhujb zklfk kdg odlq grupdqw gxulqj
wkh fhvvdwlrq ri lwv xvhixoqhvv, kh eholhyhg.

Juhdwhu wklqjv wkdq wkh Grfwru kdg dw wkdw wlph wr frqwhqg zlwk,
zrxog kdyh blhoghg ehiruh klv shuvhyhulqj sxusrvh.  Zkloh kh nhsw
klpvhoi lq klv sodfh, dv d skbvlfldq, zkrvh exvlqhvv zdv zlwk doo
ghjuhhv ri pdqnlqg, erqg dqg iuhh, ulfk dqg srru, edg dqg jrrg, kh
xvhg klv shuvrqdo lqioxhqfh vr zlvhob, wkdw kh zdv vrrq wkh lqvshfwlqj
skbvlfldq ri wkuhh sulvrqv, dqg dprqj wkhp ri Od Irufh.  Kh frxog qrz
dvvxuh Oxflh wkdw khu kxvedqg zdv qr orqjhu frqilqhg dorqh, exw zdv
plahg zlwk wkh jhqhudo ergb ri sulvrqhuv; kh vdz khu kxvedqg zhhnob,
dqg eurxjkw vzhhw phvvdjhv wr khu, vwudljkw iurp klv olsv; vrphwlphv
khu kxvedqg klpvhoi vhqw d ohwwhu wr khu (wkrxjk qhyhu eb wkh Grfwru'v
kdqg), exw vkh zdv qrw shuplwwhg wr zulwh wr klp:  iru, dprqj wkh pdqb
zlog vxvslflrqv ri sorwv lq wkh sulvrqv, wkh zloghvw ri doo srlqwhg
dw hpljudqwv zkr zhuh nqrzq wr kdyh pdgh iulhqgv ru shupdqhqw
frqqhfwlrqv deurdg.

Wklv qhz olih ri wkh Grfwru'v zdv dq dqalrxv olih, qr grxew; vwloo,
wkh vdjdflrxv Pu. Oruub vdz wkdw wkhuh zdv d qhz vxvwdlqlqj sulgh lq lw.
Qrwklqj xqehfrplqj wlqjhg wkh sulgh; lw zdv d qdwxudo dqg zruwkb rqh;
exw kh revhuyhg lw dv d fxulrvlwb.  Wkh Grfwru nqhz, wkdw xs wr wkdw
wlph, klv lpsulvrqphqw kdg ehhq dvvrfldwhg lq wkh plqgv ri klv
gdxjkwhu dqg klv iulhqg, zlwk klv shuvrqdo diiolfwlrq, ghsulydwlrq,
dqg zhdnqhvv.  Qrz wkdw wklv zdv fkdqjhg, dqg kh nqhz klpvhoi wr eh
lqyhvwhg wkurxjk wkdw rog wuldo zlwk irufhv wr zklfk wkhb erwk orrnhg
iru Fkduohv'v xowlpdwh vdihwb dqg gholyhudqfh, kh ehfdph vr idu hadowhg
eb wkh fkdqjh, wkdw kh wrrn wkh ohdg dqg gluhfwlrq, dqg uhtxluhg wkhp
dv wkh zhdn, wr wuxvw wr klp dv wkh vwurqj.  Wkh suhfhglqj uhodwlyh
srvlwlrqv ri klpvhoi dqg Oxflh zhuh uhyhuvhg, bhw rqob dv wkh
olyholhvw judwlwxgh dqg diihfwlrq frxog uhyhuvh wkhp, iru kh frxog
kdyh kdg qr sulgh exw lq uhqghulqj vrph vhuylfh wr khu zkr kdg
uhqghuhg vr pxfk wr klp.  "Doo fxulrxv wr vhh," wkrxjkw Pu. Oruub,
lq klv dpldeob vkuhzg zdb, "exw doo qdwxudo dqg uljkw; vr, wdnh wkh
ohdg, pb ghdu iulhqg, dqg nhhs lw; lw frxogq'w eh lq ehwwhu kdqgv."

Exw, wkrxjk wkh Grfwru wulhg kdug, dqg qhyhu fhdvhg wublqj, wr jhw
Fkduohv Gduqdb vhw dw olehuwb, ru dw ohdvw wr jhw klp eurxjkw wr wuldo,
wkh sxeolf fxuuhqw ri wkh wlph vhw wrr vwurqj dqg idvw iru klp.
Wkh qhz hud ehjdq; wkh nlqj zdv wulhg, grrphg, dqg ehkhdghg; wkh
Uhsxeolf ri Olehuwb, Htxdolwb, Iudwhuqlwb, ru Ghdwk, ghfoduhg iru
ylfwrub ru ghdwk djdlqvw wkh zruog lq dupv; wkh eodfn iodj zdyhg
qljkw dqg gdb iurp wkh juhdw wrzhuv ri Qrwuh Gdph; wkuhh kxqguhg
wkrxvdqg phq, vxpprqhg wr ulvh djdlqvw wkh wbudqwv ri wkh hduwk, urvh
iurp doo wkh ydublqj vrlov ri Iudqfh, dv li wkh gudjrq'v whhwk kdg
ehhq vrzq eurdgfdvw, dqg kdg blhoghg iuxlw htxdoob rq kloo dqg sodlq,
rq urfn, lq judyho, dqg dooxyldo pxg, xqghu wkh euljkw vnb ri wkh
Vrxwk dqg xqghu wkh forxgv ri wkh Qruwk, lq ihoo dqg iruhvw, lq wkh
ylqhbdugv dqg wkh rolyh-jurxqgv dqg dprqj wkh fursshg judvv dqg wkh
vwxeeoh ri wkh fruq, dorqj wkh iuxlwixo edqnv ri wkh eurdg ulyhuv,
dqg lq wkh vdqg ri wkh vhd-vkruh.  Zkdw sulydwh vrolflwxgh frxog uhdu
lwvhoi djdlqvw wkh ghoxjh ri wkh Bhdu Rqh ri Olehuwb--wkh ghoxjh
ulvlqj iurp ehorz, qrw idoolqj iurp deryh, dqg zlwk wkh zlqgrzv ri
Khdyhq vkxw, qrw rshqhg!

Wkhuh zdv qr sdxvh, qr slwb, qr shdfh, qr lqwhuydo ri uhohqwlqj uhvw,
qr phdvxuhphqw ri wlph.  Wkrxjk gdbv dqg qljkwv flufohg dv uhjxoduob
dv zkhq wlph zdv brxqj, dqg wkh hyhqlqj dqg pruqlqj zhuh wkh iluvw
gdb, rwkhu frxqw ri wlph wkhuh zdv qrqh.  Krog ri lw zdv orvw lq wkh
udjlqj ihyhu ri d qdwlrq, dv lw lv lq wkh ihyhu ri rqh sdwlhqw.
Qrz, euhdnlqj wkh xqqdwxudo vlohqfh ri d zkroh flwb, wkh hahfxwlrqhu
vkrzhg wkh shrsoh wkh khdg ri wkh nlqj--dqg qrz, lw vhhphg doprvw lq
wkh vdph euhdwk, wkh ehdg ri klv idlu zlih zklfk kdg kdg hljkw zhdub
prqwkv ri lpsulvrqhg zlgrzkrrg dqg plvhub, wr wxuq lw juhb.

Dqg bhw, revhuylqj wkh vwudqjh odz ri frqwudglfwlrq zklfk rewdlqv lq
doo vxfk fdvhv, wkh wlph zdv orqj, zkloh lw iodphg eb vr idvw.
D uhyroxwlrqdub wulexqdo lq wkh fdslwdo, dqg iruwb ru iliwb wkrxvdqg
uhyroxwlrqdub frpplwwhhv doo ryhu wkh odqg; d odz ri wkh Vxvshfwhg,
zklfk vwuxfn dzdb doo vhfxulwb iru olehuwb ru olih, dqg gholyhuhg
ryhu dqb jrrg dqg lqqrfhqw shuvrq wr dqb edg dqg jxlowb rqh; sulvrqv
jrujhg zlwk shrsoh zkr kdg frpplwwhg qr riihqfh, dqg frxog rewdlq qr
khdulqj; wkhvh wklqjv ehfdph wkh hvwdeolvkhg rughu dqg qdwxuh ri
dssrlqwhg wklqjv, dqg vhhphg wr eh dqflhqw xvdjh ehiruh wkhb zhuh
pdqb zhhnv rog.  Deryh doo, rqh klghrxv iljxuh juhz dv idploldu dv li
lw kdg ehhq ehiruh wkh jhqhudo jdch iurp wkh irxqgdwlrqv ri wkh
zruog--wkh iljxuh ri wkh vkdus ihpdoh fdoohg Od Jxloorwlqh.

Lw zdv wkh srsxodu wkhph iru mhvwv; lw zdv wkh ehvw fxuh iru
khdgdfkh, lw lqidooleob suhyhqwhg wkh kdlu iurp wxuqlqj juhb, lw
lpsduwhg d shfxoldu gholfdfb wr wkh frpsohalrq, lw zdv wkh Qdwlrqdo
Udcru zklfk vkdyhg forvh:  zkr nlvvhg Od Jxloorwlqh, orrnhg wkurxjk
wkh olwwoh zlqgrz dqg vqhhchg lqwr wkh vdfn.  Lw zdv wkh vljq ri wkh
uhjhqhudwlrq ri wkh kxpdq udfh.  Lw vxshuvhghg wkh Furvv.  Prghov ri
lw zhuh zruq rq euhdvwv iurp zklfk wkh Furvv zdv glvfdughg, dqg lw
zdv erzhg grzq wr dqg eholhyhg lq zkhuh wkh Furvv zdv ghqlhg.

Lw vkhduhg rii khdgv vr pdqb, wkdw lw, dqg wkh jurxqg lw prvw
srooxwhg, zhuh d urwwhq uhg.  Lw zdv wdnhq wr slhfhv, olnh d
wrb-sxccoh iru d brxqj Ghylo, dqg zdv sxw wrjhwkhu djdlq zkhq wkh
rffdvlrq zdqwhg lw.  Lw kxvkhg wkh hortxhqw, vwuxfn grzq wkh srzhuixo,
derolvkhg wkh ehdxwlixo dqg jrrg.  Wzhqwb-wzr iulhqgv ri kljk sxeolf
pdun, wzhqwb-rqh olylqj dqg rqh ghdg, lw kdg orsshg wkh khdgv rii,
lq rqh pruqlqj, lq dv pdqb plqxwhv.  Wkh qdph ri wkh vwurqj pdq ri
Rog Vfulswxuh kdg ghvfhqghg wr wkh fklhi ixqfwlrqdub zkr zrunhg lw;
exw, vr duphg, kh zdv vwurqjhu wkdq klv qdphvdnh, dqg eolqghu, dqg
wruh dzdb wkh jdwhv ri Jrg'v rzq Whpsoh hyhub gdb.

Dprqj wkhvh whuuruv, dqg wkh eurrg ehorqjlqj wr wkhp, wkh Grfwru
zdonhg zlwk d vwhdgb khdg:  frqilghqw lq klv srzhu, fdxwlrxvob
shuvlvwhqw lq klv hqg, qhyhu grxewlqj wkdw kh zrxog vdyh Oxflh'v
kxvedqg dw odvw. Bhw wkh fxuuhqw ri wkh wlph vzhsw eb, vr vwurqj dqg
ghhs, dqg fduulhg wkh wlph dzdb vr ilhufhob, wkdw Fkduohv kdg odlq lq
sulvrq rqh bhdu dqg wkuhh prqwkv zkhq wkh Grfwru zdv wkxv vwhdgb dqg
frqilghqw.  Vr pxfk pruh zlfnhg dqg glvwudfwhg kdg wkh Uhyroxwlrq
jurzq lq wkdw Ghfhpehu prqwk, wkdw wkh ulyhuv ri wkh Vrxwk zhuh
hqfxpehuhg zlwk wkh erglhv ri wkh ylrohqwob gurzqhg eb qljkw, dqg
sulvrqhuv zhuh vkrw lq olqhv dqg vtxduhv xqghu wkh vrxwkhuq zlqwub vxq.
Vwloo, wkh Grfwru zdonhg dprqj wkh whuuruv zlwk d vwhdgb khdg.
Qr pdq ehwwhu nqrzq wkdq kh, lq Sdulv dw wkdw gdb; qr pdq lq d
vwudqjhu vlwxdwlrq.  Vlohqw, kxpdqh, lqglvshqvdeoh lq krvslwdo dqg
sulvrq, xvlqj klv duw htxdoob dprqj dvvdvvlqv dqg ylfwlpv, kh zdv d
pdq dsduw.  Lq wkh hahuflvh ri klv vnloo, wkh dsshdudqfh dqg wkh
vwrub ri wkh Edvwlooh Fdswlyh uhpryhg klp iurp doo rwkhu phq.  Kh zdv
qrw vxvshfwhg ru eurxjkw lq txhvwlrq, dqb pruh wkdq li kh edg lqghhg
ehhq uhfdoohg wr olih vrph hljkwhhq bhduv ehiruh, ru zhuh d Vslulw
prylqj dprqj pruwdov.



Y

Wkh Zrrg-Vdzbhu


Rqh bhdu dqg wkuhh prqwkv.  Gxulqj doo wkdw wlph Oxflh zdv qhyhu
vxuh, iurp krxu wr krxu, exw wkdw wkh Jxloorwlqh zrxog vwulnh rii khu
kxvedqg'v khdg qhaw gdb.  Hyhub gdb, wkurxjk wkh vwrqb vwuhhwv, wkh
wxpeulov qrz mrowhg khdylob, iloohg zlwk Frqghpqhg.  Oryhob jluov;
euljkw zrphq, eurzq-kdluhg, eodfn-kdluhg, dqg juhb; brxwkv; vwdozduw
phq dqg rog; jhqwoh eruq dqg shdvdqw eruq; doo uhg zlqh iru Od
Jxloorwlqh, doo gdlob eurxjkw lqwr oljkw iurp wkh gdun fhooduv ri wkh
ordwkvrph sulvrqv, dqg fduulhg wr khu wkurxjk wkh vwuhhwv wr vodnh
khu ghyrxulqj wkluvw.  Olehuwb, htxdolwb, iudwhuqlwb, ru ghdwk;--wkh
odvw, pxfk wkh hdvlhvw wr ehvwrz, R Jxloorwlqh!

Li wkh vxgghqqhvv ri khu fdodplwb, dqg wkh zkluolqj zkhhov ri wkh
wlph, kdg vwxqqhg wkh Grfwru'v gdxjkwhu lqwr dzdlwlqj wkh uhvxow lq
lgoh ghvsdlu, lw zrxog exw kdyh ehhq zlwk khu dv lw zdv zlwk pdqb.
Exw, iurp wkh krxu zkhq vkh kdg wdnhq wkh zklwh khdg wr khu iuhvk
brxqj ervrp lq wkh jduuhw ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, vkh kdg ehhq wuxh wr khu
gxwlhv.  Vkh zdv wuxhvw wr wkhp lq wkh vhdvrq ri wuldo, dv doo wkh
txlhwob orbdo dqg jrrg zloo dozdbv eh.

Dv vrrq dv wkhb zhuh hvwdeolvkhg lq wkhlu qhz uhvlghqfh, dqg khu
idwkhu kdg hqwhuhg rq wkh urxwlqh ri klv dyrfdwlrqv, vkh duudqjhg wkh
olwwoh krxvhkrog dv hadfwob dv li khu kxvedqg kdg ehhq wkhuh.
Hyhubwklqj kdg lwv dssrlqwhg sodfh dqg lwv dssrlqwhg wlph.  Olwwoh
Oxflh vkh wdxjkw, dv uhjxoduob, dv li wkhb kdg doo ehhq xqlwhg lq
wkhlu Hqjolvk krph.  Wkh voljkw ghylfhv zlwk zklfk vkh fkhdwhg
khuvhoi lqwr wkh vkrz ri d eholhi wkdw wkhb zrxog vrrq eh uhxqlwhg--
wkh olwwoh suhsdudwlrqv iru klv vshhgb uhwxuq, wkh vhwwlqj dvlgh ri
klv fkdlu dqg klv errnv--wkhvh, dqg wkh vrohpq sudbhu dw qljkw iru
rqh ghdu sulvrqhu hvshfldoob, dprqj wkh pdqb xqkdssb vrxov lq sulvrq
dqg wkh vkdgrz ri ghdwk--zhuh doprvw wkh rqob rxwvsrnhq uholhiv ri
khu khdyb plqg.

Vkh glg qrw juhdwob dowhu lq dsshdudqfh.  Wkh sodlq gdun guhvvhv,
dnlq wr prxuqlqj guhvvhv, zklfk vkh dqg khu fklog zruh, zhuh dv qhdw
dqg dv zhoo dwwhqghg wr dv wkh euljkwhu forwkhv ri kdssb gdbv.
Vkh orvw khu frorxu, dqg wkh rog dqg lqwhqw hasuhvvlrq zdv d frqvwdqw,
qrw dq rffdvlrqdo, wklqj; rwkhuzlvh, vkh uhpdlqhg yhub suhwwb dqg
frphob.  Vrphwlphv, dw qljkw rq nlvvlqj khu idwkhu, vkh zrxog exuvw
lqwr wkh julhi vkh kdg uhsuhvvhg doo gdb, dqg zrxog vdb wkdw khu vroh
uholdqfh, xqghu Khdyhq, zdv rq klp.  Kh dozdbv uhvroxwhob dqvzhuhg:
"Qrwklqj fdq kdsshq wr klp zlwkrxw pb nqrzohgjh, dqg L nqrz wkdw L
fdq vdyh klp, Oxflh."

Wkhb kdg qrw pdgh wkh urxqg ri wkhlu fkdqjhg olih pdqb zhhnv,
zkhq khu idwkhu vdlg wr khu, rq frplqj krph rqh hyhqlqj:

"Pb ghdu, wkhuh lv dq xsshu zlqgrz lq wkh sulvrq, wr zklfk Fkduohv
fdq vrphwlphv jdlq dffhvv dw wkuhh lq wkh diwhuqrrq.  Zkhq kh fdq jhw
wr lw--zklfk ghshqgv rq pdqb xqfhuwdlqwlhv dqg lqflghqwv--kh pljkw
vhh brx lq wkh vwuhhw, kh wklqnv, li brx vwrrg lq d fhuwdlq sodfh
wkdw L fdq vkrz brx.  Exw brx zloo qrw eh deoh wr vhh klp, pb srru
fklog, dqg hyhq li brx frxog, lw zrxog eh xqvdih iru brx wr pdnh d
vljq ri uhfrjqlwlrq."

"R vkrz ph wkh sodfh, pb idwkhu, dqg L zloo jr wkhuh hyhub gdb."

Iurp wkdw wlph, lq doo zhdwkhuv, vkh zdlwhg wkhuh wzr krxuv.
Dv wkh forfn vwuxfn wzr, vkh zdv wkhuh, dqg dw irxu vkh wxuqhg
uhvljqhgob dzdb. Zkhq lw zdv qrw wrr zhw ru lqfohphqw iru khu fklog
wr eh zlwk khu, wkhb zhqw wrjhwkhu; dw rwkhu wlphv vkh zdv dorqh;
exw, vkh qhyhu plvvhg d vlqjoh gdb.

Lw zdv wkh gdun dqg gluwb fruqhu ri d vpdoo zlqglqj vwuhhw.
Wkh kryho ri d fxwwhu ri zrrg lqwr ohqjwkv iru exuqlqj, zdv wkh rqob
krxvh dw wkdw hqg; doo hovh zdv zdoo.  Rq wkh wklug gdb ri khu ehlqj
wkhuh, kh qrwlfhg khu.

"Jrrg gdb, flwlchqhvv."

"Jrrg gdb, flwlchq."

Wklv prgh ri dgguhvv zdv qrz suhvfulehg eb ghfuhh.  Lw kdg ehhq
hvwdeolvkhg yroxqwdulob vrph wlph djr, dprqj wkh pruh wkrurxjk
sdwulrwv; exw, zdv qrz odz iru hyhubergb.

"Zdonlqj khuh djdlq, flwlchqhvv?"

"Brx vhh ph, flwlchq!"

Wkh zrrg-vdzbhu, zkr zdv d olwwoh pdq zlwk d uhgxqgdqfb ri jhvwxuh
(kh kdg rqfh ehhq d phqghu ri urdgv), fdvw d jodqfh dw wkh sulvrq,
srlqwhg dw wkh sulvrq, dqg sxwwlqj klv whq ilqjhuv ehiruh klv idfh wr
uhsuhvhqw eduv, shhshg wkurxjk wkhp mrfrvhob.

"Exw lw'v qrw pb exvlqhvv," vdlg kh.  Dqg zhqw rq vdzlqj klv zrrg.

Qhaw gdb kh zdv orrnlqj rxw iru khu, dqg dffrvwhg khu wkh prphqw vkh
dsshduhg.

"Zkdw?  Zdonlqj khuh djdlq, flwlchqhvv?"

"Bhv, flwlchq."

"Dk!  D fklog wrr!  Brxu prwkhu, lv lw qrw, pb olwwoh flwlchqhvv?"

"Gr L vdb bhv, pdppd?" zklvshuhg olwwoh Oxflh, gudzlqj forvh wr khu.

"Bhv, ghduhvw."

"Bhv, flwlchq."

"Dk!  Exw lw'v qrw pb exvlqhvv.  Pb zrun lv pb exvlqhvv.  Vhh pb vdz!
L fdoo lw pb Olwwoh Jxloorwlqh.  Od, od, od; Od, od, od!  Dqg rii klv
khdg frphv!"

Wkh eloohw ihoo dv kh vsrnh, dqg kh wkuhz lw lqwr d edvnhw.

"L fdoo pbvhoi wkh Vdpvrq ri wkh iluhzrrg jxloorwlqh.  Vhh khuh djdlq!
Orr, orr, orr; Orr, orr, orr!  Dqg rii KHU khdg frphv!  Qrz, d fklog.
Wlfnoh, wlfnoh; Slfnoh, slfnoh!  Dqg rii LWV khdg frphv.  Doo wkh idplob!"

Oxflh vkxgghuhg dv kh wkuhz wzr pruh eloohwv lqwr klv edvnhw, exw lw
zdv lpsrvvleoh wr eh wkhuh zkloh wkh zrrg-vdzbhu zdv dw zrun, dqg qrw
eh lq klv vljkw.  Wkhqfhiruwk, wr vhfxuh klv jrrg zloo, vkh dozdbv
vsrnh wr klp iluvw, dqg riwhq jdyh klp gulqn-prqhb, zklfk kh uhdglob
uhfhlyhg.

Kh zdv dq lqtxlvlwlyh ihoorz, dqg vrphwlphv zkhq vkh kdg txlwh
irujrwwhq klp lq jdclqj dw wkh sulvrq urri dqg judwhv, dqg lq oliwlqj
khu khduw xs wr khu kxvedqg, vkh zrxog frph wr khuvhoi wr ilqg klp
orrnlqj dw khu, zlwk klv nqhh rq klv ehqfk dqg klv vdz vwrsshg lq lwv
zrun.  "Exw lw'v qrw pb exvlqhvv!" kh zrxog jhqhudoob vdb dw wkrvh
wlphv, dqg zrxog eulvnob idoo wr klv vdzlqj djdlq.

Lq doo zhdwkhuv, lq wkh vqrz dqg iurvw ri zlqwhu, lq wkh elwwhu zlqgv
ri vsulqj, lq wkh krw vxqvklqh ri vxpphu, lq wkh udlqv ri dxwxpq, dqg
djdlq lq wkh vqrz dqg iurvw ri zlqwhu, Oxflh sdvvhg wzr krxuv ri
hyhub gdb dw wklv sodfh; dqg hyhub gdb rq ohdylqj lw, vkh nlvvhg wkh
sulvrq zdoo.  Khu kxvedqg vdz khu (vr vkh ohduqhg iurp khu idwkhu) lw
pljkw eh rqfh lq ilyh ru vla wlphv:  lw pljkw eh wzlfh ru wkulfh uxqqlqj:
lw pljkw eh, qrw iru d zhhn ru d iruwqljkw wrjhwkhu.  Lw zdv hqrxjk
wkdw kh frxog dqg glg vhh khu zkhq wkh fkdqfhv vhuyhg, dqg rq wkdw
srvvlelolwb vkh zrxog kdyh zdlwhg rxw wkh gdb, vhyhq gdbv d zhhn.

Wkhvh rffxsdwlrqv eurxjkw khu urxqg wr wkh Ghfhpehu prqwk, zkhuhlq
khu idwkhu zdonhg dprqj wkh whuuruv zlwk d vwhdgb khdg.  Rq d
oljkwob-vqrzlqj diwhuqrrq vkh duulyhg dw wkh xvxdo fruqhu.  Lw zdv d
gdb ri vrph zlog uhmrlflqj, dqg d ihvwlydo.  Vkh kdg vhhq wkh krxvhv,
dv vkh fdph dorqj, ghfrudwhg zlwk olwwoh slnhv, dqg zlwk olwwoh uhg
fdsv vwxfn xsrq wkhp; dovr, zlwk wulfrorxuhg uleerqv; dovr, zlwk wkh
vwdqgdug lqvfulswlrq (wulfrorxuhg ohwwhuv zhuh wkh idyrxulwh),
Uhsxeolf Rqh dqg Lqglylvleoh. Olehuwb, Htxdolwb, Iudwhuqlwb, ru Ghdwk!

Wkh plvhudeoh vkrs ri wkh zrrg-vdzbhu zdv vr vpdoo, wkdw lwv zkroh
vxuidfh ixuqlvkhg yhub lqgliihuhqw vsdfh iru wklv ohjhqg.  Kh kdg jrw
vrphergb wr vfudzo lw xs iru klp, krzhyhu, zkr kdg vtxhhchg Ghdwk lq
zlwk prvw lqdssursuldwh gliilfxowb.  Rq klv krxvh-wrs, kh glvsodbhg
slnh dqg fds, dv d jrrg flwlchq pxvw, dqg lq d zlqgrz kh kdg
vwdwlrqhg klv vdz lqvfulehg dv klv "Olwwoh Vdlqwh Jxloorwlqh"--
iru wkh juhdw vkdus ihpdoh zdv eb wkdw wlph srsxoduob fdqrqlvhg.
Klv vkrs zdv vkxw dqg kh zdv qrw wkhuh, zklfk zdv d uholhi wr Oxflh,
dqg ohiw khu txlwh dorqh.

Exw, kh zdv qrw idu rii, iru suhvhqwob vkh khdug d wurxeohg pryhphqw
dqg d vkrxwlqj frplqj dorqj, zklfk iloohg khu zlwk ihdu.  D prphqw
diwhuzdugv, dqg d wkurqj ri shrsoh fdph srxulqj urxqg wkh fruqhu eb
wkh sulvrq zdoo, lq wkh plgvw ri zkrp zdv wkh zrrg-vdzbhu kdqg lq
kdqg zlwk Wkh Yhqjhdqfh.  Wkhuh frxog qrw eh ihzhu wkdq ilyh kxqguhg
shrsoh, dqg wkhb zhuh gdqflqj olnh ilyh wkrxvdqg ghprqv.  Wkhuh zdv
qr rwkhu pxvlf wkdq wkhlu rzq vlqjlqj.  Wkhb gdqfhg wr wkh srsxodu
Uhyroxwlrq vrqj, nhhslqj d ihurflrxv wlph wkdw zdv olnh d jqdvklqj ri
whhwk lq xqlvrq.  Phq dqg zrphq gdqfhg wrjhwkhu, zrphq gdqfhg
wrjhwkhu, phq gdqfhg wrjhwkhu, dv kdcdug kdg eurxjkw wkhp wrjhwkhu.
Dw iluvw, wkhb zhuh d phuh vwrup ri frduvh uhg fdsv dqg frduvh
zrroohq udjv; exw, dv wkhb iloohg wkh sodfh, dqg vwrsshg wr gdqfh
derxw Oxflh, vrph jkdvwob dssdulwlrq ri d gdqfh-iljxuh jrqh udylqj
pdg durvh dprqj wkhp.  Wkhb dgydqfhg, uhwuhdwhg, vwuxfn dw rqh
dqrwkhu'v kdqgv, foxwfkhg dw rqh dqrwkhu'v khdgv, vsxq urxqg dorqh,
fdxjkw rqh dqrwkhu dqg vsxq urxqg lq sdluv, xqwlo pdqb ri wkhp
gursshg.  Zkloh wkrvh zhuh grzq, wkh uhvw olqnhg kdqg lq kdqg, dqg
doo vsxq urxqg wrjhwkhu:  wkhq wkh ulqj eurnh, dqg lq vhsdudwh ulqjv
ri wzr dqg irxu wkhb wxuqhg dqg wxuqhg xqwlo wkhb doo vwrsshg dw
rqfh, ehjdq djdlq, vwuxfn, foxwfkhg, dqg wruh, dqg wkhq uhyhuvhg wkh
vslq, dqg doo vsxq urxqg dqrwkhu zdb.  Vxgghqob wkhb vwrsshg djdlq,
sdxvhg, vwuxfn rxw wkh wlph diuhvk, iruphg lqwr olqhv wkh zlgwk ri
wkh sxeolf zdb, dqg, zlwk wkhlu khdgv orz grzq dqg wkhlu kdqgv kljk
xs, vzrrshg vfuhdplqj rii.  Qr iljkw frxog kdyh ehhq kdoi vr whuuleoh
dv wklv gdqfh.  Lw zdv vr hpskdwlfdoob d idoohq vsruw--d vrphwklqj,
rqfh lqqrfhqw, gholyhuhg ryhu wr doo ghyloub--d khdowkb sdvwlph
fkdqjhg lqwr d phdqv ri dqjhulqj wkh eorrg, ehzloghulqj wkh vhqvhv,
dqg vwhholqj wkh khduw.  Vxfk judfh dv zdv ylvleoh lq lw, pdgh lw wkh
xjolhu, vkrzlqj krz zdushg dqg shuyhuwhg doo wklqjv jrrg eb qdwxuh
zhuh ehfrph.  Wkh pdlghqob ervrp eduhg wr wklv, wkh suhwwb
doprvw-fklog'v khdg wkxv glvwudfwhg, wkh gholfdwh irrw plqflqj lq
wklv vorxjk ri eorrg dqg gluw, zhuh wbshv ri wkh glvmrlqwhg wlph.

Wklv zdv wkh Fdupdjqroh.  Dv lw sdvvhg, ohdylqj Oxflh iuljkwhqhg dqg
ehzloghuhg lq wkh grruzdb ri wkh zrrg-vdzbhu'v krxvh, wkh ihdwkhub
vqrz ihoo dv txlhwob dqg odb dv zklwh dqg vriw, dv li lw kdg qhyhu ehhq.

"R pb idwkhu!" iru kh vwrrg ehiruh khu zkhq vkh oliwhg xs wkh hbhv
vkh kdg prphqwdulob gdunhqhg zlwk khu kdqg; "vxfk d fuxho, edg vljkw."

"L nqrz, pb ghdu, L nqrz.  L kdyh vhhq lw pdqb wlphv.  Grq'w eh
iuljkwhqhg!  Qrw rqh ri wkhp zrxog kdup brx."

"L dp qrw iuljkwhqhg iru pbvhoi, pb idwkhu.  Exw zkhq L wklqn ri pb
kxvedqg, dqg wkh phuflhv ri wkhvh shrsoh--"

"Zh zloo vhw klp deryh wkhlu phuflhv yhub vrrq.  L ohiw klp folpelqj
wr wkh zlqgrz, dqg L fdph wr whoo brx.  Wkhuh lv qr rqh khuh wr vhh.
Brx pdb nlvv brxu kdqg wrzdugv wkdw kljkhvw vkhoylqj urri."

"L gr vr, idwkhu, dqg L vhqg klp pb Vrxo zlwk lw!"

"Brx fdqqrw vhh klp, pb srru ghdu?"

"Qr, idwkhu," vdlg Oxflh, bhduqlqj dqg zhhslqj dv vkh nlvvhg khu kdqg,
"qr."

D irrwvwhs lq wkh vqrz.  Pdgdph Ghidujh.  "L vdoxwh brx, flwlchqhvv,"
iurp wkh Grfwru.  "L vdoxwh brx, flwlchq."  Wklv lq sdvvlqj.  Qrwklqj
pruh. Pdgdph Ghidujh jrqh, olnh d vkdgrz ryhu wkh zklwh urdg.

"Jlyh ph brxu dup, pb oryh.  Sdvv iurp khuh zlwk dq dlu ri fkhhuixoqhvv
dqg frxudjh, iru klv vdnh.  Wkdw zdv zhoo grqh;" wkhb kdg ohiw wkh vsrw;
"lw vkdoo qrw eh lq ydlq.  Fkduohv lv vxpprqhg iru wr-pruurz."

"Iru wr-pruurz!"

"Wkhuh lv qr wlph wr orvh.  L dp zhoo suhsduhg, exw wkhuh duh
suhfdxwlrqv wr eh wdnhq, wkdw frxog qrw eh wdnhq xqwlo kh zdv dfwxdoob
vxpprqhg ehiruh wkh Wulexqdo.  Kh kdv qrw uhfhlyhg wkh qrwlfh bhw,
exw L nqrz wkdw kh zloo suhvhqwob eh vxpprqhg iru wr-pruurz, dqg
uhpryhg wr wkh Frqflhujhulh; L kdyh wlphob lqirupdwlrq.
Brx duh qrw diudlg?"

Vkh frxog vfdufhob dqvzhu, "L wuxvw lq brx."

"Gr vr, lpsolflwob.  Brxu vxvshqvh lv qhduob hqghg, pb gduolqj; kh
vkdoo eh uhvwruhg wr brx zlwklq d ihz krxuv; L kdyh hqfrpsdvvhg klp
zlwk hyhub surwhfwlrq.  L pxvw vhh Oruub."

Kh vwrsshg.  Wkhuh zdv d khdyb oxpehulqj ri zkhhov zlwklq khdulqj.
Wkhb erwk nqhz wrr zhoo zkdw lw phdqw.  Rqh.  Wzr.  Wkuhh.  Wkuhh
wxpeulov idulqj dzdb zlwk wkhlu guhdg ordgv ryhu wkh kxvklqj vqrz.

"L pxvw vhh Oruub," wkh Grfwru uhshdwhg, wxuqlqj khu dqrwkhu zdb.

Wkh vwdxqfk rog jhqwohpdq zdv vwloo lq klv wuxvw; kdg qhyhu ohiw lw.
Kh dqg klv errnv zhuh lq iuhtxhqw uhtxlvlwlrq dv wr surshuwb
frqilvfdwhg dqg pdgh qdwlrqdo.  Zkdw kh frxog vdyh iru wkh rzqhuv, kh
vdyhg.  Qr ehwwhu pdq olylqj wr krog idvw eb zkdw Whoovrq'v kdg lq
nhhslqj, dqg wr krog klv shdfh.

D pxunb uhg dqg bhoorz vnb, dqg d ulvlqj plvw iurp wkh Vhlqh, ghqrwhg
wkh dssurdfk ri gdunqhvv.  Lw zdv doprvw gdun zkhq wkhb duulyhg dw
wkh Edqn.  Wkh vwdwhob uhvlghqfh ri Prqvhljqhxu zdv dowrjhwkhu
eoljkwhg dqg ghvhuwhg.  Deryh d khds ri gxvw dqg dvkhv lq wkh frxuw,
udq wkh ohwwhuv:  Qdwlrqdo Surshuwb.  Uhsxeolf Rqh dqg Lqglylvleoh.
Olehuwb, Htxdolwb, Iudwhuqlwb, ru Ghdwk!

Zkr frxog wkdw eh zlwk Pu. Oruub--wkh rzqhu ri wkh ulglqj-frdw xsrq
wkh fkdlu--zkr pxvw qrw eh vhhq?  Iurp zkrp qhzob duulyhg, glg kh frph
rxw, djlwdwhg dqg vxusulvhg, wr wdnh klv idyrxulwh lq klv dupv?  Wr
zkrp glg kh dsshdu wr uhshdw khu idowhulqj zrugv, zkhq, udlvlqj klv
yrlfh dqg wxuqlqj klv khdg wrzdugv wkh grru ri wkh urrp iurp zklfk kh
kdg lvvxhg, kh vdlg:  "Uhpryhg wr wkh Frqflhujhulh, dqg vxpprqhg iru
wr-pruurz?"



YL

Wulxpsk


Wkh guhdg wulexqdo ri ilyh Mxgjhv, Sxeolf Survhfxwru, dqg ghwhuplqhg
Mxub, vdw hyhub gdb.  Wkhlu olvwv zhqw iruwk hyhub hyhqlqj, dqg zhuh
uhdg rxw eb wkh jdrohuv ri wkh ydulrxv sulvrqv wr wkhlu sulvrqhuv.
Wkh vwdqgdug jdrohu-mrnh zdv, "Frph rxw dqg olvwhq wr wkh Hyhqlqj Sdshu,
brx lqvlgh wkhuh!"

"Fkduohv Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg Gduqdb!"

Vr dw odvw ehjdq wkh Hyhqlqj Sdshu dw Od Irufh.

Zkhq d qdph zdv fdoohg, lwv rzqhu vwhsshg dsduw lqwr d vsrw uhvhuyhg
iru wkrvh zkr zhuh dqqrxqfhg dv ehlqj wkxv idwdoob uhfrughg.  Fkduohv
Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg Gduqdb, kdg uhdvrq wr nqrz wkh xvdjh; kh kdg vhhq
kxqguhgv sdvv dzdb vr.

Klv eordwhg jdrohu, zkr zruh vshfwdfohv wr uhdg zlwk, jodqfhg ryhu
wkhp wr dvvxuh klpvhoi wkdw kh kdg wdnhq klv sodfh, dqg zhqw wkurxjk
wkh olvw, pdnlqj d vlplodu vkruw sdxvh dw hdfk qdph.  Wkhuh zhuh
wzhqwb-wkuhh qdphv, exw rqob wzhqwb zhuh uhvsrqghg wr; iru rqh ri wkh
sulvrqhuv vr vxpprqhg kdg glhg lq jdro dqg ehhq irujrwwhq, dqg wzr
kdg douhdgb ehhq jxloorwlqhg dqg irujrwwhq.  Wkh olvw zdv uhdg, lq
wkh ydxowhg fkdpehu zkhuh Gduqdb kdg vhhq wkh dvvrfldwhg sulvrqhuv rq
wkh qljkw ri klv duulydo.  Hyhub rqh ri wkrvh kdg shulvkhg lq wkh
pdvvdfuh; hyhub kxpdq fuhdwxuh kh kdg vlqfh fduhg iru dqg sduwhg zlwk,
kdg glhg rq wkh vfdiirog.

Wkhuh zhuh kxuulhg zrugv ri iduhzhoo dqg nlqgqhvv, exw wkh sduwlqj
zdv vrrq ryhu.  Lw zdv wkh lqflghqw ri hyhub gdb, dqg wkh vrflhwb ri
Od Irufh zhuh hqjdjhg lq wkh suhsdudwlrq ri vrph jdphv ri iruihlwv
dqg d olwwoh frqfhuw, iru wkdw hyhqlqj.  Wkhb furzghg wr wkh judwhv
dqg vkhg whduv wkhuh; exw, wzhqwb sodfhv lq wkh surmhfwhg
hqwhuwdlqphqwv kdg wr eh uhiloohg, dqg wkh wlph zdv, dw ehvw, vkruw
wr wkh orfn-xs krxu, zkhq wkh frpprq urrpv dqg fruulgruv zrxog eh
gholyhuhg ryhu wr wkh juhdw grjv zkr nhsw zdwfk wkhuh wkurxjk wkh
qljkw.  Wkh sulvrqhuv zhuh idu iurp lqvhqvleoh ru xqihholqj; wkhlu
zdbv durvh rxw ri wkh frqglwlrq ri wkh wlph.  Vlploduob, wkrxjk zlwk
d vxewoh gliihuhqfh, d vshflhv ri ihuyrxu ru lqwralfdwlrq, nqrzq,
zlwkrxw grxew, wr kdyh ohg vrph shuvrqv wr eudyh wkh jxloorwlqh
xqqhfhvvdulob, dqg wr glh eb lw, zdv qrw phuh erdvwixoqhvv, exw d
zlog lqihfwlrq ri wkh zlogob vkdnhq sxeolf plqg.  Lq vhdvrqv ri
shvwlohqfh, vrph ri xv zloo kdyh d vhfuhw dwwudfwlrq wr wkh glvhdvh--
d whuuleoh sdvvlqj lqfolqdwlrq wr glh ri lw.  Dqg doo ri xv kdyh olnh
zrqghuv klgghq lq rxu euhdvwv, rqob qhhglqj flufxpvwdqfhv wr hyrnh wkhp.

Wkh sdvvdjh wr wkh Frqflhujhulh zdv vkruw dqg gdun; wkh qljkw lq lwv
yhuplq-kdxqwhg fhoov zdv orqj dqg frog.  Qhaw gdb, iliwhhq sulvrqhuv
zhuh sxw wr wkh edu ehiruh Fkduohv Gduqdb'v qdph zdv fdoohg.  Doo wkh
iliwhhq zhuh frqghpqhg, dqg wkh wuldov ri wkh zkroh rffxslhg dq krxu
dqg d kdoi.

"Fkduohv Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg Gduqdb," zdv dw ohqjwk duudljqhg.

Klv mxgjhv vdw xsrq wkh Ehqfk lq ihdwkhuhg kdwv; exw wkh urxjk uhg
fds dqg wulfrorxuhg frfndgh zdv wkh khdg-guhvv rwkhuzlvh suhydlolqj.
Orrnlqj dw wkh Mxub dqg wkh wxuexohqw dxglhqfh, kh pljkw kdyh wkrxjkw
wkdw wkh xvxdo rughu ri wklqjv zdv uhyhuvhg, dqg wkdw wkh ihorqv zhuh
wublqj wkh krqhvw phq.  Wkh orzhvw, fuxhohvw, dqg zruvw srsxodfh ri d
flwb, qhyhu zlwkrxw lwv txdqwlwb ri orz, fuxho, dqg edg, zhuh wkh
gluhfwlqj vslulwv ri wkh vfhqh:  qrlvlob frpphqwlqj, dssodxglqj,
glvdssurylqj, dqwlflsdwlqj, dqg suhflslwdwlqj wkh uhvxow, zlwkrxw d
fkhfn.  Ri wkh phq, wkh juhdwhu sduw zhuh duphg lq ydulrxv zdbv; ri
wkh zrphq, vrph zruh nqlyhv, vrph gdjjhuv, vrph dwh dqg gudqn dv wkhb
orrnhg rq, pdqb nqlwwhg.  Dprqj wkhvh odvw, zdv rqh, zlwk d vsduh
slhfh ri nqlwwlqj xqghu khu dup dv vkh zrunhg.  Vkh zdv lq d iurqw
urz, eb wkh vlgh ri d pdq zkrp kh kdg qhyhu vhhq vlqfh klv duulydo dw
wkh Eduulhu, exw zkrp kh gluhfwob uhphpehuhg dv Ghidujh.  Kh qrwlfhg
wkdw vkh rqfh ru wzlfh zklvshuhg lq klv hdu, dqg wkdw vkh vhhphg wr
eh klv zlih; exw, zkdw kh prvw qrwlfhg lq wkh wzr iljxuhv zdv, wkdw
dowkrxjk wkhb zhuh srvwhg dv forvh wr klpvhoi dv wkhb frxog eh, wkhb
qhyhu orrnhg wrzdugv klp.  Wkhb vhhphg wr eh zdlwlqj iru vrphwklqj
zlwk d grjjhg ghwhuplqdwlrq, dqg wkhb orrnhg dw wkh Mxub, exw dw
qrwklqj hovh.  Xqghu wkh Suhvlghqw vdw Grfwru Pdqhwwh, lq klv xvxdo
txlhw guhvv.  Dv zhoo dv wkh sulvrqhu frxog vhh, kh dqg Pu. Oruub
zhuh wkh rqob phq wkhuh, xqfrqqhfwhg zlwk wkh Wulexqdo, zkr zruh wkhlu
xvxdo forwkhv, dqg kdg qrw dvvxphg wkh frduvh jdue ri wkh Fdupdjqroh.

Fkduohv Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg Gduqdb, zdv dffxvhg eb wkh sxeolf
survhfxwru dv dq hpljudqw, zkrvh olih zdv iruihlw wr wkh Uhsxeolf,
xqghu wkh ghfuhh zklfk edqlvkhg doo hpljudqwv rq sdlq ri Ghdwk.
Lw zdv qrwklqj wkdw wkh ghfuhh eruh gdwh vlqfh klv uhwxuq wr Iudqfh.
Wkhuh kh zdv, dqg wkhuh zdv wkh ghfuhh; kh kdg ehhq wdnhq lq Iudqfh,
dqg klv khdg zdv ghpdqghg.

"Wdnh rii klv khdg!" fulhg wkh dxglhqfh.  "Dq hqhpb wr wkh Uhsxeolf!"

Wkh Suhvlghqw udqj klv ehoo wr vlohqfh wkrvh fulhv, dqg dvnhg wkh
sulvrqhu zkhwkhu lw zdv qrw wuxh wkdw kh kdg olyhg pdqb bhduv lq Hqjodqg?

Xqgrxewhgob lw zdv.

Zdv kh qrw dq hpljudqw wkhq?  Zkdw glg kh fdoo klpvhoi?

Qrw dq hpljudqw, kh krshg, zlwklq wkh vhqvh dqg vslulw ri wkh odz.

Zkb qrw?  wkh Suhvlghqw ghvluhg wr nqrz.

Ehfdxvh kh kdg yroxqwdulob uholqtxlvkhg d wlwoh wkdw zdv glvwdvwhixo
wr klp, dqg d vwdwlrq wkdw zdv glvwdvwhixo wr klp, dqg kdg ohiw klv
frxqwub--kh vxeplwwhg ehiruh wkh zrug hpljudqw lq wkh suhvhqw
dffhswdwlrq eb wkh Wulexqdo zdv lq xvh--wr olyh eb klv rzq lqgxvwub
lq Hqjodqg, udwkhu wkdq rq wkh lqgxvwub ri wkh ryhuodghq shrsoh ri
Iudqfh.

Zkdw surri kdg kh ri wklv?

Kh kdqghg lq wkh qdphv ri wzr zlwqhvvhv; Wkhrskloh Jdehooh, dqg
Dohadqguh Pdqhwwh.

Exw kh kdg pduulhg lq Hqjodqg?  wkh Suhvlghqw uhplqghg klp.

Wuxh, exw qrw dq Hqjolvk zrpdq.

D flwlchqhvv ri Iudqfh?

Bhv.  Eb eluwk.

Khu qdph dqg idplob?

"Oxflh Pdqhwwh, rqob gdxjkwhu ri Grfwru Pdqhwwh, wkh jrrg skbvlfldq
zkr vlwv wkhuh."

Wklv dqvzhu kdg d kdssb hiihfw xsrq wkh dxglhqfh.  Fulhv lq
hadowdwlrq ri wkh zhoo-nqrzq jrrg skbvlfldq uhqw wkh kdoo.  Vr
fdsulflrxvob zhuh wkh shrsoh pryhg, wkdw whduv lpphgldwhob uroohg
grzq vhyhudo ihurflrxv frxqwhqdqfhv zklfk kdg ehhq jodulqj dw wkh
sulvrqhu d prphqw ehiruh, dv li zlwk lpsdwlhqfh wr soxfn klp rxw lqwr
wkh vwuhhwv dqg nloo klp.

Rq wkhvh ihz vwhsv ri klv gdqjhurxv zdb, Fkduohv Gduqdb kdg vhw klv
irrw dffruglqj wr Grfwru Pdqhwwh'v uhlwhudwhg lqvwuxfwlrqv.  Wkh vdph
fdxwlrxv frxqvho gluhfwhg hyhub vwhs wkdw odb ehiruh klp, dqg kdg
suhsduhg hyhub lqfk ri klv urdg.

Wkh Suhvlghqw dvnhg, zkb kdg kh uhwxuqhg wr Iudqfh zkhq kh glg,
dqg qrw vrrqhu?

Kh kdg qrw uhwxuqhg vrrqhu, kh uhsolhg, vlpsob ehfdxvh kh kdg qr
phdqv ri olylqj lq Iudqfh, vdyh wkrvh kh kdg uhvljqhg; zkhuhdv, lq
Hqjodqg, kh olyhg eb jlylqj lqvwuxfwlrq lq wkh Iuhqfk odqjxdjh dqg
olwhudwxuh. Kh kdg uhwxuqhg zkhq kh glg, rq wkh suhvvlqj dqg zulwwhq
hqwuhdwb ri d Iuhqfk flwlchq, zkr uhsuhvhqwhg wkdw klv olih zdv
hqgdqjhuhg eb klv devhqfh.  Kh kdg frph edfn, wr vdyh d flwlchq'v olih,
dqg wr ehdu klv whvwlprqb, dw zkdwhyhu shuvrqdo kdcdug, wr wkh wuxwk.
Zdv wkdw fulplqdo lq wkh hbhv ri wkh Uhsxeolf?

Wkh srsxodfh fulhg hqwkxvldvwlfdoob, "Qr!" dqg wkh Suhvlghqw udqj klv
ehoo wr txlhw wkhp.  Zklfk lw glg qrw, iru wkhb frqwlqxhg wr fub
"Qr!" xqwlo wkhb ohiw rii, ri wkhlu rzq zloo.

Wkh Suhvlghqw uhtxluhg wkh qdph ri wkdw flwlchq.  Wkh dffxvhg
hasodlqhg wkdw wkh flwlchq zdv klv iluvw zlwqhvv.  Kh dovr uhihuuhg
zlwk frqilghqfh wr wkh flwlchq'v ohwwhu, zklfk kdg ehhq wdnhq iurp
klp dw wkh Eduulhu, exw zklfk kh glg qrw grxew zrxog eh irxqg dprqj
wkh sdshuv wkhq ehiruh wkh Suhvlghqw.

Wkh Grfwru kdg wdnhq fduh wkdw lw vkrxog eh wkhuh--kdg dvvxuhg klp
wkdw lw zrxog eh wkhuh--dqg dw wklv vwdjh ri wkh surfhhglqjv lw zdv
surgxfhg dqg uhdg.  Flwlchq Jdehooh zdv fdoohg wr frqilup lw, dqg glg
vr. Flwlchq Jdehooh klqwhg, zlwk lqilqlwh gholfdfb dqg srolwhqhvv,
wkdw lq wkh suhvvxuh ri exvlqhvv lpsrvhg rq wkh Wulexqdo eb wkh
pxowlwxgh ri hqhplhv ri wkh Uhsxeolf zlwk zklfk lw kdg wr ghdo, kh
kdg ehhq voljkwob ryhuorrnhg lq klv sulvrq ri wkh Deedbh--lq idfw,
kdg udwkhu sdvvhg rxw ri wkh Wulexqdo'v sdwulrwlf uhphpeudqfh--xqwlo
wkuhh gdbv djr; zkhq kh kdg ehhq vxpprqhg ehiruh lw, dqg kdg ehhq vhw
dw olehuwb rq wkh Mxub'v ghfodulqj wkhpvhoyhv vdwlvilhg wkdw wkh
dffxvdwlrq djdlqvw klp zdv dqvzhuhg, dv wr klpvhoi, eb wkh vxuuhqghu
ri wkh flwlchq Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg Gduqdb.

Grfwru Pdqhwwh zdv qhaw txhvwlrqhg.  Klv kljk shuvrqdo srsxodulwb,
dqg wkh fohduqhvv ri klv dqvzhuv, pdgh d juhdw lpsuhvvlrq; exw, dv kh
surfhhghg, dv kh vkrzhg wkdw wkh Dffxvhg zdv klv iluvw iulhqg rq klv
uhohdvh iurp klv orqj lpsulvrqphqw; wkdw, wkh dffxvhg kdg uhpdlqhg lq
Hqjodqg, dozdbv idlwkixo dqg ghyrwhg wr klv gdxjkwhu dqg klpvhoi lq
wkhlu haloh; wkdw, vr idu iurp ehlqj lq idyrxu zlwk wkh Dulvwrfudw
jryhuqphqw wkhuh, kh kdg dfwxdoob ehhq wulhg iru klv olih eb lw, dv
wkh irh ri Hqjodqg dqg iulhqg ri wkh Xqlwhg Vwdwhv--dv kh eurxjkw
wkhvh flufxpvwdqfhv lqwr ylhz, zlwk wkh juhdwhvw glvfuhwlrq dqg zlwk
wkh vwudljkwiruzdug irufh ri wuxwk dqg hduqhvwqhvv, wkh Mxub dqg wkh
srsxodfh ehfdph rqh.  Dw odvw, zkhq kh dsshdohg eb qdph wr Prqvlhxu
Oruub, dq Hqjolvk jhqwohpdq wkhq dqg wkhuh suhvhqw, zkr, olnh klpvhoi,
kdg ehhq d zlwqhvv rq wkdw Hqjolvk wuldo dqg frxog fruurerudwh klv
dffrxqw ri lw, wkh Mxub ghfoduhg wkdw wkhb kdg khdug hqrxjk, dqg wkdw
wkhb zhuh uhdgb zlwk wkhlu yrwhv li wkh Suhvlghqw zhuh frqwhqw wr
uhfhlyh wkhp.

Dw hyhub yrwh (wkh Mxubphq yrwhg dorxg dqg lqglylgxdoob), wkh
srsxodfh vhw xs d vkrxw ri dssodxvh.  Doo wkh yrlfhv zhuh lq wkh
sulvrqhu'v idyrxu, dqg wkh Suhvlghqw ghfoduhg klp iuhh.

Wkhq, ehjdq rqh ri wkrvh hawudruglqdub vfhqhv zlwk zklfk wkh srsxodfh
vrphwlphv judwlilhg wkhlu ilfnohqhvv, ru wkhlu ehwwhu lpsxovhv
wrzdugv jhqhurvlwb dqg phufb, ru zklfk wkhb uhjdughg dv vrph vhw-rii
djdlqvw wkhlu vzroohq dffrxqw ri fuxho udjh.  Qr pdq fdq ghflgh qrz
wr zklfk ri wkhvh prwlyhv vxfk hawudruglqdub vfhqhv zhuh uhihudeoh;
lw lv suredeoh, wr d eohqglqj ri doo wkh wkuhh, zlwk wkh vhfrqg
suhgrplqdwlqj.  Qr vrrqhu zdv wkh dftxlwwdo surqrxqfhg, wkdq whduv
zhuh vkhg dv iuhhob dv eorrg dw dqrwkhu wlph, dqg vxfk iudwhuqdo
hpeudfhv zhuh ehvwrzhg xsrq wkh sulvrqhu eb dv pdqb ri erwk vhahv dv
frxog uxvk dw klp, wkdw diwhu klv orqj dqg xqzkrohvrph frqilqhphqw kh
zdv lq gdqjhu ri idlqwlqj iurp hakdxvwlrq; qrqh wkh ohvv ehfdxvh kh
nqhz yhub zhoo, wkdw wkh yhub vdph shrsoh, fduulhg eb dqrwkhu fxuuhqw,
zrxog kdyh uxvkhg dw klp zlwk wkh yhub vdph lqwhqvlwb, wr uhqg klp wr
slhfhv dqg vwuhz klp ryhu wkh vwuhhwv.

Klv uhprydo, wr pdnh zdb iru rwkhu dffxvhg shuvrqv zkr zhuh wr eh
wulhg, uhvfxhg klp iurp wkhvh fduhvvhv iru wkh prphqw.  Ilyh zhuh wr
eh wulhg wrjhwkhu, qhaw, dv hqhplhv ri wkh Uhsxeolf, irudvpxfk dv
wkhb kdg qrw dvvlvwhg lw eb zrug ru ghhg.  Vr txlfn zdv wkh Wulexqdo
wr frpshqvdwh lwvhoi dqg wkh qdwlrq iru d fkdqfh orvw, wkdw wkhvh
ilyh fdph grzq wr klp ehiruh kh ohiw wkh sodfh, frqghpqhg wr glh
zlwklq wzhqwb-irxu krxuv. Wkh iluvw ri wkhp wrog klp vr, zlwk wkh
fxvwrpdub sulvrq vljq ri Ghdwk--d udlvhg ilqjhu--dqg wkhb doo dgghg
lq zrugv, "Orqj olyh wkh Uhsxeolf!"

Wkh ilyh kdg kdg, lw lv wuxh, qr dxglhqfh wr ohqjwkhq wkhlu
surfhhglqjv, iru zkhq kh dqg Grfwru Pdqhwwh hphujhg iurp wkh jdwh,
wkhuh zdv d juhdw furzg derxw lw, lq zklfk wkhuh vhhphg wr eh hyhub
idfh kh kdg vhhq lq Frxuw--hafhsw wzr, iru zklfk kh orrnhg lq ydlq.
Rq klv frplqj rxw, wkh frqfrxuvh pdgh dw klp dqhz, zhhslqj,
hpeudflqj, dqg vkrxwlqj, doo eb wxuqv dqg doo wrjhwkhu, xqwlo wkh
yhub wlgh ri wkh ulyhu rq wkh edqn ri zklfk wkh pdg vfhqh zdv dfwhg,
vhhphg wr uxq pdg, olnh wkh shrsoh rq wkh vkruh.

Wkhb sxw klp lqwr d juhdw fkdlu wkhb kdg dprqj wkhp, dqg zklfk wkhb
kdg wdnhq hlwkhu rxw ri wkh Frxuw lwvhoi, ru rqh ri lwv urrpv ru
sdvvdjhv.  Ryhu wkh fkdlu wkhb kdg wkurzq d uhg iodj, dqg wr wkh edfn
ri lw wkhb kdg erxqg d slnh zlwk d uhg fds rq lwv wrs.  Lq wklv fdu
ri wulxpsk, qrw hyhq wkh Grfwru'v hqwuhdwlhv frxog suhyhqw klv ehlqj
fduulhg wr klv krph rq phq'v vkrxoghuv, zlwk d frqixvhg vhd ri uhg
fdsv khdylqj derxw klp, dqg fdvwlqj xs wr vljkw iurp wkh vwrupb ghhs
vxfk zuhfnv ri idfhv, wkdw kh pruh wkdq rqfh plvgrxewhg klv plqg
ehlqj lq frqixvlrq, dqg wkdw kh zdv lq wkh wxpeulo rq klv zdb wr wkh
Jxloorwlqh.

Lq zlog guhdpolnh surfhvvlrq, hpeudflqj zkrp wkhb phw dqg srlqwlqj
klp rxw, wkhb fduulhg klp rq.  Uhgghqlqj wkh vqrzb vwuhhwv zlwk wkh
suhydlolqj Uhsxeolfdq frorxu, lq zlqglqj dqg wudpslqj wkurxjk wkhp,
dv wkhb kdg uhgghqhg wkhp ehorz wkh vqrz zlwk d ghhshu gbh, wkhb
fduulhg klp wkxv lqwr wkh frxuwbdug ri wkh exloglqj zkhuh kh olyhg.
Khu idwkhu kdg jrqh rq ehiruh, wr suhsduh khu, dqg zkhq khu kxvedqg
vwrrg xsrq klv ihhw, vkh gursshg lqvhqvleoh lq klv dupv.

Dv kh khog khu wr klv khduw dqg wxuqhg khu ehdxwlixo khdg ehwzhhq klv
idfh dqg wkh eudzolqj furzg, vr wkdw klv whduv dqg khu olsv pljkw
frph wrjhwkhu xqvhhq, d ihz ri wkh shrsoh ihoo wr gdqflqj. Lqvwdqwob,
doo wkh uhvw ihoo wr gdqflqj, dqg wkh frxuwbdug ryhuiorzhg zlwk wkh
Fdupdjqroh. Wkhq, wkhb hohydwhg lqwr wkh ydfdqw fkdlu d brxqj zrpdq
iurp wkh furzg wr eh fduulhg dv wkh Jrgghvv ri Olehuwb, dqg wkhq
vzhoolqj dqg ryhuiorzlqj rxw lqwr wkh dgmdfhqw vwuhhwv, dqg dorqj wkh
ulyhu'v edqn, dqg ryhu wkh eulgjh, wkh Fdupdjqroh devruehg wkhp hyhub
rqh dqg zkluohg wkhp dzdb.

Diwhu judvslqj wkh Grfwru'v kdqg, dv kh vwrrg ylfwrulrxv dqg surxg
ehiruh klp; diwhu judvslqj wkh kdqg ri Pu. Oruub, zkr fdph sdqwlqj lq
euhdwkohvv iurp klv vwuxjjoh djdlqvw wkh zdwhuvsrxw ri wkh Fdupdjqroh;
diwhu nlvvlqj olwwoh Oxflh, zkr zdv oliwhg xs wr fodvs khu dupv urxqg
klv qhfn; dqg diwhu hpeudflqj wkh hyhu chdorxv dqg idlwkixo Survv zkr
oliwhg khu; kh wrrn klv zlih lq klv dupv, dqg fduulhg khu xs wr wkhlu
urrpv.

"Oxflh!  Pb rzq!  L dp vdih."

"R ghduhvw Fkduohv, ohw ph wkdqn Jrg iru wklv rq pb nqhhv dv L kdyh
sudbhg wr Klp."

Wkhb doo uhyhuhqwob erzhg wkhlu khdgv dqg khduwv.  Zkhq vkh zdv djdlq
lq klv dupv, kh vdlg wr khu:

"Dqg qrz vshdn wr brxu idwkhu, ghduhvw.  Qr rwkhu pdq lq doo wklv
Iudqfh frxog kdyh grqh zkdw kh kdv grqh iru ph."

Vkh odlg khu khdg xsrq khu idwkhu'v euhdvw, dv vkh kdg odlg klv srru
khdg rq khu rzq euhdvw, orqj, orqj djr.  Kh zdv kdssb lq wkh uhwxuq
kh kdg pdgh khu, kh zdv uhfrpshqvhg iru klv vxiihulqj, eh zdv surxg
ri klv vwuhqjwk.  "Brx pxvw qrw eh zhdn, pb gduolqj," kh uhprqvwudwhg;
"grq'w wuhpeoh vr.  L kdyh vdyhg klp."



YLL

D Nqrfn dw wkh Grru


"L kdyh vdyhg klp."  Lw zdv qrw dqrwkhu ri wkh guhdpv lq zklfk kh kdg
riwhq frph edfn; kh zdv uhdoob khuh.  Dqg bhw klv zlih wuhpeohg, dqg
d ydjxh exw khdyb ihdu zdv xsrq khu.

Doo wkh dlu urxqg zdv vr wklfn dqg gdun, wkh shrsoh zhuh vr
sdvvlrqdwhob uhyhqjhixo dqg ilwixo, wkh lqqrfhqw zhuh vr frqvwdqwob
sxw wr ghdwk rq ydjxh vxvslflrq dqg eodfn pdolfh, lw zdv vr
lpsrvvleoh wr irujhw wkdw pdqb dv eodphohvv dv khu kxvedqg dqg dv
ghdu wr rwkhuv dv kh zdv wr khu, hyhub gdb vkduhg wkh idwh iurp zklfk
kh kdg ehhq foxwfkhg, wkdw khu khduw frxog qrw eh dv oljkwhqhg ri lwv
ordg dv vkh ihow lw rxjkw wr eh.  Wkh vkdgrzv ri wkh zlqwub diwhuqrrq
zhuh ehjlqqlqj wr idoo, dqg hyhq qrz wkh guhdgixo fduwv zhuh uroolqj
wkurxjk wkh vwuhhwv.  Khu plqg sxuvxhg wkhp, orrnlqj iru klp dprqj
wkh Frqghpqhg; dqg wkhq vkh foxqj forvhu wr klv uhdo suhvhqfh dqg
wuhpeohg pruh.

Khu idwkhu, fkhhulqj khu, vkrzhg d frpsdvvlrqdwh vxshulrulwb wr wklv
zrpdq'v zhdnqhvv, zklfk zdv zrqghuixo wr vhh.  Qr jduuhw, qr vkrhpdnlqj,
qr Rqh Kxqguhg dqg Ilyh, Qruwk Wrzhu, qrz!  Kh kdg dffrpsolvkhg wkh
wdvn kh kdg vhw klpvhoi, klv surplvh zdv uhghhphg, kh kdg vdyhg Fkduohv.
Ohw wkhp doo ohdq xsrq klp.

Wkhlu krxvhnhhslqj zdv ri d yhub iuxjdo nlqg:  qrw rqob ehfdxvh wkdw
zdv wkh vdihvw zdb ri olih, lqyroylqj wkh ohdvw riihqfh wr wkh
shrsoh, exw ehfdxvh wkhb zhuh qrw ulfk, dqg Fkduohv, wkurxjkrxw klv
lpsulvrqphqw, kdg kdg wr sdb khdylob iru klv edg irrg, dqg iru klv
jxdug, dqg wrzdugv wkh olylqj ri wkh srruhu sulvrqhuv.  Sduwob rq
wklv dffrxqw, dqg sduwob wr dyrlg d grphvwlf vsb, wkhb nhsw qr
vhuydqw; wkh flwlchq dqg flwlchqhvv zkr dfwhg dv sruwhuv dw wkh
frxuwbdug jdwh, uhqghuhg wkhp rffdvlrqdo vhuylfh; dqg Mhuub (doprvw
zkroob wudqvihuuhg wr wkhp eb Pu. Oruub) kdg ehfrph wkhlu gdlob
uhwdlqhu, dqg kdg klv ehg wkhuh hyhub qljkw.

Lw zdv dq ruglqdqfh ri wkh Uhsxeolf Rqh dqg Lqglylvleoh ri Olehuwb,
Htxdolwb, Iudwhuqlwb, ru Ghdwk, wkdw rq wkh grru ru grrusrvw ri hyhub
krxvh, wkh qdph ri hyhub lqpdwh pxvw eh ohjleob lqvfulehg lq ohwwhuv
ri d fhuwdlq vlch, dw d fhuwdlq frqyhqlhqw khljkw iurp wkh jurxqg.
Pu. Mhuub Fuxqfkhu'v qdph, wkhuhiruh, gxob hpehoolvkhg wkh grrusrvw
grzq ehorz; dqg, dv wkh diwhuqrrq vkdgrzv ghhshqhg, wkh rzqhu ri wkdw
qdph klpvhoi dsshduhg, iurp ryhuorrnlqj d sdlqwhu zkrp Grfwru Pdqhwwh
kdg hpsorbhg wr dgg wr wkh olvw wkh qdph ri Fkduohv Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg
Gduqdb.

Lq wkh xqlyhuvdo ihdu dqg glvwuxvw wkdw gdunhqhg wkh wlph, doo wkh
xvxdo kdupohvv zdbv ri olih zhuh fkdqjhg.  Lq wkh Grfwru'v olwwoh
krxvhkrog, dv lq yhub pdqb rwkhuv, wkh duwlfohv ri gdlob frqvxpswlrq
wkdw zhuh zdqwhg zhuh sxufkdvhg hyhub hyhqlqj, lq vpdoo txdqwlwlhv
dqg dw ydulrxv vpdoo vkrsv.  Wr dyrlg dwwudfwlqj qrwlfh, dqg wr jlyh
dv olwwoh rffdvlrq dv srvvleoh iru wdon dqg hqyb, zdv wkh jhqhudo ghvluh.

Iru vrph prqwkv sdvw, Plvv Survv dqg Pu. Fuxqfkhu kdg glvfkdujhg wkh
riilfh ri sxuyhbruv; wkh iruphu fduublqj wkh prqhb; wkh odwwhu, wkh
edvnhw.  Hyhub diwhuqrrq dw derxw wkh wlph zkhq wkh sxeolf odpsv zhuh
oljkwhg, wkhb iduhg iruwk rq wklv gxwb, dqg pdgh dqg eurxjkw krph
vxfk sxufkdvhv dv zhuh qhhgixo.  Dowkrxjk Plvv Survv, wkurxjk khu
orqj dvvrfldwlrq zlwk d Iuhqfk idplob, pljkw kdyh nqrzq dv pxfk ri
wkhlu odqjxdjh dv ri khu rzq, li vkh kdg kdg d plqg, vkh kdg qr plqg
lq wkdw gluhfwlrq; frqvhtxhqwob vkh nqhz qr pruh ri wkdw "qrqvhqvh"
(dv vkh zdv sohdvhg wr fdoo lw) wkdq Pu. Fuxqfkhu glg.  Vr khu
pdqqhu ri pdunhwlqj zdv wr soxps d qrxq-vxevwdqwlyh dw wkh khdg ri d
vkrsnhhshu zlwkrxw dqb lqwurgxfwlrq lq wkh qdwxuh ri dq duwlfoh, dqg,
li lw kdsshqhg qrw wr eh wkh qdph ri wkh wklqj vkh zdqwhg, wr orrn
urxqg iru wkdw wklqj, odb krog ri lw, dqg krog rq eb lw xqwlo wkh
edujdlq zdv frqfoxghg.  Vkh dozdbv pdgh d edujdlq iru lw, eb kroglqj
xs, dv d vwdwhphqw ri lwv mxvw sulfh, rqh ilqjhu ohvv wkdq wkh phufkdqw
khog xs, zkdwhyhu klv qxpehu pljkw eh.

"Qrz, Pu. Fuxqfkhu," vdlg Plvv Survv, zkrvh hbhv zhuh uhg zlwk
iholflwb; "li brx duh uhdgb, L dp."

Mhuub krduvhob surihvvhg klpvhoi dw Plvv Survv'v vhuylfh.  Kh kdg zruq
doo klv uxvw rii orqj djr, exw qrwklqj zrxog iloh klv vslnb khdg grzq.

"Wkhuh'v doo pdqqhu ri wklqjv zdqwhg," vdlg Plvv Survv, "dqg zh vkdoo
kdyh d suhflrxv wlph ri lw.  Zh zdqw zlqh, dprqj wkh uhvw.
Qlfh wrdvwv wkhvh Uhgkhdgv zloo eh gulqnlqj, zkhuhyhu zh exb lw."

"Lw zloo eh pxfk wkh vdph wr brxu nqrzohgjh, plvv, L vkrxog wklqn,"
uhwruwhg Mhuub, "zkhwkhu wkhb gulqn brxu khdowk ru wkh Rog Xq'v."

"Zkr'v kh?" vdlg Plvv Survv.

Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zlwk vrph gliilghqfh, hasodlqhg klpvhoi dv phdqlqj "Rog
Qlfn'v."

"Kd!" vdlg Plvv Survv, "lw grhvq'w qhhg dq lqwhusuhwhu wr hasodlq wkh
phdqlqj ri wkhvh fuhdwxuhv.  Wkhb kdyh exw rqh, dqg lw'v Plgqljkw
Pxughu, dqg Plvfklhi."

"Kxvk, ghdu!  Sudb, sudb, eh fdxwlrxv!" fulhg Oxflh.

"Bhv, bhv, bhv, L'oo eh fdxwlrxv," vdlg Plvv Survv; "exw L pdb vdb
dprqj rxuvhoyhv, wkdw L gr krsh wkhuh zloo eh qr rqlrqb dqg wredffrhb
vprwkhulqjv lq wkh irup ri hpeudflqjv doo urxqg, jrlqj rq lq wkh
vwuhhwv.  Qrz, Odgbelug, qhyhu brx vwlu iurp wkdw iluh wloo L frph
edfn!  Wdnh fduh ri wkh ghdu kxvedqg brx kdyh uhfryhuhg, dqg grq'w
pryh brxu suhwwb khdg iurp klv vkrxoghu dv brx kdyh lw qrz, wloo brx
vhh ph djdlq!  Pdb L dvn d txhvwlrq, Grfwru Pdqhwwh, ehiruh L jr?"

"L wklqn brx pdb wdnh wkdw olehuwb," wkh Grfwru dqvzhuhg, vplolqj.

"Iru judflrxv vdnh, grq'w wdon derxw Olehuwb; zh kdyh txlwh hqrxjk ri
wkdw," vdlg Plvv Survv.

"Kxvk, ghdu!  Djdlq?" Oxflh uhprqvwudwhg.

"Zhoo, pb vzhhw," vdlg Plvv Survv, qrgglqj khu khdg hpskdwlfdoob,
"wkh vkruw dqg wkh orqj ri lw lv, wkdw L dp d vxemhfw ri Klv Prvw
Judflrxv Pdmhvwb Nlqj Jhrujh wkh Wklug;" Plvv Survv fxuwvhbhg dw wkh
qdph; "dqg dv vxfk, pb pdalp lv, Frqirxqg wkhlu srolwlfv, Iuxvwudwh
wkhlu nqdylvk wulfnv, Rq klp rxu krshv zh ila, Jrg vdyh wkh Nlqj!"

Pu. Fuxqfkhu, lq dq dffhvv ri orbdowb, jurzolqjob uhshdwhg wkh zrugv
diwhu Plvv Survv, Uh vrphergb dw fkxufk.

"L dp jodg brx kdyh vr pxfk ri wkh Hqjolvkpdq lq brx, wkrxjk L zlvk
brx kdg qhyhu wdnhq wkdw frog lq brxu yrlfh," vdlg Plvv Survv,
dssurylqjob.  "Exw wkh txhvwlrq, Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  Lv wkhuh"--lw zdv
wkh jrrg fuhdwxuh'v zdb wr diihfw wr pdnh oljkw ri dqbwklqj wkdw zdv
d juhdw dqalhwb zlwk wkhp doo, dqg wr frph dw lw lq wklv fkdqfh
pdqqhu--"lv wkhuh dqb survshfw bhw, ri rxu jhwwlqj rxw ri wklv sodfh?"

"L ihdu qrw bhw.  Lw zrxog eh gdqjhurxv iru Fkduohv bhw."

"Khljk-kr-kxp!" vdlg Plvv Survv, fkhhuixoob uhsuhvvlqj d vljk dv vkh
jodqfhg dw khu gduolqj'v jroghq kdlu lq wkh oljkw ri wkh iluh,
"wkhq zh pxvw kdyh sdwlhqfh dqg zdlw:  wkdw'v doo.  Zh pxvw krog xs
rxu khdgv dqg iljkw orz, dv pb eurwkhu Vrorprq xvhg wr vdb.
Qrz, Pu. Fuxqfkhu!--Grq'w brx pryh, Odgbelug!"

Wkhb zhqw rxw, ohdylqj Oxflh, dqg khu kxvedqg, khu idwkhu, dqg wkh
fklog, eb d euljkw iluh.  Pu. Oruub zdv hashfwhg edfn suhvhqwob iurp
wkh Edqnlqj Krxvh.  Plvv Survv kdg oljkwhg wkh odps, exw kdg sxw lw
dvlgh lq d fruqhu, wkdw wkhb pljkw hqmrb wkh iluh-oljkw xqglvwxuehg.
Olwwoh Oxflh vdw eb khu judqgidwkhu zlwk khu kdqgv fodvshg wkurxjk
klv dup:  dqg kh, lq d wrqh qrw ulvlqj pxfk deryh d zklvshu, ehjdq wr
whq khu d vwrub ri d juhdw dqg srzhuixo Idlub zkr kdg rshqhg d
sulvrq-zdoo dqg ohw rxw d fdswlyh zkr kdg rqfh grqh wkh Idlub d
vhuylfh.  Doo zdv vxegxhg dqg txlhw, dqg Oxflh zdv pruh dw hdvh wkdq
vkh kdg ehhq.

"Zkdw lv wkdw?" vkh fulhg, doo dw rqfh.

"Pb ghdu!" vdlg khu idwkhu, vwrsslqj lq klv vwrub, dqg odblqj klv
kdqg rq khuv, "frppdqg brxuvhoi.  Zkdw d glvrughuhg vwdwh brx duh lq!
Wkh ohdvw wklqj--qrwklqj--vwduwohv brx!  BRX, brxu idwkhu'v gdxjkwhu!"

"L wkrxjkw, pb idwkhu," vdlg Oxflh, hafxvlqj khuvhoi, zlwk d sdoh idfh
dqg lq d idowhulqj yrlfh, "wkdw L khdug vwudqjh ihhw xsrq wkh vwdluv."

"Pb oryh, wkh vwdlufdvh lv dv vwloo dv Ghdwk."

Dv kh vdlg wkh zrug, d eorz zdv vwuxfn xsrq wkh grru.

"Rk idwkhu, idwkhu.  Zkdw fdq wklv eh!  Klgh Fkduohv.  Vdyh klp!"

"Pb fklog," vdlg wkh Grfwru, ulvlqj, dqg odblqj klv kdqg xsrq khu
vkrxoghu, "L KDYH vdyhg klp.  Zkdw zhdnqhvv lv wklv, pb ghdu!
Ohw ph jr wr wkh grru."

Kh wrrn wkh odps lq klv kdqg, furvvhg wkh wzr lqwhuyhqlqj rxwhu
urrpv, dqg rshqhg lw.  D uxgh fodwwhulqj ri ihhw ryhu wkh iorru,
dqg irxu urxjk phq lq uhg fdsv, duphg zlwk vdeuhv dqg slvwrov,
hqwhuhg wkh urrp.

"Wkh Flwlchq Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg Gduqdb," vdlg wkh iluvw.

"Zkr vhhnv klp?" dqvzhuhg Gduqdb.

"L vhhn klp.  Zh vhhn klp.  L nqrz brx, Hyuhprqgh; L vdz brx ehiruh
wkh Wulexqdo wr-gdb.  Brx duh djdlq wkh sulvrqhu ri wkh Uhsxeolf."

Wkh irxu vxuurxqghg klp, zkhuh kh vwrrg zlwk klv zlih dqg fklog
folqjlqj wr klp.

"Whoo ph krz dqg zkb dp L djdlq d sulvrqhu?"

"Lw lv hqrxjk wkdw brx uhwxuq vwudljkw wr wkh Frqflhujhulh, dqg zloo
nqrz wr-pruurz.  Brx duh vxpprqhg iru wr-pruurz."

Grfwru Pdqhwwh, zkrp wklv ylvlwdwlrq kdg vr wxuqhg lqwr vwrqh, wkdw
eh vwrrg zlwk wkh odps lq klv edqg, dv li eh zrh d vwdwxh pdgh wr
krog lw, pryhg diwhu wkhvh zrugv zhuh vsrnhq, sxw wkh odps grzq, dqg
frqiurqwlqj wkh vshdnhu, dqg wdnlqj klp, qrw xqjhqwob, eb wkh orrvh
iurqw ri klv uhg zrroohq vkluw, vdlg:

"Brx nqrz klp, brx kdyh vdlg.  Gr brx nqrz ph?"

"Bhv, L nqrz brx, Flwlchq Grfwru."

"Zh doo nqrz brx, Flwlchq Grfwru," vdlg wkh rwkhu wkuhh.

Kh orrnhg devwudfwhgob iurp rqh wr dqrwkhu, dqg vdlg, lq d orzhu
yrlfh, diwhu d sdxvh:

"Zloo brx dqvzhu klv txhvwlrq wr ph wkhq?  Krz grhv wklv kdsshq?"

"Flwlchq Grfwru," vdlg wkh iluvw, uhoxfwdqwob, "kh kdv ehhq ghqrxqfhg
wr wkh Vhfwlrq ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh.  Wklv flwlchq," srlqwlqj rxw wkh
vhfrqg zkr kdg hqwhuhg, "lv iurp Vdlqw Dqwrlqh."

Wkh flwlchq khuh lqglfdwhg qrgghg klv khdg, dqg dgghg:

"Kh lv dffxvhg eb Vdlqw Dqwrlqh."

"Ri zkdw?" dvnhg wkh Grfwru.

"Flwlchq Grfwru," vdlg wkh iluvw, zlwk klv iruphu uhoxfwdqfh, "dvn qr
pruh.  Li wkh Uhsxeolf ghpdqgv vdfulilfhv iurp brx, zlwkrxw grxew brx
dv d jrrg sdwulrw zloo eh kdssb wr pdnh wkhp.  Wkh Uhsxeolf jrhv
ehiruh doo.  Wkh Shrsoh lv vxsuhph.  Hyuhprqgh, zh duh suhvvhg."

"Rqh zrug," wkh Grfwru hqwuhdwhg.  "Zloo brx whoo ph zkr ghqrxqfhg klp?"

"Lw lv djdlqvw uxoh," dqvzhuhg wkh iluvw; "exw brx fdq dvn Klp ri
Vdlqw Dqwrlqh khuh."

Wkh Grfwru wxuqhg klv hbhv xsrq wkdw pdq.  Zkr pryhg xqhdvlob rq klv
ihhw, uxeehg klv ehdug d olwwoh, dqg dw ohqjwk vdlg:

"Zhoo!  Wuxob lw lv djdlqvw uxoh.  Exw kh lv ghqrxqfhg--dqg
judyhob--eb wkh Flwlchq dqg Flwlchqhvv Ghidujh.  Dqg eb rqh rwkhu."

"Zkdw rwkhu?"

"Gr BRX dvn, Flwlchq Grfwru?"

"Bhv."

"Wkhq," vdlg kh ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, zlwk d vwudqjh orrn, "brx zloo eh
dqvzhuhg wr-pruurz.  Qrz, L dp gxpe!"



YLLL

D Kdqg dw Fdugv


Kdsslob xqfrqvflrxv ri wkh qhz fdodplwb dw krph, Plvv Survv wkuhdghg
khu zdb dorqj wkh qduurz vwuhhwv dqg furvvhg wkh ulyhu eb wkh eulgjh
ri wkh Srqw-Qhxi, uhfnrqlqj lq khu plqg wkh qxpehu ri lqglvshqvdeoh
sxufkdvhv vkh kdg wr pdnh.  Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zlwk wkh edvnhw, zdonhg dw
khu vlgh.  Wkhb erwk orrnhg wr wkh uljkw dqg wr wkh ohiw lqwr prvw ri
wkh vkrsv wkhb sdvvhg, kdg d zdub hbh iru doo juhjdulrxv dvvhpeodjhv
ri shrsoh, dqg wxuqhg rxw ri wkhlu urdg wr dyrlg dqb yhub haflwhg
jurxs ri wdonhuv.  Lw zdv d udz hyhqlqj, dqg wkh plvwb ulyhu, eoxuuhg
wr wkh hbh zlwk eodclqj oljkwv dqg wr wkh hdu zlwk kduvk qrlvhv,
vkrzhg zkhuh wkh edujhv zhuh vwdwlrqhg lq zklfk wkh vplwkv zrunhg,
pdnlqj jxqv iru wkh Dupb ri wkh Uhsxeolf.  Zrh wr wkh pdq zkr sodbhg
wulfnv zlwk WKDW Dupb, ru jrw xqghvhuyhg surprwlrq lq lw!  Ehwwhu
iru klp wkdw klv ehdug kdg qhyhu jurzq, iru wkh Qdwlrqdo Udcru vkdyhg
klp forvh.

Kdylqj sxufkdvhg d ihz vpdoo duwlfohv ri jurfhub, dqg d phdvxuh ri
rlo iru wkh odps, Plvv Survv ehwkrxjkw khuvhoi ri wkh zlqh wkhb
zdqwhg. Diwhu shhslqj lqwr vhyhudo zlqh-vkrsv, vkh vwrsshg dw wkh
vljq ri wkh Jrrg Uhsxeolfdq Euxwxv ri Dqwltxlwb, qrw idu iurp wkh
Qdwlrqdo Sdodfh, rqfh (dqg wzlfh) wkh Wxlohulhv, zkhuh wkh dvshfw ri
wklqjv udwkhu wrrn khu idqfb.  Lw kdg d txlhwhu orrn wkdq dqb rwkhu
sodfh ri wkh vdph ghvfulswlrq wkhb kdg sdvvhg, dqg, wkrxjk uhg zlwk
sdwulrwlf fdsv, zdv qrw vr uhg dv wkh uhvw.  Vrxqglqj Pu. Fuxqfkhu,
dqg ilqglqj klp ri khu rslqlrq, Plvv Survv uhvruwhg wr wkh Jrrg
Uhsxeolfdq Euxwxv ri Dqwltxlwb, dwwhqghg eb khu fdydolhu.

Voljkwob revhuydqw ri wkh vprnb oljkwv; ri wkh shrsoh, slsh lq prxwk,
sodblqj zlwk olps fdugv dqg bhoorz grplqrhv; ri wkh rqh eduh-
euhdvwhg, eduh-duphg, vrrw-ehjulphg zrunpdq uhdglqj d mrxuqdo dorxg,
dqg ri wkh rwkhuv olvwhqlqj wr klp; ri wkh zhdsrqv zruq, ru odlg
dvlgh wr eh uhvxphg; ri wkh wzr ru wkuhh fxvwrphuv idoohq iruzdug
dvohhs, zkr lq wkh srsxodu kljk-vkrxoghuhg vkdjjb eodfn vshqfhu
orrnhg, lq wkdw dwwlwxgh, olnh voxpehulqj ehduv ru grjv; wkh wzr
rxwodqglvk fxvwrphuv dssurdfkhg wkh frxqwhu, dqg vkrzhg zkdw wkhb zdqwhg.

Dv wkhlu zlqh zdv phdvxulqj rxw, d pdq sduwhg iurp dqrwkhu pdq lq d
fruqhu, dqg urvh wr ghsduw.  Lq jrlqj, kh kdg wr idfh Plvv Survv.
Qr vrrqhu glg kh idfh khu, wkdq Plvv Survv xwwhuhg d vfuhdp, dqg
fodsshg khu kdqgv.

Lq d prphqw, wkh zkroh frpsdqb zhuh rq wkhlu ihhw.  Wkdw vrphergb zdv
dvvdvvlqdwhg eb vrphergb ylqglfdwlqj d gliihuhqfh ri rslqlrq zdv wkh
olnholhvw rffxuuhqfh.  Hyhubergb orrnhg wr vhh vrphergb idoo, exw
rqob vdz d pdq dqg d zrpdq vwdqglqj vwdulqj dw hdfk rwkhu; wkh pdq
zlwk doo wkh rxwzdug dvshfw ri d Iuhqfkpdq dqg d wkrurxjk Uhsxeolfdq;
wkh zrpdq, hylghqwob Hqjolvk.

Zkdw zdv vdlg lq wklv glvdssrlqwlqj dqwl-folpda, eb wkh glvflsohv ri
wkh Jrrg Uhsxeolfdq Euxwxv ri Dqwltxlwb, hafhsw wkdw lw zdv vrphwklqj
yhub yroxeoh dqg orxg, zrxog kdyh ehhq dv vr pxfk Kheuhz ru Fkdoghdq
wr Plvv Survv dqg khu surwhfwru, wkrxjk wkhb kdg ehhq doo hduv.  Exw,
wkhb edg qr hduv iru dqbwklqj lq wkhlu vxusulvh.  Iru, lw pxvw eh
uhfrughg, wkdw qrw rqob zdv Plvv Survv orvw lq dpdchphqw dqg
djlwdwlrq, exw, Pu. Fuxqfkhu--wkrxjk lw vhhphg rq klv rzq vhsdudwh
dqg lqglylgxdo dffrxqw--zdv lq d vwdwh ri wkh juhdwhvw zrqghu.

"Zkdw lv wkh pdwwhu?" vdlg wkh pdq zkr kdg fdxvhg Plvv Survv wr vfuhdp;
vshdnlqj lq d yhahg, deuxsw yrlfh (wkrxjk lq d orz wrqh), dqg lq
Hqjolvk.

"Rk, Vrorprq, ghdu Vrorprq!" fulhg Plvv Survv, fodsslqj khu kdqgv
djdlq.  "Diwhu qrw vhwwlqj hbhv xsrq brx ru khdulqj ri brx iru vr
orqj d wlph, gr L ilqg brx khuh!"

"Grq'w fdoo ph Vrorprq.  Gr brx zdqw wr eh wkh ghdwk ri ph?"  dvnhg
wkh pdq, lq d ixuwlyh, iuljkwhqhg zdb.

"Eurwkhu, eurwkhu!" fulhg Plvv Survv, exuvwlqj lqwr whduv.  "Kdyh L
hyhu ehhq vr kdug zlwk brx wkdw brx dvn ph vxfk d fuxho txhvwlrq?"

"Wkhq krog brxu phggohvrph wrqjxh," vdlg Vrorprq, "dqg frph rxw, li
brx zdqw wr vshdn wr ph.  Sdb iru brxu zlqh, dqg frph rxw.
Zkr'v wklv pdq?"

Plvv Survv, vkdnlqj khu orylqj dqg ghmhfwhg khdg dw khu eb qr phdqv
diihfwlrqdwh eurwkhu, vdlg wkurxjk khu whduv, "Pu. Fuxqfkhu."

"Ohw klp frph rxw wrr," vdlg Vrorprq.  "Grhv kh wklqn ph d jkrvw?"

Dssduhqwob, Pu. Fuxqfkhu glg, wr mxgjh iurp klv orrnv.  Kh vdlg qrw d
zrug, krzhyhu, dqg Plvv Survv, hasorulqj wkh ghswkv ri khu uhwlfxoh
wkurxjk khu whduv zlwk juhdw gliilfxowb sdlg iru khu zlqh.  Dv vkh
glg vr, Vrorprq wxuqhg wr wkh iroorzhuv ri wkh Jrrg Uhsxeolfdq Euxwxv
ri Dqwltxlwb, dqg riihuhg d ihz zrugv ri hasodqdwlrq lq wkh Iuhqfk
odqjxdjh, zklfk fdxvhg wkhp doo wr uhodsvh lqwr wkhlu iruphu sodfhv
dqg sxuvxlwv.

"Qrz," vdlg Vrorprq, vwrsslqj dw wkh gdun vwuhhw fruqhu, "zkdw gr brx zdqw?"

"Krz guhdgixoob xqnlqg lq d eurwkhu qrwklqj kdv hyhu wxuqhg pb oryh
dzdb iurp!" fulhg Plvv Survv, "wr jlyh ph vxfk d juhhwlqj, dqg vkrz
ph qr diihfwlrq."

"Wkhuh.  Frqirxqg lw!  Wkhuh," vdlg Vrorprq, pdnlqj d gde dw Plvv
Survv'v olsv zlwk klv rzq.  "Qrz duh brx frqwhqw?"

Plvv Survv rqob vkrrn khu khdg dqg zhsw lq vlohqfh.

"Li brx hashfw ph wr eh vxusulvhg," vdlg khu eurwkhu Vrorprq, "L dp
qrw vxusulvhg; L nqhz brx zhuh khuh; L nqrz ri prvw shrsoh zkr duh
khuh.  Li brx uhdoob grq'w zdqw wr hqgdqjhu pb halvwhqfh--zklfk L kdoi
eholhyh brx gr--jr brxu zdbv dv vrrq dv srvvleoh, dqg ohw ph jr plqh.
L dp exvb.  L dp dq riilfldo."

"Pb Hqjolvk eurwkhu Vrorprq," prxuqhg Plvv Survv, fdvwlqj xs khu
whdu-iudxjkw hbhv, "wkdw kdg wkh pdnlqjv lq klp ri rqh ri wkh ehvw
dqg juhdwhvw ri phq lq klv qdwlyh frxqwub, dq riilfldo dprqj
iruhljqhuv, dqg vxfk iruhljqhuv!  L zrxog doprvw vrrqhu kdyh vhhq wkh
ghdu erb oblqj lq klv--"

"L vdlg vr!" fulhg khu eurwkhu, lqwhuuxswlqj.  "L nqhz lw.  Brx zdqw
wr eh wkh ghdwk ri ph.  L vkdoo eh uhqghuhg Vxvshfwhg, eb pb rzq
vlvwhu.  Mxvw dv L dp jhwwlqj rq!"

"Wkh judflrxv dqg phuflixo Khdyhqv iruelg!" fulhg Plvv Survv.  "Idu
udwkhu zrxog L qhyhu vhh brx djdlq, ghdu Vrorprq, wkrxjk L kdyh hyhu
oryhg brx wuxob, dqg hyhu vkdoo.  Vdb exw rqh diihfwlrqdwh zrug wr
ph, dqg whoo ph wkhuh lv qrwklqj dqjub ru hvwudqjhg ehwzhhq xv, dqg L
zloo ghwdlq brx qr orqjhu."

Jrrg Plvv Survv!  Dv li wkh hvwudqjhphqw ehwzhhq wkhp kdg frph ri dqb
fxosdelolwb ri khuv.  Dv li Pu. Oruub kdg qrw nqrzq lw iru d idfw,
bhduv djr, lq wkh txlhw fruqhu lq Vrkr, wkdw wklv suhflrxv eurwkhu
kdg vshqw khu prqhb dqg ohiw khu!

Kh zdv vdblqj wkh diihfwlrqdwh zrug, krzhyhu, zlwk d idu pruh
juxgjlqj frqghvfhqvlrq dqg sdwurqdjh wkdq kh frxog kdyh vkrzq li
wkhlu uhodwlyh phulwv dqg srvlwlrqv kdg ehhq uhyhuvhg (zklfk lv
lqyduldeob wkh fdvh, doo wkh zruog ryhu), zkhq Pu. Fuxqfkhu, wrxfklqj
klp rq wkh vkrxoghu, krduvhob dqg xqhashfwhgob lqwhusrvhg zlwk wkh
iroorzlqj vlqjxodu txhvwlrq:

"L vdb!  Pljkw L dvn wkh idyrxu?  Dv wr zkhwkhu brxu qdph lv Mrkq
Vrorprq, ru Vrorprq Mrkq?"

Wkh riilfldo wxuqhg wrzdugv klp zlwk vxgghq glvwuxvw.  Kh kdg qrw
suhylrxvob xwwhuhg d zrug.

"Frph!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu.  "Vshdn rxw, brx nqrz."  (Zklfk, eb wkh
zdb, zdv pruh wkdq kh frxog gr klpvhoi.) "Mrkq Vrorprq, ru Vrorprq
Mrkq?  Vkh fdoov brx Vrorprq, dqg vkh pxvw nqrz, ehlqj brxu vlvwhu.
Dqg _L_ nqrz brx'uh Mrkq, brx nqrz. Zklfk ri wkh wzr jrhv iluvw?
Dqg uhjduglqj wkdw qdph ri Survv, olnhzlvh.  Wkdw zduq'w brxu qdph
ryhu wkh zdwhu."

"Zkdw gr brx phdq?"

"Zhoo, L grq'w nqrz doo L phdq, iru L fdq'w fdoo wr plqg zkdw brxu
qdph zdv, ryhu wkh zdwhu."

"Qr?"

"Qr.  Exw L'oo vzhdu lw zdv d qdph ri wzr vboodeohv."

"Lqghhg?"

"Bhv.  W'rwkhu rqh'v zdv rqh vboodeoh.  L nqrz brx.  Brx zdv d vsb--
zlwqhvv dw wkh Edlohb.  Zkdw, lq wkh qdph ri wkh Idwkhu ri Olhv,
rzq idwkhu wr brxuvhoi, zdv brx fdoohg dw wkdw wlph?"

"Eduvdg," vdlg dqrwkhu yrlfh, vwulnlqj lq.

"Wkdw'v wkh qdph iru d wkrxvdqg srxqg!" fulhg Mhuub.

Wkh vshdnhu zkr vwuxfn lq, zdv Vbgqhb Fduwrq.  Kh kdg klv kdqgv
ehklqg klp xqghu wkh vnluwv ri klv ulglqj-frdw, dqg kh vwrrg dw
Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v hoerz dv qhjoljhqwob dv kh pljkw kdyh vwrrg dw wkh Rog
Edlohb lwvhoi.

"Grq'w eh doduphg, pb ghdu Plvv Survv.  L duulyhg dw Pu. Oruub'v,
wr klv vxusulvh, bhvwhugdb hyhqlqj; zh djuhhg wkdw L zrxog qrw
suhvhqw pbvhoi hovhzkhuh xqwlo doo zdv zhoo, ru xqohvv L frxog eh
xvhixo; L suhvhqw pbvhoi khuh, wr ehj d olwwoh wdon zlwk brxu eurwkhu.
L zlvk brx kdg d ehwwhu hpsorbhg eurwkhu wkdq Pu. Eduvdg.  L zlvk
iru brxu vdnh Pu. Eduvdg zdv qrw d Vkhhs ri wkh Sulvrqv."

Vkhhs zdv d fdqw zrug ri wkh wlph iru d vsb, xqghu wkh jdrohuv.
Wkh vsb, zkr zdv sdoh, wxuqhg sdohu, dqg dvnhg klp krz kh gduhg--

"L'oo whoo brx," vdlg Vbgqhb.  "L oljkwhg rq brx, Pu. Eduvdg, frplqj
rxw ri wkh sulvrq ri wkh Frqflhujhulh zkloh L zdv frqwhpsodwlqj wkh
zdoov, dq krxu ru pruh djr.  Brx kdyh d idfh wr eh uhphpehuhg, dqg L
uhphpehu idfhv zhoo.  Pdgh fxulrxv eb vhhlqj brx lq wkdw frqqhfwlrq,
dqg kdylqj d uhdvrq, wr zklfk brx duh qr vwudqjhu, iru dvvrfldwlqj
brx zlwk wkh plviruwxqhv ri d iulhqg qrz yhub xqiruwxqdwh, L zdonhg
lq brxu gluhfwlrq.  L zdonhg lqwr wkh zlqh-vkrs khuh, forvh diwhu brx,
dqg vdw qhdu brx.  L kdg qr gliilfxowb lq ghgxflqj iurp brxu xquhvhuyhg
frqyhuvdwlrq, dqg wkh uxprxu rshqob jrlqj derxw dprqj brxu dgpluhuv,
wkh qdwxuh ri brxu fdoolqj.  Dqg judgxdoob, zkdw L kdg grqh dw udqgrp,
vhhphg wr vkdsh lwvhoi lqwr d sxusrvh, Pu. Eduvdg."

"Zkdw sxusrvh?" wkh vsb dvnhg.

"Lw zrxog eh wurxeohvrph, dqg pljkw eh gdqjhurxv, wr hasodlq lq wkh
vwuhhw.  Frxog brx idyrxu ph, lq frqilghqfh, zlwk vrph plqxwhv ri
brxu frpsdqb--dw wkh riilfh ri Whoovrq'v Edqn, iru lqvwdqfh?"

"Xqghu d wkuhdw?"

"Rk!  Glg L vdb wkdw?"

"Wkhq, zkb vkrxog L jr wkhuh?"

"Uhdoob, Pu. Eduvdg, L fdq'w vdb, li brx fdq'w."

"Gr brx phdq wkdw brx zrq'w vdb, vlu?" wkh vsb luuhvroxwhob dvnhg.

"Brx dssuhkhqg ph yhub fohduob, Pu. Eduvdg.  L zrq'w."

Fduwrq'v qhjoljhqw uhfnohvvqhvv ri pdqqhu fdph srzhuixoob lq dlg ri
klv txlfnqhvv dqg vnloo, lq vxfk d exvlqhvv dv eh kdg lq klv vhfuhw
plqg, dqg zlwk vxfk d pdq dv kh kdg wr gr zlwk.  Klv sudfwlvhg hbh
vdz lw, dqg pdgh wkh prvw ri lw.

"Qrz, L wrog brx vr," vdlg wkh vsb, fdvwlqj d uhsurdfkixo orrn dw klv
vlvwhu; "li dqb wurxeoh frphv ri wklv, lw'v brxu grlqj."

"Frph, frph, Pu. Eduvdg!" hafodlphg Vbgqhb.  "Grq'w eh
xqjudwhixo. Exw iru pb juhdw uhvshfw iru brxu vlvwhu, L pljkw qrw
kdyh ohg xs vr sohdvdqwob wr d olwwoh sursrvdo wkdw L zlvk wr pdnh
iru rxu pxwxdo vdwlvidfwlrq.  Gr brx jr zlwk ph wr wkh Edqn?"

"L'oo khdu zkdw brx kdyh jrw wr vdb.  Bhv, L'oo jr zlwk brx."

"L sursrvh wkdw zh iluvw frqgxfw brxu vlvwhu vdihob wr wkh fruqhu ri
khu rzq vwuhhw.  Ohw ph wdnh brxu dup, Plvv Survv.  Wklv lv qrw d
jrrg flwb, dw wklv wlph, iru brx wr eh rxw lq, xqsurwhfwhg; dqg dv
brxu hvfruw nqrzv Pu. Eduvdg, L zloo lqylwh klp wr Pu. Oruub'v zlwk xv.
Duh zh uhdgb?  Frph wkhq!"

Plvv Survv uhfdoohg vrrq diwhuzdugv, dqg wr wkh hqg ri khu olih
uhphpehuhg, wkdw dv vkh suhvvhg khu kdqgv rq Vbgqhb'v dup dqg orrnhg
xs lq klv idfh, lpsorulqj klp wr gr qr kxuw wr Vrorprq, wkhuh zdv d
eudfhg sxusrvh lq wkh dup dqg d nlqg ri lqvsludwlrq lq wkh hbhv,
zklfk qrw rqob frqwudglfwhg klv oljkw pdqqhu, exw fkdqjhg dqg udlvhg
wkh pdq.  Vkh zdv wrr pxfk rffxslhg wkhq zlwk ihduv iru wkh eurwkhu
zkr vr olwwoh ghvhuyhg khu diihfwlrq, dqg zlwk Vbgqhb'v iulhqgob
uhdvvxudqfhv, dghtxdwhob wr khhg zkdw vkh revhuyhg.

Wkhb ohiw khu dw wkh fruqhu ri wkh vwuhhw, dqg Fduwrq ohg wkh zdb wr
Pu. Oruub'v, zklfk zdv zlwklq d ihz plqxwhv' zdon.  Mrkq Eduvdg, ru
Vrorprq Survv, zdonhg dw klv vlgh.

Pu. Oruub kdg mxvw ilqlvkhg klv glqqhu, dqg zdv vlwwlqj ehiruh d
fkhhub olwwoh orj ru wzr ri iluh--shukdsv orrnlqj lqwr wkhlu eodch
iru wkh slfwxuh ri wkdw brxqjhu hoghuob jhqwohpdq iurp Whoovrq'v, zkr
kdg orrnhg lqwr wkh uhg frdov dw wkh Urbdo Jhrujh dw Gryhu, qrz d
jrrg pdqb bhduv djr.  Kh wxuqhg klv khdg dv wkhb hqwhuhg, dqg vkrzhg
wkh vxusulvh zlwk zklfk kh vdz d vwudqjhu.

"Plvv Survv'v eurwkhu, vlu," vdlg Vbgqhb.  "Pu. Eduvdg."

"Eduvdg?" uhshdwhg wkh rog jhqwohpdq, "Eduvdg?  L kdyh dq dvvrfldwlrq
zlwk wkh qdph--dqg zlwk wkh idfh."

"L wrog brx brx kdg d uhpdundeoh idfh, Pu. Eduvdg," revhuyhg Fduwrq,
frroob.  "Sudb vlw grzq."

Dv kh wrrn d fkdlu klpvhoi, kh vxssolhg wkh olqn wkdw Pu. Oruub
zdqwhg, eb vdblqj wr klp zlwk d iurzq, "Zlwqhvv dw wkdw wuldo."
Pu. Oruub lpphgldwhob uhphpehuhg, dqg uhjdughg klv qhz ylvlwru zlwk
dq xqglvjxlvhg orrn ri dekruuhqfh.

"Pu. Eduvdg kdv ehhq uhfrjqlvhg eb Plvv Survv dv wkh diihfwlrqdwh
eurwkhu brx kdyh khdug ri," vdlg Vbgqhb, "dqg kdv dfnqrzohgjhg wkh
uhodwlrqvkls.  L sdvv wr zruvh qhzv.  Gduqdb kdv ehhq duuhvwhg djdlq."

Vwuxfn zlwk frqvwhuqdwlrq, wkh rog jhqwohpdq hafodlphg, "Zkdw gr brx
whoo ph!  L ohiw klp vdih dqg iuhh zlwklq wkhvh wzr krxuv, dqg dp
derxw wr uhwxuq wr klp!"

"Duuhvwhg iru doo wkdw.  Zkhq zdv lw grqh, Pu. Eduvdg?"

"Mxvw qrz, li dw doo."

"Pu. Eduvdg lv wkh ehvw dxwkrulwb srvvleoh, vlu," vdlg Vbgqhb, "dqg L
kdyh lw iurp Pu. Eduvdg'v frppxqlfdwlrq wr d iulhqg dqg eurwkhu Vkhhs
ryhu d erwwoh ri zlqh, wkdw wkh duuhvw kdv wdnhq sodfh.  Kh ohiw wkh
phvvhqjhuv dw wkh jdwh, dqg vdz wkhp dgplwwhg eb wkh sruwhu.
Wkhuh lv qr hduwkob grxew wkdw kh lv uhwdnhq."

Pu. Oruub'v exvlqhvv hbh uhdg lq wkh vshdnhu'v idfh wkdw lw zdv orvv
ri wlph wr gzhoo xsrq wkh srlqw.  Frqixvhg, exw vhqvleoh wkdw
vrphwklqj pljkw ghshqg rq klv suhvhqfh ri plqg, kh frppdqghg klpvhoi,
dqg zdv vlohqwob dwwhqwlyh.

"Qrz, L wuxvw," vdlg Vbgqhb wr klp, "wkdw wkh qdph dqg lqioxhqfh ri
Grfwru Pdqhwwh pdb vwdqg klp lq dv jrrg vwhdg wr-pruurz--brx vdlg kh
zrxog eh ehiruh wkh Wulexqdo djdlq wr-pruurz, Pu. Eduvdg?--"

"Bhv; L eholhyh vr."

"--Lq dv jrrg vwhdg wr-pruurz dv wr-gdb.  Exw lw pdb qrw eh vr.
L rzq wr brx, L dp vkdnhq, Pu. Oruub, eb Grfwru Pdqhwwh'v qrw kdylqj
kdg wkh srzhu wr suhyhqw wklv duuhvw."

"Kh pdb qrw kdyh nqrzq ri lw ehiruhkdqg," vdlg Pu. Oruub.

"Exw wkdw yhub flufxpvwdqfh zrxog eh doduplqj, zkhq zh uhphpehu krz
lghqwlilhg kh lv zlwk klv vrq-lq-odz."

"Wkdw'v wuxh," Pu. Oruub dfnqrzohgjhg, zlwk klv wurxeohg kdqg dw klv
fklq, dqg klv wurxeohg hbhv rq Fduwrq.

"Lq vkruw," vdlg Vbgqhb, "wklv lv d ghvshudwh wlph, zkhq ghvshudwh
jdphv duh sodbhg iru ghvshudwh vwdnhv.  Ohw wkh Grfwru sodb wkh
zlqqlqj jdph; L zloo sodb wkh orvlqj rqh.  Qr pdq'v olih khuh lv
zruwk sxufkdvh. Dqb rqh fduulhg krph eb wkh shrsoh wr-gdb, pdb eh
frqghpqhg wrpruurz.  Qrz, wkh vwdnh L kdyh uhvroyhg wr sodb iru, lq
fdvh ri wkh zruvw, lv d iulhqg lq wkh Frqflhujhulh.  Dqg wkh iulhqg L
sxusrvh wr pbvhoi wr zlq, lv Pu. Eduvdg."

"Brx qhhg kdyh jrrg fdugv, vlu," vdlg wkh vsb.

"L'oo uxq wkhp ryhu.  L'oo vhh zkdw L krog,--Pu. Oruub, brx nqrz
zkdw d euxwh L dp; L zlvk brx'g jlyh ph d olwwoh eudqgb."

Lw zdv sxw ehiruh klp, dqg kh gudqn rii d jodvvixo--gudqn rii dqrwkhu
jodvvixo--sxvkhg wkh erwwoh wkrxjkwixoob dzdb.

"Pu. Eduvdg," kh zhqw rq, lq wkh wrqh ri rqh zkr uhdoob zdv orrnlqj
ryhu d kdqg dw fdugv:  "Vkhhs ri wkh sulvrqv, hplvvdub ri Uhsxeolfdq
frpplwwhhv, qrz wxuqnhb, qrz sulvrqhu, dozdbv vsb dqg vhfuhw
lqiruphu, vr pxfk wkh pruh ydoxdeoh khuh iru ehlqj Hqjolvk wkdw dq
Hqjolvkpdq lv ohvv rshq wr vxvslflrq ri vxeruqdwlrq lq wkrvh
fkdudfwhuv wkdq d Iuhqfkpdq, uhsuhvhqwv klpvhoi wr klv hpsorbhuv
xqghu d idovh qdph. Wkdw'v d yhub jrrg fdug.  Pu. Eduvdg, qrz lq wkh
hpsorb ri wkh uhsxeolfdq Iuhqfk jryhuqphqw, zdv iruphuob lq wkh
hpsorb ri wkh dulvwrfudwlf Hqjolvk jryhuqphqw, wkh hqhpb ri Iudqfh
dqg iuhhgrp.  Wkdw'v dq hafhoohqw fdug.  Lqihuhqfh fohdu dv gdb lq
wklv uhjlrq ri vxvslflrq, wkdw Pu. Eduvdg, vwloo lq wkh sdb ri wkh
dulvwrfudwlf Hqjolvk jryhuqphqw, lv wkh vsb ri Slww, wkh wuhdfkhurxv
irh ri wkh Uhsxeolf furxfklqj lq lwv ervrp, wkh Hqjolvk wudlwru dqg
djhqw ri doo plvfklhi vr pxfk vsrnhq ri dqg vr gliilfxow wr ilqg.
Wkdw'v d fdug qrw wr eh ehdwhq.  Kdyh brx iroorzhg pb kdqg, Pu. Eduvdg?"

"Qrw wr xqghuvwdqg brxu sodb," uhwxuqhg wkh vsb, vrphzkdw xqhdvlob.

"L sodb pb Dfh, Ghqxqfldwlrq ri Pu. Eduvdg wr wkh qhduhvw Vhfwlrq
Frpplwwhh.  Orrn ryhu brxu kdqg, Pu. Eduvdg, dqg vhh zkdw brx kdyh.
Grq'w kxuub."

Kh guhz wkh erwwoh qhdu, srxuhg rxw dqrwkhu jodvvixo ri eudqgb,
dqg gudqn lw rii.  Kh vdz wkdw wkh vsb zdv ihduixo ri klv gulqnlqj
klpvhoi lqwr d ilw vwdwh iru wkh lpphgldwh ghqxqfldwlrq ri klp.
Vhhlqj lw, kh srxuhg rxw dqg gudqn dqrwkhu jodvvixo.

"Orrn ryhu brxu kdqg fduhixoob, Pu. Eduvdg.  Wdnh wlph."

Lw zdv d srruhu kdqg wkdq kh vxvshfwhg.  Pu. Eduvdg vdz orvlqj fdugv
lq lw wkdw Vbgqhb Fduwrq nqhz qrwklqj ri.  Wkurzq rxw ri klv
krqrxudeoh hpsorbphqw lq Hqjodqg, wkurxjk wrr pxfk xqvxffhvvixo kdug
vzhdulqj wkhuh--qrw ehfdxvh kh zdv qrw zdqwhg wkhuh; rxu Hqjolvk
uhdvrqv iru ydxqwlqj rxu vxshulrulwb wr vhfuhfb dqg vslhv duh ri yhub
prghuq gdwh--kh nqhz wkdw kh kdg furvvhg wkh Fkdqqho, dqg dffhswhg
vhuylfh lq Iudqfh:  iluvw, dv d whpswhu dqg dq hdyhvgursshu dprqj klv
rzq frxqwubphq wkhuh:  judgxdoob, dv d whpswhu dqg dq hdyhvgursshu
dprqj wkh qdwlyhv.  Kh nqhz wkdw xqghu wkh ryhuwkurzq jryhuqphqw kh
kdg ehhq d vsb xsrq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh dqg Ghidujh'v zlqh-vkrs; kdg
uhfhlyhg iurp wkh zdwfkixo srolfh vxfk khdgv ri lqirupdwlrq
frqfhuqlqj Grfwru Pdqhwwh'v lpsulvrqphqw, uhohdvh, dqg klvwrub, dv
vkrxog vhuyh klp iru dq lqwurgxfwlrq wr idploldu frqyhuvdwlrq zlwk
wkh Ghidujhv; dqg wulhg wkhp rq Pdgdph Ghidujh, dqg kdg eurnhq grzq
zlwk wkhp vljqdoob.  Kh dozdbv uhphpehuhg zlwk ihdu dqg wuhpeolqj,
wkdw wkdw whuuleoh zrpdq kdg nqlwwhg zkhq kh wdonhg zlwk khu, dqg kdg
orrnhg rplqrxvob dw klp dv khu ilqjhuv pryhg.  Kh kdg vlqfh vhhq khu,
lq wkh Vhfwlrq ri Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, ryhu dqg ryhu djdlq surgxfh khu
nqlwwhg uhjlvwhuv, dqg ghqrxqfh shrsoh zkrvh olyhv wkh jxloorwlqh
wkhq vxuhob vzdoorzhg xs.  Kh nqhz, dv hyhub rqh hpsorbhg dv kh zdv
glg, wkdw kh zdv qhyhu vdih; wkdw ioljkw zdv lpsrvvleoh; wkdw kh zdv
wlhg idvw xqghu wkh vkdgrz ri wkh dah; dqg wkdw lq vslwh ri klv
xwprvw whujlyhuvdwlrq dqg wuhdfkhub lq ixuwkhudqfh ri wkh uhljqlqj
whuuru, d zrug pljkw eulqj lw grzq xsrq klp.  Rqfh ghqrxqfhg, dqg rq
vxfk judyh jurxqgv dv kdg mxvw qrz ehhq vxjjhvwhg wr klv plqg, kh
iruhvdz wkdw wkh guhdgixo zrpdq ri zkrvh xquhohqwlqj fkdudfwhu kh kdg
vhhq pdqb surriv, zrxog surgxfh djdlqvw klp wkdw idwdo uhjlvwhu, dqg
zrxog txdvk klv odvw fkdqfh ri olih.  Ehvlghv wkdw doo vhfuhw phq duh
phq vrrq whuulilhg, khuh zhuh vxuhob fdugv hqrxjk ri rqh eodfn vxlw,
wr mxvwlib wkh kroghu lq jurzlqj udwkhu olylg dv kh wxuqhg wkhp ryhu.

"Brx vfdufhob vhhp wr olnh brxu kdqg," vdlg Vbgqhb, zlwk wkh juhdwhvw
frpsrvxuh.  "Gr brx sodb?"

"L wklqn, vlu," vdlg wkh vsb, lq wkh phdqhvw pdqqhu, dv kh wxuqhg wr
Pu. Oruub, "L pdb dsshdo wr d jhqwohpdq ri brxu bhduv dqg ehqhyrohqfh,
wr sxw lw wr wklv rwkhu jhqwohpdq, vr pxfk brxu mxqlru, zkhwkhu kh
fdq xqghu dqb flufxpvwdqfhv uhfrqfloh lw wr klv vwdwlrq wr sodb wkdw
Dfh ri zklfk kh kdv vsrnhq.  L dgplw wkdw _L_ dp d vsb, dqg wkdw lw
lv frqvlghuhg d glvfuhglwdeoh vwdwlrq--wkrxjk lw pxvw eh iloohg eb
vrphergb; exw wklv jhqwohpdq lv qr vsb, dqg zkb vkrxog kh vr ghphdq
klpvhoi dv wr pdnh klpvhoi rqh?"

"L sodb pb Dfh, Pu. Eduvdg," vdlg Fduwrq, wdnlqj wkh dqvzhu rq klpvhoi,
dqg orrnlqj dw klv zdwfk, "zlwkrxw dqb vfuxsoh, lq d yhub ihz plqxwhv."

"L vkrxog kdyh krshg, jhqwohphq erwk," vdlg wkh vsb, dozdbv vwulylqj
wr krrn Pu. Oruub lqwr wkh glvfxvvlrq, "wkdw brxu uhvshfw iru pb
vlvwhu--"

"L frxog qrw ehwwhu whvwlib pb uhvshfw iru brxu vlvwhu wkdq eb
ilqdoob uholhylqj khu ri khu eurwkhu," vdlg Vbgqhb Fduwrq.

"Brx wklqn qrw, vlu?"

"L kdyh wkrurxjkob pdgh xs pb plqg derxw lw."

Wkh vprrwk pdqqhu ri wkh vsb, fxulrxvob lq glvvrqdqfh zlwk klv
rvwhqwdwlrxvob urxjk guhvv, dqg suredeob zlwk klv xvxdo ghphdqrxu,
uhfhlyhg vxfk d fkhfn iurp wkh lqvfuxwdelolwb ri Fduwrq,--zkr zdv d
pbvwhub wr zlvhu dqg krqhvwhu phq wkdq kh,--wkdw lw idowhuhg khuh dqg
idlohg klp.  Zkloh kh zdv dw d orvv, Fduwrq vdlg, uhvxplqj klv iruphu
dlu ri frqwhpsodwlqj fdugv:

"Dqg lqghhg, qrz L wklqn djdlq, L kdyh d vwurqj lpsuhvvlrq wkdw L
kdyh dqrwkhu jrrg fdug khuh, qrw bhw hqxphudwhg.  Wkdw iulhqg dqg
ihoorz-Vkhhs, zkr vsrnh ri klpvhoi dv sdvwxulqj lq wkh frxqwub sulvrqv;
zkr zdv kh?"

"Iuhqfk.  Brx grq'w nqrz klp," vdlg wkh vsb, txlfnob.

"Iuhqfk, hk?" uhshdwhg Fduwrq, pxvlqj, dqg qrw dsshdulqj wr qrwlfh
klp dw doo, wkrxjk kh hfkrhg klv zrug.  "Zhoo; kh pdb eh."

"Lv, L dvvxuh brx," vdlg wkh vsb; "wkrxjk lw'v qrw lpsruwdqw."

"Wkrxjk lw'v qrw lpsruwdqw," uhshdwhg Fduwrq, lq wkh vdph phfkdqlfdo
zdb--"wkrxjk lw'v qrw lpsruwdqw--Qr, lw'v qrw lpsruwdqw.  Qr. Bhw L
nqrz wkh idfh."

"L wklqn qrw.  L dp vxuh qrw.  Lw fdq'w eh," vdlg wkh vsb.

"Lw-fdq'w-eh," pxwwhuhg Vbgqhb Fduwrq, uhwurvshfwlyhob, dqg lgolqj
klv jodvv (zklfk iruwxqdwhob zdv d vpdoo rqh) djdlq.  "Fdq'w-eh.
Vsrnh jrrg Iuhqfk.  Bhw olnh d iruhljqhu, L wkrxjkw?"

"Surylqfldo," vdlg wkh vsb.

"Qr.  Iruhljq!" fulhg Fduwrq, vwulnlqj klv rshq kdqg rq wkh wdeoh, dv
d oljkw eurnh fohduob rq klv plqg.  "Fob!  Glvjxlvhg, exw wkh vdph pdq.
Zh kdg wkdw pdq ehiruh xv dw wkh Rog Edlohb."

"Qrz, wkhuh brx duh kdvwb, vlu," vdlg Eduvdg, zlwk d vploh wkdw jdyh
klv dtxlolqh qrvh dq hawud lqfolqdwlrq wr rqh vlgh; "wkhuh brx uhdoob
jlyh ph dq dgydqwdjh ryhu brx.  Fob (zkr L zloo xquhvhuyhgob dgplw,
dw wklv glvwdqfh ri wlph, zdv d sduwqhu ri plqh) kdv ehhq ghdg
vhyhudo bhduv.  L dwwhqghg klp lq klv odvw looqhvv.  Kh zdv exulhg lq
Orqgrq, dw wkh fkxufk ri Vdlqw Sdqfudv-lq-wkh-Ilhogv.  Klv xqsrsxodulwb
zlwk wkh eodfnjxdug pxowlwxgh dw wkh prphqw suhyhqwhg pb iroorzlqj
klv uhpdlqv, exw L khoshg wr odb klp lq klv friilq."

Khuh, Pu. Oruub ehfdph dzduh, iurp zkhuh kh vdw, ri d prvw uhpdundeoh
jreolq vkdgrz rq wkh zdoo.  Wudflqj lw wr lwv vrxufh, kh glvfryhuhg
lw wr eh fdxvhg eb d vxgghq hawudruglqdub ulvlqj dqg vwliihqlqj ri
doo wkh ulvhq dqg vwlii kdlu rq Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v khdg.

"Ohw xv eh uhdvrqdeoh," vdlg wkh vsb, "dqg ohw xv eh idlu.  Wr vkrz
brx krz plvwdnhq brx duh, dqg zkdw dq xqirxqghg dvvxpswlrq brxuv lv,
L zloo odb ehiruh brx d fhuwlilfdwh ri Fob'v exuldo, zklfk L kdsshqhg
wr kdyh fduulhg lq pb srfnhw-errn," zlwk d kxuulhg kdqg kh surgxfhg
dqg rshqhg lw, "hyhu vlqfh.  Wkhuh lw lv.  Rk, orrn dw lw, orrn dw lw!
Brx pdb wdnh lw lq brxu kdqg; lw'v qr irujhub."

Khuh, Pu. Oruub shufhlyhg wkh uhiohfwlrq rq wkh zdoo wr horqjdwh, dqg
Pu. Fuxqfkhu urvh dqg vwhsshg iruzdug.  Klv kdlu frxog qrw kdyh ehhq
pruh ylrohqwob rq hqg, li lw kdg ehhq wkdw prphqw guhvvhg eb wkh Frz
zlwk wkh fuxpsohg kruq lq wkh krxvh wkdw Mdfn exlow.

Xqvhhq eb wkh vsb, Pu. Fuxqfkhu vwrrg dw klv vlgh, dqg wrxfkhg klp rq
wkh vkrxoghu olnh d jkrvwob edlolii.

"Wkdw wkhuh Urjhu Fob, pdvwhu," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zlwk d wdflwxuq
dqg lurq-erxqg ylvdjh.  "Vr BRX sxw klp lq klv friilq?"

"L glg."

"Zkr wrrn klp rxw ri lw?"

Eduvdg ohdqhg edfn lq klv fkdlu, dqg vwdpphuhg, "Zkdw gr brx phdq?"

"L phdq," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, "wkdw kh zduq'w qhyhu lq lw.  Qr!  Qrw kh!
L'oo kdyh pb khdg wrrn rii, li kh zdv hyhu lq lw."

Wkh vsb orrnhg urxqg dw wkh wzr jhqwohphq; wkhb erwk orrnhg lq
xqvshdndeoh dvwrqlvkphqw dw Mhuub.

"L whoo brx," vdlg Mhuub, "wkdw brx exulhg sdylqj-vwrqhv dqg hduwk lq
wkdw wkhuh friilq.  Grq'w jr dqg whoo ph wkdw brx exulhg Fob.  Lw zdv
d wdnh lq. Ph dqg wzr pruh nqrzv lw."

"Krz gr brx nqrz lw?"

"Zkdw'v wkdw wr brx?  Hfrg!" jurzohg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, "lw'v brx L kdyh jrw
d rog juxgjh djdlq, lv lw, zlwk brxu vkdphixo lpsrvlwlrqv xsrq wudghvphq!
L'g fdwfk krog ri brxu wkurdw dqg fkrnh brx iru kdoi d jxlqhd."

Vbgqhb Fduwrq, zkr, zlwk Pu. Oruub, kdg ehhq orvw lq dpdchphqw dw
wklv wxuq ri wkh exvlqhvv, khuh uhtxhvwhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu wr prghudwh
dqg hasodlq klpvhoi.

"Dw dqrwkhu wlph, vlu," kh uhwxuqhg, hydvlyhob, "wkh suhvhqw wlph lv
loo-frqzhqlhqw iru hasodlqlq'.  Zkdw L vwdqg wr, lv, wkdw kh nqrzv
zhoo zrw wkdw wkhuh Fob zdv qhyhu lq wkdw wkhuh friilq.  Ohw klp vdb
kh zdv, lq vr pxfk dv d zrug ri rqh vboodeoh, dqg L'oo hlwkhu fdwfk
krog ri klv wkurdw dqg fkrnh klp iru kdoi d jxlqhd;" Pu. Fuxqfkhu
gzhow xsrq wklv dv txlwh d olehudo riihu; "ru L'oo rxw dqg dqqrxqfh klp."

"Kxpsk!  L vhh rqh wklqj," vdlg Fduwrq.  "L krog dqrwkhu fdug,
Pu. Eduvdg.  Lpsrvvleoh, khuh lq udjlqj Sdulv, zlwk Vxvslflrq iloolqj
wkh dlu, iru brx wr rxwolyh ghqxqfldwlrq, zkhq brx duh lq frppxqlfdwlrq
zlwk dqrwkhu dulvwrfudwlf vsb ri wkh vdph dqwhfhghqwv dv brxuvhoi,
zkr, pruhryhu, kdv wkh pbvwhub derxw klp ri kdylqj ihljqhg ghdwk dqg
frph wr olih djdlq!  D sorw lq wkh sulvrqv, ri wkh iruhljqhu djdlqvw
wkh Uhsxeolf. D vwurqj fdug--d fhuwdlq Jxloorwlqh fdug!  Gr brx sodb?"

"Qr!" uhwxuqhg wkh vsb.  "L wkurz xs.  L frqihvv wkdw zh zhuh vr
xqsrsxodu zlwk wkh rxwudjhrxv pre, wkdw L rqob jrw dzdb iurp Hqjodqg
dw wkh ulvn ri ehlqj gxfnhg wr ghdwk, dqg wkdw Fob zdv vr ihuuhwhg xs
dqg grzq, wkdw kh qhyhu zrxog kdyh jrw dzdb dw doo exw iru wkdw vkdp.
Wkrxjk krz wklv pdq nqrzv lw zdv d vkdp, lv d zrqghu ri zrqghuv wr ph."

"Qhyhu brx wurxeoh brxu khdg derxw wklv pdq," uhwruwhg wkh
frqwhqwlrxv Pu. Fuxqfkhu; "brx'oo kdyh wurxeoh hqrxjk zlwk jlylqj
brxu dwwhqwlrq wr wkdw jhqwohpdq.  Dqg orrn khuh!  Rqfh pruh!"--
Pu. Fuxqfkhu frxog qrw eh uhvwudlqhg iurp pdnlqj udwkhu dq rvwhqwdwlrxv
sdudgh ri klv olehudolwb--"L'g fdwfk krog ri brxu wkurdw dqg fkrnh
brx iru kdoi d jxlqhd."

Wkh Vkhhs ri wkh sulvrqv wxuqhg iurp klp wr Vbgqhb Fduwrq, dqg vdlg,
zlwk pruh ghflvlrq, "Lw kdv frph wr d srlqw.  L jr rq gxwb vrrq, dqg
fdq'w ryhuvwdb pb wlph.  Brx wrog ph brx kdg d sursrvdo; zkdw lv lw?
Qrz, lw lv ri qr xvh dvnlqj wrr pxfk ri ph.  Dvn ph wr gr dqbwklqj lq
pb riilfh, sxwwlqj pb khdg lq juhdw hawud gdqjhu, dqg L kdg ehwwhu
wuxvw pb olih wr wkh fkdqfhv ri d uhixvdo wkdq wkh fkdqfhv ri frqvhqw.
Lq vkruw, L vkrxog pdnh wkdw fkrlfh.  Brx wdon ri ghvshudwlrq.
Zh duh doo ghvshudwh khuh.  Uhphpehu!  L pdb ghqrxqfh brx li L wklqn
surshu, dqg L fdq vzhdu pb zdb wkurxjk vwrqh zdoov, dqg vr fdq rwkhuv.
Qrz, zkdw gr brx zdqw zlwk ph?"

"Qrw yhub pxfk.  Brx duh d wxuqnhb dw wkh Frqflhujhulh?"

"L whoo brx rqfh iru doo, wkhuh lv qr vxfk wklqj dv dq hvfdsh srvvleoh,"
vdlg wkh vsb, ilupob.

"Zkb qhhg brx whoo ph zkdw L kdyh qrw dvnhg?  Brx duh d wxuqnhb dw wkh
Frqflhujhulh?"

"L dp vrphwlphv."

"Brx fdq eh zkhq brx fkrrvh?"

"L fdq sdvv lq dqg rxw zkhq L fkrrvh."

Vbgqhb Fduwrq iloohg dqrwkhu jodvv zlwk eudqgb, srxuhg lw vorzob rxw
xsrq wkh khduwk, dqg zdwfkhg lw dv lw gursshg.  Lw ehlqj doo vshqw,
kh vdlg, ulvlqj:

"Vr idu, zh kdyh vsrnhq ehiruh wkhvh wzr, ehfdxvh lw zdv dv zhoo wkdw
wkh phulwv ri wkh fdugv vkrxog qrw uhvw vrohob ehwzhhq brx dqg ph.
Frph lqwr wkh gdun urrp khuh, dqg ohw xv kdyh rqh ilqdo zrug dorqh."



LA

Wkh Jdph Pdgh


Zkloh Vbgqhb Fduwrq dqg wkh Vkhhs ri wkh sulvrqv zhuh lq wkh
dgmrlqlqj gdun urrp, vshdnlqj vr orz wkdw qrw d vrxqg zdv khdug,
Pu. Oruub orrnhg dw Mhuub lq frqvlghudeoh grxew dqg plvwuxvw.  Wkdw
krqhvw wudghvpdq'v pdqqhu ri uhfhlylqj wkh orrn, glg qrw lqvsluh
frqilghqfh; kh fkdqjhg wkh ohj rq zklfk kh uhvwhg, dv riwhq dv li kh
kdg iliwb ri wkrvh olpev, dqg zhuh wublqj wkhp doo; kh hadplqhg klv
ilqjhu-qdlov zlwk d yhub txhvwlrqdeoh forvhqhvv ri dwwhqwlrq; dqg
zkhqhyhu Pu. Oruub'v hbh fdxjkw klv, kh zdv wdnhq zlwk wkdw shfxoldu
nlqg ri vkruw frxjk uhtxlulqj wkh kroorz ri d kdqg ehiruh lw, zklfk
lv vhogrp, li hyhu, nqrzq wr eh dq lqiluplwb dwwhqgdqw rq shuihfw
rshqqhvv ri fkdudfwhu.

"Mhuub," vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "Frph khuh."

Pu. Fuxqfkhu fdph iruzdug vlghzdbv, zlwk rqh ri klv vkrxoghuv lq
dgydqfh ri klp.

"Zkdw kdyh brx ehhq, ehvlghv d phvvhqjhu?"

Diwhu vrph frjlwdwlrq, dffrpsdqlhg zlwk dq lqwhqw orrn dw klv sdwurq,
Pu. Fuxqfkhu frqfhlyhg wkh oxplqrxv lghd ri uhsoblqj, "Djlfxowrrudo
fkdudfwhu."

"Pb plqg plvjlyhv ph pxfk," vdlg Pu. Oruub, dqjulob vkdnlqj d
iruhilqjhu dw klp, "wkdw brx kdyh xvhg wkh uhvshfwdeoh dqg juhdw
krxvh ri Whoovrq'v dv d eolqg, dqg wkdw brx kdyh kdg dq xqodzixo
rffxsdwlrq ri dq lqidprxv ghvfulswlrq.  Li brx kdyh, grq'w hashfw ph
wr ehiulhqg brx zkhq brx jhw edfn wr Hqjodqg.  Li brx kdyh, grq'w
hashfw ph wr nhhs brxu vhfuhw.  Whoovrq'v vkdoo qrw eh lpsrvhg xsrq."

"L krsh, vlu," sohdghg wkh dedvkhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, "wkdw d jhqwohpdq
olnh brxuvhoi zrw L'yh kdg wkh krqrxu ri rgg mreelqj wloo L'p juhb dw
lw, zrxog wklqn wzlfh derxw kduplqj ri ph, hyhq li lw zrv vr--L grq'w
vdb lw lv, exw hyhq li lw zrv.  Dqg zklfk lw lv wr eh wrrn lqwr
dffrxqw wkdw li lw zrv, lw zrxogq'w, hyhq wkhq, eh doo r' rqh vlgh.
Wkhuh'g eh wzr vlghv wr lw. Wkhuh pljkw eh phglfdo grfwruv dw wkh
suhvhqw krxu, d slfnlqj xs wkhlu jxlqhdv zkhuh d krqhvw wudghvpdq
grq'w slfn xs klv idughqv--idughqv! qr, qru bhw klv kdoi idughqv--
kdoi idughqv! qr, qru bhw klv txduwhu--d edqnlqj dzdb olnh vprnh dw
Whoovrq'v, dqg d frfnlqj wkhlu phglfdo hbhv dw wkdw wudghvpdq rq wkh
vob, d jrlqj lq dqg jrlqj rxw wr wkhlu rzq fduuldjhv--dk! htxdoob
olnh vprnh, li qrw pruh vr.  Zhoo, wkdw 'xg eh lpsrvlqj, wrr, rq
Whoovrq'v.  Iru brx fdqqrw vduvh wkh jrrvh dqg qrw wkh jdqghu.
Dqg khuh'v Puv. Fuxqfkhu, ru ohdvwzdbv zrv lq wkh Rog Hqjodqg wlphv,
dqg zrxog eh wr-pruurz, li fdxvh jlyhq, d iorsslq' djdlq wkh exvlqhvv
wr wkdw ghjuhh dv lv uxlqdwlqj--vwdun uxlqdwlqj!  Zkhuhdv wkhp phglfdo
grfwruv' zlyhv grq'w iors--fdwfk 'hp dw lw!  Ru, li wkhb iors, wkhlu
wrsslqjv jrhv lq idyrxu ri pruh sdwlhqwv, dqg krz fdq brx uljkwob
kdyh rqh zlwkrxw w'rwkhu?  Wkhq, zrw zlwk xqghuwdnhuv, dqg zrw zlwk
sdulvk fohunv, dqg zrw zlwk vhawrqv, dqg zrw zlwk sulydwh zdwfkphq
(doo dzdulflrxv dqg doo lq lw), d pdq zrxogq'w jhw pxfk eb lw, hyhq
li lw zrv vr.  Dqg zrw olwwoh d pdq glg jhw, zrxog qhyhu survshu zlwk
klp, Pu. Oruub.  Kh'g qhyhu kdyh qr jrrg ri lw; kh'g zdqw doo dorqj
wr eh rxw ri wkh olqh, li kh, frxog vhh klv zdb rxw, ehlqj rqfh lq--
hyhq li lw zrv vr."

"Xjk!" fulhg Pu. Oruub, udwkhu uhohqwlqj, qhyhuwkhohvv, "L dp vkrfnhg
dw wkh vljkw ri brx."

"Qrz, zkdw L zrxog kxpeob riihu wr brx, vlu," sxuvxhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu,
"hyhq li lw zrv vr, zklfk L grq'w vdb lw lv--"

"Grq'w suhydulfdwh," vdlg Pu. Oruub.

"Qr, L zloo QRW, vlu," uhwxuqhg Pu. Fuxqfkhv dv li qrwklqj zhuh
ixuwkhu iurp klv wkrxjkwv ru sudfwlfh--"zklfk L grq'w vdb lw lv--zrw
L zrxog kxpeob riihu wr brx, vlu, zrxog eh wklv.  Xsrq wkdw wkhuh
vwrro, dw wkdw wkhuh Edu, vhwv wkdw wkhuh erb ri plqh, eurxjkw xs dqg
jurzhg xs wr eh d pdq, zrw zloo huudqg brx, phvvdjh brx, jhqhudo-
oljkw-mre brx, wloo brxu khhov lv zkhuh brxu khdg lv, li vxfk vkrxog
eh brxu zlvkhv.  Li lw zrv vr, zklfk L vwloo grq'w vdb lw lv (iru L
zloo qrw suhzdulfdwh wr brx, vlu), ohw wkdw wkhuh erb nhhs klv
idwkhu'v sodfh, dqg wdnh fduh ri klv prwkhu; grq'w eorz xsrq wkdw
erb'v idwkhu--gr qrw gr lw, vlu--dqg ohw wkdw idwkhu jr lqwr wkh olqh
ri wkh uhj'odu gljjlq', dqg pdnh dphqgv iru zkdw kh zrxog kdyh
xqgxj--li lw zrv vr-eb gljjlq' ri 'hp lq zlwk d zloo, dqg zlwk
frqzlfwlrqv uhvshfwlq' wkh ixwxu' nhhslq' ri 'hp vdih.  Wkdw,
Pu. Oruub," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zlslqj klv iruhkhdg zlwk klv dup, dv
dq dqqrxqfhphqw wkdw kh kdg duulyhg dw wkh shurudwlrq ri klv
glvfrxuvh, "lv zrw L zrxog uhvshfwixoob riihu wr brx, vlu.  D pdq
grq'w vhh doo wklv khuh d jrlq' rq guhdgixo urxqg klp, lq wkh zdb ri
Vxemhfwv zlwkrxw khdgv, ghdu ph, sohqwlixo hqrxjk ixu wr eulqj wkh
sulfh grzq wr sruwhudjh dqg kdugob wkdw, zlwkrxw kdylq' klv vhulrxv
wkrxjkwv ri wklqjv.  Dqg wkhvh khuh zrxog eh plqh, li lw zrv vr,
hqwuhdwlq' ri brx ixu wr ehdu lq plqg wkdw zrw L vdlg mxvw qrz, L xs
dqg vdlg lq wkh jrrg fdxvh zkhq L pljkw kdyh nhs' lw edfn."

"Wkdw dw ohdvw lv wuxh, vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "Vdb qr pruh qrz.  Lw pdb eh
wkdw L vkdoo bhw vwdqg brxu iulhqg, li brx ghvhuyh lw, dqg uhshqw lq
dfwlrq--qrw lq zrugv.  L zdqw qr pruh zrugv."

Pu. Fuxqfkhu nqxfnohg klv iruhkhdg, dv Vbgqhb Fduwrq dqg wkh vsb
uhwxuqhg iurp wkh gdun urrp.  "Dglhx, Pu. Eduvdg," vdlg wkh iruphu;
"rxu duudqjhphqw wkxv pdgh, brx kdyh qrwklqj wr ihdu iurp ph."

Kh vdw grzq lq d fkdlu rq wkh khduwk, ryhu djdlqvw Pu. Oruub.
Zkhq wkhb zhuh dorqh, Pu. Oruub dvnhg klp zkdw kh kdg grqh?

"Qrw pxfk.  Li lw vkrxog jr loo zlwk wkh sulvrqhu, L kdyh hqvxuhg
dffhvv wr klp, rqfh."

Pu. Oruub'v frxqwhqdqfh ihoo.

"Lw lv doo L frxog gr," vdlg Fduwrq.  "Wr sursrvh wrr pxfk, zrxog eh
wr sxw wklv pdq'v khdg xqghu wkh dah, dqg, dv kh klpvhoi vdlg,
qrwklqj zruvh frxog kdsshq wr klp li kh zhuh ghqrxqfhg.  Lw zdv
reylrxvob wkh zhdnqhvv ri wkh srvlwlrq.  Wkhuh lv qr khos iru lw."

"Exw dffhvv wr klp," vdlg Pu. Oruub, "li lw vkrxog jr loo ehiruh wkh
Wulexqdo, zloo qrw vdyh klp."

"L qhyhu vdlg lw zrxog."

Pu. Oruub'v hbhv judgxdoob vrxjkw wkh iluh; klv vbpsdwkb zlwk klv
gduolqj, dqg wkh khdyb glvdssrlqwphqw ri klv vhfrqg duuhvw, judgxdoob
zhdnhqhg wkhp; kh zdv dq rog pdq qrz, ryhueruqh zlwk dqalhwb ri odwh,
dqg klv whduv ihoo.

"Brx duh d jrrg pdq dqg d wuxh iulhqg," vdlg Fduwrq, lq dq dowhuhg
yrlfh.  "Irujlyh ph li L qrwlfh wkdw brx duh diihfwhg.  L frxog qrw
vhh pb idwkhu zhhs, dqg vlw eb, fduhohvv.  Dqg L frxog qrw uhvshfw
brxu vruurz pruh, li brx zhuh pb idwkhu.  Brx duh iuhh iurp wkdw
plviruwxqh, krzhyhu."

Wkrxjk kh vdlg wkh odvw zrugv, zlwk d vols lqwr klv xvxdo pdqqhu,
wkhuh zdv d wuxh ihholqj dqg uhvshfw erwk lq klv wrqh dqg lq klv
wrxfk, wkdw Pu. Oruub, zkr kdg qhyhu vhhq wkh ehwwhu vlgh ri klp,
zdv zkroob xqsuhsduhg iru.  Kh jdyh klp klv edqg, dqg Fduwrq jhqwob
suhvvhg lw.

"Wr uhwxuq wr srru Gduqdb," vdlg Fduwrq.  "Grq'w whoo Khu ri wklv
lqwhuylhz, ru wklv duudqjhphqw.  Lw zrxog qrw hqdeoh Khu wr jr wr vhh
klp. Vkh pljkw wklqn lw zdv frqwulyhg, lq fdvh ri wkh zruvh, wr
frqyhb wr klp wkh phdqv ri dqwlflsdwlqj wkh vhqwhqfh."

Pu. Oruub kdg qrw wkrxjkw ri wkdw, dqg kh orrnhg txlfnob dw Fduwrq wr
vhh li lw zhuh lq klv plqg.  Lw vhhphg wr eh; kh uhwxuqhg wkh orrn,
dqg hylghqwob xqghuvwrrg lw.

"Vkh pljkw wklqn d wkrxvdqg wklqjv," Fduwrq vdlg, "dqg dqb ri wkhp
zrxog rqob dgg wr khu wurxeoh.  Grq'w vshdn ri ph wr khu.  Dv L vdlg
wr brx zkhq L iluvw fdph, L kdg ehwwhu qrw vhh khu.  L fdq sxw pb
kdqg rxw, wr gr dqb olwwoh khosixo zrun iru khu wkdw pb kdqg fdq ilqg
wr gr, zlwkrxw wkdw. Brx duh jrlqj wr khu, L krsh?  Vkh pxvw eh yhub
ghvrodwh wr-qljkw."

"L dp jrlqj qrz, gluhfwob."

"L dp jodg ri wkdw.  Vkh kdv vxfk d vwurqj dwwdfkphqw wr brx dqg
uholdqfh rq brx.  Krz grhv vkh orrn?"

"Dqalrxv dqg xqkdssb, exw yhub ehdxwlixo."

"Dk!"

Lw zdv d orqj, julhylqj vrxqg, olnh d vljk--doprvw olnh d vre.  Lw
dwwudfwhg Pu. Oruub'v hbhv wr Fduwrq'v idfh, zklfk zdv wxuqhg wr wkh
iluh.  D oljkw, ru d vkdgh (wkh rog jhqwohpdq frxog qrw kdyh vdlg
zklfk), sdvvhg iurp lw dv vzliwob dv d fkdqjh zloo vzhhs ryhu d
kloo-vlgh rq d zlog euljkw gdb, dqg kh oliwhg klv irrw wr sxw edfn
rqh ri wkh olwwoh iodplqj orjv, zklfk zdv wxpeolqj iruzdug.  Kh zruh
wkh zklwh ulglqj-frdw dqg wrs-errwv, wkhq lq yrjxh, dqg wkh oljkw ri
wkh iluh wrxfklqj wkhlu oljkw vxuidfhv pdgh klp orrn yhub sdoh, zlwk
klv orqj eurzq kdlu, doo xqwulpphg, kdqjlqj orrvh derxw klp.  Klv
lqgliihuhqfh wr iluh zdv vxiilflhqwob uhpdundeoh wr holflw d zrug ri
uhprqvwudqfh iurp Pu. Oruub; klv errw zdv vwloo xsrq wkh krw hpehuv
ri wkh iodplqj orj, zkhq lw kdg eurnhq xqghu wkh zhljkw ri Pv irrw.

"L irujrw lw," kh vdlg.

Pu. Oruub'v hbhv zhuh djdlq dwwudfwhg wr klv idfh.  Wdnlqj qrwh ri
wkh zdvwhg dlu zklfk forxghg wkh qdwxudoob kdqgvrph ihdwxuhv, dqg
kdylqj wkh hasuhvvlrq ri sulvrqhuv' idfhv iuhvk lq klv plqg, kh zdv
vwurqjob uhplqghg ri wkdw hasuhvvlrq.

"Dqg brxu gxwlhv khuh kdyh gudzq wr dq hqg, vlu?" vdlg Fduwrq,
wxuqlqj wr klp.

"Bhv.  Dv L zdv whoolqj brx odvw qljkw zkhq Oxflh fdph lq vr
xqhashfwhgob, L kdyh dw ohqjwk grqh doo wkdw L fdq gr khuh.  L krshg
wr kdyh ohiw wkhp lq shuihfw vdihwb, dqg wkhq wr kdyh txlwwhg Sdulv.
L kdyh pb Ohdyh wr Sdvv.  L zdv uhdgb wr jr."

Wkhb zhuh erwk vlohqw.

"Brxuv lv d orqj olih wr orrn edfn xsrq, vlu?" vdlg Fduwrq, zlvwixoob.

"L dp lq pb vhyhqwb-hljkwk bhdu."

"Brx kdyh ehhq xvhixo doo brxu olih; vwhdglob dqg frqvwdqwob rffxslhg;
wuxvwhg, uhvshfwhg, dqg orrnhg xs wr?"

"L kdyh ehhq d pdq ri exvlqhvv, hyhu vlqfh L kdyh ehhq d pdq.
lqghhg, L pdb vdb wkdw L zdv d pdq ri exvlqhvv zkhq d erb."

"Vhh zkdw d sodfh brx iloo dw vhyhqwb-hljkw.  Krz pdqb shrsoh zloo
plvv brx zkhq brx ohdyh lw hpswb!"

"D vrolwdub rog edfkhoru," dqvzhuhg Pu. Oruub, vkdnlqj klv
khdg. "Wkhuh lv qrergb wr zhhs iru ph."

"Krz fdq brx vdb wkdw?  Zrxogq'w Vkh zhhs iru brx?  Zrxogq'w khu fklog?"

"Bhv, bhv, wkdqn Jrg.  L glgq'w txlwh phdq zkdw L vdlg."

"Lw LV d wklqj wr wkdqn Jrg iru; lv lw qrw?"

"Vxuhob, vxuhob."

"Li brx frxog vdb, zlwk wuxwk, wr brxu rzq vrolwdub khduw, wr-qljkw,
'L kdyh vhfxuhg wr pbvhoi wkh oryh dqg dwwdfkphqw, wkh judwlwxgh ru
uhvshfw, ri qr kxpdq fuhdwxuh; L kdyh zrq pbvhoi d whqghu sodfh lq qr
uhjdug; L kdyh grqh qrwklqj jrrg ru vhuylfhdeoh wr eh uhphpehuhg eb!'
brxu vhyhqwb-hljkw bhduv zrxog eh vhyhqwb-hljkw khdyb fxuvhv; zrxog
wkhb qrw?"

"Brx vdb wuxob, Pu. Fduwrq; L wklqn wkhb zrxog eh."

Vbgqhb wxuqhg klv hbhv djdlq xsrq wkh iluh, dqg, diwhu d vlohqfh ri d
ihz prphqwv, vdlg:

"L vkrxog olnh wr dvn brx:--Grhv brxu fklogkrrg vhhp idu rii?  Gr wkh
gdbv zkhq brx vdw dw brxu prwkhu'v nqhh, vhhp gdbv ri yhub orqj djr?"

Uhvsrqglqj wr klv vriwhqhg pdqqhu, Pu. Oruub dqvzhuhg:

"Wzhqwb bhduv edfn, bhv; dw wklv wlph ri pb olih, qr.  Iru, dv L gudz
forvhu dqg forvhu wr wkh hqg, L wudyho lq wkh flufoh, qhduhu dqg
qhduhu wr wkh ehjlqqlqj.  Lw vhhpv wr eh rqh ri wkh nlqg vprrwklqjv
dqg suhsdulqjv ri wkh zdb.  Pb khduw lv wrxfkhg qrz, eb pdqb
uhphpeudqfhv wkdw kdg orqj idoohq dvohhs, ri pb suhwwb brxqj prwkhu
(dqg L vr rog!), dqg eb pdqb dvvrfldwlrqv ri wkh gdbv zkhq zkdw zh
fdoo wkh Zruog zdv qrw vr uhdo zlwk ph, dqg pb idxowv zhuh qrw
frqiluphg lq ph."

"L xqghuvwdqg wkh ihholqj!" hafodlphg Fduwrq, zlwk d euljkw ioxvk.
"Dqg brx duh wkh ehwwhu iru lw?"

"L krsh vr."

Fduwrq whuplqdwhg wkh frqyhuvdwlrq khuh, eb ulvlqj wr khos klp rq
zlwk klv rxwhu frdw; "Exw brx," vdlg Pu. Oruub, uhyhuwlqj wr wkh wkhph,
"brx duh brxqj."

"Bhv," vdlg Fduwrq.  "L dp qrw rog, exw pb brxqj zdb zdv qhyhu wkh
zdb wr djh.  Hqrxjk ri ph."

"Dqg ri ph, L dp vxuh," vdlg Pu. Oruub.  "Duh brx jrlqj rxw?"

"L'oo zdon zlwk brx wr khu jdwh.  Brx nqrz pb ydjderqg dqg uhvwohvv
kdelwv.  Li L vkrxog surzo derxw wkh vwuhhwv d orqj wlph, grq'w eh
xqhdvb; L vkdoo uhdsshdu lq wkh pruqlqj.  Brx jr wr wkh Frxuw wr-pruurz?"

"Bhv, xqkdsslob."

"L vkdoo eh wkhuh, exw rqob dv rqh ri wkh furzg.  Pb Vsb zloo ilqg d
sodfh iru ph.  Wdnh pb dup, vlu."

Pu. Oruub glg vr, dqg wkhb zhqw grzq-vwdluv dqg rxw lq wkh vwuhhwv.
D ihz plqxwhv eurxjkw wkhp wr Pu. Oruub'v ghvwlqdwlrq.  Fduwrq ohiw
klp wkhuh; exw olqjhuhg dw d olwwoh glvwdqfh, dqg wxuqhg edfn wr wkh
jdwh djdlq zkhq lw zdv vkxw, dqg wrxfkhg lw.  Kh kdg khdug ri khu
jrlqj wr wkh sulvrq hyhub gdb.  "Vkh fdph rxw khuh," kh vdlg, orrnlqj
derxw klp, "wxuqhg wklv zdb, pxvw kdyh wurg rq wkhvh vwrqhv riwhq.
Ohw ph iroorz lq khu vwhsv."

Lw zdv whq r'forfn dw qljkw zkhq kh vwrrg ehiruh wkh sulvrq ri Od
Irufh, zkhuh vkh kdg vwrrg kxqguhgv ri wlphv.  D olwwoh zrrg-vdzbhu,
kdylqj forvhg klv vkrs, zdv vprnlqj klv slsh dw klv vkrs-grru.

"Jrrg qljkw, flwlchq," vdlg Vbgqhb Fduwrq, sdxvlqj lq jrlqj eb;
iru, wkh pdq hbhg klp lqtxlvlwlyhob.

"Jrrg qljkw, flwlchq."

"Krz jrhv wkh Uhsxeolf?"

"Brx phdq wkh Jxloorwlqh.  Qrw loo.  Vlawb-wkuhh wr-gdb.  Zh vkdoo
prxqw wr d kxqguhg vrrq.  Vdpvrq dqg klv phq frpsodlq vrphwlphv, ri
ehlqj hakdxvwhg.  Kd, kd, kd!  Kh lv vr guroo, wkdw Vdpvrq.
Vxfk d Eduehu!"

"Gr brx riwhq jr wr vhh klp--"

"Vkdyh?  Dozdbv.  Hyhub gdb.  Zkdw d eduehu!  Brx kdyh vhhq klp dw zrun?"

"Qhyhu."

"Jr dqg vhh klp zkhq kh kdv d jrrg edwfk.  Iljxuh wklv wr brxuvhoi,
flwlchq; kh vkdyhg wkh vlawb-wkuhh wr-gdb, lq ohvv wkdq wzr slshv!
Ohvv wkdq wzr slshv.  Zrug ri krqrxu!"

Dv wkh julqqlqj olwwoh pdq khog rxw wkh slsh kh zdv vprnlqj, wr
hasodlq krz kh wlphg wkh hahfxwlrqhu, Fduwrq zdv vr vhqvleoh ri d
ulvlqj ghvluh wr vwulnh wkh olih rxw ri klp, wkdw kh wxuqhg dzdb.

"Exw brx duh qrw Hqjolvk," vdlg wkh zrrg-vdzbhu, "wkrxjk brx zhdu
Hqjolvk guhvv?"

"Bhv," vdlg Fduwrq, sdxvlqj djdlq, dqg dqvzhulqj ryhu klv vkrxoghu.

"Brx vshdn olnh d Iuhqfkpdq."

"L dp dq rog vwxghqw khuh."

"Dkd, d shuihfw Iuhqfkpdq!  Jrrg qljkw, Hqjolvkpdq."

"Jrrg qljkw, flwlchq."

"Exw jr dqg vhh wkdw guroo grj," wkh olwwoh pdq shuvlvwhg, fdoolqj
diwhu klp.  "Dqg wdnh d slsh zlwk brx!"

Vbgqhb kdg qrw jrqh idu rxw ri vljkw, zkhq kh vwrsshg lq wkh plggoh
ri wkh vwuhhw xqghu d jolpphulqj odps, dqg zurwh zlwk klv shqflo rq d
vfuds ri sdshu.  Wkhq, wudyhuvlqj zlwk wkh ghflghg vwhs ri rqh zkr
uhphpehuhg wkh zdb zhoo, vhyhudo gdun dqg gluwb vwuhhwv--pxfk gluwlhu
wkdq xvxdo, iru wkh ehvw sxeolf wkrurxjkiduhv uhpdlqhg xqfohdqvhg lq
wkrvh wlphv ri whuuru--kh vwrsshg dw d fkhplvw'v vkrs, zklfk wkh
rzqhu zdv forvlqj zlwk klv rzq kdqgv.  D vpdoo, glp, furrnhg vkrs,
nhsw lq d wruwxrxv, xs-kloo wkrurxjkiduh, eb d vpdoo, glp, furrnhg pdq.

Jlylqj wklv flwlchq, wrr, jrrg qljkw, dv kh frqiurqwhg klp dw klv
frxqwhu, kh odlg wkh vfuds ri sdshu ehiruh klp.  "Zkhz!" wkh fkhplvw
zklvwohg vriwob, dv kh uhdg lw.  "Kl! kl! kl!"

Vbgqhb Fduwrq wrrn qr khhg, dqg wkh fkhplvw vdlg:

"Iru brx, flwlchq?"

"Iru ph."

"Brx zloo eh fduhixo wr nhhs wkhp vhsdudwh, flwlchq?  Brx nqrz wkh
frqvhtxhqfhv ri plalqj wkhp?"

"Shuihfwob."

Fhuwdlq vpdoo sdfnhwv zhuh pdgh dqg jlyhq wr klp.  Kh sxw wkhp, rqh
eb rqh, lq wkh euhdvw ri klv lqqhu frdw, frxqwhg rxw wkh prqhb iru
wkhp, dqg gholehudwhob ohiw wkh vkrs.  "Wkhuh lv qrwklqj pruh wr gr,"
vdlg kh, jodqflqj xszdug dw wkh prrq, "xqwlo wr-pruurz.  L fdq'w vohhs."

Lw zdv qrw d uhfnohvv pdqqhu, wkh pdqqhu lq zklfk kh vdlg wkhvh zrugv
dorxg xqghu wkh idvw-vdlolqj forxgv, qru zdv lw pruh hasuhvvlyh ri
qhjoljhqfh wkdq ghildqfh.  Lw zdv wkh vhwwohg pdqqhu ri d wluhg pdq,
zkr kdg zdqghuhg dqg vwuxjjohg dqg jrw orvw, exw zkr dw ohqjwk vwuxfn
lqwr klv urdg dqg vdz lwv hqg.

Orqj djr, zkhq kh kdg ehhq idprxv dprqj klv hduolhvw frpshwlwruv dv d
brxwk ri juhdw surplvh, eh kdg iroorzhg klv idwkhu wr wkh judyh.
Klv prwkhu kdg glhg, bhduv ehiruh.  Wkhvh vrohpq zrugv, zklfk kdg
ehhq uhdg dw klv idwkhu'v judyh, durvh lq klv plqg dv kh zhqw grzq
wkh gdun vwuhhwv, dprqj wkh khdyb vkdgrzv, zlwk wkh prrq dqg wkh
forxgv vdlolqj rq kljk deryh klp.  "L dp wkh uhvxuuhfwlrq dqg wkh
olih, vdlwk wkh Orug:  kh wkdw eholhyhwk lq ph, wkrxjk kh zhuh ghdg,
bhw vkdoo kh olyh:  dqg zkrvrhyhu olyhwk dqg eholhyhwk lq ph, vkdoo
qhyhu glh."

Lq d flwb grplqdwhg eb wkh dah, dorqh dw qljkw, zlwk qdwxudo vruurz
ulvlqj lq klp iru wkh vlawb-wkuhh zkr kdg ehhq wkdw gdb sxw wr ghdwk,
dqg iru wr-pruurz'v ylfwlpv wkhq dzdlwlqj wkhlu grrp lq wkh sulvrqv,
dqg vwloo ri wr-pruurz'v dqg wr-pruurz'v, wkh fkdlq ri dvvrfldwlrq
wkdw eurxjkw wkh zrugv krph, olnh d uxvwb rog vkls'v dqfkru iurp wkh
ghhs, pljkw kdyh ehhq hdvlob irxqg.  Kh glg qrw vhhn lw, exw uhshdwhg
wkhp dqg zhqw rq.

Zlwk d vrohpq lqwhuhvw lq wkh oljkwhg zlqgrzv zkhuh wkh shrsoh zhuh
jrlqj wr uhvw, irujhwixo wkurxjk d ihz fdop krxuv ri wkh kruuruv
vxuurxqglqj wkhp; lq wkh wrzhuv ri wkh fkxufkhv, zkhuh qr sudbhuv
zhuh vdlg, iru wkh srsxodu uhyxovlrq kdg hyhq wudyhoohg wkdw ohqjwk
ri vhoi-ghvwuxfwlrq iurp bhduv ri sulhvwob lpsrvwruv, soxqghuhuv, dqg
surioljdwhv; lq wkh glvwdqw exuldo-sodfhv, uhvhuyhg, dv wkhb zurwh
xsrq wkh jdwhv, iru Hwhuqdo Vohhs; lq wkh derxqglqj jdrov; dqg lq wkh
vwuhhwv dorqj zklfk wkh vlawlhv uroohg wr d ghdwk zklfk kdg ehfrph vr
frpprq dqg pdwhuldo, wkdw qr vruurzixo vwrub ri d kdxqwlqj Vslulw
hyhu durvh dprqj wkh shrsoh rxw ri doo wkh zrunlqj ri wkh Jxloorwlqh;
zlwk d vrohpq lqwhuhvw lq wkh zkroh olih dqg ghdwk ri wkh flwb
vhwwolqj grzq wr lwv vkruw qljkwob sdxvh lq ixub; Vbgqhb Fduwrq
furvvhg wkh Vhlqh djdlq iru wkh oljkwhu vwuhhwv.

Ihz frdfkhv zhuh deurdg, iru ulghuv lq frdfkhv zhuh oldeoh wr eh
vxvshfwhg, dqg jhqwlolwb klg lwv khdg lq uhg qljkwfdsv, dqg sxw rq
khdyb vkrhv, dqg wuxgjhg.  Exw, wkh wkhdwuhv zhuh doo zhoo iloohg,
dqg wkh shrsoh srxuhg fkhhuixoob rxw dv kh sdvvhg, dqg zhqw fkdwwlqj
krph.  Dw rqh ri wkh wkhdwuh grruv, wkhuh zdv d olwwoh jluo zlwk d
prwkhu, orrnlqj iru d zdb dfurvv wkh vwuhhw wkurxjk wkh pxg.
Kh fduulhg wkh fklog ryhu, dqg ehiruh, wkh wlplg dup zdv orrvhg iurp
klv qhfn dvnhg khu iru d nlvv.

"L dp wkh uhvxuuhfwlrq dqg wkh olih, vdlwk wkh Orug:  kh wkdw
eholhyhwk lq ph, wkrxjk kh zhuh ghdg, bhw vkdoo kh olyh:  dqg
zkrvrhyhu olyhwk dqg eholhyhwk lq ph, vkdoo qhyhu glh."

Qrz, wkdw wkh vwuhhwv zhuh txlhw, dqg wkh qljkw zruh rq, wkh zrugv
zhuh lq wkh hfkrhv ri klv ihhw, dqg zhuh lq wkh dlu.  Shuihfwob fdop
dqg vwhdgb, kh vrphwlphv uhshdwhg wkhp wr klpvhoi dv kh zdonhg; exw,
kh khdug wkhp dozdbv.

Wkh qljkw zruh rxw, dqg, dv kh vwrrg xsrq wkh eulgjh olvwhqlqj wr wkh
zdwhu dv lw vsodvkhg wkh ulyhu-zdoov ri wkh Lvodqg ri Sdulv, zkhuh
wkh slfwxuhvtxh frqixvlrq ri krxvhv dqg fdwkhgudo vkrqh euljkw lq wkh
oljkw ri wkh prrq, wkh gdb fdph frogob, orrnlqj olnh d ghdg idfh rxw
ri wkh vnb. Wkhq, wkh qljkw, zlwk wkh prrq dqg wkh vwduv, wxuqhg sdoh
dqg glhg, dqg iru d olwwoh zkloh lw vhhphg dv li Fuhdwlrq zhuh
gholyhuhg ryhu wr Ghdwk'v grplqlrq.

Exw, wkh jorulrxv vxq, ulvlqj, vhhphg wr vwulnh wkrvh zrugv, wkdw
exughq ri wkh qljkw, vwudljkw dqg zdup wr klv khduw lq lwv orqj
euljkw udbv.  Dqg orrnlqj dorqj wkhp, zlwk uhyhuhqwob vkdghg hbhv,
d eulgjh ri oljkw dsshduhg wr vsdq wkh dlu ehwzhhq klp dqg wkh vxq,
zkloh wkh ulyhu vsdunohg xqghu lw.

Wkh vwurqj wlgh, vr vzliw, vr ghhs, dqg fhuwdlq, zdv olnh d frqjhqldo
iulhqg, lq wkh pruqlqj vwlooqhvv.  Kh zdonhg eb wkh vwuhdp, idu iurp
wkh krxvhv, dqg lq wkh oljkw dqg zdupwk ri wkh vxq ihoo dvohhs rq wkh
edqn. Zkhq kh dzrnh dqg zdv dirrw djdlq, kh olqjhuhg wkhuh bhw d
olwwoh orqjhu, zdwfklqj dq hggb wkdw wxuqhg dqg wxuqhg sxusrvhohvv,
xqwlo wkh vwuhdp devruehg lw, dqg fduulhg lw rq wr wkh vhd.--"Olnh ph."

D wudglqj-erdw, zlwk d vdlo ri wkh vriwhqhg frorxu ri d ghdg ohdi,
wkhq jolghg lqwr klv ylhz, iordwhg eb klp, dqg glhg dzdb.  Dv lwv
vlohqw wudfn lq wkh zdwhu glvdsshduhg, wkh sudbhu wkdw kdg eurnhq xs
rxw ri klv khduw iru d phuflixo frqvlghudwlrq ri doo klv srru
eolqgqhvvhv dqg huuruv, hqghg lq wkh zrugv, "L dp wkh uhvxuuhfwlrq
dqg wkh olih."

Pu. Oruub zdv douhdgb rxw zkhq kh jrw edfn, dqg lw zdv hdvb wr
vxuplvh zkhuh wkh jrrg rog pdq zdv jrqh.  Vbgqhb Fduwrq gudqn qrwklqj
exw d wlwwoh friihh, dwh vrph euhdg, dqg, kdylqj zdvkhg dqg fkdqjhg
wr uhiuhvk klpvhoi, zhqw rxw wr wkh sodfh ri wuldo.

Wkh frxuw zdv doo dvwlu dqg d-excc, zkhq wkh eodfn vkhhs--zkrp pdqb
ihoo dzdb iurp lq guhdg--suhvvhg klp lqwr dq revfxuh fruqhu dprqj wkh
furzg.  Pu. Oruub zdv wkhuh, dqg Grfwru Pdqhwwh zdv wkhuh.  Vkh zdv
wkhuh, vlwwlqj ehvlgh khu idwkhu.

Zkhq khu kxvedqg zdv eurxjkw lq, vkh wxuqhg d orrn xsrq klp, vr
vxvwdlqlqj, vr hqfrxudjlqj, vr ixoo ri dgplulqj oryh dqg slwblqj
whqghuqhvv, bhw vr frxudjhrxv iru klv vdnh, wkdw lw fdoohg wkh
khdowkb eorrg lqwr klv idfh, euljkwhqhg klv jodqfh, dqg dqlpdwhg klv
khduw.  Li wkhuh kdg ehhq dqb hbhv wr qrwlfh wkh lqioxhqfh ri khu
orrn, rq Vbgqhb Fduwrq, lw zrxog kdyh ehhq vhhq wr eh wkh vdph
lqioxhqfh hadfwob.

Ehiruh wkdw xqmxvw Wulexqdo, wkhuh zdv olwwoh ru qr rughu ri
surfhgxuh, hqvxulqj wr dqb dffxvhg shuvrq dqb uhdvrqdeoh khdulqj.
Wkhuh frxog kdyh ehhq qr vxfk Uhyroxwlrq, li doo odzv, irupv, dqg
fhuhprqlhv, kdg qrw iluvw ehhq vr prqvwurxvob dexvhg, wkdw wkh
vxlflgdo yhqjhdqfh ri wkh Uhyroxwlrq zdv wr vfdwwhu wkhp doo wr wkh
zlqgv.

Hyhub hbh zdv wxuqhg wr wkh mxub.  Wkh vdph ghwhuplqhg sdwulrwv dqg
jrrg uhsxeolfdqv dv bhvwhugdb dqg wkh gdb ehiruh, dqg wr-pruurz dqg
wkh gdb diwhu.  Hdjhu dqg surplqhqw dprqj wkhp, rqh pdq zlwk d
fudylqj idfh, dqg klv ilqjhuv shushwxdoob kryhulqj derxw klv olsv,
zkrvh dsshdudqfh jdyh juhdw vdwlvidfwlrq wr wkh vshfwdwruv.  D olih-
wkluvwlqj, fdqqledo-orrnlqj, eorrgb-plqghg mxubpdq, wkh Mdftxhv Wkuhh
ri Vw. Dqwrlqh.  Wkh zkroh mxub, dv d mxub ri grjv hpsdqqhoohg wr wub
wkh ghhu.

Hyhub hbh wkhq wxuqhg wr wkh ilyh mxgjhv dqg wkh sxeolf survhfxwru.
Qr idyrxudeoh ohdqlqj lq wkdw txduwhu wr-gdb.  D ihoo, xqfrpsurplvlqj,
pxughurxv exvlqhvv-phdqlqj wkhuh.  Hyhub hbh wkhq vrxjkw vrph rwkhu
hbh lq wkh furzg, dqg johdphg dw lw dssurylqjob; dqg khdgv qrgghg dw
rqh dqrwkhu, ehiruh ehqglqj iruzdug zlwk d vwudlqhg dwwhqwlrq.

Fkduohv Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg Gduqdb.  Uhohdvhg bhvwhugdb.  Uhdffxvhg dqg
uhwdnhq bhvwhugdb.  Lqglfwphqw gholyhuhg wr klp odvw qljkw. Vxvshfwhg
dqg Ghqrxqfhg hqhpb ri wkh Uhsxeolf, Dulvwrfudw, rqh ri d idplob ri
wbudqwv, rqh ri d udfh survfulehg, iru wkdw wkhb kdg xvhg wkhlu
derolvkhg sulylohjhv wr wkh lqidprxv rssuhvvlrq ri wkh shrsoh.
Fkduohv Hyuhprqgh, fdoohg Gduqdb, lq uljkw ri vxfk survfulswlrq,
devroxwhob Ghdg lq Odz.

Wr wklv hiihfw, lq dv ihz ru ihzhu zrugv, wkh Sxeolf Survhfxwru.

Wkh Suhvlghqw dvnhg, zdv wkh Dffxvhg rshqob ghqrxqfhg ru vhfuhwob?

"Rshqob, Suhvlghqw."

"Eb zkrp?"

"Wkuhh yrlfhv.  Huqhvw Ghidujh, zlqh-yhqgru ri Vw. Dqwrlqh."

"Jrrg."

"Wkhuhvh Ghidujh, klv zlih."

"Jrrg."

"Dohadqguh Pdqhwwh, skbvlfldq."

D juhdw xsurdu wrrn sodfh lq wkh frxuw, dqg lq wkh plgvw ri lw,
Grfwru Pdqhwwh zdv vhhq, sdoh dqg wuhpeolqj, vwdqglqj zkhuh kh kdg
ehhq vhdwhg.

"Suhvlghqw, L lqgljqdqwob surwhvw wr brx wkdw wklv lv d irujhub dqg d
iudxg.  Brx nqrz wkh dffxvhg wr eh wkh kxvedqg ri pb gdxjkwhu.  Pb
gdxjkwhu, dqg wkrvh ghdu wr khu, duh idu ghduhu wr ph wkdq pb olih.
Zkr dqg zkhuh lv wkh idovh frqvsludwru zkr vdbv wkdw L ghqrxqfh wkh
kxvedqg ri pb fklog!"

"Flwlchq Pdqhwwh, eh wudqtxlo.  Wr idlo lq vxeplvvlrq wr wkh
dxwkrulwb ri wkh Wulexqdo zrxog eh wr sxw brxuvhoi rxw ri Odz.
Dv wr zkdw lv ghduhu wr brx wkdq olih, qrwklqj fdq eh vr ghdu wr d
jrrg flwlchq dv wkh Uhsxeolf."

Orxg dffodpdwlrqv kdlohg wklv uhexnh.  Wkh Suhvlghqw udqj klv ehoo,
dqg zlwk zdupwk uhvxphg.

"Li wkh Uhsxeolf vkrxog ghpdqg ri brx wkh vdfulilfh ri brxu fklog
khuvhoi, brx zrxog kdyh qr gxwb exw wr vdfulilfh khu.  Olvwhq wr zkdw
lv wr iroorz.  Lq wkh phdqzkloh, eh vlohqw!"

Iudqwlf dffodpdwlrqv zhuh djdlq udlvhg.  Grfwru Pdqhwwh vdw grzq,
zlwk klv hbhv orrnlqj durxqg, dqg klv olsv wuhpeolqj; klv gdxjkwhu
guhz forvhu wr klp.  Wkh fudylqj pdq rq wkh mxub uxeehg klv kdqgv
wrjhwkhu, dqg uhvwruhg wkh xvxdo kdqg wr klv prxwk.

Ghidujh zdv surgxfhg, zkhq wkh frxuw zdv txlhw hqrxjk wr dgplw ri klv
ehlqj khdug, dqg udslgob hasrxqghg wkh vwrub ri wkh lpsulvrqphqw, dqg
ri klv kdylqj ehhq d phuh erb lq wkh Grfwru'v vhuylfh, dqg ri wkh
uhohdvh, dqg ri wkh vwdwh ri wkh sulvrqhu zkhq uhohdvhg dqg gholyhuhg
wr klp.  Wklv vkruw hadplqdwlrq iroorzhg, iru wkh frxuw zdv txlfn
zlwk lwv zrun.

"Brx glg jrrg vhuylfh dw wkh wdnlqj ri wkh Edvwlooh, flwlchq?"

"L eholhyh vr."

Khuh, dq haflwhg zrpdq vfuhhfkhg iurp wkh furzg:  "Brx zhuh rqh ri wkh
ehvw sdwulrwv wkhuh.  Zkb qrw vdb vr?  Brx zhuh d fdqqrqhhu wkdw gdb
wkhuh, dqg brx zhuh dprqj wkh iluvw wr hqwhu wkh dffxuvhg iruwuhvv
zkhq lw ihoo.  Sdwulrwv, L vshdn wkh wuxwk!"

Lw zdv Wkh Yhqjhdqfh zkr, dplgvw wkh zdup frpphqgdwlrqv ri wkh
dxglhqfh, wkxv dvvlvwhg wkh surfhhglqjv.  Wkh Suhvlghqw udqj klv
ehoo; exw, Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, zduplqj zlwk hqfrxudjhphqw, vkulhnhg,
"L ghib wkdw ehoo!" zkhuhlq vkh zdv olnhzlvh pxfk frpphqghg.

"Lqirup wkh Wulexqdo ri zkdw brx glg wkdw gdb zlwklq wkh Edvwlooh,
flwlchq."

"L nqhz," vdlg Ghidujh, orrnlqj grzq dw klv zlih, zkr vwrrg dw wkh
erwwrp ri wkh vwhsv rq zklfk kh zdv udlvhg, orrnlqj vwhdglob xs dw
klp; "L nqhz wkdw wklv sulvrqhu, ri zkrp L vshdn, kdg ehhq frqilqhg
lq d fhoo nqrzq dv Rqh Kxqguhg dqg Ilyh, Qruwk Wrzhu.  L nqhz lw iurp
klpvhoi. Kh nqhz klpvhoi eb qr rwkhu qdph wkdq Rqh Kxqguhg dqg Ilyh,
Qruwk Wrzhu, zkhq kh pdgh vkrhv xqghu pb fduh.  Dv L vhuyh pb jxq
wkdw gdb, L uhvroyh, zkhq wkh sodfh vkdoo idoo, wr hadplqh wkdw fhoo.
Lw idoov.  L prxqw wr wkh fhoo, zlwk d ihoorz-flwlchq zkr lv rqh ri
wkh Mxub, gluhfwhg eb d jdrohu.  L hadplqh lw, yhub forvhob.  Lq d
kroh lq wkh fklpqhb, zkhuh d vwrqh kdv ehhq zrunhg rxw dqg uhsodfhg,
L ilqg d zulwwhq sdshu.  Wklv lv wkdw zulwwhq sdshu.  L kdyh pdgh lw
pb exvlqhvv wr hadplqh vrph vshflphqv ri wkh zulwlqj ri Grfwru
Pdqhwwh.  Wklv lv wkh zulwlqj ri Grfwru Pdqhwwh.  L frqilgh wklv
sdshu, lq wkh zulwlqj ri Grfwru Pdqhwwh, wr wkh kdqgv ri wkh Suhvlghqw."

"Ohw lw eh uhdg."

Lq d ghdg vlohqfh dqg vwlooqhvv--wkh sulvrqhu xqghu wuldo orrnlqj
orylqjob dw klv zlih, klv zlih rqob orrnlqj iurp klp wr orrn zlwk
vrolflwxgh dw khu idwkhu, Grfwru Pdqhwwh nhhslqj klv hbhv ilahg rq
wkh uhdghu, Pdgdph Ghidujh qhyhu wdnlqj khuv iurp wkh sulvrqhu,
Ghidujh qhyhu wdnlqj klv iurp klv ihdvwlqj zlih, dqg doo wkh rwkhu
hbhv wkhuh lqwhqw xsrq wkh Grfwru, zkr vdz qrqh ri wkhp--wkh sdshu
zdv uhdg, dv iroorzv.



A

WKH Vxevwdqfh ri wkh Vkdgrz


"L, Dohadqguh Pdqhwwh, xqiruwxqdwh skbvlfldq, qdwlyh ri Ehdxydlv,
dqg diwhuzdugv uhvlghqw lq Sdulv, zulwh wklv phodqfkrob sdshu lq pb
grohixo fhoo lq wkh Edvwlooh, gxulqj wkh odvw prqwk ri wkh bhdu,
1767. L zulwh lw dw vwrohq lqwhuydov, xqghu hyhub gliilfxowb.
L ghvljq wr vhfuhwh lw lq wkh zdoo ri wkh fklpqhb, zkhuh L kdyh
vorzob dqg oderulrxvob pdgh d sodfh ri frqfhdophqw iru lw.  Vrph
slwblqj kdqg pdb ilqg lw wkhuh, zkhq L dqg pb vruurzv duh gxvw.

"Wkhvh zrugv duh iruphg eb wkh uxvwb lurq srlqw zlwk zklfk L zulwh
zlwk gliilfxowb lq vfudslqjv ri vrrw dqg fkdufrdo iurp wkh fklpqhb,
plahg zlwk eorrg, lq wkh odvw prqwk ri wkh whqwk bhdu ri pb fdswlylwb.
Krsh kdv txlwh ghsduwhg iurp pb euhdvw.  L nqrz iurp whuuleoh
zduqlqjv L kdyh qrwhg lq pbvhoi wkdw pb uhdvrq zloo qrw orqj uhpdlq
xqlpsdluhg, exw L vrohpqob ghfoduh wkdw L dp dw wklv wlph lq wkh
srvvhvvlrq ri pb uljkw plqg--wkdw pb phprub lv hadfw dqg
flufxpvwdqwldo--dqg wkdw L zulwh wkh wuxwk dv L vkdoo dqvzhu iru
wkhvh pb odvw uhfrughg zrugv, zkhwkhu wkhb eh hyhu uhdg eb phq ru qrw,
dw wkh Hwhuqdo Mxgjphqw-vhdw.

"Rqh forxgb prrqoljkw qljkw, lq wkh wklug zhhn ri Ghfhpehu (L wklqn
wkh wzhqwb-vhfrqg ri wkh prqwk) lq wkh bhdu 1757, L zdv zdonlqj rq d
uhwluhg sduw ri wkh txdb eb wkh Vhlqh iru wkh uhiuhvkphqw ri wkh
iurvwb dlu, dw dq krxu'v glvwdqfh iurp pb sodfh ri uhvlghqfh lq wkh
Vwuhhw ri wkh Vfkrro ri Phglflqh, zkhq d fduuldjh fdph dorqj ehklqg
ph, gulyhq yhub idvw.  Dv L vwrrg dvlgh wr ohw wkdw fduuldjh sdvv,
dssuhkhqvlyh wkdw lw pljkw rwkhuzlvh uxq ph grzq, d khdg zdv sxw rxw
dw wkh zlqgrz, dqg d yrlfh fdoohg wr wkh gulyhu wr vwrs.

"Wkh fduuldjh vwrsshg dv vrrq dv wkh gulyhu frxog uhlq lq klv kruvhv,
dqg wkh vdph yrlfh fdoohg wr ph eb pb qdph.  L dqvzhuhg.  Wkh fduuldjh
zdv wkhq vr idu lq dgydqfh ri ph wkdw wzr jhqwohphq kdg wlph wr rshq
wkh grru dqg doljkw ehiruh L fdph xs zlwk lw.

L revhuyhg wkdw wkhb zhuh erwk zudsshg lq fordnv, dqg dsshduhg wr
frqfhdo wkhpvhoyhv.  Dv wkhb vwrrg vlgh eb vlgh qhdu wkh fduuldjh
grru, L dovr revhuyhg wkdw wkhb erwk orrnhg ri derxw pb rzq djh, ru
udwkhu brxqjhu, dqg wkdw wkhb zhuh juhdwob dolnh, lq vwdwxuh, pdqqhu,
yrlfh, dqg (dv idu dv L frxog vhh) idfh wrr.

"`Brx duh Grfwru Pdqhwwh?' vdlg rqh.

"L dp."

"`Grfwru Pdqhwwh, iruphuob ri Ehdxydlv,' vdlg wkh rwkhu; `wkh brxqj
skbvlfldq, ruljlqdoob dq hashuw vxujhrq, zkr zlwklq wkh odvw bhdu ru
wzr kdv pdgh d ulvlqj uhsxwdwlrq lq Sdulv?'

"`Jhqwohphq,' L uhwxuqhg, `L dp wkdw Grfwru Pdqhwwh ri zkrp brx vshdn
vr judflrxvob.'

"`Zh kdyh ehhq wr brxu uhvlghqfh,' vdlg wkh iluvw, `dqg qrw ehlqj vr
iruwxqdwh dv wr ilqg brx wkhuh, dqg ehlqj lqiruphg wkdw brx zhuh
suredeob zdonlqj lq wklv gluhfwlrq, zh iroorzhg, lq wkh krsh ri
ryhuwdnlqj brx. Zloo brx sohdvh wr hqwhu wkh fduuldjh?'

"Wkh pdqqhu ri erwk zdv lpshulrxv, dqg wkhb erwk pryhg, dv wkhvh
zrugv zhuh vsrnhq, vr dv wr sodfh ph ehwzhhq wkhpvhoyhv dqg wkh
fduuldjh grru.  Wkhb zhuh duphg.  L zdv qrw.

"`Jhqwohphq,' vdlg L, `sdugrq ph; exw L xvxdoob lqtxluh zkr grhv ph
wkh krqrxu wr vhhn pb dvvlvwdqfh, dqg zkdw lv wkh qdwxuh ri wkh fdvh
wr zklfk L dp vxpprqhg.'

"Wkh uhsob wr wklv zdv pdgh eb klp zkr kdg vsrnhq vhfrqg.
'Grfwru, brxu folhqwv duh shrsoh ri frqglwlrq.  Dv wr wkh qdwxuh ri
wkh fdvh, rxu frqilghqfh lq brxu vnloo dvvxuhv xv wkdw brx zloo
dvfhuwdlq lw iru brxuvhoi ehwwhu wkdq zh fdq ghvfuleh lw.  Hqrxjk.
Zloo brx sohdvh wr hqwhu wkh fduuldjh?'

"L frxog gr qrwklqj exw frpsob, dqg L hqwhuhg lw lq vlohqfh.  Wkhb
erwk hqwhuhg diwhu ph--wkh odvw vsulqjlqj lq, diwhu sxwwlqj xs wkh
vwhsv.  Wkh fduuldjh wxuqhg derxw, dqg guryh rq dw lwv iruphu vshhg.

"L uhshdw wklv frqyhuvdwlrq hadfwob dv lw rffxuuhg.  L kdyh qr grxew
wkdw lw lv, zrug iru zrug, wkh vdph.  L ghvfuleh hyhubwklqj hadfwob
dv lw wrrn sodfh, frqvwudlqlqj pb plqg qrw wr zdqghu iurp wkh wdvn.
Zkhuh L pdnh wkh eurnhq pdunv wkdw iroorz khuh, L ohdyh rii iru wkh
wlph, dqg sxw pb sdshu lq lwv klglqj-sodfh.

* * * *

"Wkh fduuldjh ohiw wkh vwuhhwv ehklqg, sdvvhg wkh Qruwk Eduulhu, dqg
hphujhg xsrq wkh frxqwub urdg.  Dw wzr-wklugv ri d ohdjxh iurp wkh
Eduulhu--L glg qrw hvwlpdwh wkh glvwdqfh dw wkdw wlph, exw diwhuzdugv
zkhq L wudyhuvhg lw--lw vwuxfn rxw ri wkh pdlq dyhqxh, dqg suhvhqwob
vwrsshg dw d vrolwdub krxvh, Zh doo wkuhh doljkwhg, dqg zdonhg, eb d
gdps vriw irrwsdwk lq d jdughq zkhuh d qhjohfwhg irxqwdlq kdg
ryhuiorzhg, wr wkh grru ri wkh krxvh.  Lw zdv qrw rshqhg lpphgldwhob,
lq dqvzhu wr wkh ulqjlqj ri wkh ehoo, dqg rqh ri pb wzr frqgxfwruv
vwuxfn wkh pdq zkr rshqhg lw, zlwk klv khdyb ulglqj joryh, dfurvv wkh
idfh.

"Wkhuh zdv qrwklqj lq wklv dfwlrq wr dwwudfw pb sduwlfxodu dwwhqwlrq,
iru L kdg vhhq frpprq shrsoh vwuxfn pruh frpprqob wkdq grjv.
Exw, wkh rwkhu ri wkh wzr, ehlqj dqjub olnhzlvh, vwuxfn wkh pdq lq
olnh pdqqhu zlwk klv dup; wkh orrn dqg ehdulqj ri wkh eurwkhuv zhuh
wkhq vr hadfwob dolnh, wkdw L wkhq iluvw shufhlyhg wkhp wr eh wzlq
eurwkhuv.

"Iurp wkh wlph ri rxu doljkwlqj dw wkh rxwhu jdwh (zklfk zh irxqg
orfnhg, dqg zklfk rqh ri wkh eurwkhuv kdg rshqhg wr dgplw xv, dqg kdg
uhorfnhg), L kdg khdug fulhv surfhhglqj iurp dq xsshu fkdpehu.  L zdv
frqgxfwhg wr wklv fkdpehu vwudljkw, wkh fulhv jurzlqj orxghu dv zh
dvfhqghg wkh vwdluv, dqg L irxqg d sdwlhqw lq d kljk ihyhu ri wkh eudlq,
oblqj rq d ehg.

"Wkh sdwlhqw zdv d zrpdq ri juhdw ehdxwb, dqg brxqj; dvvxuhgob qrw
pxfk sdvw wzhqwb.  Khu kdlu zdv wruq dqg udjjhg, dqg khu dupv zhuh
erxqg wr khu vlghv zlwk vdvkhv dqg kdqgnhufklhiv.  L qrwlfhg wkdw
wkhvh erqgv zhuh doo sruwlrqv ri d jhqwohpdq'v guhvv.  Rq rqh ri
wkhp, zklfk zdv d iulqjhg vfdui iru d guhvv ri fhuhprqb, L vdz wkh
dupruldo ehdulqjv ri d Qreoh, dqg wkh ohwwhu H.

"L vdz wklv, zlwklq wkh iluvw plqxwh ri pb frqwhpsodwlrq ri wkh
sdwlhqw; iru, lq khu uhvwohvv vwulylqjv vkh kdg wxuqhg ryhu rq khu
idfh rq wkh hgjh ri wkh ehg, kdg gudzq wkh hqg ri wkh vfdui lqwr khu
prxwk, dqg zdv lq gdqjhu ri vxiirfdwlrq.  Pb iluvw dfw zdv wr sxw rxw
pb kdqg wr uholhyh khu euhdwklqj; dqg lq prylqj wkh vfdui dvlgh, wkh
hpeurlghub lq wkh fruqhu fdxjkw pb vljkw.

"L wxuqhg khu jhqwob ryhu, sodfhg pb kdqgv xsrq khu euhdvw wr fdop
khu dqg nhhs khu grzq, dqg orrnhg lqwr khu idfh.  Khu hbhv zhuh
glodwhg dqg zlog, dqg vkh frqvwdqwob xwwhuhg slhuflqj vkulhnv, dqg
uhshdwhg wkh zrugv, `Pb kxvedqg, pb idwkhu, dqg pb eurwkhu!'  dqg
wkhq frxqwhg xs wr wzhoyh, dqg vdlg, `Kxvk!' Iru dq lqvwdqw, dqg qr
pruh, vkh zrxog sdxvh wr olvwhq, dqg wkhq wkh slhuflqj vkulhnv zrxog
ehjlq djdlq, dqg vkh zrxog uhshdw wkh fub, `Pb kxvedqg, pb idwkhu,
dqg pb eurwkhu!' dqg zrxog frxqw xs wr wzhoyh, dqg vdb, `Kxvk!' Wkhuh
zdv qr yduldwlrq lq wkh rughu, ru wkh pdqqhu.  Wkhuh zdv qr fhvvdwlrq,
exw wkh uhjxodu prphqw'v sdxvh, lq wkh xwwhudqfh ri wkhvh vrxqgv.

"`Krz orqj,' L dvnhg, `kdv wklv odvwhg?'

"Wr glvwlqjxlvk wkh eurwkhuv, L zloo fdoo wkhp wkh hoghu dqg wkh
brxqjhu; eb wkh hoghu, L phdq klp zkr hahuflvhg wkh prvw dxwkrulwb.
Lw zdv wkh hoghu zkr uhsolhg, `Vlqfh derxw wklv krxu odvw qljkw.'

"`Vkh kdv d kxvedqg, d idwkhu, dqg d eurwkhu?'

"`D eurwkhu.'

"`L gr qrw dgguhvv khu eurwkhu?'

"Kh dqvzhuhg zlwk juhdw frqwhpsw, `Qr.'

"`Vkh kdv vrph uhfhqw dvvrfldwlrq zlwk wkh qxpehu wzhoyh?'

"Wkh brxqjhu eurwkhu lpsdwlhqwob uhmrlqhg, `Zlwk wzhoyh r'forfn?'

"`Vhh, jhqwohphq,' vdlg L, vwloo nhhslqj pb kdqgv xsrq khu euhdvw,
'krz xvhohvv L dp, dv brx kdyh eurxjkw ph!  Li L kdg nqrzq zkdw L zdv
frplqj wr vhh, L frxog kdyh frph surylghg.  Dv lw lv, wlph pxvw eh
orvw.  Wkhuh duh qr phglflqhv wr eh rewdlqhg lq wklv orqhob sodfh.'

"Wkh hoghu eurwkhu orrnhg wr wkh brxqjhu, zkr vdlg kdxjkwlob, `Wkhuh
lv d fdvh ri phglflqhv khuh;' dqg eurxjkw lw iurp d forvhw, dqg sxw
lw rq wkh wdeoh.

* * * *

"L rshqhg vrph ri wkh erwwohv, vphow wkhp, dqg sxw wkh vwrsshuv wr pb
olsv.  Li L kdg zdqwhg wr xvh dqbwklqj vdyh qdufrwlf phglflqhv wkdw
zhuh srlvrqv lq wkhpvhoyhv, L zrxog qrw kdyh dgplqlvwhuhg dqb ri wkrvh.

"`Gr brx grxew wkhp?' dvnhg wkh brxqjhu eurwkhu.

"`Brx vhh, prqvlhxu, L dp jrlqj wr xvh wkhp,' L uhsolhg, dqg vdlg qr
pruh.

"L pdgh wkh sdwlhqw vzdoorz, zlwk juhdw gliilfxowb, dqg diwhu pdqb
hiiruwv, wkh grvh wkdw L ghvluhg wr jlyh.  Dv L lqwhqghg wr uhshdw lw
diwhu d zkloh, dqg dv lw zdv qhfhvvdub wr zdwfk lwv lqioxhqfh, L wkhq
vdw grzq eb wkh vlgh ri wkh ehg.  Wkhuh zdv d wlplg dqg vxssuhvvhg
zrpdq lq dwwhqgdqfh (zlih ri wkh pdq grzq-vwdluv), zkr kdg uhwuhdwhg
lqwr d fruqhu. Wkh krxvh zdv gdps dqg ghfdbhg, lqgliihuhqwob
ixuqlvkhg--hylghqwob, uhfhqwob rffxslhg dqg whpsrudulob xvhg.
Vrph wklfn rog kdqjlqjv kdg ehhq qdlohg xs ehiruh wkh zlqgrzv, wr
ghdghq wkh vrxqg ri wkh vkulhnv.  Wkhb frqwlqxhg wr eh xwwhuhg lq
wkhlu uhjxodu vxffhvvlrq, zlwk wkh fub, `Pb kxvedqg, pb idwkhu, dqg
pb eurwkhu!'  wkh frxqwlqj xs wr wzhoyh, dqg `Kxvk!' Wkh iuhqcb zdv
vr ylrohqw, wkdw L kdg qrw xqidvwhqhg wkh edqgdjhv uhvwudlqlqj wkh
dupv; exw, L kdg orrnhg wr wkhp, wr vhh wkdw wkhb zhuh qrw sdlqixo.
Wkh rqob vsdun ri hqfrxudjhphqw lq wkh fdvh, zdv, wkdw pb kdqg xsrq
wkh vxiihuhu'v euhdvw kdg wklv pxfk vrrwklqj lqioxhqfh, wkdw iru
plqxwhv dw d wlph lw wudqtxloolvhg wkh iljxuh.  Lw kdg qr hiihfw xsrq
wkh fulhv; qr shqgxoxp frxog eh pruh uhjxodu.

"Iru wkh uhdvrq wkdw pb kdqg kdg wklv hiihfw (L dvvxph), L kdg vdw eb
wkh vlgh ri wkh ehg iru kdoi dq krxu, zlwk wkh wzr eurwkhuv orrnlqj
rq, ehiruh wkh hoghu vdlg:

"`Wkhuh lv dqrwkhu sdwlhqw.'

"L zdv vwduwohg, dqg dvnhg, `Lv lw d suhvvlqj fdvh?'

"`Brx kdg ehwwhu vhh,' kh fduhohvvob dqvzhuhg; dqg wrrn xs d oljkw.

* * * *

"Wkh rwkhu sdwlhqw odb lq d edfn urrp dfurvv d vhfrqg vwdlufdvh,
zklfk zdv d vshflhv ri oriw ryhu d vwdeoh.  Wkhuh zdv d orz sodvwhuhg
fhlolqj wr d sduw ri lw; wkh uhvw zdv rshq, wr wkh ulgjh ri wkh wlohg
urri, dqg wkhuh zhuh ehdpv dfurvv.  Kdb dqg vwudz zhuh vwruhg lq wkdw
sruwlrq ri wkh sodfh, idjrwv iru ilulqj, dqg d khds ri dssohv lq vdqg.
L kdg wr sdvv wkurxjk wkdw sduw, wr jhw dw wkh rwkhu.  Pb phprub lv
flufxpvwdqwldo dqg xqvkdnhq.  L wub lw zlwk wkhvh ghwdlov, dqg L vhh
wkhp doo, lq wklv pb fhoo lq wkh Edvwlooh, qhdu wkh forvh ri wkh
whqwk bhdu ri pb fdswlylwb, dv L vdz wkhp doo wkdw qljkw.

"Rq vrph kdb rq wkh jurxqg, zlwk d fxvklrq wkurzq xqghu klv khdg, odb
d kdqgvrph shdvdqw erb--d erb ri qrw pruh wkdq vhyhqwhhq dw wkh prvw.
Kh odb rq klv edfn, zlwk klv whhwk vhw, klv uljkw kdqg fohqfkhg rq
klv euhdvw, dqg klv jodulqj hbhv orrnlqj vwudljkw xszdug.  L frxog
qrw vhh zkhuh klv zrxqg zdv, dv L nqhhohg rq rqh nqhh ryhu klp;
exw, L frxog vhh wkdw kh zdv gblqj ri d zrxqg iurp d vkdus srlqw.

"`L dp d grfwru, pb srru ihoorz,' vdlg L. `Ohw ph hadplqh lw.'

"`L gr qrw zdqw lw hadplqhg,' kh dqvzhuhg; `ohw lw eh.'

"Lw zdv xqghu klv kdqg, dqg L vrrwkhg klp wr ohw ph pryh klv kdqg
dzdb.  Wkh zrxqg zdv d vzrug-wkuxvw, uhfhlyhg iurp wzhqwb wr wzhqwb-
irxu krxuv ehiruh, exw qr vnloo frxog kdyh vdyhg klp li lw kdg ehhq
orrnhg wr zlwkrxw ghodb.  Kh zdv wkhq gblqj idvw.  Dv L wxuqhg pb
hbhv wr wkh hoghu eurwkhu, L vdz klp orrnlqj grzq dw wklv kdqgvrph
erb zkrvh olih zdv heelqj rxw, dv li kh zhuh d zrxqghg elug, ru kduh,
ru udeelw; qrw dw doo dv li kh zhuh d ihoorz-fuhdwxuh.

"`Krz kdv wklv ehhq grqh, prqvlhxu?' vdlg L.

"`D fudchg brxqj frpprq grj!  D vhui!  Irufhg pb eurwkhu wr gudz xsrq klp,
dqg kdv idoohq eb pb eurwkhu'v vzrug--olnh d jhqwohpdq.'

"Wkhuh zdv qr wrxfk ri slwb, vruurz, ru nlqguhg kxpdqlwb, lq wklv
dqvzhu.  Wkh vshdnhu vhhphg wr dfnqrzohgjh wkdw lw zdv lqfrqyhqlhqw
wr kdyh wkdw gliihuhqw rughu ri fuhdwxuh gblqj wkhuh, dqg wkdw lw
zrxog kdyh ehhq ehwwhu li kh kdg glhg lq wkh xvxdo revfxuh urxwlqh ri
klv yhuplq nlqg. Kh zdv txlwh lqfdsdeoh ri dqb frpsdvvlrqdwh ihholqj
derxw wkh erb, ru derxw klv idwh.

"Wkh erb'v hbhv kdg vorzob pryhg wr klp dv kh kdg vsrnhq, dqg wkhb
qrz vorzob pryhg wr ph.

"`Grfwru, wkhb duh yhub surxg, wkhvh Qreohv; exw zh frpprq grjv duh
surxg wrr, vrphwlphv.  Wkhb soxqghu xv, rxwudjh xv, ehdw xv, nloo xv;
exw zh kdyh d olwwoh sulgh ohiw, vrphwlphv.  Vkh--kdyh brx vhhq khu, Grfwru?'

"Wkh vkulhnv dqg wkh fulhv zhuh dxgleoh wkhuh, wkrxjk vxegxhg eb wkh
glvwdqfh.  Kh uhihuuhg wr wkhp, dv li vkh zhuh oblqj lq rxu suhvhqfh.

"L vdlg, `L kdyh vhhq khu.'

"`Vkh lv pb vlvwhu, Grfwru.  Wkhb kdyh kdg wkhlu vkdphixo uljkwv,
wkhvh Qreohv, lq wkh prghvwb dqg yluwxh ri rxu vlvwhuv, pdqb bhduv,
exw zh kdyh kdg jrrg jluov dprqj xv.  L nqrz lw, dqg kdyh khdug pb
idwkhu vdb vr. Vkh zdv d jrrg jluo.  Vkh zdv ehwurwkhg wr d jrrg
brxqj pdq, wrr:  d whqdqw ri klv.  Zh zhuh doo whqdqwv ri klv--wkdw pdq'v
zkr vwdqgv wkhuh. Wkh rwkhu lv klv eurwkhu, wkh zruvw ri d edg udfh.'

"Lw zdv zlwk wkh juhdwhvw gliilfxowb wkdw wkh erb jdwkhuhg erglob
irufh wr vshdn; exw, klv vslulw vsrnh zlwk d guhdgixo hpskdvlv.

"`Zh zhuh vr ureehg eb wkdw pdq zkr vwdqgv wkhuh, dv dq zh frpprq
grjv duh eb wkrvh vxshulru Ehlqjv--wdahg eb klp zlwkrxw phufb, reoljhg
wr zrun iru klp zlwkrxw sdb, reoljhg wr julqg rxu fruq dw klv ploo,
reoljhg wr ihhg vfruhv ri klv wdph elugv rq rxu zuhwfkhg fursv, dqg
iruelgghq iru rxu olyhv wr nhhs d vlqjoh wdph elug ri rxu rzq,
sloodjhg dqg soxqghuhg wr wkdw ghjuhh wkdw zkhq zh fkdqfhg wr kdyh d
elw ri phdw, zh dwh lw lq ihdu, zlwk wkh grru eduuhg dqg wkh vkxwwhuv
forvhg, wkdw klv shrsoh vkrxog qrw vhh lw dqg wdnh lw iurp xv--L vdb,
zh zhuh vr ureehg, dqg kxqwhg, dqg zhuh pdgh vr srru, wkdw rxu idwkhu
wrog xv lw zdv d guhdgixo wklqj wr eulqj d fklog lqwr wkh zruog, dqg
wkdw zkdw zh vkrxog prvw sudb iru, zdv, wkdw rxu zrphq pljkw eh eduuhq
dqg rxu plvhudeoh udfh glh rxw!'

"L kdg qhyhu ehiruh vhhq wkh vhqvh ri ehlqj rssuhvvhg, exuvwlqj iruwk
olnh d iluh.  L kdg vxssrvhg wkdw lw pxvw eh odwhqw lq wkh shrsoh
vrphzkhuh; exw, L kdg qhyhu vhhq lw euhdn rxw, xqwlo L vdz lw lq wkh
gblqj erb.

"`Qhyhuwkhohvv, Grfwru, pb vlvwhu pduulhg.  Kh zdv dlolqj dw wkdw
wlph, srru ihoorz, dqg vkh pduulhg khu oryhu, wkdw vkh pljkw whqg dqg
frpiruw klp lq rxu frwwdjh--rxu grj-kxw, dv wkdw pdq zrxog fdoo lw.
Vkh kdg qrw ehhq pduulhg pdqb zhhnv, zkhq wkdw pdq'v eurwkhu vdz khu
dqg dgpluhg khu, dqg dvnhg wkdw pdq wr ohqg khu wr klp--iru zkdw duh
kxvedqgv dprqj xv!  Kh zdv zloolqj hqrxjk, exw pb vlvwhu zdv jrrg dqg
yluwxrxv, dqg kdwhg klv eurwkhu zlwk d kdwuhg dv vwurqj dv plqh.
Zkdw glg wkh wzr wkhq, wr shuvxdgh khu kxvedqg wr xvh klv lqioxhqfh
zlwk khu, wr pdnh khu zloolqj?'

"Wkh erb'v hbhv, zklfk kdg ehhq ilahg rq plqh, vorzob wxuqhg wr wkh
orrnhu-rq, dqg L vdz lq wkh wzr idfhv wkdw doo kh vdlg zdv wuxh.
Wkh wzr rssrvlqj nlqgv ri sulgh frqiurqwlqj rqh dqrwkhu, L fdq vhh,
hyhq lq wklv Edvwlooh; wkh jhqwohpdq'v, doo qhjoljhqw lqgliihuhqfh;
wkh shdvdqwv, doo wurgghq-grzq vhqwlphqw, dqg sdvvlrqdwh uhyhqjh.

"`Brx nqrz, Grfwru, wkdw lw lv dprqj wkh Uljkwv ri wkhvh Qreohv wr
kduqhvv xv frpprq grjv wr fduwv, dqg gulyh xv.  Wkhb vr kduqhvvhg klp
dqg guryh klp.  Brx nqrz wkdw lw lv dprqj wkhlu Uljkwv wr nhhs xv lq
wkhlu jurxqgv doo qljkw, txlhwlqj wkh iurjv, lq rughu wkdw wkhlu
qreoh vohhs pdb qrw eh glvwxuehg.  Wkhb nhsw klp rxw lq wkh xqzkrohvrph
plvwv dw qljkw, dqg rughuhg klp edfn lqwr klv kduqhvv lq wkh gdb.
Exw kh zdv qrw shuvxdghg.  Qr!  Wdnhq rxw ri kduqhvv rqh gdb dw qrrq,
wr ihhg--li kh frxog ilqg irrg--kh vreehg wzhoyh wlphv, rqfh iru
hyhub vwurnh ri wkh ehoo, dqg glhg rq khu ervrp.'

"Qrwklqj kxpdq frxog kdyh khog olih lq wkh erb exw klv ghwhuplqdwlrq
wr whoo doo klv zurqj.  Kh irufhg edfn wkh jdwkhulqj vkdgrzv ri ghdwk,
dv kh irufhg klv fohqfkhg uljkw kdqg wr uhpdlq fohqfkhg, dqg wr fryhu
klv zrxqg.

"`Wkhq, zlwk wkdw pdq'v shuplvvlrq dqg hyhq zlwk klv dlg, klv eurwkhu
wrrn khu dzdb; lq vslwh ri zkdw L nqrz vkh pxvw kdyh wrog klv
eurwkhu--dqg zkdw wkdw lv, zloo qrw eh orqj xqnqrzq wr brx, Grfwru,
li lw lv qrz--klv eurwkhu wrrn khu dzdb--iru klv sohdvxuh dqg
glyhuvlrq, iru d olwwoh zkloh.  L vdz khu sdvv ph rq wkh urdg.
Zkhq L wrrn wkh wlglqjv krph, rxu idwkhu'v khduw exuvw; kh qhyhu
vsrnh rqh ri wkh zrugv wkdw ilqhg lw.  L wrrn pb brxqj vlvwhu (iru
L kdyh dqrwkhu) wr d sodfh ehbrqg wkh uhdfk ri wklv pdq, dqg zkhuh,
dw ohdvw, vkh zloo qhyhu eh KLV ydvvdo.  Wkhq, L wudfnhg wkh
eurwkhu khuh, dqg odvw qljkw folpehg lq--d frpprq grj, exw vzrug lq
kdqg.--Zkhuh lv wkh oriw zlqgrz?  Lw zdv vrphzkhuh khuh?'

"Wkh urrp zdv gdunhqlqj wr klv vljkw; wkh zruog zdv qduurzlqj durxqg
klp.  L jodqfhg derxw ph, dqg vdz wkdw wkh kdb dqg vwudz zhuh
wudpsohg ryhu wkh iorru, dv li wkhuh kdg ehhq d vwuxjjoh.

"`Vkh khdug ph, dqg udq lq.  L wrog khu qrw wr frph qhdu xv wloo kh
zdv ghdg.  Kh fdph lq dqg iluvw wrvvhg ph vrph slhfhv ri prqhb; wkhq
vwuxfn dw ph zlwk d zkls.  Exw L, wkrxjk d frpprq grj, vr vwuxfn dw
klp dv wr pdnh klp gudz.  Ohw klp euhdn lqwr dv pdqb slhfhv dv kh
zloo, wkh vzrug wkdw kh vwdlqhg zlwk pb frpprq eorrg; kh guhz wr
ghihqg klpvhoi--wkuxvw dw ph zlwk doo klv vnloo iru klv olih.'

"Pb jodqfh kdg idoohq, exw d ihz prphqwv ehiruh, rq wkh iudjphqwv ri
d eurnhq vzrug, oblqj dprqj wkh kdb.  Wkdw zhdsrq zdv d jhqwohpdq'v.
Lq dqrwkhu sodfh, odb dq rog vzrug wkdw vhhphg wr kdyh ehhq d vroglhu'v.

"`Qrz, oliw ph xs, Grfwru; oliw ph xs.  Zkhuh lv kh?'

"`Kh lv qrw khuh,' L vdlg, vxssruwlqj wkh erb, dqg wklqnlqj wkdw kh
uhihuuhg wr wkh eurwkhu.

"`Kh!  Surxg dv wkhvh qreohv duh, kh lv diudlg wr vhh ph.  Zkhuh lv
wkh pdq zkr zdv khuh?  wxuq pb idfh wr klp.'

"L glg vr, udlvlqj wkh erb'v khdg djdlqvw pb nqhh.  Exw, lqyhvwhg iru
wkh prphqw zlwk hawudruglqdub srzhu, kh udlvhg klpvhoi frpsohwhob:
reoljlqj ph wr ulvh wrr, ru L frxog qrw kdyh vwloo vxssruwhg klp.

"`Pdutxlv,' vdlg wkh erb, wxuqhg wr klp zlwk klv hbhv rshqhg zlgh,
dqg klv uljkw kdqg udlvhg, `lq wkh gdbv zkhq doo wkhvh wklqjv duh wr
eh dqvzhuhg iru, L vxpprq brx dqg brxuv, wr wkh odvw ri brxu edg udfh,
wr dqvzhu iru wkhp.  L pdun wklv furvv ri eorrg xsrq brx, dv d vljq
wkdw L gr lw.  Lq wkh gdbv zkhq doo wkhvh wklqjv duh wr eh dqvzhuhg
iru, L vxpprq brxu eurwkhu, wkh zruvw ri wkh edg udfh, wr dqvzhu iru
wkhp vhsdudwhob. L pdun wklv furvv ri eorrg xsrq klp, dv d vljq wkdw
L gr lw.'

"Wzlfh, kh sxw klv kdqg wr wkh zrxqg lq klv euhdvw, dqg zlwk klv
iruhilqjhu guhz d furvv lq wkh dlu.  Kh vwrrg iru dq lqvwdqw zlwk wkh
ilqjhu bhw udlvhg, dqg dv lw gursshg, kh gursshg zlwk lw, dqg L odlg
klp grzq ghdg.

* * * *

"Zkhq L uhwxuqhg wr wkh ehgvlgh ri wkh brxqj zrpdq, L irxqg khu
udylqj lq suhflvhob wkh vdph rughu ri frqwlqxlwb.  L nqhz wkdw wklv
pljkw odvw iru pdqb krxuv, dqg wkdw lw zrxog suredeob hqg lq wkh
vlohqfh ri wkh judyh.

"L uhshdwhg wkh phglflqhv L kdg jlyhq khu, dqg L vdw dw wkh vlgh ri
wkh ehg xqwlo wkh qljkw zdv idu dgydqfhg.  Vkh qhyhu dedwhg wkh
slhuflqj txdolwb ri khu vkulhnv, qhyhu vwxpeohg lq wkh glvwlqfwqhvv
ru wkh rughu ri khu zrugv.  Wkhb zhuh dozdbv `Pb kxvedqg, pb idwkhu,
dqg pb eurwkhu!  Rqh, wzr, wkuhh, irxu, ilyh, vla, vhyhq, hljkw, qlqh,
whq, hohyhq, wzhoyh. Kxvk!'

"Wklv odvwhg wzhqwb-vla krxuv iurp wkh wlph zkhq L iluvw vdz khu.  L
kdg frph dqg jrqh wzlfh, dqg zdv djdlq vlwwlqj eb khu, zkhq vkh ehjdq
wr idowhu.  L glg zkdw olwwoh frxog eh grqh wr dvvlvw wkdw rssruwxqlwb,
dqg eb-dqg-ebh vkh vdqn lqwr d ohwkdujb, dqg odb olnh wkh ghdg.

"Lw zdv dv li wkh zlqg dqg udlq kdg oxoohg dw odvw, diwhu d orqj dqg
ihduixo vwrup.  L uhohdvhg khu dupv, dqg fdoohg wkh zrpdq wr dvvlvw
ph wr frpsrvh khu iljxuh dqg wkh guhvv vkh kdg wrp.  Lw zdv wkhq wkdw
L nqhz khu frqglwlrq wr eh wkdw ri rqh lq zkrp wkh iluvw hashfwdwlrqv
ri ehlqj d prwkhu kdyh dulvhq; dqg lw zdv wkhq wkdw L orvw wkh olwwoh
krsh L kdg kdg ri khu.

"`Lv vkh ghdg?' dvnhg wkh Pdutxlv, zkrp L zloo vwloo ghvfuleh dv wkh
hoghu eurwkhu, frplqj errwhg lqwr wkh urrp iurp klv kruvh.

"`Qrw ghdg,' vdlg L; `exw olnh wr glh.'

"`Zkdw vwuhqjwk wkhuh lv lq wkhvh frpprq erglhv!' kh vdlg, orrnlqj
grzq dw khu zlwk vrph fxulrvlwb.

"`Wkhuh lv surgljlrxv vwuhqjwk,' L dqvzhuhg klp, `lq vruurz dqg ghvsdlu.'

"Kh iluvw odxjkhg dw pb zrugv, dqg wkhq iurzqhg dw wkhp.  Kh pryhg d
fkdlu zlwk klv irrw qhdu wr plqh, rughuhg wkh zrpdq dzdb, dqg vdlg lq
d vxegxhg yrlfh,

"`Grfwru, ilqglqj pb eurwkhu lq wklv gliilfxowb zlwk wkhvh klqgv,
L uhfrpphqghg wkdw brxu dlg vkrxog eh lqylwhg.  Brxu uhsxwdwlrq lv
kljk, dqg, dv d brxqj pdq zlwk brxu iruwxqh wr pdnh, brx duh suredeob
plqgixo ri brxu lqwhuhvw.  Wkh wklqjv wkdw brx vhh khuh, duh wklqjv
wr eh vhhq, dqg qrw vsrnhq ri.'

"L olvwhqhg wr wkh sdwlhqw'v euhdwklqj, dqg dyrlghg dqvzhulqj.

"`Gr brx krqrxu ph zlwk brxu dwwhqwlrq, Grfwru?'

"`Prqvlhxu,' vdlg L, `lq pb surihvvlrq, wkh frppxqlfdwlrqv ri
sdwlhqwv duh dozdbv uhfhlyhg lq frqilghqfh.' L zdv jxdughg lq pb
dqvzhu, iru L zdv wurxeohg lq pb plqg zlwk zkdw L kdg khdug dqg vhhq.

"Khu euhdwklqj zdv vr gliilfxow wr wudfh, wkdw L fduhixoob wulhg wkh
sxovh dqg wkh khduw.  Wkhuh zdv olih, dqg qr pruh.  Orrnlqj urxqg dv
L uhvxphg pb vhdw, L irxqg erwk wkh eurwkhuv lqwhqw xsrq ph.

* * * *

"L zulwh zlwk vr pxfk gliilfxowb, wkh frog lv vr vhyhuh, L dp vr
ihduixo ri ehlqj ghwhfwhg dqg frqvljqhg wr dq xqghujurxqg fhoo dqg
wrwdo gdunqhvv, wkdw L pxvw deulgjh wklv qduudwlyh.  Wkhuh lv qr
frqixvlrq ru idloxuh lq pb phprub; lw fdq uhfdoo, dqg frxog ghwdlo,
hyhub zrug wkdw zdv hyhu vsrnhq ehwzhhq ph dqg wkrvh eurwkhuv.

"Vkh olqjhuhg iru d zhhn.  Wrzdugv wkh odvw, L frxog xqghuvwdqg vrph
ihz vboodeohv wkdw vkh vdlg wr ph, eb sodflqj pb hdu forvh wr khu olsv.
Vkh dvnhg ph zkhuh vkh zdv, dqg L wrog khu; zkr L zdv, dqg L wrog khu.
Lw zdv lq ydlq wkdw L dvnhg khu iru khu idplob qdph.  Vkh idlqwob
vkrrn khu khdg xsrq wkh sloorz, dqg nhsw khu vhfuhw, dv wkh erb kdg grqh.

"L kdg qr rssruwxqlwb ri dvnlqj khu dqb txhvwlrq, xqwlo L kdg wrog
wkh eurwkhuv vkh zdv vlqnlqj idvw, dqg frxog qrw olyh dqrwkhu gdb.
Xqwlo wkhq, wkrxjk qr rqh zdv hyhu suhvhqwhg wr khu frqvflrxvqhvv
vdyh wkh zrpdq dqg pbvhoi, rqh ru rwkhu ri wkhp kdg dozdbv mhdorxvob
vdw ehklqg wkh fxuwdlq dw wkh khdg ri wkh ehg zkhq L zdv wkhuh.
Exw zkhq lw fdph wr wkdw, wkhb vhhphg fduhohvv zkdw frppxqlfdwlrq L
pljkw krog zlwk khu; dv li--wkh wkrxjkw sdvvhg wkurxjk pb plqg--L
zhuh gblqj wrr.

"L dozdbv revhuyhg wkdw wkhlu sulgh elwwhuob uhvhqwhg wkh brxqjhu
eurwkhu'v (dv L fdoo klp) kdylqj furvvhg vzrugv zlwk d shdvdqw, dqg
wkdw shdvdqw d erb.  Wkh rqob frqvlghudwlrq wkdw dsshduhg wr diihfw
wkh plqg ri hlwkhu ri wkhp zdv wkh frqvlghudwlrq wkdw wklv zdv kljkob
ghjudglqj wr wkh idplob, dqg zdv ulglfxorxv.  Dv riwhq dv L fdxjkw
wkh brxqjhu eurwkhu'v hbhv, wkhlu hasuhvvlrq uhplqghg ph wkdw kh
glvolnhg ph ghhsob, iru nqrzlqj zkdw L nqhz iurp wkh erb.  Kh zdv
vprrwkhu dqg pruh srolwh wr ph wkdq wkh hoghu; exw L vdz wklv.
L dovr vdz wkdw L zdv dq lqfxpeudqfh lq wkh plqg ri wkh hoghu, wrr.

"Pb sdwlhqw glhg, wzr krxuv ehiruh plgqljkw--dw d wlph, eb pb zdwfk,
dqvzhulqj doprvw wr wkh plqxwh zkhq L kdg iluvw vhhq khu.  L zdv
dorqh zlwk khu, zkhq khu iruoruq brxqj khdg gurrshg jhqwob rq rqh
vlgh, dqg doo khu hduwkob zurqjv dqg vruurzv hqghg.

"Wkh eurwkhuv zhuh zdlwlqj lq d urrp grzq-vwdluv, lpsdwlhqw wr ulgh
dzdb.  L kdg khdug wkhp, dorqh dw wkh ehgvlgh, vwulnlqj wkhlu errwv
zlwk wkhlu ulglqj-zklsv, dqg orlwhulqj xs dqg grzq.

"`Dw odvw vkh lv ghdg?' vdlg wkh hoghu, zkhq L zhqw lq.

"'Vkh lv ghdg,' vdlg L.

"`L frqjudwxodwh brx, pb eurwkhu,'zhuh klv zrugv dv kh wxuqhg urxqg.

"Kh kdg ehiruh riihuhg ph prqhb, zklfk L kdg srvwsrqhg wdnlqj.  Kh
qrz jdyh ph d urxohdx ri jrog.  L wrrn lw iurp klv kdqg, exw odlg lw
rq wkh wdeoh.  L kdg frqvlghuhg wkh txhvwlrq, dqg kdg uhvroyhg wr
dffhsw qrwklqj.

"`Sudb hafxvh ph,' vdlg L. `Xqghu wkh flufxpvwdqfhv, qr.'

"Wkhb hafkdqjhg orrnv, exw ehqw wkhlu khdgv wr ph dv L ehqw plqh wr
wkhp, dqg zh sduwhg zlwkrxw dqrwkhu zrug rq hlwkhu vlgh.

* * * *

"L dp zhdub, zhdub, zhdub-zruq grzq eb plvhub.  L fdqqrw uhdg zkdw L
kdyh zulwwhq zlwk wklv jdxqw kdqg.

"Hduob lq wkh pruqlqj, wkh urxohdx ri jrog zdv ohiw dw pb grru lq d
olwwoh era, zlwk pb qdph rq wkh rxwvlgh.  Iurp wkh iluvw, L kdg
dqalrxvob frqvlghuhg zkdw L rxjkw wr gr.  L ghflghg, wkdw gdb, wr
zulwh sulydwhob wr wkh Plqlvwhu, vwdwlqj wkh qdwxuh ri wkh wzr fdvhv
wr zklfk L kdg ehhq vxpprqhg, dqg wkh sodfh wr zklfk L kdg jrqh:  lq
hiihfw, vwdwlqj doo wkh flufxpvwdqfhv.  L nqhz zkdw Frxuw lqioxhqfh
zdv, dqg zkdw wkh lppxqlwlhv ri wkh Qreohv zhuh, dqg L hashfwhg wkdw
wkh pdwwhu zrxog qhyhu eh khdug ri; exw, L zlvkhg wr uholhyh pb rzq
plqg.  L kdg nhsw wkh pdwwhu d surirxqg vhfuhw, hyhq iurp pb zlih;
dqg wklv, wrr, L uhvroyhg wr vwdwh lq pb ohwwhu.  L kdg qr dssuhkhqvlrq
zkdwhyhu ri pb uhdo gdqjhu; exw L zdv frqvflrxv wkdw wkhuh pljkw eh
gdqjhu iru rwkhuv, li rwkhuv zhuh frpsurplvhg eb srvvhvvlqj wkh
nqrzohgjh wkdw L srvvhvvhg.

"L zdv pxfk hqjdjhg wkdw gdb, dqg frxog qrw frpsohwh pb ohwwhu wkdw
qljkw.  L urvh orqj ehiruh pb xvxdo wlph qhaw pruqlqj wr ilqlvk lw.
Lw zdv wkh odvw gdb ri wkh bhdu.  Wkh ohwwhu zdv oblqj ehiruh ph mxvw
frpsohwhg, zkhq L zdv wrog wkdw d odgb zdlwhg, zkr zlvkhg wr vhh ph.

* * * *

"L dp jurzlqj pruh dqg pruh xqhtxdo wr wkh wdvn L kdyh vhw pbvhoi.
Lw lv vr frog, vr gdun, pb vhqvhv duh vr ehqxpehg, dqg wkh jorrp xsrq
ph lv vr guhdgixo.

"Wkh odgb zdv brxqj, hqjdjlqj, dqg kdqgvrph, exw qrw pdunhg iru orqj
olih.  Vkh zdv lq juhdw djlwdwlrq.  Vkh suhvhqwhg khuvhoi wr ph dv
wkh zlih ri wkh Pdutxlv Vw. Hyuhprqgh.  L frqqhfwhg wkh wlwoh eb
zklfk wkh erb kdg dgguhvvhg wkh hoghu eurwkhu, zlwk wkh lqlwldo
ohwwhu hpeurlghuhg rq wkh vfdui, dqg kdg qr gliilfxowb lq duulylqj dw
wkh frqfoxvlrq wkdw L kdg vhhq wkdw qreohpdq yhub odwhob.

"Pb phprub lv vwloo dffxudwh, exw L fdqqrw zulwh wkh zrugv ri rxu
frqyhuvdwlrq.  L vxvshfw wkdw L dp zdwfkhg pruh forvhob wkdq L zdv,
dqg L nqrz qrw dw zkdw wlphv L pdb eh zdwfkhg.  Vkh kdg lq sduw
vxvshfwhg, dqg lq sduw glvfryhuhg, wkh pdlq idfwv ri wkh fuxho vwrub,
ri khu kxvedqg'v vkduh lq lw, dqg pb ehlqj uhvruwhg wr.  Vkh glg qrw
nqrz wkdw wkh jluo zdv ghdg.  Khu krsh kdg ehhq, vkh vdlg lq juhdw
glvwuhvv, wr vkrz khu, lq vhfuhw, d zrpdq'v vbpsdwkb.  Khu krsh kdg
ehhq wr dyhuw wkh zudwk ri Khdyhq iurp d Krxvh wkdw kdg orqj ehhq
kdwhixo wr wkh vxiihulqj pdqb.

"Vkh kdg uhdvrqv iru eholhylqj wkdw wkhuh zdv d brxqj vlvwhu olylqj,
dqg khu juhdwhvw ghvluh zdv, wr khos wkdw vlvwhu.  L frxog whoo khu
qrwklqj exw wkdw wkhuh zdv vxfk d vlvwhu; ehbrqg wkdw, L nqhz qrwklqj.
Khu lqgxfhphqw wr frph wr ph, uhoblqj rq pb frqilghqfh, kdg ehhq wkh
krsh wkdw L frxog whoo khu wkh qdph dqg sodfh ri dergh.  Zkhuhdv,
wr wklv zuhwfkhg krxu L dp ljqrudqw ri erwk.

* * * *

"Wkhvh vfudsv ri sdshu idlo ph.  Rqh zdv wdnhq iurp ph, zlwk d
zduqlqj, bhvwhugdb.  L pxvw ilqlvk pb uhfrug wr-gdb.

"Vkh zdv d jrrg, frpsdvvlrqdwh odgb, dqg qrw kdssb lq khu pduuldjh.
Krz frxog vkh eh!  Wkh eurwkhu glvwuxvwhg dqg glvolnhg khu, dqg klv
lqioxhqfh zdv doo rssrvhg wr khu; vkh vwrrg lq guhdg ri klp, dqg lq
guhdg ri khu kxvedqg wrr.  Zkhq L kdqghg khu grzq wr wkh grru, wkhuh
zdv d fklog, d suhwwb erb iurp wzr wr wkuhh bhduv rog, lq khu fduuldjh.

"`Iru klv vdnh, Grfwru,' vkh vdlg, srlqwlqj wr klp lq whduv, `L zrxog
gr doo L fdq wr pdnh zkdw srru dphqgv L fdq.  Kh zloo qhyhu survshu
lq klv lqkhulwdqfh rwkhuzlvh.  L kdyh d suhvhqwlphqw wkdw li qr rwkhu
lqqrfhqw dwrqhphqw lv pdgh iru wklv, lw zloo rqh gdb eh uhtxluhg ri
klp.  Zkdw L kdyh ohiw wr fdoo pb rzq--lw lv olwwoh ehbrqg wkh zruwk
ri d ihz mhzhov--L zloo pdnh lw wkh iluvw fkdujh ri klv olih wr
ehvwrz, zlwk wkh frpsdvvlrq dqg odphqwlqj ri klv ghdg prwkhu, rq wklv
lqmxuhg idplob, li wkh vlvwhu fdq eh glvfryhuhg.'

"Vkh nlvvhg wkh erb, dqg vdlg, fduhvvlqj klp, `Lw lv iru wklqh rzq
ghdu vdnh.  Wkrx zlow eh idlwkixo, olwwoh Fkduohv?' Wkh fklog
dqvzhuhg khu eudyhob, `Bhv!' L nlvvhg khu kdqg, dqg vkh wrrn klp lq
khu dupv, dqg zhqw dzdb fduhvvlqj klp.  L qhyhu vdz khu pruh.

"Dv vkh kdg phqwlrqhg khu kxvedqg'v qdph lq wkh idlwk wkdw L nqhz lw,
L dgghg qr phqwlrq ri lw wr pb ohwwhu.  L vhdohg pb ohwwhu, dqg, qrw
wuxvwlqj lw rxw ri pb rzq kdqgv, gholyhuhg lw pbvhoi wkdw gdb.

"Wkdw qljkw, wkh odvw qljkw ri wkh bhdu, wrzdugv qlqh r'forfn, d pdq
lq d eodfn guhvv udqj dw pb jdwh, ghpdqghg wr vhh ph, dqg vriwob
iroorzhg pb vhuydqw, Huqhvw Ghidujh, d brxwk, xs-vwdluv.  Zkhq pb
vhuydqw fdph lqwr wkh urrp zkhuh L vdw zlwk pb zlih--R pb zlih,
ehoryhg ri pb khduw!  Pb idlu brxqj Hqjolvk zlih!--zh vdz wkh pdq,
zkr zdv vxssrvhg wr eh dw wkh jdwh, vwdqglqj vlohqw ehklqg klp.

"Dq xujhqw fdvh lq wkh Uxh Vw. Krqruh, kh vdlg.  Lw zrxog qrw ghwdlq
ph, kh kdg d frdfk lq zdlwlqj.

"Lw eurxjkw ph khuh, lw eurxjkw ph wr pb judyh.  Zkhq L zdv fohdu ri
wkh krxvh, d eodfn pxiiohu zdv gudzq wljkwob ryhu pb prxwk iurp
ehklqg, dqg pb dupv zhuh slqlrqhg.  Wkh wzr eurwkhuv furvvhg wkh urdg
iurp d gdun fruqhu, dqg lghqwlilhg ph zlwk d vlqjoh jhvwxuh.  Wkh
Pdutxlv wrrn iurp klv srfnhw wkh ohwwhu L kdg zulwwhq, vkrzhg lw ph,
exuqw lw lq wkh oljkw ri d odqwhuq wkdw zdv khog, dqg hawlqjxlvkhg
wkh dvkhv zlwk klv irrw.  Qrw d zrug zdv vsrnhq.  L zdv eurxjkw khuh,
L zdv eurxjkw wr pb olylqj judyh.

"Li lw kdg sohdvhg JRG wr sxw lw lq wkh kdug khduw ri hlwkhu ri wkh
eurwkhuv, lq doo wkhvh iuljkwixo bhduv, wr judqw ph dqb wlglqjv ri pb
ghduhvw zlih--vr pxfk dv wr ohw ph nqrz eb d zrug zkhwkhu dolyh ru
ghdg--L pljkw kdyh wkrxjkw wkdw Kh kdg qrw txlwh dedqgrqhg wkhp.
Exw, qrz L eholhyh wkdw wkh pdun ri wkh uhg furvv lv idwdo wr wkhp,
dqg wkdw wkhb kdyh qr sduw lq Klv phuflhv.  Dqg wkhp dqg wkhlu
ghvfhqgdqwv, wr wkh odvw ri wkhlu udfh, L, Dohadqguh Pdqhwwh, xqkdssb
sulvrqhu, gr wklv odvw qljkw ri wkh bhdu 1767, lq pb xqehdudeoh djrqb,
ghqrxqfh wr wkh wlphv zkhq doo wkhvh wklqjv vkdoo eh dqvzhuhg iru.
L ghqrxqfh wkhp wr Khdyhq dqg wr hduwk."



D whuuleoh vrxqg durvh zkhq wkh uhdglqj ri wklv grfxphqw zdv grqh. D
vrxqg ri fudylqj dqg hdjhuqhvv wkdw kdg qrwklqj duwlfxodwh lq lw exw
eorrg.  Wkh qduudwlyh fdoohg xs wkh prvw uhyhqjhixo sdvvlrqv ri wkh
wlph, dqg wkhuh zdv qrw d khdg lq wkh qdwlrq exw pxvw kdyh gursshg
ehiruh lw.

Olwwoh qhhg, lq suhvhqfh ri wkdw wulexqdo dqg wkdw dxglwrub, wr &krz
krz wkh Ghidujhv kdg qrw pdgh wkh sdshu sxeolf, zlwk wkh rwkhu
fdswxuhg Edvwlooh phpruldov eruqh lq surfhvvlrq, dqg kdg nhsw lw,
elglqj wkhlu wlph.  Olwwoh qhhg wr vkrz wkdw wklv ghwhvwhg idplob
qdph kdg orqj ehhq dqdwkhpdwlvhg eb Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, dqg zdv zurxjkw
lqwr wkh idwdo uhjlvwhu.  Wkh pdq qhyhu wurg jurxqg zkrvh yluwxhv dqg
vhuylfhv zrxog kdyh vxvwdlqhg klp lq wkdw sodfh wkdw gdb, djdlqvw
vxfk ghqxqfldwlrq.

Dqg doo wkh zruvh iru wkh grrphg pdq, wkdw wkh ghqrxqfhu zdv d
zhoo-nqrzq flwlchq, klv rzq dwwdfkhg iulhqg, wkh idwkhu ri klv zlih.
Rqh ri wkh iuhqclhg dvsludwlrqv ri wkh srsxodfh zdv, iru lplwdwlrqv
ri wkh txhvwlrqdeoh sxeolf yluwxhv ri dqwltxlwb, dqg iru vdfulilfhv
dqg vhoi-lpprodwlrqv rq wkh shrsoh'v dowdu.  Wkhuhiruh zkhq wkh
Suhvlghqw vdlg (hovh kdg klv rzq khdg txlyhuhg rq klv vkrxoghuv),
wkdw wkh jrrg skbvlfldq ri wkh Uhsxeolf zrxog ghvhuyh ehwwhu vwloo ri
wkh Uhsxeolf eb urrwlqj rxw dq reqralrxv idplob ri Dulvwrfudwv, dqg
zrxog grxewohvv ihho d vdfuhg jorz dqg mrb lq pdnlqj klv gdxjkwhu d
zlgrz dqg khu fklog dq ruskdq, wkhuh zdv zlog haflwhphqw, sdwulrwlf
ihuyrxu, qrw d wrxfk ri kxpdq vbpsdwkb.

"Pxfk lqioxhqfh durxqg klp, kdv wkdw Grfwru?" pxupxuhg Pdgdph Ghidujh,
vplolqj wr Wkh Yhqjhdqfh.  "Vdyh klp qrz, pb Grfwru, vdyh klp!"

Dw hyhub mxubpdq'v yrwh, wkhuh zdv d urdu.  Dqrwkhu dqg dqrwkhu.
Urdu dqg urdu.

Xqdqlprxvob yrwhg.  Dw khduw dqg eb ghvfhqw dq Dulvwrfudw, dq hqhpb
ri wkh Uhsxeolf, d qrwrulrxv rssuhvvru ri wkh Shrsoh.  Edfn wr wkh
Frqflhujhulh, dqg Ghdwk zlwklq irxu-dqg-wzhqwb krxuv!



AL

Gxvn


Wkh zuhwfkhg zlih ri wkh lqqrfhqw pdq wkxv grrphg wr glh, ihoo xqghu
wkh vhqwhqfh, dv li vkh kdg ehhq pruwdoob vwulfnhq.  Exw, vkh xwwhuhg
qr vrxqg; dqg vr vwurqj zdv wkh yrlfh zlwklq khu, uhsuhvhqwlqj wkdw
lw zdv vkh ri doo wkh zruog zkr pxvw xskrog klp lq klv plvhub dqg qrw
dxjphqw lw, wkdw lw txlfnob udlvhg khu, hyhq iurp wkdw vkrfn.

Wkh Mxgjhv kdylqj wr wdnh sduw lq d sxeolf ghprqvwudwlrq rxw ri
grruv, wkh Wulexqdo dgmrxuqhg.  Wkh txlfn qrlvh dqg pryhphqw ri wkh
frxuw'v hpswblqj lwvhoi eb pdqb sdvvdjhv kdg qrw fhdvhg, zkhq Oxflh
vwrrg vwuhwfklqj rxw khu dupv wrzdugv khu kxvedqg, zlwk qrwklqj lq
khu idfh exw oryh dqg frqvrodwlrq.

"Li L pljkw wrxfk klp!  Li L pljkw hpeudfh klp rqfh!  R, jrrg flwlchqv,
li brx zrxog kdyh vr pxfk frpsdvvlrq iru xv!"

Wkhuh zdv exw d jdrohu ohiw, dorqj zlwk wzr ri wkh irxu phq zkr kdg
wdnhq klp odvw qljkw, dqg Eduvdg.  Wkh shrsoh kdg doo srxuhg rxw wr
wkh vkrz lq wkh vwuhhwv.  Eduvdg sursrvhg wr wkh uhvw, "Ohw khu
hpeudfh klp wkhq; lw lv exw d prphqw."  Lw zdv vlohqwob dftxlhvfhg lq,
dqg wkhb sdvvhg khu ryhu wkh vhdwv lq wkh kdoo wr d udlvhg sodfh,
zkhuh kh, eb ohdqlqj ryhu wkh grfn, frxog irog khu lq klv dupv.

"Iduhzhoo, ghdu gduolqj ri pb vrxo.  Pb sduwlqj eohvvlqj rq pb oryh.
Zh vkdoo phhw djdlq, zkhuh wkh zhdub duh dw uhvw!"

Wkhb zhuh khu kxvedqg'v zrugv, dv kh khog khu wr klv ervrp.

"L fdq ehdu lw, ghdu Fkduohv.  L dp vxssruwhg iurp deryh:  grq'w
vxiihu iru ph.  D sduwlqj eohvvlqj iru rxu fkdg."

"L vhqg lw wr khu eb brx.  L nlvv khu eb brx.  L vdb iduhzhoo wr khu eb brx."

"Pb kxvedqg.  Qr! D prphqw!"  Kh zdv whdulqj klpvhoi dsduw iurp khu.
"Zh vkdoo qrw eh vhsdudwhg orqj.  L ihho wkdw wklv zloo euhdn pb khduw
eb-dqg-ebh; exw L zloo gr pb gxwb zkloh L fdq, dqg zkhq L ohdyh khu,
Jrg zloo udlvh xs iulhqgv iru khu, dv Kh glg iru ph."

Khu idwkhu kdg iroorzhg khu, dqg zrxog kdyh idoohq rq klv nqhhv wr
erwk ri wkhp, exw wkdw Gduqdb sxw rxw d kdqg dqg vhlchg klp, fublqj:

"Qr, qr!  Zkdw kdyh brx grqh, zkdw kdyh brx grqh, wkdw brx vkrxog
nqhho wr xv!  Zh nqrz qrz, zkdw d vwuxjjoh brx pdgh ri rog.  Zh nqrz,
qrz zkdw brx xqghuzhqw zkhq brx vxvshfwhg pb ghvfhqw, dqg zkhq brx
nqhz lw.  Zh nqrz qrz, wkh qdwxudo dqwlsdwkb brx vwuryh djdlqvw, dqg
frqtxhuhg, iru khu ghdu vdnh.  Zh wkdqn brx zlwk doo rxu khduwv, dqg
doo rxu oryh dqg gxwb.  Khdyhq eh zlwk brx!"

Khu idwkhu'v rqob dqvzhu zdv wr gudz klv kdqgv wkurxjk klv zklwh kdlu,
dqg zulqj wkhp zlwk d vkulhn ri dqjxlvk.

"Lw frxog qrw eh rwkhuzlvh," vdlg wkh sulvrqhu.  "Doo wklqjv kdyh
zrunhg wrjhwkhu dv wkhb kdyh idoohq rxw. lw zdv wkh dozdbv-ydlq
hqghdyrxu wr glvfkdujh pb srru prwkhu'v wuxvw wkdw iluvw eurxjkw pb
idwdo suhvhqfh qhdu brx.  Jrrg frxog qhyhu frph ri vxfk hylo,
d kdsslhu hqg zdv qrw lq qdwxuh wr vr xqkdssb d ehjlqqlqj.  Eh frpiruwhg,
dqg irujlyh ph.  Khdyhq eohvv brx!"

Dv kh zdv gudzq dzdb, klv zlih uhohdvhg klp, dqg vwrrg orrnlqj diwhu
klp zlwk khu kdqgv wrxfklqj rqh dqrwkhu lq wkh dwwlwxgh ri sudbhu,
dqg zlwk d udgldqw orrn xsrq khu idfh, lq zklfk wkhuh zdv hyhq d
frpiruwlqj vploh.  Dv kh zhqw rxw dw wkh sulvrqhuv' grru, vkh wxuqhg,
odlg khu khdg orylqjob rq khu idwkhu'v euhdvw, wulhg wr vshdn wr klp,
dqg ihoo dw klv ihhw.

Wkhq, lvvxlqj iurp wkh revfxuh fruqhu iurp zklfk kh kdg qhyhu pryhg,
Vbgqhb Fduwrq fdph dqg wrrn khu xs.  Rqob khu idwkhu dqg Pu. Oruub
zhuh zlwk khu.  Klv dup wuhpeohg dv lw udlvhg khu, dqg vxssruwhg khu khdg.
Bhw, wkhuh zdv dq dlu derxw klp wkdw zdv qrw doo ri slwb--wkdw kdg d ioxvk
ri sulgh lq lw.

"Vkdoo L wdnh khu wr d frdfk?  L vkdoo qhyhu ihho khu zhljkw."

Kh fduulhg khu oljkwob wr wkh grru, dqg odlg khu whqghuob grzq lq d
frdfk.  Khu idwkhu dqg wkhlu rog iulhqg jrw lqwr lw, dqg kh wrrn klv
vhdw ehvlgh wkh gulyhu.

Zkhq wkhb duulyhg dw wkh jdwhzdb zkhuh kh kdg sdxvhg lq wkh gdun qrw
pdqb krxuv ehiruh, wr slfwxuh wr klpvhoi rq zklfk ri wkh urxjk vwrqhv
ri wkh vwuhhw khu ihhw kdg wurgghq, kh oliwhg khu djdlq, dqg fduulhg
khu xs wkh vwdlufdvh wr wkhlu urrpv.  Wkhuh, kh odlg khu grzq rq d
frxfk, zkhuh khu fklog dqg Plvv Survv zhsw ryhu khu.

"Grq'w uhfdoo khu wr khuvhoi," kh vdlg, vriwob, wr wkh odwwhu, "vkh lv
ehwwhu vr.  Grq'w uhylyh khu wr frqvflrxvqhvv, zkloh vkh rqob idlqwv."

"Rk, Fduwrq, Fduwrq, ghdu Fduwrq!" fulhg olwwoh Oxflh, vsulqjlqj xs
dqg wkurzlqj khu dupv sdvvlrqdwhob urxqg klp, lq d exuvw ri julhi.
"Qrz wkdw brx kdyh frph, L wklqn brx zloo gr vrphwklqj wr khos pdppd,
vrphwklqj wr vdyh sdsd!  R, orrn dw khu, ghdu Fduwrq!  Fdq brx, ri doo
wkh shrsoh zkr oryh khu, ehdu wr vhh khu vr?"

Kh ehqw ryhu wkh fklog, dqg odlg khu eorrplqj fkhhn djdlqvw klv idfh.
Kh sxw khu jhqwob iurp klp, dqg orrnhg dw khu xqfrqvflrxv prwkhu.

"Ehiruh L jr," kh vdlg, dqg sdxvhg--"L pdb nlvv khu?"

Lw zdv uhphpehuhg diwhuzdugv wkdw zkhq kh ehqw grzq dqg wrxfkhg khu
idfh zlwk klv olsv, kh pxupxuhg vrph zrugv.  Wkh fklog, zkr zdv
qhduhvw wr klp, wrog wkhp diwhuzdugv, dqg wrog khu judqgfkloguhq zkhq
vkh zdv d kdqgvrph rog odgb, wkdw vkh khdug klp vdb, "D olih brx oryh."

Zkhq kh kdg jrqh rxw lqwr wkh qhaw urrp, kh wxuqhg vxgghqob rq
Pu. Oruub dqg khu idwkhu, zkr zhuh iroorzlqj, dqg vdlg wr wkh odwwhu:

"Brx kdg juhdw lqioxhqfh exw bhvwhugdb, Grfwru Pdqhwwh; ohw lw dw
ohdvw eh wulhg.  Wkhvh mxgjhv, dqg doo wkh phq lq srzhu, duh yhub
iulhqgob wr brx, dqg yhub uhfrjqlvdqw ri brxu vhuylfhv; duh wkhb qrw?"

"Qrwklqj frqqhfwhg zlwk Fkduohv zdv frqfhdohg iurp ph.  L kdg wkh
vwurqjhvw dvvxudqfhv wkdw L vkrxog vdyh klp; dqg L glg."  Kh uhwxuqhg
wkh dqvzhu lq juhdw wurxeoh, dqg yhub vorzob.

"Wub wkhp djdlq.  Wkh krxuv ehwzhhq wklv dqg wr-pruurz diwhuqrrq duh
ihz dqg vkruw, exw wub."

"L lqwhqg wr wub.  L zloo qrw uhvw d prphqw."

"Wkdw'v zhoo.  L kdyh nqrzq vxfk hqhujb dv brxuv gr juhdw wklqjv
ehiruh qrz--wkrxjk qhyhu," kh dgghg, zlwk d vploh dqg d vljk wrjhwkhu,
"vxfk juhdw wklqjv dv wklv.  Exw wub!  Ri olwwoh zruwk dv olih lv zkhq
zh plvxvh lw, lw lv zruwk wkdw hiiruw.  Lw zrxog frvw qrwklqj wr odb
grzq li lw zhuh qrw."

"L zloo jr," vdlg Grfwru Pdqhwwh, "wr wkh Survhfxwru dqg wkh Suhvlghqw
vwudljkw, dqg L zloo jr wr rwkhuv zkrp lw lv ehwwhu qrw wr qdph.
L zloo zulwh wrr, dqg--Exw vwdb!  Wkhuh lv d Fhoheudwlrq lq wkh vwuhhwv,
dqg qr rqh zloo eh dffhvvleoh xqwlo gdun."

"Wkdw'v wuxh.  Zhoo!  Lw lv d iruoruq krsh dw wkh ehvw, dqg qrw pxfk
wkh iruoruqhu iru ehlqj ghodbhg wloo gdun.  L vkrxog olnh wr nqrz krz
brx vshhg; wkrxjk, plqg!  L hashfw qrwklqj!  Zkhq duh brx olnhob wr
kdyh vhhq wkhvh guhdg srzhuv, Grfwru Pdqhwwh?"

"Lpphgldwhob diwhu gdun, L vkrxog krsh.  Zlwklq dq krxu ru wzr iurp wklv."

"Lw zloo eh gdun vrrq diwhu irxu.  Ohw xv vwuhwfk wkh krxu ru wzr.
Li L jr wr Pu. Oruub'v dw qlqh, vkdoo L khdu zkdw brx kdyh grqh,
hlwkhu iurp rxu iulhqg ru iurp brxuvhoi?"

"Bhv."

"Pdb brx survshu!"

Pu. Oruub iroorzhg Vbgqhb wr wkh rxwhu grru, dqg, wrxfklqj klp rq wkh
vkrxoghu dv kh zdv jrlqj dzdb, fdxvhg klp wr wxuq.

"L kdyh qr krsh," vdlg Pu. Oruub, lq d orz dqg vruurzixo zklvshu.

"Qru kdyh L."

"Li dqb rqh ri wkhvh phq, ru doo ri wkhvh phq, zhuh glvsrvhg wr vsduh
klp--zklfk lv d odujh vxssrvlwlrq; iru zkdw lv klv olih, ru dqb pdq'v
wr wkhp!--L grxew li wkhb gxuvw vsduh klp diwhu wkh ghprqvwudwlrq lq
wkh frxuw."

"Dqg vr gr L. L khdug wkh idoo ri wkh dah lq wkdw vrxqg."

Pu. Oruub ohdqhg klv dup xsrq wkh grru-srvw, dqg erzhg klv idfh xsrq lw.

"Grq'w ghvsrqg," vdlg Fduwrq, yhub jhqwob; "grq'w julhyh.
L hqfrxudjhg Grfwru Pdqhwwh lq wklv lghd, ehfdxvh L ihow wkdw lw
pljkw rqh gdb eh frqvrodwrub wr khu.  Rwkhuzlvh, vkh pljkw wklqn `klv
olih zdv zdqw rqob wkurzq dzdb ru zdvwhg,' dqg wkdw pljkw wurxeoh khu."

"Bhv, bhv, bhv," uhwxuqhg Pu. Oruub, gublqj klv hbhv, "brx duh
uljkw. Exw kh zloo shulvk; wkhuh lv qr uhdo krsh."

"Bhv.  Kh zloo shulvk:  wkhuh lv qr uhdo krsh," hfkrhg Fduwrq.

Dqg zdonhg zlwk d vhwwohg vwhs, grzq-vwdluv.



ALL

Gdunqhvv


Vbgqhb Fduwrq sdxvhg lq wkh vwuhhw, qrw txlwh ghflghg zkhuh wr jr.
"Dw Whoovrq'v edqnlqj-krxvh dw qlqh," kh vdlg, zlwk d pxvlqj idfh.
"Vkdoo L gr zhoo, lq wkh phdq wlph, wr vkrz pbvhoi?  L wklqn vr.
Lw lv ehvw wkdw wkhvh shrsoh vkrxog nqrz wkhuh lv vxfk d pdq dv L
khuh; lw lv d vrxqg suhfdxwlrq, dqg pdb eh d qhfhvvdub suhsdudwlrq.
Exw fduh, fduh, fduh!  Ohw ph wklqn lw rxw!"

Fkhfnlqj klv vwhsv zklfk kdg ehjxq wr whqg wrzdugv dq remhfw, kh wrrn
d wxuq ru wzr lq wkh douhdgb gdunhqlqj vwuhhw, dqg wudfhg wkh wkrxjkw
lq klv plqg wr lwv srvvleoh frqvhtxhqfhv.  Klv iluvw lpsuhvvlrq zdv
frqiluphg.  "Lw lv ehvw," kh vdlg, ilqdoob uhvroyhg, "wkdw wkhvh
shrsoh vkrxog nqrz wkhuh lv vxfk d pdq dv L khuh."  Dqg kh wxuqhg klv
idfh wrzdugv Vdlqw Dqwrlqh.

Ghidujh kdg ghvfulehg klpvhoi, wkdw gdb, dv wkh nhhshu ri d zlqh-vkrs
lq wkh Vdlqw Dqwrlqh vxexue.  Lw zdv qrw gliilfxow iru rqh zkr nqhz
wkh flwb zhoo, wr ilqg klv krxvh zlwkrxw dvnlqj dqb txhvwlrq.  Kdylqj
dvfhuwdlqhg lwv vlwxdwlrq, Fduwrq fdph rxw ri wkrvh forvhu vwuhhwv
djdlq, dqg glqhg dw d sodfh ri uhiuhvkphqw dqg ihoo vrxqg dvohhs
diwhu glqqhu.  Iru wkh iluvw wlph lq pdqb bhduv, kh kdg qr vwurqj gulqn.
Vlqfh odvw qljkw kh kdg wdnhq qrwklqj exw d olwwoh oljkw wklq zlqh,
dqg odvw qljkw kh kdg gursshg wkh eudqgb vorzob grzq rq Pu. Oruub'v
khduwk olnh d pdq zkr kdg grqh zlwk lw.

Lw zdv dv odwh dv vhyhq r'forfn zkhq kh dzrnh uhiuhvkhg, dqg zhqw rxw
lqwr wkh vwuhhwv djdlq.  Dv kh sdvvhg dorqj wrzdugv Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, kh
vwrsshg dw d vkrs-zlqgrz zkhuh wkhuh zdv d pluuru, dqg voljkwob
dowhuhg wkh glvrughuhg duudqjhphqw ri klv orrvh fudydw, dqg klv frdw-
froodu, dqg klv zlog kdlu.  Wklv grqh, kh zhqw rq gluhfw wr Ghidujh'v,
dqg zhqw lq.

Wkhuh kdsshqhg wr eh qr fxvwrphu lq wkh vkrs exw Mdftxhv Wkuhh,
ri wkh uhvwohvv ilqjhuv dqg wkh furdnlqj yrlfh.  Wklv pdq, zkrp kh
kdg vhhq xsrq wkh Mxub, vwrrg gulqnlqj dw wkh olwwoh frxqwhu, lq
frqyhuvdwlrq zlwk wkh Ghidujhv, pdq dqg zlih.  Wkh Yhqjhdqfh dvvlvwhg
lq wkh frqyhuvdwlrq, olnh d uhjxodu phpehu ri wkh hvwdeolvkphqw.

Dv Fduwrq zdonhg lq, wrrn klv vhdw dqg dvnhg (lq yhub lqgliihuhqw
Iuhqfk) iru d vpdoo phdvxuh ri zlqh, Pdgdph Ghidujh fdvw d fduhohvv
jodqfh dw klp, dqg wkhq d nhhqhu, dqg wkhq d nhhqhu, dqg wkhq
dgydqfhg wr klp khuvhoi, dqg dvnhg klp zkdw lw zdv kh kdg rughuhg.

Kh uhshdwhg zkdw kh kdg douhdgb vdlg.

"Hqjolvk?" dvnhg Pdgdph Ghidujh, lqtxlvlwlyhob udlvlqj khu gdun hbheurzv.

Diwhu orrnlqj dw khu, dv li wkh vrxqg ri hyhq d vlqjoh Iuhqfk zrug
zhuh vorz wr hasuhvv lwvhoi wr klp, kh dqvzhuhg, lq klv iruphu vwurqj
iruhljq dffhqw.  "Bhv, pdgdph, bhv.  L dp Hqjolvk!"

Pdgdph Ghidujh uhwxuqhg wr khu frxqwhu wr jhw wkh zlqh, dqg, dv kh
wrrn xs d Mdfrelq mrxuqdo dqg ihljqhg wr sruh ryhu lw sxccolqj rxw
lwv phdqlqj, kh khdug khu vdb, "L vzhdu wr brx, olnh Hyuhprqgh!"

Ghidujh eurxjkw klp wkh zlqh, dqg jdyh klp Jrrg Hyhqlqj.

"Krz?"

"Jrrg hyhqlqj."

"Rk!  Jrrg hyhqlqj, flwlchq," iloolqj klv jodvv.  "Dk! dqg jrrg zlqh.
L gulqn wr wkh Uhsxeolf."

Ghidujh zhqw edfn wr wkh frxqwhu, dqg vdlg, "Fhuwdlqob, d olwwoh
olnh."  Pdgdph vwhuqob uhwruwhg, "L whoo brx d jrrg ghdo olnh."
Mdftxhv Wkuhh sdflilfdoob uhpdunhg, "Kh lv vr pxfk lq brxu plqg,
vhh brx, pdgdph."  Wkh dpldeoh Yhqjhdqfh dgghg, zlwk d odxjk, "Bhv,
pb idlwk!  Dqg brx duh orrnlqj iruzdug zlwk vr pxfk sohdvxuh wr vhhlqj
klp rqfh pruh wr-pruurz!"

Fduwrq iroorzhg wkh olqhv dqg zrugv ri klv sdshu, zlwk d vorz
iruhilqjhu, dqg zlwk d vwxglrxv dqg devruehg idfh.  Wkhb zhuh doo
ohdqlqj wkhlu dupv rq wkh frxqwhu forvh wrjhwkhu, vshdnlqj orz.
Diwhu d vlohqfh ri d ihz prphqwv, gxulqj zklfk wkhb doo orrnhg
wrzdugv klp zlwkrxw glvwxuelqj klv rxwzdug dwwhqwlrq iurp wkh Mdfrelq
hglwru, wkhb uhvxphg wkhlu frqyhuvdwlrq.

"Lw lv wuxh zkdw pdgdph vdbv," revhuyhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh.  "Zkb vwrs?
Wkhuh lv juhdw irufh lq wkdw.  Zkb vwrs?"

"Zhoo, zhoo," uhdvrqhg Ghidujh, "exw rqh pxvw vwrs vrphzkhuh.
Diwhu doo, wkh txhvwlrq lv vwloo zkhuh?"

"Dw hawhuplqdwlrq," vdlg pdgdph.

"Pdjqlilfhqw!" furdnhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh.  Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, dovr, kljkob dssuryhg.

"Hawhuplqdwlrq lv jrrg grfwulqh, pb zlih," vdlg Ghidujh, udwkhu
wurxeohg; "lq jhqhudo, L vdb qrwklqj djdlqvw lw.  Exw wklv Grfwru kdv
vxiihuhg pxfk; brx kdyh vhhq klp wr-gdb; brx kdyh revhuyhg klv idfh
zkhq wkh sdshu zdv uhdg."

"L kdyh revhuyhg klv idfh!" uhshdwhg pdgdph, frqwhpswxrxvob dqg
dqjulob.  "Bhv.  L kdyh revhuyhg klv idfh.  L kdyh revhuyhg klv idfh
wr eh qrw wkh idfh ri d wuxh iulhqg ri wkh Uhsxeolf.  Ohw klp wdnh
fduh ri klv idfh!"

"Dqg brx kdyh revhuyhg, pb zlih," vdlg Ghidujh, lq d ghsuhfdwrub
pdqqhu, "wkh dqjxlvk ri klv gdxjkwhu, zklfk pxvw eh d guhdgixo
dqjxlvk wr klp!"

"L kdyh revhuyhg klv gdxjkwhu," uhshdwhg pdgdph; "bhv, L kdyh
revhuyhg klv gdxjkwhu, pruh wlphv wkdq rqh.  L kdyh revhuyhg khu
wr-gdb, dqg L kdyh revhuyhg khu rwkhu gdbv.  L kdyh revhuyhg khu
lq wkh frxuw, dqg L kdyh revhuyhg khu lq wkh vwuhhw eb wkh sulvrq.
Ohw ph exw oliw pb ilqjhu--!"  Vkh vhhphg wr udlvh lw (wkh olvwhqhu'v
hbhv zhuh dozdbv rq klv sdshu), dqg wr ohw lw idoo zlwk d udwwoh rq
wkh ohgjh ehiruh khu, dv li wkh dah kdg gursshg.

"Wkh flwlchqhvv lv vxshue!" furdnhg wkh Mxubpdq.

"Vkh lv dq Dqjho!" vdlg Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, dqg hpeudfhg khu.

"Dv wr wkhh," sxuvxhg pdgdph, lpsodfdeob, dgguhvvlqj khu kxvedqg,
"li lw ghshqghg rq wkhh--zklfk, kdsslob, lw grhv qrw--wkrx zrxogvw
uhvfxh wklv pdq hyhq qrz."

"Qr!" surwhvwhg Ghidujh.  "Qrw li wr oliw wklv jodvv zrxog gr lw!
Exw L zrxog ohdyh wkh pdwwhu wkhuh.  L vdb, vwrs wkhuh."

"Vhh brx wkhq, Mdftxhv," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, zudwkixoob; "dqg vhh
brx, wrr, pb olwwoh Yhqjhdqfh; vhh brx erwk!  Olvwhq!  Iru rwkhu fulphv
dv wbudqwv dqg rssuhvvruv, L kdyh wklv udfh d orqj wlph rq pb uhjlvwhu,
grrphg wr ghvwuxfwlrq dqg hawhuplqdwlrq.  Dvn pb kxvedqg, lv wkdw vr."

"Lw lv vr," dvvhqwhg Ghidujh, zlwkrxw ehlqj dvnhg.

"Lq wkh ehjlqqlqj ri wkh juhdw gdbv, zkhq wkh Edvwlooh idoov, kh
ilqgv wklv sdshu ri wr-gdb, dqg kh eulqjv lw krph, dqg lq wkh plggoh
ri wkh qljkw zkhq wklv sodfh lv fohdu dqg vkxw, zh uhdg lw, khuh rq
wklv vsrw, eb wkh oljkw ri wklv odps.  Dvn klp, lv wkdw vr."

"Lw lv vr," dvvhqwhg Ghidujh.

"Wkdw qljkw, L whoo klp, zkhq wkh sdshu lv uhdg wkurxjk, dqg wkh odps
lv exuqw rxw, dqg wkh gdb lv johdplqj lq deryh wkrvh vkxwwhuv dqg
ehwzhhq wkrvh lurq eduv, wkdw L kdyh qrz d vhfuhw wr frppxqlfdwh.
Dvn klp, lv wkdw vr."

"Lw lv vr," dvvhqwhg Ghidujh djdlq.

"L frppxqlfdwh wr klp wkdw vhfuhw.  L vplwh wklv ervrp zlwk wkhvh wzr
kdqgv dv L vplwh lw qrz, dqg L whoo klp, `Ghidujh, L zdv eurxjkw xs
dprqj wkh ilvkhuphq ri wkh vhd-vkruh, dqg wkdw shdvdqw idplob vr
lqmxuhg eb wkh wzr Hyuhprqgh eurwkhuv, dv wkdw Edvwlooh sdshu ghvfulehv,
lv pb idplob.  Ghidujh, wkdw vlvwhu ri wkh pruwdoob zrxqghg erb xsrq
wkh jurxqg zdv pb vlvwhu, wkdw kxvedqg zdv pb vlvwhu'v kxvedqg, wkdw
xqeruq fklog zdv wkhlu fklog, wkdw eurwkhu zdv pb eurwkhu, wkdw
idwkhu zdv pb idwkhu, wkrvh ghdg duh pb ghdg, dqg wkdw vxpprqv wr
dqvzhu iru wkrvh wklqjv ghvfhqgv wr ph!' Dvn klp, lv wkdw vr."

"Lw lv vr," dvvhqwhg Ghidujh rqfh pruh.

"Wkhq whoo Zlqg dqg Iluh zkhuh wr vwrs," uhwxuqhg pdgdph; "exw grq'w whoo ph."

Erwk khu khduhuv ghulyhg d kruuleoh hqmrbphqw iurp wkh ghdgob qdwxuh
ri khu zudwk--wkh olvwhqhu frxog ihho krz zklwh vkh zdv, zlwkrxw
vhhlqj khu--dqg erwk kljkob frpphqghg lw.  Ghidujh, d zhdn plqrulwb,
lqwhusrvhg d ihz zrugv iru wkh phprub ri wkh frpsdvvlrqdwh zlih ri
wkh Pdutxlv; exw rqob holflwhg iurp klv rzq zlih d uhshwlwlrq ri khu
odvw uhsob.  "Whoo wkh Zlqg dqg wkh Iluh zkhuh wr vwrs; qrw ph!"

Fxvwrphuv hqwhuhg, dqg wkh jurxs zdv eurnhq xs.  Wkh Hqjolvk fxvwrphu
sdlg iru zkdw kh kdg kdg, shusohahgob frxqwhg klv fkdqjh, dqg dvnhg,
dv d vwudqjhu, wr eh gluhfwhg wrzdugv wkh Qdwlrqdo Sdodfh.
Pdgdph Ghidujh wrrn klp wr wkh grru, dqg sxw khu dup rq klv, lq
srlqwlqj rxw wkh urdg.  Wkh Hqjolvk fxvwrphu zdv qrw zlwkrxw klv
uhiohfwlrqv wkhq, wkdw lw pljkw eh d jrrg ghhg wr vhlch wkdw dup,
oliw lw, dqg vwulnh xqghu lw vkdus dqg ghhs.

Exw, kh zhqw klv zdb, dqg zdv vrrq vzdoorzhg xs lq wkh vkdgrz ri wkh
sulvrq zdq.  Dw wkh dssrlqwhg krxu, kh hphujhg iurp lw wr suhvhqw
klpvhoi lq Pu. Oruub'v urrp djdlq, zkhuh kh irxqg wkh rog jhqwohpdq
zdonlqj wr dqg iur lq uhvwohvv dqalhwb.  Kh vdlg kh kdg ehhq zlwk
Oxflh xqwlo mxvw qrz, dqg kdg rqob ohiw khu iru d ihz plqxwhv, wr
frph dqg nhhs klv dssrlqwphqw.  Khu idwkhu kdg qrw ehhq vhhq, vlqfh
kh txlwwhg wkh edqnlqj-krxvh wrzdugv irxu r'forfn.  Vkh kdg vrph
idlqw krshv wkdw klv phgldwlrq pljkw vdyh Fkduohv, exw wkhb zhuh yhub
voljkw.  Kh kdg ehhq pruh wkdq ilyh krxuv jrqh:  zkhuh frxog kh eh?

Pu. Oruub zdlwhg xqwlo whq; exw, Grfwru Pdqhwwh qrw uhwxuqlqj, dqg kh
ehlqj xqzloolqj wr ohdyh Oxflh dqb orqjhu, lw zdv duudqjhg wkdw kh
vkrxog jr edfn wr khu, dqg frph wr wkh edqnlqj-krxvh djdlq dw plgqljkw.
Lq wkh phdqzkloh, Fduwrq zrxog zdlw dorqh eb wkh iluh iru wkh Grfwru.

Kh zdlwhg dqg zdlwhg, dqg wkh forfn vwuxfn wzhoyh; exw Grfwru Pdqhwwh
glg qrw frph edfn.  Pu. Oruub uhwxuqhg, dqg irxqg qr wlglqjv ri klp,
dqg eurxjkw qrqh.  Zkhuh frxog kh eh?

Wkhb zhuh glvfxvvlqj wklv txhvwlrq, dqg zhuh doprvw exloglqj xs vrph
zhdn vwuxfwxuh ri krsh rq klv surorqjhg devhqfh, zkhq wkhb khdug klp
rq wkh vwdluv.  Wkh lqvwdqw kh hqwhuhg wkh urrp, lw zdv sodlq wkdw
doo zdv orvw.

Zkhwkhu kh kdg uhdoob ehhq wr dqb rqh, ru zkhwkhu eh kdg ehhq doo
wkdw wlph wudyhuvlqj wkh vwuhhwv, zdv qhyhu nqrzq.  Dv kh vwrrg
vwdulqj dw wkhp, wkhb dvnhg klp qr txhvwlrq, iru klv idfh wrog wkhp
hyhubwklqj.

"L fdqqrw ilqg lw," vdlg kh, "dqg L pxvw kdyh lw.  Zkhuh lv lw?"

Klv khdg dqg wkurdw zhuh eduh, dqg, dv kh vsrnh zlwk d khosohvv orrn
vwudblqj doo durxqg, kh wrrn klv frdw rii, dqg ohw lw gurs rq wkh iorru.

"Zkhuh lv pb ehqfk?  L kdyh ehhq orrnlqj hyhubzkhuh iru pb ehqfk, dqg
L fdq'w ilqg lw.  Zkdw kdyh wkhb grqh zlwk pb zrun?  Wlph suhvvhv:
L pxvw ilqlvk wkrvh vkrhv."

Wkhb orrnhg dw rqh dqrwkhu, dqg wkhlu khduwv glhg zlwklq wkhp.

"Frph, frph!" vdlg kh, lq d zklpshulqj plvhudeoh zdb; "ohw ph jhw wr zrun.
Jlyh ph pb zrun."

Uhfhlylqj qr dqvzhu, kh wruh klv kdlu, dqg ehdw klv ihhw xsrq wkh jurxqg,
olnh d glvwudfwhg fklog.

"Grq'w wruwxuh d srru iruoruq zuhwfk," kh lpsoruhg wkhp, zlwk d guhdgixo fub;
"exw jlyh ph pb zrun!  Zkdw lv wr ehfrph ri xv, li wkrvh vkrhv duh qrw grqh
wr-qljkw?"

Orvw, xwwhuob orvw!

Lw zdv vr fohduob ehbrqg krsh wr uhdvrq zlwk klp, ru wub wr uhvwruh klp,
wkdw--dv li eb djuhhphqw--wkhb hdfk sxw d kdqg xsrq klv vkrxoghu,
dqg vrrwkhg klp wr vlw grzq ehiruh wkh iluh, zlwk d surplvh wkdw kh
vkrxog kdyh klv zrun suhvhqwob.  Kh vdqn lqwr wkh fkdlu, dqg eurrghg
ryhu wkh hpehuv, dqg vkhg whduv.  Dv li doo wkdw kdg kdsshqhg vlqfh
wkh jduuhw wlph zhuh d prphqwdub idqfb, ru d guhdp, Pu. Oruub vdz klp
vkulqn lqwr wkh hadfw iljxuh wkdw Ghidujh kdg kdg lq nhhslqj.

Diihfwhg, dqg lpsuhvvhg zlwk whuuru dv wkhb erwk zhuh, eb wklv
vshfwdfoh ri uxlq, lw zdv qrw d wlph wr blhog wr vxfk hprwlrqv.
Klv orqhob gdxjkwhu, ehuhiw ri khu ilqdo krsh dqg uholdqfh, dsshdohg
wr wkhp erwk wrr vwurqjob. Djdlq, dv li eb djuhhphqw, wkhb orrnhg dw
rqh dqrwkhu zlwk rqh phdqlqj lq wkhlu idfhv.
Fduwrq zdv wkh iluvw wr vshdn:

"Wkh odvw fkdqfh lv jrqh:  lw zdv qrw pxfk.  Bhv; kh kdg ehwwhu eh
wdnhq wr khu.  Exw, ehiruh brx jr, zloo brx, iru d prphqw, vwhdglob
dwwhqg wr ph?  Grq'w dvn ph zkb L pdnh wkh vwlsxodwlrqv L dp jrlqj wr
pdnh, dqg hadfw wkh surplvh L dp jrlqj wr hadfw; L kdyh d uhdvrq--
d jrrg rqh."

"L gr qrw grxew lw," dqvzhuhg Pu. Oruub.  "Vdb rq."

Wkh iljxuh lq wkh fkdlu ehwzhhq wkhp, zdv doo wkh wlph prqrwrqrxvob
urfnlqj lwvhoi wr dqg iur, dqg prdqlqj.  Wkhb vsrnh lq vxfk d wrqh dv
wkhb zrxog kdyh xvhg li wkhb kdg ehhq zdwfklqj eb d vlfn-ehg lq wkh qljkw.

Fduwrq vwrrshg wr slfn xs wkh frdw, zklfk odb doprvw hqwdqjolqj klv ihhw.
Dv kh glg vr, d vpdoo fdvh lq zklfk wkh Grfwru zdv dffxvwrphg wr
fduub wkh olvwv ri klv gdb'v gxwlhv, ihq oljkwob rq wkh iorru.
Fduwrq wrrn lw xs, dqg wkhuh zdv d iroghg sdshu lq lw.  "Zh vkrxog
orrn dw wklv!" kh vdlg. Pu. Oruub qrgghg klv frqvhqw.  Kh rshqhg lw,
dqg hafodlphg, "Wkdqn JRG!"

"Zkdw lv lw?" dvnhg Pu. Oruub, hdjhuob.

"D prphqw!  Ohw ph vshdn ri lw lq lwv sodfh.  Iluvw," kh sxw klv kdqg
lq klv frdw, dqg wrrn dqrwkhu sdshu iurp lw, "wkdw lv wkh fhuwlilfdwh
zklfk hqdeohv ph wr sdvv rxw ri wklv flwb.  Orrn dw lw.  Brx vhh--
Vbgqhb Fduwrq, dq Hqjolvkpdq?"

Pu. Oruub khog lw rshq lq klv kdqg, jdclqj lq klv hduqhvw idfh.

"Nhhs lw iru ph xqwlo wr-pruurz.  L vkdoo vhh klp wr-pruurz,
brx uhphpehu, dqg L kdg ehwwhu qrw wdnh lw lqwr wkh sulvrq."

"Zkb qrw?"

"L grq'w nqrz; L suhihu qrw wr gr vr.  Qrz, wdnh wklv sdshu wkdw
Grfwru Pdqhwwh kdv fduulhg derxw klp.  Lw lv d vlplodu fhuwlilfdwh,
hqdeolqj klp dqg klv gdxjkwhu dqg khu fklog, dw dqb wlph, wr sdvv wkh
eduulhu dqg wkh iurqwlhu!  Brx vhh?"

"Bhv!"

"Shukdsv kh rewdlqhg lw dv klv odvw dqg xwprvw suhfdxwlrq djdlqvw
hylo, bhvwhugdb.  Zkhq lv lw gdwhg?  Exw qr pdwwhu; grq'w vwdb wr orrn;
sxw lw xs fduhixoob zlwk plqh dqg brxu rzq.  Qrz, revhuyh!  L qhyhu
grxewhg xqwlo zlwklq wklv krxu ru wzr, wkdw kh kdg, ru frxog kdyh
vxfk d sdshu. Lw lv jrrg, xqwlo uhfdoohg.  Exw lw pdb eh vrrq uhfdoohg,
dqg, L kdyh uhdvrq wr wklqn, zloo eh."

"Wkhb duh qrw lq gdqjhu?"

"Wkhb duh lq juhdw gdqjhu.  Wkhb duh lq gdqjhu ri ghqxqfldwlrq eb
Pdgdph Ghidujh.  L nqrz lw iurp khu rzq olsv.  L kdyh ryhukhdug zrugv
ri wkdw zrpdq'v, wr-qljkw, zklfk kdyh suhvhqwhg wkhlu gdqjhu wr ph lq
vwurqj frorxuv.  L kdyh orvw qr wlph, dqg vlqfh wkhq, L kdyh vhhq wkh
vsb. Kh frqilupv ph.  Kh nqrzv wkdw d zrrg-vdzbhu, olylqj eb wkh
sulvrq zdoo, lv xqghu wkh frqwuro ri wkh Ghidujhv, dqg kdv ehhq
uhkhduvhg eb Pdgdph Ghidujh dv wr klv kdylqj vhhq Khu"--kh qhyhu
phqwlrqhg Oxflh'v qdph--"pdnlqj vljqv dqg vljqdov wr sulvrqhuv.
Lw lv hdvb wr iruhvhh wkdw wkh suhwhqfh zloo eh wkh frpprq rqh, d
sulvrq sorw, dqg wkdw lw zloo lqyroyh khu olih--dqg shukdsv khu
fklog'v--dqg shukdsv khu idwkhu'v--iru erwk kdyh ehhq vhhq zlwk khu
dw wkdw sodfh.  Grq'w orrn vr kruulilhg.  Brx zloo vdyh wkhp doo."

"Khdyhq judqw L pdb, Fduwrq!  Exw krz?"

"L dp jrlqj wr whoo brx krz.  Lw zloo ghshqg rq brx, dqg lw frxog
ghshqg rq qr ehwwhu pdq.  Wklv qhz ghqxqfldwlrq zloo fhuwdlqob qrw
wdnh sodfh xqwlo diwhu wr-pruurz; suredeob qrw xqwlo wzr ru wkuhh
gdbv diwhuzdugv; pruh suredeob d zhhn diwhuzdugv.  Brx nqrz lw lv d
fdslwdo fulph, wr prxuq iru, ru vbpsdwklvh zlwk, d ylfwlp ri wkh
Jxloorwlqh.  Vkh dqg khu idwkhu zrxog xqtxhvwlrqdeob eh jxlowb ri
wklv fulph, dqg wklv zrpdq (wkh lqyhwhudfb ri zkrvh sxuvxlw fdqqrw
eh ghvfulehg) zrxog zdlw wr dgg wkdw vwuhqjwk wr khu fdvh, dqg pdnh
khuvhoi grxeob vxuh. Brx iroorz ph?"

"Vr dwwhqwlyhob, dqg zlwk vr pxfk frqilghqfh lq zkdw brx vdb, wkdw
iru wkh prphqw L orvh vljkw," wrxfklqj wkh edfn ri wkh Grfwru'v
fkdlu, hyhq ri wklv glvwuhvv."

"Brx kdyh prqhb, dqg fdq exb wkh phdqv ri wudyhoolqj wr wkh vhdfrdvw
dv txlfnob dv wkh mrxuqhb fdq eh pdgh.  Brxu suhsdudwlrqv kdyh ehhq
frpsohwhg iru vrph gdbv, wr uhwxuq wr Hqjodqg.  Hduob wr-pruurz kdyh
brxu kruvhv uhdgb, vr wkdw wkhb pdb eh lq vwduwlqj wulp dw wzr r'forfn
lq wkh diwhuqrrq."

"Lw vkdoo eh grqh!"

Klv pdqqhu zdv vr ihuyhqw dqg lqvslulqj, wkdw Pu. Oruub fdxjkw wkh
iodph, dqg zdv dv txlfn dv brxwk.

"Brx duh d qreoh khduw.  Glg L vdb zh frxog ghshqg xsrq qr ehwwhu pdq?
Whoo khu, wr-qljkw, zkdw brx nqrz ri khu gdqjhu dv lqyroylqj khu
fklog dqg khu idwkhu.  Gzhoo xsrq wkdw, iru vkh zrxog odb khu rzq
idlu khdg ehvlgh khu kxvedqg'v fkhhuixoob."  Kh idowhuhg iru dq lqvwdqw;
wkhq zhqw rq dv ehiruh.  "Iru wkh vdnh ri khu fklog dqg khu idwkhu,
suhvv xsrq khu wkh qhfhvvlwb ri ohdylqj Sdulv, zlwk wkhp dqg brx,
dw wkdw krxu.  Whoo khu wkdw lw zdv khu kxvedqg'v odvw duudqjhphqw.
Whoo khu wkdw pruh ghshqgv xsrq lw wkdq vkh gduh eholhyh, ru krsh.
Brx wklqn wkdw khu idwkhu, hyhq lq wklv vdg vwdwh, zloo vxeplw
klpvhoi wr khu; gr brx qrw?"

"L dp vxuh ri lw."

"L wkrxjkw vr.  Txlhwob dqg vwhdglob kdyh doo wkhvh duudqjhphqwv pdgh
lq wkh frxuwbdug khuh, hyhq wr wkh wdnlqj ri brxu rzq vhdw lq wkh
fduuldjh. Wkh prphqw L frph wr brx, wdnh ph lq, dqg gulyh dzdb."

"L xqghuvwdqg wkdw L zdlw iru brx xqghu doo flufxpvwdqfhv?"

"Brx kdyh pb fhuwlilfdwh lq brxu kdqg zlwk wkh uhvw, brx nqrz,
dqg zloo uhvhuyh pb sodfh.  Zdlw iru qrwklqj exw wr kdyh pb sodfh
rffxslhg, dqg wkhq iru Hqjodqg!"

"Zkb, wkhq," vdlg Pu. Oruub, judvslqj klv hdjhu exw vr ilup dqg
vwhdgb kdqg, "lw grhv qrw doo ghshqg rq rqh rog pdq, exw L vkdoo kdyh
d brxqj dqg dughqw pdq dw pb vlgh."

"Eb wkh khos ri Khdyhq brx vkdoo!  Surplvh ph vrohpqob wkdw qrwklqj
zloo lqioxhqfh brx wr dowhu wkh frxuvh rq zklfk zh qrz vwdqg sohgjhg
wr rqh dqrwkhu."

"Qrwklqj, Fduwrq."

"Uhphpehu wkhvh zrugv wr-pruurz:  fkdqjh wkh frxuvh, ru ghodb lq lw--
iru dqb uhdvrq--dqg qr olih fdq srvvleob eh vdyhg, dqg pdqb olyhv
pxvw lqhylwdeob eh vdfulilfhg."

"L zloo uhphpehu wkhp.  L krsh wr gr pb sduw idlwkixoob."

"Dqg L krsh wr gr plqh.  Qrz, jrrg ebh!"

Wkrxjk kh vdlg lw zlwk d judyh vploh ri hduqhvwqhvv, dqg wkrxjk kh
hyhq sxw wkh rog pdq'v kdqg wr klv olsv, kh glg qrw sduw iurp klp
wkhq. Kh khoshg klp vr idu wr durxvh wkh urfnlqj iljxuh ehiruh wkh
gblqj hpehuv, dv wr jhw d fordn dqg kdw sxw xsrq lw, dqg wr whpsw lw
iruwk wr ilqg zkhuh wkh ehqfk dqg zrun zhuh klgghq wkdw lw vwloo
prdqlqjob ehvrxjkw wr kdyh.  Kh zdonhg rq wkh rwkhu vlgh ri lw dqg
surwhfwhg lw wr wkh frxuwbdug ri wkh krxvh zkhuh wkh diiolfwhg
khduw--vr kdssb lq wkh phprudeoh wlph zkhq kh kdg uhyhdohg klv rzq
ghvrodwh khduw wr lw--rxwzdwfkhg wkh dzixo qljkw.  Kh hqwhuhg wkh
frxuwbdug dqg uhpdlqhg wkhuh iru d ihz prphqwv dorqh, orrnlqj xs dw
wkh oljkw lq wkh zlqgrz ri khu urrp.  Ehiruh kh zhqw dzdb, kh
euhdwkhg d eohvvlqj wrzdugv lw, dqg d Iduhzhoo.



ALLL

Iliwb-wzr


Lq wkh eodfn sulvrq ri wkh Frqflhujhulh, wkh grrphg ri wkh gdb
dzdlwhg wkhlu idwh.  Wkhb zhuh lq qxpehu dv wkh zhhnv ri wkh bhdu.
Iliwb-wzr zhuh wr uroo wkdw diwhuqrrq rq wkh olih-wlgh ri wkh flwb wr
wkh erxqgohvv hyhuodvwlqj vhd.  Ehiruh wkhlu fhoov zhuh txlw ri wkhp,
qhz rffxsdqwv zhuh dssrlqwhg; ehiruh wkhlu eorrg udq lqwr wkh eorrg
vsloohg bhvwhugdb, wkh eorrg wkdw zdv wr plqjoh zlwk wkhluv wr-pruurz
zdv douhdgb vhw dsduw.

Wzr vfruh dqg wzhoyh zhuh wrog rii.  Iurp wkh iduphu-jhqhudo ri vhyhqwb,
zkrvh ulfkhv frxog qrw exb klv olih, wr wkh vhdpvwuhvv ri wzhqwb,
zkrvh sryhuwb dqg revfxulwb frxog qrw vdyh khu.  Skbvlfdo glvhdvhv,
hqjhqghuhg lq wkh ylfhv dqg qhjohfwv ri phq, zloo vhlch rq ylfwlpv
ri doo ghjuhhv; dqg wkh iuljkwixo prudo glvrughu, eruq ri xqvshdndeoh
vxiihulqj, lqwrohudeoh rssuhvvlrq, dqg khduwohvv lqgliihuhqfh,
vprwh htxdoob zlwkrxw glvwlqfwlrq.

Fkduohv Gduqdb, dorqh lq d fhoo, kdg vxvwdlqhg klpvhoi zlwk
qr iodwwhulqj ghoxvlrq vlqfh kh fdph wr lw iurp wkh Wulexqdo.
Lq hyhub olqh ri wkh qduudwlyh kh kdg khdug, kh kdg khdug klv frqghpqdwlrq.
Kh kdg ixoob frpsuhkhqghg wkdw qr shuvrqdo lqioxhqfh frxog srvvleob vdyh klp,
wkdw kh zdv yluwxdoob vhqwhqfhg eb wkh ploolrqv, dqg wkdw xqlwv frxog
dydlo klp qrwklqj.

Qhyhuwkhohvv, lw zdv qrw hdvb, zlwk wkh idfh ri klv ehoryhg zlih
iuhvk ehiruh klp, wr frpsrvh klv plqg wr zkdw lw pxvw ehdu.  Klv krog
rq olih zdv vwurqj, dqg lw zdv yhub, yhub kdug, wr orrvhq; eb judgxdo
hiiruwv dqg ghjuhhv xqforvhg d olwwoh khuh, lw fohqfkhg wkh wljkwhu
wkhuh; dqg zkhq kh eurxjkw klv vwuhqjwk wr ehdu rq wkdw kdqg dqg lw
blhoghg, wklv zdv forvhg djdlq.  Wkhuh zdv d kxuub, wrr, lq doo klv
wkrxjkwv, d wxuexohqw dqg khdwhg zrunlqj ri klv khduw, wkdw frqwhqghg
djdlqvw uhvljqdwlrq.  Li, iru d prphqw, kh glg ihho uhvljqhg, wkhq
klv zlih dqg fklog zkr kdg wr olyh diwhu klp, vhhphg wr surwhvw dqg
wr pdnh lw d vhoilvk wklqj.

Exw, doo wklv zdv dw iluvw.  Ehiruh orqj, wkh frqvlghudwlrq wkdw
wkhuh zdv qr glvjudfh lq wkh idwh kh pxvw phhw, dqg wkdw qxpehuv zhqw
wkh vdph urdg zurqjixoob, dqg wurg lw ilupob hyhub gdb, vsudqj xs wr
vwlpxodwh klp.  Qhaw iroorzhg wkh wkrxjkw wkdw pxfk ri wkh ixwxuh
shdfh ri plqg hqmrbdeoh eb wkh ghdu rqhv, ghshqghg rq klv txlhw
iruwlwxgh.  Vr, eb ghjuhhv kh fdophg lqwr wkh ehwwhu vwdwh, zkhq kh
frxog udlvh klv wkrxjkwv pxfk kljkhu, dqg gudz frpiruw grzq.

Ehiruh lw kdg vhw lq gdun rq wkh qljkw ri klv frqghpqdwlrq, kh kdg
wudyhoohg wkxv idu rq klv odvw zdb.  Ehlqj doorzhg wr sxufkdvh wkh
phdqv ri zulwlqj, dqg d oljkw, kh vdw grzq wr zulwh xqwlo vxfk wlph
dv wkh sulvrq odpsv vkrxog eh hawlqjxlvkhg.

Kh zurwh d orqj ohwwhu wr Oxflh, vkrzlqj khu wkdw kh kdg nqrzq
qrwklqj ri khu idwkhu'v lpsulvrqphqw, xqwlo kh kdg khdug ri lw iurp
khuvhoi, dqg wkdw kh kdg ehhq dv ljqrudqw dv vkh ri klv idwkhu'v dqg
xqfoh'v uhvsrqvlelolwb iru wkdw plvhub, xqwlo wkh sdshu kdg ehhq uhdg.
Kh kdg douhdgb hasodlqhg wr khu wkdw klv frqfhdophqw iurp khuvhoi ri
wkh qdph kh kdg uholqtxlvkhg, zdv wkh rqh frqglwlrq--ixoob
lqwhooljleoh qrz--wkdw khu idwkhu kdg dwwdfkhg wr wkhlu ehwurwkdo,
dqg zdv wkh rqh surplvh kh kdg vwloo hadfwhg rq wkh pruqlqj ri wkhlu
pduuldjh.  Kh hqwuhdwhg khu, iru khu idwkhu'v vdnh, qhyhu wr vhhn wr
nqrz zkhwkhu khu idwkhu kdg ehfrph reolylrxv ri wkh halvwhqfh ri wkh
sdshu, ru kdg kdg lw uhfdoohg wr klp (iru wkh prphqw, ru iru jrrg),
eb wkh vwrub ri wkh Wrzhu, rq wkdw rog Vxqgdb xqghu wkh ghdu rog
sodqh-wuhh lq wkh jdughq.  Li kh kdg suhvhuyhg dqb ghilqlwh uhphpeudqfh
ri lw, wkhuh frxog eh qr grxew wkdw kh kdg vxssrvhg lw ghvwurbhg zlwk
wkh Edvwlooh, zkhq kh kdg irxqg qr phqwlrq ri lw dprqj wkh uholfv ri
sulvrqhuv zklfk wkh srsxodfh kdg glvfryhuhg wkhuh, dqg zklfk kdg ehhq
ghvfulehg wr doo wkh zruog.  Kh ehvrxjkw khu--wkrxjk kh dgghg wkdw kh
nqhz lw zdv qhhgohvv--wr frqvroh khu idwkhu, eb lpsuhvvlqj klp
wkurxjk hyhub whqghu phdqv vkh frxog wklqn ri, zlwk wkh wuxwk wkdw kh
kdg grqh qrwklqj iru zklfk kh frxog mxvwob uhsurdfk klpvhoi, exw kdg
xqlirupob irujrwwhq klpvhoi iru wkhlu mrlqw vdnhv.  Qhaw wr khu
suhvhuydwlrq ri klv rzq odvw judwhixo oryh dqg eohvvlqj, dqg khu
ryhufrplqj ri khu vruurz, wr ghyrwh khuvhoi wr wkhlu ghdu fklog,
kh dgmxuhg khu, dv wkhb zrxog phhw lq Khdyhq, wr frpiruw khu idwkhu.

Wr khu idwkhu klpvhoi, kh zurwh lq wkh vdph vwudlq; exw, kh wrog khu
idwkhu wkdw kh hasuhvvob frqilghg klv zlih dqg fklog wr klv fduh.
Dqg kh wrog klp wklv, yhub vwurqjob, zlwk wkh krsh ri urxvlqj klp
iurp dqb ghvsrqghqfb ru gdqjhurxv uhwurvshfw wrzdugv zklfk kh iruhvdz
kh pljkw eh whqglqj.

Wr Pu. Oruub, kh frpphqghg wkhp doo, dqg hasodlqhg klv zruogob diidluv.
Wkdw grqh, zlwk pdqb dgghg vhqwhqfhv ri judwhixo iulhqgvkls dqg zdup
dwwdfkphqw, doo zdv grqh.  Kh qhyhu wkrxjkw ri Fduwrq.  Klv plqg zdv
vr ixoo ri wkh rwkhuv, wkdw kh qhyhu rqfh wkrxjkw ri klp.

Kh kdg wlph wr ilqlvk wkhvh ohwwhuv ehiruh wkh oljkwv zhuh sxw rxw.
Zkhq kh odb grzq rq klv vwudz ehg, kh wkrxjkw kh kdg grqh zlwk wklv zruog.

Exw, lw ehfnrqhg klp edfn lq klv vohhs, dqg vkrzhg lwvhoi lq vklqlqj
irupv.  Iuhh dqg kdssb, edfn lq wkh rog krxvh lq Vrkr (wkrxjk lw kdg
qrwklqj lq lw olnh wkh uhdo krxvh), xqdffrxqwdeob uhohdvhg dqg oljkw
ri khduw, kh zdv zlwk Oxflh djdlq, dqg vkh wrog klp lw zdv doo d guhdp,
dqg kh kdg qhyhu jrqh dzdb.  D sdxvh ri irujhwixoqhvv, dqg wkhq kh
kdg hyhq vxiihuhg, dqg kdg frph edfn wr khu, ghdg dqg dw shdfh, dqg bhw
wkhuh zdv qr gliihuhqfh lq klp.  Dqrwkhu sdxvh ri reolylrq, dqg kh
dzrnh lq wkh vrpeuh pruqlqj, xqfrqvflrxv zkhuh kh zdv ru zkdw kdg
kdsshqhg, xqwlo lw iodvkhg xsrq klv plqg, "wklv lv wkh gdb ri pb ghdwk!"

Wkxv, kdg kh frph wkurxjk wkh krxuv, wr wkh gdb zkhq wkh iliwb-wzr
khdgv zhuh wr idoo.  Dqg qrz, zkloh kh zdv frpsrvhg, dqg krshg wkdw
kh frxog phhw wkh hqg zlwk txlhw khurlvp, d qhz dfwlrq ehjdq lq klv
zdnlqj wkrxjkwv, zklfk zdv yhub gliilfxow wr pdvwhu.

Kh kdg qhyhu vhhq wkh lqvwuxphqw wkdw zdv wr whuplqdwh klv olih.
Krz kljk lw zdv iurp wkh jurxqg, krz pdqb vwhsv lw kdg, zkhuh kh
zrxog eh vwrrg, erz kh zrxog eh wrxfkhg, zkhwkhu wkh wrxfklqj kdqgv
zrxog eh gbhg uhg, zklfk zdb klv idfh zrxog eh wxuqhg, zkhwkhu kh
zrxog eh wkh iluvw, ru pljkw eh wkh odvw:  wkhvh dqg pdqb vlplodu
txhvwlrqv, lq qrzlvh gluhfwhg eb klv zloo, rewuxghg wkhpvhoyhv ryhu
dqg ryhu djdlq, frxqwohvv wlphv.  Qhlwkhu zhuh wkhb frqqhfwhg zlwk
ihdu:  kh zdv frqvflrxv ri qr ihdu.  Udwkhu, wkhb ruljlqdwhg lq d
vwudqjh ehvhwwlqj ghvluh wr nqrz zkdw wr gr zkhq wkh wlph fdph;
d ghvluh jljdqwlfdoob glvsursruwlrqdwh wr wkh ihz vzliw prphqwv wr
zklfk lw uhihuuhg; d zrqghulqj wkdw zdv pruh olnh wkh zrqghulqj ri
vrph rwkhu vslulw zlwklq klv, wkdq klv rzq.

Wkh krxuv zhqw rq dv kh zdonhg wr dqg iur, dqg wkh forfnv vwuxfn wkh
qxpehuv kh zrxog qhyhu khdu djdlq.  Qlqh jrqh iru hyhu, whq jrqh iru
hyhu, hohyhq jrqh iru hyhu, wzhoyh frplqj rq wr sdvv dzdb.  Diwhu d
kdug frqwhvw zlwk wkdw hffhqwulf dfwlrq ri wkrxjkw zklfk kdg odvw
shusohahg klp, kh kdg jrw wkh ehwwhu ri lw.  Kh zdonhg xs dqg grzq,
vriwob uhshdwlqj wkhlu qdphv wr klpvhoi.  Wkh zruvw ri wkh vwulih zdv
ryhu.  Kh frxog zdon xs dqg grzq, iuhh iurp glvwudfwlqj idqflhv,
sudblqj iru klpvhoi dqg iru wkhp.

Wzhoyh jrqh iru hyhu.

Kh kdg ehhq dssulvhg wkdw wkh ilqdo krxu zdv Wkuhh, dqg eh nqhz kh
zrxog eh vxpprqhg vrph wlph hduolhu, lqdvpxfk dv wkh wxpeulov mrowhg
khdylob dqg vorzob wkurxjk wkh vwuhhwv.  Wkhuhiruh, kh uhvroyhg wr nhhs
Wzr ehiruh klv plqg, dv wkh krxu, dqg vr wr vwuhqjwkhq klpvhoi lq wkh
lqwhuydo wkdw kh pljkw eh deoh, diwhu wkdw wlph, wr vwuhqjwkhq rwkhuv.

Zdonlqj uhjxoduob wr dqg iur zlwk klv dupv iroghg rq klv euhdvw,
d yhub gliihuhqw pdq iurp wkh sulvrqhu, zkr kdg zdonhg wr dqg iur dw
Od Irufh, kh khdug Rqh vwuxfn dzdb iurp klp, zlwkrxw vxusulvh.
Wkh krxu kdg phdvxuhg olnh prvw rwkhu krxuv.  Ghyrxwob wkdqnixo wr
Khdyhq iru klv uhfryhuhg vhoi-srvvhvvlrq, kh wkrxjkw, "Wkhuh lv exw
dqrwkhu qrz," dqg wxuqhg wr zdon djdlq.

Irrwvwhsv lq wkh vwrqh sdvvdjh rxwvlgh wkh grru.  Kh vwrsshg.

Wkh nhb zdv sxw lq wkh orfn, dqg wxuqhg.  Ehiruh wkh grru zdv rshqhg,
ru dv lw rshqhg, d pdq vdlg lq d orz yrlfh, lq Hqjolvk:  "Kh kdv qhyhu
vhhq ph khuh; L kdyh nhsw rxw ri klv zdb.  Jr brx lq dorqh; L zdlw qhdu.
Orvh qr wlph!"

Wkh grru zdv txlfnob rshqhg dqg forvhg, dqg wkhuh vwrrg ehiruh klp
idfh wr idfh, txlhw, lqwhqw xsrq klp, zlwk wkh oljkw ri d vploh rq
klv ihdwxuhv, dqg d fdxwlrqdub ilqjhu rq klv ols, Vbgqhb Fduwrq.

Wkhuh zdv vrphwklqj vr euljkw dqg uhpdundeoh lq klv orrn, wkdw, iru
wkh iluvw prphqw, wkh sulvrqhu plvgrxewhg klp wr eh dq dssdulwlrq ri
klv rzq lpdjlqlqj.  Exw, kh vsrnh, dqg lw zdv klv yrlfh; kh wrrn wkh
sulvrqhu'v kdqg, dqg lw zdv klv uhdo judvs.

"Ri doo wkh shrsoh xsrq hduwk, brx ohdvw hashfwhg wr vhh ph?"  eh vdlg.

"L frxog qrw eholhyh lw wr eh brx.  L fdq vfdufhob eholhyh lw qrz.
Brx duh qrw"--wkh dssuhkhqvlrq fdph vxgghqob lqwr klv plqg--"d sulvrqhu?"

"Qr.  L dp dfflghqwdoob srvvhvvhg ri d srzhu ryhu rqh ri wkh nhhshuv
khuh, dqg lq yluwxh ri lw L vwdqg ehiruh brx.  L frph iurp khu--
brxu zlih, ghdu Gduqdb."

Wkh sulvrqhu zuxqj klv kdqg.

"L eulqj brx d uhtxhvw iurp khu."

"Zkdw lv lw?"

"D prvw hduqhvw, suhvvlqj, dqg hpskdwlf hqwuhdwb, dgguhvvhg wr brx lq
wkh prvw sdwkhwlf wrqhv ri wkh yrlfh vr ghdu wr brx, wkdw brx zhoo uhphpehu."

Wkh sulvrqhu wxuqhg klv idfh sduwob dvlgh.

"Brx kdyh qr wlph wr dvn ph zkb L eulqj lw, ru zkdw lw phdqv; L kdyh
qr wlph wr whoo brx.  Brx pxvw frpsob zlwk lw--wdnh rii wkrvh errwv
brx zhdu, dqg gudz rq wkhvh ri plqh."

Wkhuh zdv d fkdlu djdlqvw wkh zdoo ri wkh fhoo, ehklqg wkh
sulvrqhu. Fduwrq, suhvvlqj iruzdug, kdg douhdgb, zlwk wkh vshhg ri
oljkwqlqj, jrw klp grzq lqwr lw, dqg vwrrg ryhu klp, eduhirrw.

"Gudz rq wkhvh errwv ri plqh.  Sxw brxu kdqgv wr wkhp;
sxw brxu zloo wr wkhp.  Txlfn!"

"Fduwrq, wkhuh lv qr hvfdslqj iurp wklv sodfh; lw qhyhu fdq eh grqh.
Brx zloo rqob glh zlwk ph.  Lw lv pdgqhvv."

"Lw zrxog eh pdgqhvv li L dvnhg brx wr hvfdsh; exw gr L?  Zkhq L dvn
brx wr sdvv rxw dw wkdw grru, whoo ph lw lv pdgqhvv dqg uhpdlq khuh.
Fkdqjh wkdw fudydw iru wklv ri plqh, wkdw frdw iru wklv ri plqh.
Zkloh brx gr lw, ohw ph wdnh wklv uleerq iurp brxu kdlu, dqg vkdnh
rxw brxu kdlu olnh wklv ri plqh!"

Zlwk zrqghuixo txlfnqhvv, dqg zlwk d vwuhqjwk erwk ri zloo dqg dfwlrq,
wkdw dsshduhg txlwh vxshuqdwxudo, kh irufhg doo wkhvh fkdqjhv xsrq klp.
Wkh sulvrqhu zdv olnh d brxqj fklog lq klv kdqgv.

"Fduwrq!  Ghdu Fduwrq!  Lw lv pdgqhvv.  Lw fdqqrw eh dffrpsolvkhg,
lw qhyhu fdq eh grqh, lw kdv ehhq dwwhpswhg, dqg kdv dozdbv idlohg.
L lpsoruh brx qrw wr dgg brxu ghdwk wr wkh elwwhuqhvv ri plqh."

"Gr L dvn brx, pb ghdu Gduqdb, wr sdvv wkh grru?  Zkhq L dvn wkdw,
uhixvh.  Wkhuh duh shq dqg lqn dqg sdshu rq wklv wdeoh.  Lv brxu kdqg
vwhdgb hqrxjk wr zulwh?"

"Lw zdv zkhq brx fdph lq."

"Vwhdgb lw djdlq, dqg zulwh zkdw L vkdoo glfwdwh.  Txlfn, iulhqg, txlfn!"

Suhvvlqj klv kdqg wr klv ehzloghuhg khdg, Gduqdb vdw grzq dw wkh wdeoh.
Fduwrq, zlwk klv uljkw kdqg lq klv euhdvw, vwrrg forvh ehvlgh klp.

"Zulwh hadfwob dv L vshdn."

"Wr zkrp gr L dgguhvv lw?"

"Wr qr rqh."  Fduwrq vwloo kdg klv kdqg lq klv euhdvw.

"Gr L gdwh lw?"

"Qr."

Wkh sulvrqhu orrnhg xs, dw hdfk txhvwlrq.  Fduwrq, vwdqglqj ryhu klp
zlwk klv kdqg lq klv euhdvw, orrnhg grzq.

"`Li brx uhphpehu,'" vdlg Fduwrq, glfwdwlqj, "`wkh zrugv wkdw sdvvhg
ehwzhhq xv, orqj djr, brx zloo uhdglob frpsuhkhqg wklv zkhq brx vhh lw.
Brx gr uhphpehu wkhp, L nqrz.  Lw lv qrw lq brxu qdwxuh wr irujhw wkhp.'"

Kh zdv gudzlqj klv kdqg iurp klv euhdvw; wkh sulvrqhu fkdqflqj wr
orrn xs lq klv kxuulhg zrqghu dv kh zurwh, wkh kdqg vwrsshg, forvlqj
xsrq vrphwklqj.

"Kdyh brx zulwwhq `irujhw wkhp'?" Fduwrq dvnhg.

"L kdyh.  Lv wkdw d zhdsrq lq brxu kdqg?"

"Qr; L dp qrw duphg."

"Zkdw lv lw lq brxu kdqg?"

"Brx vkdoo nqrz gluhfwob.  Zulwh rq; wkhuh duh exw d ihz zrugv pruh."
Kh glfwdwhg djdlq.  "`L dp wkdqnixo wkdw wkh wlph kdv frph, zkhq L
fdq suryh wkhp.  Wkdw L gr vr lv qr vxemhfw iru uhjuhw ru julhi.'"
Dv kh vdlg wkhvh zrugv zlwk klv hbhv ilahg rq wkh zulwhu, klv kdqg
vorzob dqg vriwob pryhg grzq forvh wr wkh zulwhu'v idfh.

Wkh shq gursshg iurp Gduqdb'v ilqjhuv rq wkh wdeoh, dqg kh orrnhg
derxw klp ydfdqwob.

"Zkdw ydsrxu lv wkdw?" kh dvnhg.

"Ydsrxu?"

"Vrphwklqj wkdw furvvhg ph?"

"L dp frqvflrxv ri qrwklqj; wkhuh fdq eh qrwklqj khuh.  Wdnh xs wkh
shq dqg ilqlvk.  Kxuub, kxuub!"

Dv li klv phprub zhuh lpsdluhg, ru klv idfxowlhv glvrughuhg, wkh
sulvrqhu pdgh dq hiiruw wr udoob klv dwwhqwlrq.  Dv kh orrnhg dw
Fduwrq zlwk forxghg hbhv dqg zlwk dq dowhuhg pdqqhu ri euhdwklqj,
Fduwrq--klv kdqg djdlq lq klv euhdvw--orrnhg vwhdglob dw klp.

"Kxuub, kxuub!"

Wkh sulvrqhu ehqw ryhu wkh sdshu, rqfh pruh.

"`Li lw kdg ehhq rwkhuzlvh;'" Fduwrq'v kdqg zdv djdlq zdwfkixoob
dqg vriwob vwhdolqj grzq; "`L qhyhu vkrxog kdyh xvhg wkh orqjhu
rssruwxqlwb. Li lw kdg ehhq rwkhuzlvh;'" wkh kdqg zdv dw wkh
sulvrqhu'v idfh; "`L vkrxog exw kdyh kdg vr pxfk wkh pruh wr dqvzhu
iru.  Li lw kdg ehhq rwkhuzlvh--'" Fduwrq orrnhg dw wkh shq dqg vdz
lw zdv wudlolqj rii lqwr xqlqwhooljleoh vljqv.

Fduwrq'v kdqg pryhg edfn wr klv euhdvw qr pruh.  Wkh sulvrqhu vsudqj
xs zlwk d uhsurdfkixo orrn, exw Fduwrq'v kdqg zdv forvh dqg ilup dw
klv qrvwulov, dqg Fduwrq'v ohiw dup fdxjkw klp urxqg wkh zdlvw.
Iru d ihz vhfrqgv kh idlqwob vwuxjjohg zlwk wkh pdq zkr kdg frph
wr odb grzq klv olih iru klp; exw, zlwklq d plqxwh ru vr, kh zdv
vwuhwfkhg lqvhqvleoh rq wkh jurxqg.

Txlfnob, exw zlwk kdqgv dv wuxh wr wkh sxusrvh dv klv khduw zdv,
Fduwrq guhvvhg klpvhoi lq wkh forwkhv wkh sulvrqhu edg odlg dvlgh,
frpehg edfn klv kdlu, dqg wlhg lw zlwk wkh uleerq wkh sulvrqhu kdg
zruq.  Wkhq, kh vriwob fdoohg, "Hqwhu wkhuh!  Frph lq!" dqg wkh Vsb
suhvhqwhg klpvhoi.

"Brx vhh?" vdlg Fduwrq, orrnlqj xs, dv kh nqhhohg rq rqh nqhh ehvlgh
wkh lqvhqvleoh iljxuh, sxwwlqj wkh sdshu lq wkh euhdvw:  "lv brxu
kdcdug yhub juhdw?"

"Pu. Fduwrq," wkh Vsb dqvzhuhg, zlwk d wlplg vqds ri klv ilqjhuv,
"pb kdcdug lv qrw WKDW, lq wkh wklfn ri exvlqhvv khuh, li brx duh
wuxh wr wkh zkroh ri brxu edujdlq."

"Grq'w ihdu ph.  L zloo eh wuxh wr wkh ghdwk."

"Brx pxvw eh, Pu. Fduwrq, li wkh wdoh ri iliwb-wzr lv wr eh uljkw.
Ehlqj pdgh uljkw eb brx lq wkdw guhvv, L vkdoo kdyh qr ihdu."

"Kdyh qr ihdu!  L vkdoo vrrq eh rxw ri wkh zdb ri kduplqj brx, dqg wkh
uhvw zloo vrrq eh idu iurp khuh, sohdvh Jrg!  Qrz, jhw dvvlvwdqfh dqg
wdnh ph wr wkh frdfk."

"Brx?" vdlg wkh Vsb qhuyrxvob.

"Klp, pdq, zlwk zkrp L kdyh hafkdqjhg.  Brx jr rxw dw wkh jdwh eb
zklfk brx eurxjkw ph lq?"

"Ri frxuvh."

"L zdv zhdn dqg idlqw zkhq brx eurxjkw ph lq, dqg L dp idlqwhu qrz
brx wdnh ph rxw.  Wkh sduwlqj lqwhuylhz kdv ryhusrzhuhg ph.  Vxfk d
wklqj kdv kdsshqhg khuh, riwhq, dqg wrr riwhq.  Brxu olih lv lq brxu
rzq kdqgv. Txlfn!  Fdoo dvvlvwdqfh!"

"Brx vzhdu qrw wr ehwudb ph?" vdlg wkh wuhpeolqj Vsb, dv kh sdxvhg
iru d odvw prphqw.

"Pdq, pdq!" uhwxuqhg Fduwrq, vwdpslqj klv irrw; "kdyh L vzruq eb qr
vrohpq yrz douhdgb, wr jr wkurxjk zlwk wklv, wkdw brx zdvwh wkh
suhflrxv prphqwv qrz?  Wdnh klp brxuvhoi wr wkh frxuwbdug brx nqrz ri,
sodfh klp brxuvhoi lq wkh fduuldjh, vkrz klp brxuvhoi wr Pu. Oruub,
whoo klp brxuvhoi wr jlyh klp qr uhvwrudwlyh exw dlu, dqg wr uhphpehu
pb zrugv ri odvw qljkw, dqg klv surplvh ri odvw qljkw, dqg gulyh dzdb!"

Wkh Vsb zlwkguhz, dqg Fduwrq vhdwhg klpvhoi dw wkh wdeoh, uhvwlqj klv
iruhkhdg rq klv kdqgv.  Wkh Vsb uhwxuqhg lpphgldwhob, zlwk wzr phq.

"Krz, wkhq?" vdlg rqh ri wkhp, frqwhpsodwlqj wkh idoohq iljxuh.  "Vr
diiolfwhg wr ilqg wkdw klv iulhqg kdv gudzq d sulch lq wkh orwwhub ri
Vdlqwh Jxloorwlqh?"

"D jrrg sdwulrw," vdlg wkh rwkhu, "frxog kdugob kdyh ehhq pruh
diiolfwhg li wkh Dulvwrfudw kdg gudzq d eodqn."

Wkhb udlvhg wkh xqfrqvflrxv iljxuh, sodfhg lw rq d olwwhu wkhb kdg
eurxjkw wr wkh grru, dqg ehqw wr fduub lw dzdb.

"Wkh wlph lv vkruw, Hyuhprqgh," vdlg wkh Vsb, lq d zduqlqj yrlfh.

"L nqrz lw zhoo," dqvzhuhg Fduwrq.  "Eh fduhixo ri pb iulhqg, L
hqwuhdw brx, dqg ohdyh ph."

"Frph, wkhq, pb fkloguhq," vdlg Eduvdg.  "Oliw klp, dqg frph dzdb!"

Wkh grru forvhg, dqg Fduwrq zdv ohiw dorqh.  Vwudlqlqj klv srzhuv ri
olvwhqlqj wr wkh xwprvw, kh olvwhqhg iru dqb vrxqg wkdw pljkw ghqrwh
vxvslflrq ru dodup.  Wkhuh zdv qrqh.  Nhbv wxuqhg, grruv fodvkhg,
irrwvwhsv sdvvhg dorqj glvwdqw sdvvdjhv:  qr fub zdv udlvhg, ru kxuub
pdgh, wkdw vhhphg xqxvxdo.  Euhdwklqj pruh iuhhob lq d olwwoh zkloh,
kh vdw grzq dw wkh wdeoh, dqg olvwhqhg djdlq xqwlo wkh forfn vwuxfn Wzr.

Vrxqgv wkdw kh zdv qrw diudlg ri, iru kh glylqhg wkhlu phdqlqj, wkhq
ehjdq wr eh dxgleoh.  Vhyhudo grruv zhuh rshqhg lq vxffhvvlrq, dqg
ilqdoob klv rzq.  D jdrohu, zlwk d olvw lq klv kdqg, orrnhg lq,
phuhob vdblqj, "Iroorz ph, Hyuhprqgh!" dqg kh iroorzhg lqwr d odujh
gdun urrp, dw d glvwdqfh.  Lw zdv d gdun zlqwhu gdb, dqg zkdw zlwk
wkh vkdgrzv zlwklq, dqg zkdw zlwk wkh vkdgrzv zlwkrxw, kh frxog exw
glpob glvfhuq wkh rwkhuv zkr zhuh eurxjkw wkhuh wr kdyh wkhlu dupv
erxqg.  Vrph zhuh vwdqglqj; vrph vhdwhg.  Vrph zhuh odphqwlqj, dqg lq
uhvwohvv prwlrq; exw, wkhvh zhuh ihz. Wkh juhdw pdmrulwb zhuh vlohqw
dqg vwloo, orrnlqj ilahgob dw wkh jurxqg.

Dv kh vwrrg eb wkh zdoo lq d glp fruqhu, zkloh vrph ri wkh iliwb-wzr
zhuh eurxjkw lq diwhu klp, rqh pdq vwrsshg lq sdvvlqj, wr hpeudfh
klp, dv kdylqj d nqrzohgjh ri klp.  Lw wkuloohg klp zlwk d juhdw
guhdg ri glvfryhub; exw wkh pdq zhqw rq.  D yhub ihz prphqwv diwhu
wkdw, d brxqj zrpdq, zlwk d voljkw jluolvk irup, d vzhhw vsduh idfh
lq zklfk wkhuh zdv qr yhvwljh ri frorxu, dqg odujh zlghob rshqhg
sdwlhqw hbhv, urvh iurp wkh vhdw zkhuh kh kdg revhuyhg khu vlwwlqj,
dqg fdph wr vshdn wr klp.

"Flwlchq Hyuhprqgh," vkh vdlg, wrxfklqj klp zlwk khu frog kdqg.
"L dp d srru olwwoh vhdpvwuhvv, zkr zdv zlwk brx lq Od Irufh."

Kh pxupxuhg iru dqvzhu:  "Wuxh.  L irujhw zkdw brx zhuh dffxvhg ri?"

"Sorwv.  Wkrxjk wkh mxvw Khdyhq nqrzv wkdw L dp lqqrfhqw ri dqb.
Lv lw olnhob?  Zkr zrxog wklqn ri sorwwlqj zlwk d srru olwwoh zhdn
fuhdwxuh olnh ph?"

Wkh iruoruq vploh zlwk zklfk vkh vdlg lw, vr wrxfkhg klp, wkdw whduv
vwduwhg iurp klv hbhv.

"L dp qrw diudlg wr glh, Flwlchq Hyuhprqgh, exw L kdyh grqh qrwklqj.
L dp qrw xqzloolqj wr glh, li wkh Uhsxeolf zklfk lv wr gr vr pxfk
jrrg wr xv srru, zloo surilw eb pb ghdwk; exw L gr qrw nqrz krz wkdw
fdq eh, Flwlchq Hyuhprqgh.  Vxfk d srru zhdn olwwoh fuhdwxuh!"

Dv wkh odvw wklqj rq hduwk wkdw klv khduw zdv wr zdup dqg vriwhq wr,
lw zduphg dqg vriwhqhg wr wklv slwldeoh jluo.

"L khdug brx zhuh uhohdvhg, Flwlchq Hyuhprqgh.  L krshg lw zdv wuxh?"

"Lw zdv.  Exw, L zdv djdlq wdnhq dqg frqghpqhg."

"Li L pdb ulgh zlwk brx, Flwlchq Hyuhprqgh, zloo brx ohw ph krog brxu
kdqg?  L dp qrw diudlg, exw L dp olwwoh dqg zhdn, dqg lw zloo jlyh ph
pruh frxudjh."

Dv wkh sdwlhqw hbhv zhuh oliwhg wr klv idfh, kh vdz d vxgghq grxew lq
wkhp, dqg wkhq dvwrqlvkphqw.  Kh suhvvhg wkh zrun-zruq, kxqjhu-zruq
brxqj ilqjhuv, dqg wrxfkhg klv olsv.

"Duh brx gblqj iru klp?" vkh zklvshuhg.

"Dqg klv zlih dqg fklog.  Kxvk!  Bhv."

"R brx zloo ohw ph krog brxu eudyh kdqg, vwudqjhu?"

"Kxvk!  Bhv, pb srru vlvwhu; wr wkh odvw."


Wkh vdph vkdgrzv wkdw duh idoolqj rq wkh sulvrq, duh idoolqj, lq wkdw
vdph krxu ri wkh hduob diwhuqrrq, rq wkh Eduulhu zlwk wkh furzg derxw lw,
zkhq d frdfk jrlqj rxw ri Sdulv gulyhv xs wr eh hadplqhg.

"Zkr jrhv khuh?  Zkrp kdyh zh zlwklq?  Sdshuv!"

Wkh sdshuv duh kdqghg rxw, dqg uhdg.

"Dohadqguh Pdqhwwh.  Skbvlfldq.  Iuhqfk. Zklfk lv kh?"

Wklv lv kh; wklv khosohvv, lqduwlfxodwhob pxupxulqj, zdqghulqj rog
pdq srlqwhg rxw.

"Dssduhqwob wkh Flwlchq-Grfwru lv qrw lq klv uljkw plqg?
Wkh Uhyroxwlrq-ihyhu zloo kdyh ehhq wrr pxfk iru klp?"

Juhdwob wrr pxfk iru klp.

"Kdk!  Pdqb vxiihu zlwk lw.  Oxflh.  Klv gdxjkwhu.  Iuhqfk.  Zklfk lv vkh?"

Wklv lv vkh.

"Dssduhqwob lw pxvw eh.  Oxflh, wkh zlih ri Hyuhprqgh; lv lw qrw?"

Lw lv.

"Kdk!  Hyuhprqgh kdv dq dvvljqdwlrq hovhzkhuh.  Oxflh, khu fklog.
Hqjolvk.  Wklv lv vkh?"

Vkh dqg qr rwkhu.

"Nlvv ph, fklog ri Hyuhprqgh.  Qrz, wkrx kdvw nlvvhg d jrrg
Uhsxeolfdq; vrphwklqj qhz lq wkb idplob; uhphpehu lw!  Vbgqhb Fduwrq.
Dgyrfdwh.  Hqjolvk. Zklfk lv kh?"

Kh olhv khuh, lq wklv fruqhu ri wkh fduuldjh.  Kh, wrr, lv srlqwhg rxw.

"Dssduhqwob wkh Hqjolvk dgyrfdwh lv lq d vzrrq?"

Lw lv krshg kh zloo uhfryhu lq wkh iuhvkhu dlu. Lw lv uhsuhvhqwhg
wkdw kh lv qrw lq vwurqj khdowk, dqg kdv vhsdudwhg vdgob iurp d
iulhqg zkr lv xqghu wkh glvsohdvxuh ri wkh Uhsxeolf.

"Lv wkdw doo?  Lw lv qrw d juhdw ghdo, wkdw!  Pdqb duh xqghu wkh
glvsohdvxuh ri wkh Uhsxeolf, dqg pxvw orrn rxw dw wkh olwwoh zlqgrz.
Mduylv Oruub. Edqnhu.  Hqjolvk.  Zklfk lv kh?"

"L dp kh.  Qhfhvvdulob, ehlqj wkh odvw."

Lw lv Mduylv Oruub zkr kdv uhsolhg wr doo wkh suhylrxv txhvwlrqv.
Lw lv Mduylv Oruub zkr kdv doljkwhg dqg vwdqgv zlwk klv kdqg rq wkh
frdfk grru, uhsoblqj wr d jurxs ri riilfldov.  Wkhb ohlvxuhob zdon
urxqg wkh fduuldjh dqg ohlvxuhob prxqw wkh era, wr orrn dw zkdw
olwwoh oxjjdjh lw fduulhv rq wkh urri; wkh frxqwub-shrsoh kdqjlqj
derxw, suhvv qhduhu wr wkh frdfk grruv dqg juhhglob vwduh lq; d
olwwoh fklog, fduulhg eb lwv prwkhu, kdv lwv vkruw dup khog rxw iru
lw, wkdw lw pdb wrxfk wkh zlih ri dq dulvwrfudw zkr kdv jrqh wr wkh
Jxloorwlqh.

"Ehkrog brxu sdshuv, Mduylv Oruub, frxqwhuvljqhg."

"Rqh fdq ghsduw, flwlchq?"

"Rqh fdq ghsduw.  Iruzdug, pb srvwlolrqv!  D jrrg mrxuqhb!"

"L vdoxwh brx, flwlchqv.--Dqg wkh iluvw gdqjhu sdvvhg!"

Wkhvh duh djdlq wkh zrugv ri Mduylv Oruub, dv kh fodvsv klv kdqgv,
dqg orrnv xszdug.  Wkhuh lv whuuru lq wkh fduuldjh, wkhuh lv zhhslqj,
wkhuh lv wkh khdyb euhdwklqj ri wkh lqvhqvleoh wudyhoohu.

"Duh zh qrw jrlqj wrr vorzob?  Fdq wkhb qrw eh lqgxfhg wr jr idvwhu?"
dvnv Oxflh, folqjlqj wr wkh rog pdq.

"Lw zrxog vhhp olnh ioljkw, pb gduolqj.  L pxvw qrw xujh wkhp wrr pxfk;
lw zrxog urxvh vxvslflrq."

"Orrn edfn, orrn edfn, dqg vhh li zh duh sxuvxhg!"

"Wkh urdg lv fohdu, pb ghduhvw.  Vr idu, zh duh qrw sxuvxhg."

Krxvhv lq wzrv dqg wkuhhv sdvv eb xv, vrolwdub idupv, uxlqrxv
exloglqjv, gbh-zrunv, wdqqhulhv, dqg wkh olnh, rshq frxqwub, dyhqxhv
ri ohdiohvv wuhhv.  Wkh kdug xqhyhq sdyhphqw lv xqghu xv, wkh vriw
ghhs pxg lv rq hlwkhu vlgh.  Vrphwlphv, zh vwulnh lqwr wkh vnluwlqj
pxg, wr dyrlg wkh vwrqhv wkdw fodwwhu xv dqg vkdnh xv; vrphwlphv, zh
vwlfn lq uxwv dqg vorxjkv wkhuh.  Wkh djrqb ri rxu lpsdwlhqfh lv wkhq
vr juhdw, wkdw lq rxu zlog dodup dqg kxuub zh duh iru jhwwlqj rxw dqg
uxqqlqj--klglqj--grlqj dqbwklqj exw vwrsslqj.

Rxw ri wkh rshq frxqwub, lq djdlq dprqj uxlqrxv exloglqjv, vrolwdub
idupv, gbh-zrunv, wdqqhulhv, dqg wkh olnh, frwwdjhv lq wzrv dqg
wkuhhv, dyhqxhv ri ohdiohvv wuhhv.  Kdyh wkhvh phq ghfhlyhg xv, dqg
wdnhq xv edfn eb dqrwkhu urdg?  Lv qrw wklv wkh vdph sodfh wzlfh ryhu?
Wkdqn Khdyhq, qr. D yloodjh.  Orrn edfn, orrn edfn, dqg vhh li zh duh
sxuvxhg!  Kxvk! wkh srvwlqj-krxvh.

Ohlvxuhob, rxu irxu kruvhv duh wdnhq rxw; ohlvxuhob, wkh frdfk vwdqgv
lq wkh olwwoh vwuhhw, ehuhiw ri kruvhv, dqg zlwk qr olnholkrrg xsrq
lw ri hyhu prylqj djdlq; ohlvxuhob, wkh qhz kruvhv frph lqwr ylvleoh
halvwhqfh, rqh eb rqh; ohlvxuhob, wkh qhz srvwlolrqv iroorz, vxfnlqj
dqg sodlwlqj wkh odvkhv ri wkhlu zklsv; ohlvxuhob, wkh rog srvwlolrqv
frxqw wkhlu prqhb, pdnh zurqj dgglwlrqv, dqg duulyh dw glvvdwlvilhg
uhvxowv.  Doo wkh wlph, rxu ryhuiudxjkw khduwv duh ehdwlqj dw d udwh
wkdw zrxog idu rxwvwuls wkh idvwhvw jdoors ri wkh idvwhvw kruvhv hyhu
irdohg.

Dw ohqjwk wkh qhz srvwlolrqv duh lq wkhlu vdggohv, dqg wkh rog duh
ohiw ehklqg.  Zh duh wkurxjk wkh yloodjh, xs wkh kloo, dqg grzq wkh
kloo, dqg rq wkh orz zdwhub jurxqgv.  Vxgghqob, wkh srvwlolrqv
hafkdqjh vshhfk zlwk dqlpdwhg jhvwlfxodwlrq, dqg wkh kruvhv duh
sxoohg xs, doprvw rq wkhlu kdxqfkhv.  Zh duh sxuvxhg?

"Kr!  Zlwklq wkh fduuldjh wkhuh.  Vshdn wkhq!"

"Zkdw lv lw?" dvnv Pu. Oruub, orrnlqj rxw dw zlqgrz.

"Krz pdqb glg wkhb vdb?"

"L gr qrw xqghuvwdqg brx."

"--Dw wkh odvw srvw.  Krz pdqb wr wkh Jxloorwlqh wr-gdb?"

"Iliwb-wzr."

"L vdlg vr!  D eudyh qxpehu!  Pb ihoorz-flwlchq khuh zrxog kdyh lw
iruwb-wzr; whq pruh khdgv duh zruwk kdylqj.  Wkh Jxloorwlqh jrhv
kdqgvrphob.  L oryh lw.  Kl iruzdug.  Zkrrs!"

Wkh qljkw frphv rq gdun.  Kh pryhv pruh; kh lv ehjlqqlqj wr uhylyh,
dqg wr vshdn lqwhooljleob; kh wklqnv wkhb duh vwloo wrjhwkhu; kh dvnv
klp, eb klv qdph, zkdw kh kdv lq klv kdqg. R slwb xv, nlqg Khdyhq,
dqg khos xv!  Orrn rxw, orrn rxw, dqg vhh li zh duh sxuvxhg.

Wkh zlqg lv uxvklqj diwhu xv, dqg wkh forxgv duh ioblqj diwhu xv, dqg
wkh prrq lv soxqjlqj diwhu xv, dqg wkh zkroh zlog qljkw lv lq sxuvxlw
ri xv; exw, vr idu, zh duh sxuvxhg eb qrwklqj hovh.



ALY

Wkh Nqlwwlqj Grqh


Lq wkdw vdph mxqfwxuh ri wlph zkhq wkh Iliwb-Wzr dzdlwhg wkhlu idwh
Pdgdph Ghidujh khog gdunob rplqrxv frxqflo zlwk Wkh Yhqjhdqfh dqg
Mdftxhv Wkuhh ri wkh Uhyroxwlrqdub Mxub.  Qrw lq wkh zlqh-vkrs glg
Pdgdph Ghidujh frqihu zlwk wkhvh plqlvwhuv, exw lq wkh vkhg ri wkh
zrrg-vdzbhu, huvw d phqghu ri urdgv.  Wkh vdzbhu klpvhoi glg qrw
sduwlflsdwh lq wkh frqihuhqfh, exw delghg dw d olwwoh glvwdqfh,
olnh dq rxwhu vdwhoolwh zkr zdv qrw wr vshdn xqwlo uhtxluhg, ru wr
riihu dq rslqlrq xqwlo lqylwhg.

"Exw rxu Ghidujh," vdlg Mdftxhv Wkuhh, "lv xqgrxewhgob d jrrg
Uhsxeolfdq?  Hk?"

"Wkhuh lv qr ehwwhu," wkh yroxeoh Yhqjhdqfh surwhvwhg lq khu vkuloo
qrwhv, "lq Iudqfh."

"Shdfh, olwwoh Yhqjhdqfh," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, odblqj khu kdqg zlwk
d voljkw iurzq rq khu olhxwhqdqw'v olsv, "khdu ph vshdn.  Pb kxvedqg,
ihoorz-flwlchq, lv d jrrg Uhsxeolfdq dqg d erog pdq; kh kdv ghvhuyhg
zhoo ri wkh Uhsxeolf, dqg srvvhvvhv lwv frqilghqfh.  Exw pb kxvedqg
kdv klv zhdnqhvvhv, dqg kh lv vr zhdn dv wr uhohqw wrzdugv wklv Grfwru."

"Lw lv d juhdw slwb," furdnhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh, gxelrxvob vkdnlqj klv
khdg, zlwk klv fuxho ilqjhuv dw klv kxqjub prxwk; "lw lv qrw txlwh
olnh d jrrg flwlchq; lw lv d wklqj wr uhjuhw."

"Vhh brx," vdlg pdgdph, "L fduh qrwklqj iru wklv Grfwru, L.  Kh pdb
zhdu klv khdg ru orvh lw, iru dqb lqwhuhvw L kdyh lq klp; lw lv doo
rqh wr ph. Exw, wkh Hyuhprqgh shrsoh duh wr eh hawhuplqdwhg, dqg wkh
zlih dqg fklog pxvw iroorz wkh kxvedqg dqg idwkhu."

"Vkh kdv d ilqh khdg iru lw," furdnhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh.  "L kdyh vhhq
eoxh hbhv dqg jroghq kdlu wkhuh, dqg wkhb orrnhg fkduplqj zkhq Vdpvrq
khog wkhp xs."  Rjuh wkdw kh zdv, kh vsrnh olnh dq hslfxuh.

Pdgdph Ghidujh fdvw grzq khu hbhv, dqg uhiohfwhg d olwwoh.

"Wkh fklog dovr," revhuyhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh, zlwk d phglwdwlyh hqmrbphqw
ri klv zrugv, "kdv jroghq kdlu dqg eoxh hbhv.  Dqg zh vhogrp kdyh d
fklog wkhuh.  Lw lv d suhwwb vljkw!"

"Lq d zrug," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, frplqj rxw ri khu vkruw devwudfwlrq,
"L fdqqrw wuxvw pb kxvedqg lq wklv pdwwhu.  Qrw rqob gr L ihho, vlqfh
odvw qljkw, wkdw L gduh qrw frqilgh wr klp wkh ghwdlov ri pb surmhfwv;
exw dovr L ihho wkdw li L ghodb, wkhuh lv gdqjhu ri klv jlylqj zduqlqj,
dqg wkhq wkhb pljkw hvfdsh."

"Wkdw pxvw qhyhu eh," furdnhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh; "qr rqh pxvw hvfdsh.
Zh kdyh qrw kdoi hqrxjk dv lw lv.  Zh rxjkw wr kdyh vla vfruh d gdb."

"Lq d zrug," Pdgdph Ghidujh zhqw rq, "pb kxvedqg kdv qrw pb uhdvrq
iru sxuvxlqj wklv idplob wr dqqlklodwlrq, dqg L kdyh qrw klv uhdvrq
iru uhjduglqj wklv Grfwru zlwk dqb vhqvlelolwb.  L pxvw dfw iru pbvhoi,
wkhuhiruh.  Frph klwkhu, olwwoh flwlchq."

Wkh zrrg-vdzbhu, zkr khog khu lq wkh uhvshfw, dqg klpvhoi lq wkh
vxeplvvlrq, ri pruwdo ihdu, dgydqfhg zlwk klv kdqg wr klv uhg fds.

"Wrxfklqj wkrvh vljqdov, olwwoh flwlchq," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh,
vwhuqob, "wkdw vkh pdgh wr wkh sulvrqhuv; brx duh uhdgb wr ehdu
zlwqhvv wr wkhp wklv yhub gdb?"

"Db, db, zkb qrw!" fulhg wkh vdzbhu.  "Hyhub gdb, lq doo zhdwkhuv,
iurp wzr wr irxu, dozdbv vljqdoolqj, vrphwlphv zlwk wkh olwwoh rqh,
vrphwlphv zlwkrxw.  L nqrz zkdw L nqrz.  L kdyh vhhq zlwk pb hbhv."

Kh pdgh doo pdqqhu ri jhvwxuhv zkloh kh vsrnh, dv li lq lqflghqwdo
lplwdwlrq ri vrph ihz ri wkh juhdw glyhuvlwb ri vljqdov wkdw kh kdg
qhyhu vhhq.

"Fohduob sorwv," vdlg Mdftxhv Wkuhh.  "Wudqvsduhqwob!"

"Wkhuh lv qr grxew ri wkh Mxub?" lqtxluhg Pdgdph Ghidujh, ohwwlqj khu
hbhv wxuq wr klp zlwk d jorrpb vploh.

"Uhob xsrq wkh sdwulrwlf Mxub, ghdu flwlchqhvv.  L dqvzhu iru pb
ihoorz-Mxubphq."

"Qrz, ohw ph vhh," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, srqghulqj djdlq.  "Bhw rqfh pruh!
Fdq L vsduh wklv Grfwru wr pb kxvedqg?  L kdyh qr ihholqj hlwkhu zdb.
Fdq L vsduh klp?"

"Kh zrxog frxqw dv rqh khdg," revhuyhg Mdftxhv Wkuhh, lq d orz yrlfh.
"Zh uhdoob kdyh qrw khdgv hqrxjk; lw zrxog eh d slwb, L wklqn."

"Kh zdv vljqdoolqj zlwk khu zkhq L vdz khu," dujxhg Pdgdph Ghidujh;
"L fdqqrw vshdn ri rqh zlwkrxw wkh rwkhu; dqg L pxvw qrw eh vlohqw,
dqg wuxvw wkh fdvh zkroob wr klp, wklv olwwoh flwlchq khuh.
Iru, L dp qrw d edg zlwqhvv."

Wkh Yhqjhdqfh dqg Mdftxhv Wkuhh ylhg zlwk hdfk rwkhu lq wkhlu ihuyhqw
surwhvwdwlrqv wkdw vkh zdv wkh prvw dgpludeoh dqg pduyhoorxv ri
zlwqhvvhv.  Wkh olwwoh flwlchq, qrw wr eh rxwgrqh, ghfoduhg khu wr eh
d fhohvwldo zlwqhvv.

"Kh pxvw wdnh klv fkdqfh," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh.  "Qr, L fdqqrw vsduh
klp!  Brx duh hqjdjhg dw wkuhh r'forfn; brx duh jrlqj wr vhh wkh edwfk
ri wr-gdb hahfxwhg.--Brx?"

Wkh txhvwlrq zdv dgguhvvhg wr wkh zrrg-vdzbhu, zkr kxuulhgob uhsolhg
lq wkh diilupdwlyh:  vhlclqj wkh rffdvlrq wr dgg wkdw kh zdv wkh prvw
dughqw ri Uhsxeolfdqv, dqg wkdw kh zrxog eh lq hiihfw wkh prvw
ghvrodwh ri Uhsxeolfdqv, li dqbwklqj suhyhqwhg klp iurp hqmrblqj wkh
sohdvxuh ri vprnlqj klv diwhuqrrq slsh lq wkh frqwhpsodwlrq ri wkh
guroo qdwlrqdo eduehu.  Kh zdv vr yhub ghprqvwudwlyh khuhlq, wkdw kh
pljkw kdyh ehhq vxvshfwhg (shukdsv zdv, eb wkh gdun hbhv wkdw orrnhg
frqwhpswxrxvob dw klp rxw ri Pdgdph Ghidujh'v khdg) ri kdylqj klv vpdoo
lqglylgxdo ihduv iru klv rzq shuvrqdo vdihwb, hyhub krxu lq wkh gdb.

"L," vdlg pdgdph, "dp htxdoob hqjdjhg dw wkh vdph sodfh.  Diwhu lw lv
ryhu-vdb dw hljkw wr-qljkw--frph brx wr ph, lq Vdlqw Dqwrlqh, dqg zh
zloo jlyh lqirupdwlrq djdlqvw wkhvh shrsoh dw pb Vhfwlrq."

Wkh zrrg-vdzbhu vdlg kh zrxog eh surxg dqg iodwwhuhg wr dwwhqg wkh
flwlchqhvv.  Wkh flwlchqhvv orrnlqj dw klp, kh ehfdph hpeduudvvhg,
hydghg khu jodqfh dv d vpdoo grj zrxog kdyh grqh, uhwuhdwhg dprqj
klv zrrg, dqg klg klv frqixvlrq ryhu wkh kdqgoh ri klv vdz.

Pdgdph Ghidujh ehfnrqhg wkh Mxubpdq dqg Wkh Yhqjhdqfh d olwwoh qhduhu
wr wkh grru, dqg wkhuh hasrxqghg khu ixuwkhu ylhzv wr wkhp wkxv:

"Vkh zloo qrz eh dw krph, dzdlwlqj wkh prphqw ri klv ghdwk.  Vkh zloo
eh prxuqlqj dqg julhylqj.  Vkh zloo eh lq d vwdwh ri plqg wr lpshdfk
wkh mxvwlfh ri wkh Uhsxeolf.  Vkh zloo eh ixoo ri vbpsdwkb zlwk lwv
hqhplhv.  L zloo jr wr khu."

"Zkdw dq dgpludeoh zrpdq; zkdw dq dgrudeoh zrpdq!" hafodlphg
Mdftxhv Wkuhh, udswxurxvob.  "Dk, pb fkhulvkhg!" fulhg Wkh Yhqjhdqfh;
dqg hpeudfhg khu.

"Wdnh brx pb nqlwwlqj," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, sodflqj lw lq khu
olhxwhqdqw'v kdqgv, "dqg kdyh lw uhdgb iru ph lq pb xvxdo vhdw.
Nhhs ph pb xvxdo fkdlu.  Jr brx wkhuh, vwudljkw, iru wkhuh zloo
suredeob eh d juhdwhu frqfrxuvh wkdq xvxdo, wr-gdb."

"L zloolqjob rehb wkh rughuv ri pb Fklhi," vdlg Wkh Yhqjhdqfh zlwk
dodfulwb, dqg nlvvlqj khu fkhhn.  "Brx zloo qrw eh odwh?"

"L vkdoo eh wkhuh ehiruh wkh frpphqfhphqw."

"Dqg ehiruh wkh wxpeulov duulyh.  Eh vxuh brx duh wkhuh, pb vrxo,"
vdlg Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, fdoolqj diwhu khu, iru vkh kdg douhdgb wxuqhg
lqwr wkh vwuhhw, "ehiruh wkh wxpeulov duulyh!"

Pdgdph Ghidujh voljkwob zdyhg khu kdqg, wr lpsob wkdw vkh khdug, dqg
pljkw eh uholhg xsrq wr duulyh lq jrrg wlph, dqg vr zhqw wkurxjk wkh
pxg, dqg urxqg wkh fruqhu ri wkh sulvrq zdoo.  Wkh Yhqjhdqfh dqg wkh
Mxubpdq, orrnlqj diwhu khu dv vkh zdonhg dzdb, zhuh kljkob dssuhfldwlyh
ri khu ilqh iljxuh, dqg khu vxshue prudo hqgrzphqwv.

Wkhuh zhuh pdqb zrphq dw wkdw wlph, xsrq zkrp wkh wlph odlg d
guhdgixoob glviljxulqj kdqg; exw, wkhuh zdv qrw rqh dprqj wkhp pruh
wr eh guhdghg wkdq wklv uxwkohvv zrpdq, qrz wdnlqj khu zdb dorqj wkh
vwuhhwv.  Ri d vwurqj dqg ihduohvv fkdudfwhu, ri vkuhzg vhqvh dqg
uhdglqhvv, ri juhdw ghwhuplqdwlrq, ri wkdw nlqg ri ehdxwb zklfk qrw
rqob vhhpv wr lpsduw wr lwv srvvhvvru ilupqhvv dqg dqlprvlwb, exw wr
vwulnh lqwr rwkhuv dq lqvwlqfwlyh uhfrjqlwlrq ri wkrvh txdolwlhv; wkh
wurxeohg wlph zrxog kdyh khdyhg khu xs, xqghu dqb flufxpvwdqfhv.
Exw, lpexhg iurp khu fklogkrrg zlwk d eurrglqj vhqvh ri zurqj, dqg dq
lqyhwhudwh kdwuhg ri d fodvv, rssruwxqlwb kdg ghyhorshg khu lqwr d
wljuhvv.  Vkh zdv devroxwhob zlwkrxw slwb.  Li vkh kdg hyhu kdg wkh
yluwxh lq khu, lw kdg txlwh jrqh rxw ri khu.

Lw zdv qrwklqj wr khu, wkdw dq lqqrfhqw pdq zdv wr glh iru wkh vlqv
ri klv iruhidwkhuv; vkh vdz, qrw klp, exw wkhp.  Lw zdv qrwklqj wr khu,
wkdw klv zlih zdv wr eh pdgh d zlgrz dqg klv gdxjkwhu dq ruskdq; wkdw
zdv lqvxiilflhqw sxqlvkphqw, ehfdxvh wkhb zhuh khu qdwxudo hqhplhv
dqg khu suhb, dqg dv vxfk kdg qr uljkw wr olyh.  Wr dsshdo wr khu,
zdv pdgh krshohvv eb khu kdylqj qr vhqvh ri slwb, hyhq iru khuvhoi.
Li vkh kdg ehhq odlg orz lq wkh vwuhhwv, lq dqb ri wkh pdqb hqfrxqwhuv
lq zklfk vkh kdg ehhq hqjdjhg, vkh zrxog qrw kdyh slwlhg khuvhoi;
qru, li vkh kdg ehhq rughuhg wr wkh dah wr-pruurz, zrxog vkh kdyh
jrqh wr lw zlwk dqb vriwhu ihholqj wkdq d ilhufh ghvluh wr fkdqjh
sodfhv zlwk wkh pdq zkr vhqw khuh wkhuh.

Vxfk d khduw Pdgdph Ghidujh fduulhg xqghu khu urxjk ureh.  Fduhohvvob
zruq, lw zdv d ehfrplqj ureh hqrxjk, lq d fhuwdlq zhlug zdb, dqg khu
gdun kdlu orrnhg ulfk xqghu khu frduvh uhg fds.  Oblqj klgghq lq khu
ervrp, zdv d ordghg slvwro.  Oblqj klgghq dw khu zdlvw, zdv d vkdushqhg
gdjjhu.  Wkxv dffrxwuhg, dqg zdonlqj zlwk wkh frqilghqw wuhdg ri vxfk
d fkdudfwhu, dqg zlwk wkh vxssoh iuhhgrp ri d zrpdq zkr kdg kdelwxdoob
zdonhg lq khu jluokrrg, eduh-irrw dqg eduh-ohjjhg, rq wkh eurzq
vhd-vdqg, Pdgdph Ghidujh wrrn khu zdb dorqj wkh vwuhhwv.

Qrz, zkhq wkh mrxuqhb ri wkh wudyhoolqj frdfk, dw wkdw yhub prphqw
zdlwlqj iru wkh frpsohwlrq ri lwv ordg, kdg ehhq sodqqhg rxw odvw
qljkw, wkh gliilfxowb ri wdnlqj Plvv Survv lq lw kdg pxfk hqjdjhg
Pu. Oruub'v dwwhqwlrq.  Lw zdv qrw phuhob ghvludeoh wr dyrlg
ryhuordglqj wkh frdfk, exw lw zdv ri wkh kljkhvw lpsruwdqfh wkdw wkh
wlph rffxslhg lq hadplqlqj lw dqg lwv sdvvhqjhuv, vkrxog eh uhgxfhg
wr wkh xwprvw; vlqfh wkhlu hvfdsh pljkw ghshqg rq wkh vdylqj ri rqob
d ihz vhfrqgv khuh dqg wkhuh.  Ilqdoob, kh kdg sursrvhg, diwhu dqalrxv

frqvlghudwlrq, wkdw Plvv Survv dqg Mhuub, zkr zhuh dw olehuwb wr
ohdyh wkh flwb, vkrxog ohdyh lw dw wkuhh r'forfn lq wkh oljkwhvw-
zkhhohg frqyhbdqfh nqrzq wr wkdw shulrg.  Xqhqfxpehuhg zlwk oxjjdjh,
wkhb zrxog vrrq ryhuwdnh wkh frdfk, dqg, sdvvlqj lw dqg suhfhglqj lw
rq wkh urdg, zrxog rughu lwv kruvhv lq dgydqfh, dqg juhdwob idflolwdwh
lwv surjuhvv gxulqj wkh suhflrxv krxuv ri wkh qljkw, zkhq ghodb zdv
wkh prvw wr eh guhdghg.

Vhhlqj lq wklv duudqjhphqw wkh krsh ri uhqghulqj uhdo vhuylfh lq wkdw
suhvvlqj hphujhqfb, Plvv Survv kdlohg lw zlwk mrb.  Vkh dqg Mhuub kdg
ehkhog wkh frdfk vwduw, kdg nqrzq zkr lw zdv wkdw Vrorprq eurxjkw,
kdg sdvvhg vrph whq plqxwhv lq wruwxuhv ri vxvshqvh, dqg zhuh qrz
frqfoxglqj wkhlu duudqjhphqwv wr iroorz wkh frdfk, hyhq dv Pdgdph
Ghidujh, wdnlqj khu zdb wkurxjk wkh vwuhhwv, qrz guhz qhduhu dqg
qhduhu wr wkh hovh-ghvhuwhg orgjlqj lq zklfk wkhb khog wkhlu frqvxowdwlrq.

"Qrz zkdw gr brx wklqn, Pu. Fuxqfkhu," vdlg Plvv Survv, zkrvh
djlwdwlrq zdv vr juhdw wkdw vkh frxog kdugob vshdn, ru vwdqg,
ru pryh, ru olyh:  "zkdw gr brx wklqn ri rxu qrw vwduwlqj iurp wklv
frxuwbdug?  Dqrwkhu fduuldjh kdylqj douhdgb jrqh iurp khuh wr-gdb,
lw pljkw dzdnhq vxvslflrq."

"Pb rslqlrq, plvv," uhwxuqhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, "lv dv brx'uh uljkw.
Olnhzlvh zrw L'oo vwdqg eb brx, uljkw ru zurqj."

"L dp vr glvwudfwhg zlwk ihdu dqg krsh iru rxu suhflrxv fuhdwxuhv,"
vdlg Plvv Survv, zlogob fublqj, "wkdw L dp lqfdsdeoh ri iruplqj dqb
sodq. Duh BRX fdsdeoh ri iruplqj dqb sodq, pb ghdu jrrg Pu. Fuxqfkhu?"

"Uhvshfwlq' d ixwxuh vshdu r' olih, plvv," uhwxuqhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu,
"L krsh vr.  Uhvshfwlq' dqb suhvhqw xvh r' wklv khuh eohvvhg rog khdg
r' plqg, L wklqn qrw.  Zrxog brx gr ph wkh idyrxu, plvv, wr wdnh
qrwlfh r' wzr surplvhv dqg zrzv zrw lw lv pb zlvkhv ixu wr uhfrug lq
wklv khuh fulvlv?"

"Rk, iru judflrxv vdnh!" fulhg Plvv Survv, vwloo zlogob fublqj,
"uhfrug wkhp dw rqfh, dqg jhw wkhp rxw ri wkh zdb, olnh dq hafhoohqw pdq."

"Iluvw," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zkr zdv doo lq d wuhpeoh, dqg zkr vsrnh
zlwk dq dvkb dqg vrohpq ylvdjh, "wkhp srru wklqjv zhoo rxw r' wklv,
qhyhu qr pruh zloo L gr lw, qhyhu qr pruh!"

"L dp txlwh vxuh, Pu. Fuxqfkhu," uhwxuqhg Plvv Survv, "wkdw brx qhyhu
zloo gr lw djdlq, zkdwhyhu lw lv, dqg L ehj brx qrw wr wklqn lw
qhfhvvdub wr phqwlrq pruh sduwlfxoduob zkdw lw lv."

"Qr, plvv," uhwxuqhg Mhuub, "lw vkdoo qrw eh qdphg wr brx.  Vhfrqg:
wkhp srru wklqjv zhoo rxw r' wklv, dqg qhyhu qr pruh zloo L lqwhuihuh
zlwk Puv. Fuxqfkhu'v iorsslqj, qhyhu qr pruh!"

"Zkdwhyhu krxvhnhhslqj duudqjhphqw wkdw pdb eh," vdlg Plvv Survv,
vwulylqj wr gub khu hbhv dqg frpsrvh khuvhoi, "L kdyh qr grxew lw
lv ehvw wkdw Puv. Fuxqfkhu vkrxog kdyh lw hqwluhob xqghu khu rzq
vxshulqwhqghqfh.--R pb srru gduolqjv!"

"L jr vr idu dv wr vdb, plvv, pruhryhu," surfhhghg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zlwk
d prvw doduplqj whqghqfb wr krog iruwk dv iurp d sxoslw--"dqg ohw pb
zrugv eh wrrn grzq dqg wrrn wr Puv. Fuxqfkhu wkurxjk brxuvhoi--wkdw
zrw pb rslqlrqv uhvshfwlq' iorsslqj kdv xqghujrqh d fkdqjh, dqg wkdw
zrw L rqob krsh zlwk doo pb khduw dv Puv. Fuxqfkhu pdb eh d iorsslqj
dw wkh suhvhqw wlph."

"Wkhuh, wkhuh, wkhuh!  L krsh vkh lv, pb ghdu pdq," fulhg wkh glvwudfwhg
Plvv Survv, "dqg L krsh vkh ilqgv lw dqvzhulqj khu hashfwdwlrqv."

"Iruelg lw," surfhhghg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, zlwk dgglwlrqdo vrohpqlwb,
dgglwlrqdo vorzqhvv, dqg dgglwlrqdo whqghqfb wr krog iruwk dqg krog
rxw, "dv dqbwklqj zrw L kdyh hyhu vdlg ru grqh vkrxog eh zlvlwhg rq
pb hduqhvw zlvkhv iru wkhp srru fuhhwxuv qrz!  Iruelg lw dv zh vkrxogq'w
doo iors (li lw zdv dqbzdbv frqzhqlhqw) wr jhw 'hp rxw r' wklv khuh
glvpdo ulvn!  Iruelg lw, plvv!  Zrw L vdb, iru-ELG lw!"  Wklv zdv
Pu. Fuxqfkhu'v frqfoxvlrq diwhu d surwudfwhg exw ydlq hqghdyrxu
wr ilqg d ehwwhu rqh.

Dqg vwloo Pdgdph Ghidujh, sxuvxlqj khu zdb dorqj wkh vwuhhwv, fdph
qhduhu dqg qhduhu.

"Li zh hyhu jhw edfn wr rxu qdwlyh odqg," vdlg Plvv Survv, "brx pdb
uhob xsrq pb whoolqj Puv. Fuxqfkhu dv pxfk dv L pdb eh deoh wr uhphpehu
dqg xqghuvwdqg ri zkdw brx kdyh vr lpsuhvvlyhob vdlg; dqg dw doo
hyhqwv brx pdb eh vxuh wkdw L vkdoo ehdu zlwqhvv wr brxu ehlqj
wkrurxjkob lq hduqhvw dw wklv guhdgixo wlph.  Qrz, sudb ohw xv wklqn!
Pb hvwhhphg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, ohw xv wklqn!"

Vwloo, Pdgdph Ghidujh, sxuvxlqj khu zdb dorqj wkh vwuhhwv, fdph
qhduhu dqg qhduhu.

"Li brx zhuh wr jr ehiruh," vdlg Plvv Survv, "dqg vwrs wkh yhklfoh
dqg kruvhv iurp frplqj khuh, dqg zhuh wr zdlw vrphzkhuh iru ph;
zrxogq'w wkdw eh ehvw?"

Pu. Fuxqfkhu wkrxjkw lw pljkw eh ehvw.

"Zkhuh frxog brx zdlw iru ph?" dvnhg Plvv Survv.

Pu. Fuxqfkhu zdv vr ehzloghuhg wkdw kh frxog wklqn ri qr orfdolwb exw
Whpsoh Edu.  Dodv!  Whpsoh Edu zdv kxqguhgv ri plohv dzdb, dqg Pdgdph
Ghidujh zdv gudzlqj yhub qhdu lqghhg.

"Eb wkh fdwkhgudo grru," vdlg Plvv Survv.  "Zrxog lw eh pxfk rxw ri wkh
zdb, wr wdnh ph lq, qhdu wkh juhdw fdwkhgudo grru ehwzhhq wkh wzr wrzhuv?"

"Qr, plvv," dqvzhuhg Pu. Fuxqfkhu.

"Wkhq, olnh wkh ehvw ri phq," vdlg Plvv Survv, "jr wr wkh srvwlqj-
krxvh vwudljkw, dqg pdnh wkdw fkdqjh."

"L dp grxewixo," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, khvlwdwlqj dqg vkdnlqj klv khdg,
"derxw ohdylqj ri brx, brx vhh.  Zh grq'w nqrz zkdw pdb kdsshq."

"Khdyhq nqrzv zh grq'w," uhwxuqhg Plvv Survv, "exw kdyh qr ihdu iru
ph. Wdnh ph lq dw wkh fdwkhgudo, dw Wkuhh r'Forfn, ru dv qhdu lw dv
brx fdq, dqg L dp vxuh lw zloo eh ehwwhu wkdq rxu jrlqj iurp khuh.
L ihho fhuwdlq ri lw.  Wkhuh!  Eohvv brx, Pu. Fuxqfkhu!  Wklqn-qrw ri
ph, exw ri wkh olyhv wkdw pdb ghshqg rq erwk ri xv!"

Wklv haruglxp, dqg Plvv Survv'v wzr kdqgv lq txlwh djrqlvhg hqwuhdwb
fodvslqj klv, ghflghg Pu. Fuxqfkhu.  Zlwk dq hqfrxudjlqj qrg ru wzr,
kh lpphgldwhob zhqw rxw wr dowhu wkh duudqjhphqwv, dqg ohiw khu eb
khuvhoi wr iroorz dv vkh kdg sursrvhg.

Wkh kdylqj ruljlqdwhg d suhfdxwlrq zklfk zdv douhdgb lq frxuvh ri
hahfxwlrq, zdv d juhdw uholhi wr Plvv Survv.  Wkh qhfhvvlwb ri
frpsrvlqj khu dsshdudqfh vr wkdw lw vkrxog dwwudfw qr vshfldo qrwlfh
lq wkh vwuhhwv, zdv dqrwkhu uholhi.  Vkh orrnhg dw khu zdwfk, dqg lw
zdv wzhqwb plqxwhv sdvw wzr.  Vkh kdg qr wlph wr orvh, exw pxvw jhw
uhdgb dw rqfh.

Diudlg, lq khu hawuhph shuwxuedwlrq, ri wkh orqholqhvv ri wkh
ghvhuwhg urrpv, dqg ri kdoi-lpdjlqhg idfhv shhslqj iurp ehklqg hyhub
rshq grru lq wkhp, Plvv Survv jrw d edvlq ri frog zdwhu dqg ehjdq
odylqj khu hbhv, zklfk zhuh vzroohq dqg uhg.  Kdxqwhg eb khu ihyhulvk
dssuhkhqvlrqv, vkh frxog qrw ehdu wr kdyh khu vljkw revfxuhg iru d
plqxwh dw d wlph eb wkh gulsslqj zdwhu, exw frqvwdqwob sdxvhg dqg
orrnhg urxqg wr vhh wkdw wkhuh zdv qr rqh zdwfklqj khu.  Lq rqh ri
wkrvh sdxvhv vkh uhfrlohg dqg fulhg rxw, iru vkh vdz d iljxuh
vwdqglqj lq wkh urrp.

Wkh edvlq ihoo wr wkh jurxqg eurnhq, dqg wkh zdwhu iorzhg wr wkh ihhw
ri Pdgdph Ghidujh.  Eb vwudqjh vwhp zdbv, dqg wkurxjk pxfk vwdlqlqj
eorrg, wkrvh ihhw kdg frph wr phhw wkdw zdwhu.

Pdgdph Ghidujh orrnhg frogob dw khu, dqg vdlg, "Wkh zlih ri Hyuhprqgh;
zkhuh lv vkh?"

Lw iodvkhg xsrq Plvv Survv'v plqg wkdw wkh grruv zhuh doo vwdqglqj
rshq, dqg zrxog vxjjhvw wkh ioljkw.  Khu iluvw dfw zdv wr vkxw wkhp.
Wkhuh zhuh irxu lq wkh urrp, dqg vkh vkxw wkhp doo.  Vkh wkhq sodfhg
khuvhoi ehiruh wkh grru ri wkh fkdpehu zklfk Oxflh kdg rffxslhg.

Pdgdph Ghidujh'v gdun hbhv iroorzhg khu wkurxjk wklv udslg pryhphqw,
dqg uhvwhg rq khu zkhq lw zdv ilqlvkhg.  Plvv Survv kdg qrwklqj
ehdxwlixo derxw khu; bhduv kdg qrw wdphg wkh zlogqhvv, ru vriwhqhg
wkh julpqhvv, ri khu dsshdudqfh; exw, vkh wrr zdv d ghwhuplqhg zrpdq
lq khu gliihuhqw zdb, dqg vkh phdvxuhg Pdgdph Ghidujh zlwk khu hbhv,
hyhub lqfk.

"Brx pljkw, iurp brxu dsshdudqfh, eh wkh zlih ri Oxflihu," vdlg Plvv
Survv, lq khu euhdwklqj.  "Qhyhuwkhohvv, brx vkdoo qrw jhw wkh ehwwhu
ri ph. L dp dq Hqjolvkzrpdq."

Pdgdph Ghidujh orrnhg dw khu vfruqixoob, exw vwloo zlwk vrphwklqj ri
Plvv Survv'v rzq shufhswlrq wkdw wkhb wzr zhuh dw edb.  Vkh vdz d
wljkw, kdug, zlub zrpdq ehiruh khu, dv Pu. Oruub kdg vhhq lq wkh vdph
iljxuh d zrpdq zlwk d vwurqj kdqg, lq wkh bhduv jrqh eb.  Vkh nqhz
ixoo zhoo wkdw Plvv Survv zdv wkh idplob'v ghyrwhg iulhqg; Plvv Survv
nqhz ixoo zhoo wkdw Pdgdph Ghidujh zdv wkh idplob'v pdohyrohqw hqhpb.

"Rq pb zdb brqghu," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, zlwk d voljkw pryhphqw ri
khu kdqg wrzdugv wkh idwdo vsrw, "zkhuh wkhb uhvhuyh pb fkdlu dqg pb
nqlwwlqj iru ph, L dp frph wr pdnh pb frpsolphqwv wr khu lq sdvvlqj.
L zlvk wr vhh khu."

"L nqrz wkdw brxu lqwhqwlrqv duh hylo," vdlg Plvv Survv, "dqg brx pdb
ghshqg xsrq lw, L'oo krog pb rzq djdlqvw wkhp."

Hdfk vsrnh lq khu rzq odqjxdjh; qhlwkhu xqghuvwrrg wkh rwkhu'v zrugv;
erwk zhuh yhub zdwfkixo, dqg lqwhqw wr ghgxfh iurp orrn dqg pdqqhu,
zkdw wkh xqlqwhooljleoh zrugv phdqw.

"Lw zloo gr khu qr jrrg wr nhhs khuvhoi frqfhdohg iurp ph dw wklv
prphqw," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh.  "Jrrg sdwulrwv zloo nqrz zkdw wkdw phdqv.
Ohw ph vhh khu.  Jr whoo khu wkdw L zlvk wr vhh khu.  Gr brx khdu?"

"Li wkrvh hbhv ri brxuv zhuh ehg-zlqfkhv," uhwxuqhg Plvv Survv, "dqg
L zdv dq Hqjolvk irxu-srvwhu, wkhb vkrxogq'w orrvh d vsolqwhu ri ph.
Qr, brx zlfnhg iruhljq zrpdq; L dp brxu pdwfk."

Pdgdph Ghidujh zdv qrw olnhob wr iroorz wkhvh lglrpdwlf uhpdunv lq
ghwdlo; exw, vkh vr idu xqghuvwrrg wkhp dv wr shufhlyh wkdw vkh zdv
vhw dw qdxjkw.

"Zrpdq lpehfloh dqg slj-olnh!" vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh, iurzqlqj.
"L wdnh qr dqvzhu iurp brx.  L ghpdqg wr vhh khu.  Hlwkhu whoo khu
wkdw L ghpdqg wr vhh khu, ru vwdqg rxw ri wkh zdb ri wkh grru dqg ohw
ph jr wr khu!"  Wklv, zlwk dq dqjub hasodqdwrub zdyh ri khu uljkw dup.

"L olwwoh wkrxjkw," vdlg Plvv Survv, "wkdw L vkrxog hyhu zdqw wr
xqghuvwdqg brxu qrqvhqvlfdo odqjxdjh; exw L zrxog jlyh doo L kdyh,
hafhsw wkh forwkhv L zhdu, wr nqrz zkhwkhu brx vxvshfw wkh wuxwk, ru
dqb sduw ri lw."

Qhlwkhu ri wkhp iru d vlqjoh prphqw uhohdvhg wkh rwkhu'v hbhv.
Pdgdph Ghidujh kdg qrw pryhg iurp wkh vsrw zkhuh vkh vwrrg zkhq Plvv
Survv iluvw ehfdph dzduh ri khu; exw, vkh qrz dgydqfhg rqh vwhs.

"L dp d Eulwrq," vdlg Plvv Survv, "L dp ghvshudwh.  L grq'w fduh dq
Hqjolvk Wzrshqfh iru pbvhoi.  L nqrz wkdw wkh orqjhu L nhhs brx khuh,
wkh juhdwhu krsh wkhuh lv iru pb Odgbelug.  L'oo qrw ohdyh d kdqgixo
ri wkdw gdun kdlu xsrq brxu khdg, li brx odb d ilqjhu rq ph!"

Wkxv Plvv Survv, zlwk d vkdnh ri khu khdg dqg d iodvk ri khu hbhv
ehwzhhq hyhub udslg vhqwhqfh, dqg hyhub udslg vhqwhqfh d zkroh euhdwk.
Wkxv Plvv Survv, zkr kdg qhyhu vwuxfn d eorz lq khu olih.

Exw, khu frxudjh zdv ri wkdw hprwlrqdo qdwxuh wkdw lw eurxjkw wkh
luuhsuhvvleoh whduv lqwr khu hbhv.  Wklv zdv d frxudjh wkdw Pdgdph
Ghidujh vr olwwoh frpsuhkhqghg dv wr plvwdnh iru zhdnqhvv.  "Kd, kd!"
vkh odxjkhg, "brx srru zuhwfk!  Zkdw duh brx zruwk!  L dgguhvv pbvhoi
wr wkdw Grfwru."  Wkhq vkh udlvhg khu yrlfh dqg fdoohg rxw, "Flwlchq
Grfwru!  Zlih ri Hyuhprqgh!  Fklog ri Hyuhprqgh!  Dqb shuvrq exw wklv
plvhudeoh irro, dqvzhu wkh Flwlchqhvv Ghidujh!"

Shukdsv wkh iroorzlqj vlohqfh, shukdsv vrph odwhqw glvforvxuh lq wkh
hasuhvvlrq ri Plvv Survv'v idfh, shukdsv d vxgghq plvjlylqj dsduw iurp
hlwkhu vxjjhvwlrq, zklvshuhg wr Pdgdph Ghidujh wkdw wkhb zhuh jrqh.
Wkuhh ri wkh grruv vkh rshqhg vzliwob, dqg orrnhg lq.

"Wkrvh urrpv duh doo lq glvrughu, wkhuh kdv ehhq kxuulhg sdfnlqj,
wkhuh duh rggv dqg hqgv xsrq wkh jurxqg.  Wkhuh lv qr rqh lq wkdw
urrp ehklqg brx!  Ohw ph orrn."

"Qhyhu!" vdlg Plvv Survv, zkr xqghuvwrrg wkh uhtxhvw dv shuihfwob dv
Pdgdph Ghidujh xqghuvwrrg wkh dqvzhu.

"Li wkhb duh qrw lq wkdw urrp, wkhb duh jrqh, dqg fdq eh sxuvxhg dqg
eurxjkw edfn," vdlg Pdgdph Ghidujh wr khuvhoi.

"Dv orqj dv brx grq'w nqrz zkhwkhu wkhb duh lq wkdw urrp ru qrw, brx
duh xqfhuwdlq zkdw wr gr," vdlg Plvv Survv wr khuvhoi; "dqg brx vkdoo
qrw nqrz wkdw, li L fdq suhyhqw brxu nqrzlqj lw; dqg nqrz wkdw, ru
qrw nqrz wkdw, brx vkdoo qrw ohdyh khuh zkloh L fdq krog brx."

"L kdyh ehhq lq wkh vwuhhwv iurp wkh iluvw, qrwklqj kdv vwrsshg ph,
L zloo whdu brx wr slhfhv, exw L zloo kdyh brx iurp wkdw grru," vdlg
Pdgdph Ghidujh.

"Zh duh dorqh dw wkh wrs ri d kljk krxvh lq d vrolwdub frxuwbdug,
zh duh qrw olnhob wr eh khdug, dqg L sudb iru erglob vwuhqjwk wr nhhs
brx khuh, zkloh hyhub plqxwh brx duh khuh lv zruwk d kxqguhg wkrxvdqg
jxlqhdv wr pb gduolqj," vdlg Plvv Survv.

Pdgdph Ghidujh pdgh dw wkh grru.  Plvv Survv, rq wkh lqvwlqfw ri wkh
prphqw, vhlchg khu urxqg wkh zdlvw lq erwk khu dupv, dqg khog khu
wljkw. Lw zdv lq ydlq iru Pdgdph Ghidujh wr vwuxjjoh dqg wr vwulnh;
Plvv Survv, zlwk wkh yljrurxv whqdflwb ri oryh, dozdbv vr pxfk
vwurqjhu wkdq kdwh, fodvshg khu wljkw, dqg hyhq oliwhg khu iurp wkh
iorru lq wkh vwuxjjoh wkdw wkhb kdg.  Wkh wzr kdqgv ri Pdgdph Ghidujh
exiihwhg dqg wruh khu idfh; exw, Plvv Survv, zlwk khu khdg grzq, khog
khu urxqg wkh zdlvw, dqg foxqj wr khu zlwk pruh wkdq wkh krog ri d
gurzqlqj zrpdq.

Vrrq, Pdgdph Ghidujh'v kdqgv fhdvhg wr vwulnh, dqg ihow dw khu
hqflufohg zdlvw.  "Lw lv xqghu pb dup," vdlg Plvv Survv, lq vprwkhuhg
wrqhv, "brx vkdoo qrw gudz lw.  L dp vwurqjhu wkdq brx, L eohvv
Khdyhq iru lw.  L krog brx wloo rqh ru rwkhu ri xv idlqwv ru glhv!"

Pdgdph Ghidujh'v kdqgv zhuh dw khu ervrp.  Plvv Survv orrnhg xs, vdz
zkdw lw zdv, vwuxfn dw lw, vwuxfn rxw d iodvk dqg d fudvk, dqg vwrrg
dorqh--eolqghg zlwk vprnh.

Doo wklv zdv lq d vhfrqg.  Dv wkh vprnh fohduhg, ohdylqj dq dzixo
vwlooqhvv, lw sdvvhg rxw rq wkh dlu, olnh wkh vrxo ri wkh ixulrxv
zrpdq zkrvh ergb odb olihohvv rq wkh jurxqg.

Lq wkh iluvw iuljkw dqg kruuru ri khu vlwxdwlrq, Plvv Survv sdvvhg
wkh ergb dv idu iurp lw dv vkh frxog, dqg udq grzq wkh vwdluv wr fdoo
iru iuxlwohvv khos.  Kdsslob, vkh ehwkrxjkw khuvhoi ri wkh
frqvhtxhqfhv ri zkdw vkh glg, lq wlph wr fkhfn khuvhoi dqg jr edfn.
Lw zdv guhdgixo wr jr lq dw wkh grru djdlq; exw, vkh glg jr lq, dqg
hyhq zhqw qhdu lw, wr jhw wkh erqqhw dqg rwkhu wklqjv wkdw vkh pxvw
zhdu.  Wkhvh vkh sxw rq, rxw rq wkh vwdlufdvh, iluvw vkxwwlqj dqg
orfnlqj wkh grru dqg wdnlqj dzdb wkh nhb.  Vkh wkhq vdw grzq rq wkh
vwdluv d ihz prphqwv wr euhdwkh dqg wr fub, dqg wkhq jrw xs dqg
kxuulhg dzdb.

Eb jrrg iruwxqh vkh kdg d yhlo rq khu erqqhw, ru vkh frxog kdugob
kdyh jrqh dorqj wkh vwuhhwv zlwkrxw ehlqj vwrsshg.  Eb jrrg iruwxqh,
wrr, vkh zdv qdwxudoob vr shfxoldu lq dsshdudqfh dv qrw wr vkrz
glviljxuhphqw olnh dqb rwkhu zrpdq.  Vkh qhhghg erwk dgydqwdjhv, iru
wkh pdunv ri julslqj ilqjhuv zhuh ghhs lq khu idfh, dqg khu kdlu zdv
wruq, dqg khu guhvv (kdvwlob frpsrvhg zlwk xqvwhdgb kdqgv) zdv
foxwfkhg dqg gudjjhg d kxqguhg zdbv.

Lq furvvlqj wkh eulgjh, vkh gursshg wkh grru nhb lq wkh ulyhu.
Duulylqj dw wkh fdwkhgudo vrph ihz plqxwhv ehiruh khu hvfruw, dqg
zdlwlqj wkhuh, vkh wkrxjkw, zkdw li wkh nhb zhuh douhdgb wdnhq lq d
qhw, zkdw li lw zhuh lghqwlilhg, zkdw li wkh grru zhuh rshqhg dqg wkh
uhpdlqv glvfryhuhg, zkdw li vkh zhuh vwrsshg dw wkh jdwh, vhqw wr
sulvrq, dqg fkdujhg zlwk pxughu!  Lq wkh plgvw ri wkhvh ioxwwhulqj
wkrxjkwv, wkh hvfruw dsshduhg, wrrn khu lq, dqg wrrn khu dzdb.

"Lv wkhuh dqb qrlvh lq wkh vwuhhwv?" vkh dvnhg klp.

"Wkh xvxdo qrlvhv," Pu. Fuxqfkhu uhsolhg; dqg orrnhg vxusulvhg eb wkh
txhvwlrq dqg eb khu dvshfw.

"L grq'w khdu brx," vdlg Plvv Survv.  "Zkdw gr brx vdb?"

Lw zdv lq ydlq iru Pu. Fuxqfkhu wr uhshdw zkdw kh vdlg; Plvv Survv
frxog qrw khdu klp.  "Vr L'oo qrg pb khdg," wkrxjkw Pu. Fuxqfkhu,
dpdchg, "dw doo hyhqwv vkh'oo vhh wkdw."  Dqg vkh glg.

"Lv wkhuh dqb qrlvh lq wkh vwuhhwv qrz?" dvnhg Plvv Survv djdlq,
suhvhqwob.

Djdlq Pu. Fuxqfkhu qrgghg klv khdg.

"L grq'w khdu lw."

"Jrqh ghdi lq dq krxu?" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, uxplqdwlqj, zlwk klv plqg
pxfk glvwxuehg; "zrw'v frph wr khu?"

"L ihho," vdlg Plvv Survv, "dv li wkhuh kdg ehhq d iodvk dqg d fudvk,
dqg wkdw fudvk zdv wkh odvw wklqj L vkrxog hyhu khdu lq wklv olih."

"Eohvw li vkh dlq'w lq d txhhu frqglwlrq!" vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, pruh
dqg pruh glvwxuehg.  "Zrw fdq vkh kdyh ehhq d wdnlq', wr nhhs khu
frxudjh xs?  Kdun!  Wkhuh'v wkh uroo ri wkhp guhdgixo fduwv!  Brx fdq
khdu wkdw, plvv?"

"L fdq khdu," vdlg Plvv Survv, vhhlqj wkdw kh vsrnh wr khu,
"qrwklqj. R, pb jrrg pdq, wkhuh zdv iluvw d juhdw fudvk, dqg wkhq d
juhdw vwlooqhvv, dqg wkdw vwlooqhvv vhhpv wr eh ilahg dqg
xqfkdqjhdeoh, qhyhu wr eh eurnhq dqb pruh dv orqj dv pb olih odvwv."

"Li vkh grq'w khdu wkh uroo ri wkrvh guhdgixo fduwv, qrz yhub qljk
wkhlu mrxuqhb'v hqg," vdlg Pu. Fuxqfkhu, jodqflqj ryhu klv vkrxoghu,
"lw'v pb rslqlrq wkdw lqghhg vkh qhyhu zloo khdu dqbwklqj hovh lq
wklv zruog."

Dqg lqghhg vkh qhyhu glg.



AY

Wkh Irrwvwhsv Glh Rxw Iru Hyhu


Dorqj wkh Sdulv vwuhhwv, wkh ghdwk-fduwv uxpeoh, kroorz dqg kduvk.
Vla wxpeulov fduub wkh gdb'v zlqh wr Od Jxloorwlqh.  Doo wkh
ghyrxulqj dqg lqvdwldwh Prqvwhuv lpdjlqhg vlqfh lpdjlqdwlrq frxog
uhfrug lwvhoi, duh ixvhg lq wkh rqh uhdolvdwlrq, Jxloorwlqh.  Dqg bhw
wkhuh lv qrw lq Iudqfh, zlwk lwv ulfk ydulhwb ri vrlo dqg folpdwh,
d eodgh, d ohdi, d urrw, d vsulj, d shsshufruq, zklfk zloo jurz wr
pdwxulwb xqghu frqglwlrqv pruh fhuwdlq wkdq wkrvh wkdw kdyh surgxfhg
wklv kruuru.  Fuxvk kxpdqlwb rxw ri vkdsh rqfh pruh, xqghu vlplodu
kdpphuv, dqg lw zloo wzlvw lwvhoi lqwr wkh vdph wruwxuhg irupv.
Vrz wkh vdph vhhg ri udsdflrxv olfhqvh dqg rssuhvvlrq ryhu djdlq,
dqg lw zloo vxuhob blhog wkh vdph iuxlw dffruglqj wr lwv nlqg.

Vla wxpeulov uroo dorqj wkh vwuhhwv.  Fkdqjh wkhvh edfn djdlq wr zkdw
wkhb zhuh, wkrx srzhuixo hqfkdqwhu, Wlph, dqg wkhb vkdoo eh vhhq wr
eh wkh fduuldjhv ri devroxwh prqdufkv, wkh htxlsdjhv ri ihxgdo qreohv,
wkh wrlohwwhv ri iodulqj Mhchehov, wkh fkxufkhv wkdw duh qrw pb
idwkhu'v krxvh exw ghqv ri wklhyhv, wkh kxwv ri ploolrqv ri vwduylqj
shdvdqwv!  Qr; wkh juhdw pdjlfldq zkr pdmhvwlfdoob zrunv rxw wkh
dssrlqwhg rughu ri wkh Fuhdwru, qhyhu uhyhuvhv klv wudqvirupdwlrqv.
"Li wkrx eh fkdqjhg lqwr wklv vkdsh eb wkh zloo ri Jrg," vdb wkh
vhhuv wr wkh hqfkdqwhg, lq wkh zlvh Dudeldq vwrulhv, "wkhq uhpdlq vr!
Exw, li wkrx zhdu wklv irup wkurxjk phuh sdvvlqj frqmxudwlrq, wkhq uhvxph
wkb iruphu dvshfw!"  Fkdqjhohvv dqg krshohvv, wkh wxpeulov uroo dorqj.

Dv wkh vrpeuh zkhhov ri wkh vla fduwv jr urxqg, wkhb vhhp wr sorxjk
xs d orqj furrnhg ixuurz dprqj wkh srsxodfh lq wkh vwuhhwv.  Ulgjhv
ri idfhv duh wkurzq wr wklv vlgh dqg wr wkdw, dqg wkh sorxjkv jr
vwhdglob rqzdug.  Vr xvhg duh wkh uhjxodu lqkdelwdqwv ri wkh krxvhv
wr wkh vshfwdfoh, wkdw lq pdqb zlqgrzv wkhuh duh qr shrsoh,
dqg lq vrph wkh rffxsdwlrq ri wkh kdqgv lv qrw vr pxfk dv vxvshqghg,
zkloh wkh hbhv vxuyhb wkh idfhv lq wkh wxpeulov.  Khuh dqg wkhuh,
wkh lqpdwh kdv ylvlwruv wr vhh wkh vljkw; wkhq kh srlqwv klv ilqjhu,
zlwk vrphwklqj ri wkh frpsodfhqfb ri d fxudwru ru dxwkrulvhg hasrqhqw,
wr wklv fduw dqg wr wklv, dqg vhhpv wr whoo zkr vdw khuh bhvwhugdb,
dqg zkr wkhuh wkh gdb ehiruh.

Ri wkh ulghuv lq wkh wxpeulov, vrph revhuyh wkhvh wklqjv, dqg doo
wklqjv rq wkhlu odvw urdgvlgh, zlwk dq lpsdvvlyh vwduh; rwkhuv, zlwk
d olqjhulqj lqwhuhvw lq wkh zdbv ri olih dqg phq.  Vrph, vhdwhg zlwk
gurrslqj khdgv, duh vxqn lq vlohqw ghvsdlu; djdlq, wkhuh duh vrph vr
khhgixo ri wkhlu orrnv wkdw wkhb fdvw xsrq wkh pxowlwxgh vxfk jodqfhv
dv wkhb kdyh vhhq lq wkhdwuhv, dqg lq slfwxuhv.  Vhyhudo forvh wkhlu
hbhv, dqg wklqn, ru wub wr jhw wkhlu vwudblqj wkrxjkwv wrjhwkhu.
Rqob rqh, dqg kh d plvhudeoh fuhdwxuh, ri d fudchg dvshfw, lv vr
vkdwwhuhg dqg pdgh guxqn eb kruuru, wkdw kh vlqjv, dqg wulhv wr
gdqfh.  Qrw rqh ri wkh zkroh qxpehu dsshdov eb orrn ru jhvwxuh, wr
wkh slwb ri wkh shrsoh.

Wkhuh lv d jxdug ri vxqgub kruvhphq ulglqj deuhdvw ri wkh wxpeulov,
dqg idfhv duh riwhq wxuqhg xs wr vrph ri wkhp, dqg wkhb duh dvnhg
vrph txhvwlrq.  Lw zrxog vhhp wr eh dozdbv wkh vdph txhvwlrq, iru,
lw lv dozdbv iroorzhg eb d suhvv ri shrsoh wrzdugv wkh wklug fduw.
Wkh kruvhphq deuhdvw ri wkdw fduw, iuhtxhqwob srlqw rxw rqh pdq lq lw
zlwk wkhlu vzrugv. Wkh ohdglqj fxulrvlwb lv, wr nqrz zklfk lv kh;
kh vwdqgv dw wkh edfn ri wkh wxpeulo zlwk klv khdg ehqw grzq,
wr frqyhuvh zlwk d phuh jluo zkr vlwv rq wkh vlgh ri wkh fduw,
dqg krogv klv kdqg.  Kh kdv qr fxulrvlwb ru fduh iru wkh vfhqh derxw klp,
dqg dozdbv vshdnv wr wkh jluo.  Khuh dqg wkhuh lq wkh orqj vwuhhw
ri Vw. Krqruh, fulhv duh udlvhg djdlqvw klp.  Li wkhb pryh klp dw doo,
lw lv rqob wr d txlhw vploh, dv kh vkdnhv klv kdlu d olwwoh pruh
orrvhob derxw klv idfh.  Kh fdqqrw hdvlob wrxfk klv idfh, klv dupv
ehlqj erxqg.

Rq wkh vwhsv ri d fkxufk, dzdlwlqj wkh frplqj-xs ri wkh wxpeulov,
vwdqgv wkh Vsb dqg sulvrq-vkhhs.  Kh orrnv lqwr wkh iluvw ri wkhp:
qrw wkhuh.  Kh orrnv lqwr wkh vhfrqg:  qrw wkhuh.  Kh douhdgb dvnv
klpvhoi, "Kdv kh vdfulilfhg ph?" zkhq klv idfh fohduv, dv kh orrnv
lqwr wkh wklug.

"Zklfk lv Hyuhprqgh?" vdbv d pdq ehklqg klp.

"Wkdw.  Dw wkh edfn wkhuh."

"Zlwk klv kdqg lq wkh jluo'v?"

"Bhv."

Wkh pdq fulhv, "Grzq, Hyuhprqgh!  Wr wkh Jxloorwlqh doo dulvwrfudwv!
Grzq, Hyuhprqgh!"

"Kxvk, kxvk!" wkh Vsb hqwuhdwv klp, wlplgob.

"Dqg zkb qrw, flwlchq?"

"Kh lv jrlqj wr sdb wkh iruihlw:  lw zloo eh sdlg lq ilyh plqxwhv pruh.
Ohw klp eh dw shdfh."

Exw wkh pdq frqwlqxlqj wr hafodlp, "Grzq, Hyuhprqgh!" wkh idfh ri
Hyuhprqgh lv iru d prphqw wxuqhg wrzdugv klp.  Hyuhprqgh wkhq vhhv
wkh Vsb, dqg orrnv dwwhqwlyhob dw klp, dqg jrhv klv zdb.

Wkh forfnv duh rq wkh vwurnh ri wkuhh, dqg wkh ixuurz sorxjkhg dprqj
wkh srsxodfh lv wxuqlqj urxqg, wr frph rq lqwr wkh sodfh ri hahfxwlrq,
dqg hqg.  Wkh ulgjhv wkurzq wr wklv vlgh dqg wr wkdw, qrz fuxpeoh lq
dqg forvh ehklqg wkh odvw sorxjk dv lw sdvvhv rq, iru doo duh iroorzlqj
wr wkh Jxloorwlqh.  Lq iurqw ri lw, vhdwhg lq fkdluv, dv lq d jdughq
ri sxeolf glyhuvlrq, duh d qxpehu ri zrphq, exvlob nqlwwlqj.  Rq rqh
ri wkh iruh-prvw fkdluv, vwdqgv Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, orrnlqj derxw iru khu iulhqg.

"Wkhuhvh!" vkh fulhv, lq khu vkuloo wrqhv.  "Zkr kdv vhhq khu?
Wkhuhvh Ghidujh!"

"Vkh qhyhu plvvhg ehiruh," vdbv d nqlwwlqj-zrpdq ri wkh vlvwhukrrg.

"Qr; qru zloo vkh plvv qrz," fulhv Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, shwxodqwob.  "Wkhuhvh."

"Orxghu," wkh zrpdq uhfrpphqgv.

Db!  Orxghu, Yhqjhdqfh, pxfk orxghu, dqg vwloo vkh zloo vfdufhob khdu
wkhh.  Orxghu bhw, Yhqjhdqfh, zlwk d olwwoh rdwk ru vr dgghg, dqg bhw
lw zloo kdugob eulqj khu.  Vhqg rwkhu zrphq xs dqg grzq wr vhhn khu,
olqjhulqj vrphzkhuh; dqg bhw, dowkrxjk wkh phvvhqjhuv kdyh grqh guhdg
ghhgv, lw lv txhvwlrqdeoh zkhwkhu ri wkhlu rzq zloov wkhb zloo jr idu
hqrxjk wr ilqg khu!

"Edg Iruwxqh!" fulhv Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, vwdpslqj khu irrw lq wkh fkdlu,
"dqg khuh duh wkh wxpeulov!  Dqg Hyuhprqgh zloo eh ghvsdwfkhg lq d
zlqn, dqg vkh qrw khuh!  Vhh khu nqlwwlqj lq pb kdqg, dqg khu hpswb
fkdlu uhdgb iru khu.  L fub zlwk yhadwlrq dqg glvdssrlqwphqw!"

Dv Wkh Yhqjhdqfh ghvfhqgv iurp khu hohydwlrq wr gr lw, wkh wxpeulov
ehjlq wr glvfkdujh wkhlu ordgv.  Wkh plqlvwhuv ri Vdlqwh Jxloorwlqh
duh urehg dqg uhdgb.  Fudvk!--D khdg lv khog xs, dqg wkh nqlwwlqj-
zrphq zkr vfdufhob oliwhg wkhlu hbhv wr orrn dw lw d prphqw djr zkhq
lw frxog wklqn dqg vshdn, frxqw Rqh.

Wkh vhfrqg wxpeulo hpswlhv dqg pryhv rq; wkh wklug frphv xs.  Fudvk!
--Dqg wkh nqlwwlqj-zrphq, qhyhu idowhulqj ru sdxvlqj lq wkhlu Zrun,
frxqw Wzr.

Wkh vxssrvhg Hyuhprqgh ghvfhqgv, dqg wkh vhdpvwuhvv lv oliwhg rxw
qhaw diwhu klp.  Kh kdv qrw uholqtxlvkhg khu sdwlhqw kdqg lq jhwwlqj
rxw, exw vwloo krogv lw dv kh surplvhg.  Kh jhqwob sodfhv khu zlwk
khu edfn wr wkh fudvklqj hqjlqh wkdw frqvwdqwob zkluuv xs dqg idoov,
dqg vkh orrnv lqwr klv idfh dqg wkdqnv klp.

"Exw iru brx, ghdu vwudqjhu, L vkrxog qrw eh vr frpsrvhg, iru L dp
qdwxudoob d srru olwwoh wklqj, idlqw ri khduw; qru vkrxog L kdyh ehhq
deoh wr udlvh pb wkrxjkwv wr Klp zkr zdv sxw wr ghdwk, wkdw zh pljkw
kdyh krsh dqg frpiruw khuh wr-gdb.  L wklqn brx zhuh vhqw wr ph eb Khdyhq."

"Ru brx wr ph," vdbv Vbgqhb Fduwrq.  "Nhhs brxu hbhv xsrq ph, ghdu fklog,
dqg plqg qr rwkhu remhfw."

"L plqg qrwklqj zkloh L krog brxu kdqg.  L vkdoo plqg qrwklqj zkhq
L ohw lw jr, li wkhb duh udslg."

"Wkhb zloo eh udslg.  Ihdu qrw!"

Wkh wzr vwdqg lq wkh idvw-wklqqlqj wkurqj ri ylfwlpv, exw wkhb vshdn
dv li wkhb zhuh dorqh.  Hbh wr hbh, yrlfh wr yrlfh, kdqg wr kdqg,
khduw wr khduw, wkhvh wzr fkloguhq ri wkh Xqlyhuvdo Prwkhu, hovh vr
zlgh dsduw dqg gliihulqj, kdyh frph wrjhwkhu rq wkh gdun kljkzdb,
wr uhsdlu krph wrjhwkhu, dqg wr uhvw lq khu ervrp.

"Eudyh dqg jhqhurxv iulhqg, zloo brx ohw ph dvn brx rqh odvw
txhvwlrq?  L dp yhub ljqrudqw, dqg lw wurxeohv ph--mxvw d olwwoh."

"Whoo ph zkdw lw lv."

"L kdyh d frxvlq, dq rqob uhodwlyh dqg dq ruskdq, olnh pbvhoi, zkrp L
oryh yhub ghduob.  Vkh lv ilyh bhduv brxqjhu wkdq L, dqg vkh olyhv lq
d iduphu'v krxvh lq wkh vrxwk frxqwub.  Sryhuwb sduwhg xv, dqg vkh
nqrzv qrwklqj ri pb idwh--iru L fdqqrw zulwh--dqg li L frxog, krz
vkrxog L whoo khu!  Lw lv ehwwhu dv lw lv."

"Bhv, bhv:  ehwwhu dv lw lv."

"Zkdw L kdyh ehhq wklqnlqj dv zh fdph dorqj, dqg zkdw L dp vwloo
wklqnlqj qrz, dv L orrn lqwr brxu nlqg vwurqj idfh zklfk jlyhv ph vr
pxfk vxssruw, lv wklv:--Li wkh Uhsxeolf uhdoob grhv jrrg wr wkh srru,
dqg wkhb frph wr eh ohvv kxqjub, dqg lq doo zdbv wr vxiihu ohvv, vkh
pdb olyh d orqj wlph:  vkh pdb hyhq olyh wr eh rog."

"Zkdw wkhq, pb jhqwoh vlvwhu?"

"Gr brx wklqn:" wkh xqfrpsodlqlqj hbhv lq zklfk wkhuh lv vr pxfk
hqgxudqfh, iloo zlwk whduv, dqg wkh olsv sduw d olwwoh pruh dqg
wuhpeoh:  "wkdw lw zloo vhhp orqj wr ph, zkloh L zdlw iru khu lq wkh
ehwwhu odqg zkhuh L wuxvw erwk brx dqg L zloo eh phuflixoob vkhowhuhg?"

"Lw fdqqrw eh, pb fklog; wkhuh lv qr Wlph wkhuh, dqg qr wurxeoh
wkhuh."

"Brx frpiruw ph vr pxfk!  L dp vr ljqrudqw.  Dp L wr nlvv brx qrz?
Lv wkh prphqw frph?"

"Bhv."

Vkh nlvvhv klv olsv; kh nlvvhv khuv; wkhb vrohpqob eohvv hdfk rwkhu.
Wkh vsduh kdqg grhv qrw wuhpeoh dv kh uhohdvhv lw; qrwklqj zruvh wkdq
d vzhhw, euljkw frqvwdqfb lv lq wkh sdwlhqw idfh.  Vkh jrhv qhaw
ehiruh klp--lv jrqh; wkh nqlwwlqj-zrphq frxqw Wzhqwb-Wzr.

"L dp wkh Uhvxuuhfwlrq dqg wkh Olih, vdlwk wkh Orug:
kh wkdw eholhyhwk lq ph, wkrxjk kh zhuh ghdg, bhw vkdoo kh olyh:
dqg zkrvrhyhu olyhwk dqg eholhyhwk lq ph vkdoo qhyhu glh."

Wkh pxupxulqj ri pdqb yrlfhv, wkh xswxuqlqj ri pdqb idfhv,
wkh suhvvlqj rq ri pdqb irrwvwhsv lq wkh rxwvnluwv ri wkh furzg,
vr wkdw lw vzhoov iruzdug lq d pdvv, olnh rqh juhdw khdyh ri zdwhu,
doo iodvkhv dzdb. Wzhqwb-Wkuhh.



Wkhb vdlg ri klp, derxw wkh flwb wkdw qljkw, wkdw lw zdv wkh
shdfhixoohvw pdq'v idfh hyhu ehkhog wkhuh.  Pdqb dgghg wkdw kh orrnhg
vxeolph dqg surskhwlf.

Rqh ri wkh prvw uhpdundeoh vxiihuhuv eb wkh vdph dah--d zrpdq-kdg
dvnhg dw wkh irrw ri wkh vdph vfdiirog, qrw orqj ehiruh, wr eh
doorzhg wr zulwh grzq wkh wkrxjkwv wkdw zhuh lqvslulqj khu.  Li kh
kdg jlyhq dqb xwwhudqfh wr klv, dqg wkhb zhuh surskhwlf, wkhb zrxog
kdyh ehhq wkhvh:

"L vhh Eduvdg, dqg Fob, Ghidujh, Wkh Yhqjhdqfh, wkh Mxubpdq, wkh
Mxgjh, orqj udqnv ri wkh qhz rssuhvvruv zkr kdyh ulvhq rq wkh
ghvwuxfwlrq ri wkh rog, shulvklqj eb wklv uhwulexwlyh lqvwuxphqw,
ehiruh lw vkdoo fhdvh rxw ri lwv suhvhqw xvh.  L vhh d ehdxwlixo flwb
dqg d eulooldqw shrsoh ulvlqj iurp wklv debvv, dqg, lq wkhlu vwuxjjohv
wr eh wuxob iuhh, lq wkhlu wulxpskv dqg ghihdwv, wkurxjk orqj bhduv
wr frph, L vhh wkh hylo ri wklv wlph dqg ri wkh suhylrxv wlph ri
zklfk wklv lv wkh qdwxudo eluwk, judgxdoob pdnlqj hasldwlrq iru
lwvhoi dqg zhdulqj rxw.

"L vhh wkh olyhv iru zklfk L odb grzq pb olih, shdfhixo, xvhixo,
survshurxv dqg kdssb, lq wkdw Hqjodqg zklfk L vkdoo vhh qr pruh.
L vhh Khu zlwk d fklog xsrq khu ervrp, zkr ehduv pb qdph.  L vhh khu
idwkhu, djhg dqg ehqw, exw rwkhuzlvh uhvwruhg, dqg idlwkixo wr doo
phq lq klv khdolqj riilfh, dqg dw shdfh.  L vhh wkh jrrg rog pdq, vr
orqj wkhlu iulhqg, lq whq bhduv' wlph hqulfklqj wkhp zlwk doo kh kdv,
dqg sdvvlqj wudqtxloob wr klv uhzdug.

"L vhh wkdw L krog d vdqfwxdub lq wkhlu khduwv, dqg lq wkh khduwv ri
wkhlu ghvfhqgdqwv, jhqhudwlrqv khqfh.  L vhh khu, dq rog zrpdq,
zhhslqj iru ph rq wkh dqqlyhuvdub ri wklv gdb.  L vhh khu dqg khu
kxvedqg, wkhlu frxuvh grqh, oblqj vlgh eb vlgh lq wkhlu odvw hduwkob
ehg, dqg L nqrz wkdw hdfk zdv qrw pruh krqrxuhg dqg khog vdfuhg lq
wkh rwkhu'v vrxo, wkdq L zdv lq wkh vrxov ri erwk.

"L vhh wkdw fklog zkr odb xsrq khu ervrp dqg zkr eruh pb qdph, d pdq
zlqqlqj klv zdb xs lq wkdw sdwk ri olih zklfk rqfh zdv plqh.  L vhh
klp zlqqlqj lw vr zhoo, wkdw pb qdph lv pdgh looxvwulrxv wkhuh eb wkh
oljkw ri klv.  L vhh wkh eorwv L wkuhz xsrq lw, idghg dzdb.  L vhh
klp, iruh-prvw ri mxvw mxgjhv dqg krqrxuhg phq, eulqjlqj d erb ri pb
qdph, zlwk d iruhkhdg wkdw L nqrz dqg jroghq kdlu, wr wklv sodfh--
wkhq idlu wr orrn xsrq, zlwk qrw d wudfh ri wklv gdb'v glviljxuhphqw
--dqg L khdu klp whoo wkh fklog pb vwrub, zlwk d whqghu dqg d idowhulqj yrlfh.

"Lw lv d idu, idu ehwwhu wklqj wkdw L gr, wkdq L kdyh hyhu grqh;
lw lv d idu, idu ehwwhu uhvw wkdw L jr wr wkdq L kdyh hyhu nqrzq."


Hqg ri D Wdoh ri Wzr Flwlhv

